23737417
Komatsu_D475A
type          Bulldozer/ripperThe Komatsu D475A is the second largest bulldozer in the Komatsu line after the D575A, the worlds largest production bulldozer. The current version is the ,  D475A-5 Tier 2. There are several versions of the D475A that are  used in mining, mining, quarries and construction worldwide.The  D475A-1 was introduced in 1986 as a replacement for the  D455A.See also* D575A* D10* D11References** ref          External links* Komatsu America Corp. D475A-5 Tier 2 product page (archived from the original on 2010-10-26)* Komatsu D475A-5 With Tier 2 Engine Product Brochure AESS724-00 04/06 (EV-1) (archived from the original on 2010-10-26)
23749226
Mythology_of_The_X-Files
The mythology of X-Files, sometimes referred to as its mytharc by the shows staff and fans, follows the quest of Special Agents Mulder (Duchovny), a believer in supernatural phenomena, and Scully (Anderson), his skeptical partner. Their boss, Assistant Director Skinner was also often involved. Beginning with season 8, another skeptic named Doggett, and Reyes, a believer like Mulder, were also introduced. The overarching story, which spans events as early as the 1940s, is built around a government conspiracy to hide the truth about alien existence and their doomsday plan. Not all episodes advanced the mythology plot, but the ones that did were often set up by Mulder via an opening monologue.Most mythological elements in The X-Files relate to extraterrestrial beings, referred to by the writers as Colonists, whose primary goal is to colonize Earth. Late in the series, this was revealed to have been planned for the year 2012. Chronology  Season 1 Prior to the events of the series, the X-Filesa collection of cases deemed unsolvable by the FBIwere investigated solely by Agent Mulder (Duchovny). In an attempt to debunk Mulders work, FBI Division Chief Scott Blevins assigned Agent Scully (Anderson) to the X-Files as Mulders partner. Smoking Man (B. Davis), a mysterious government figure, attended Scullys initial meeting with Blevins. Mulder and Scullys first case together involved a series of alien abductions in Bellefleur, Oregon. While investigating the case, Mulder explained his motivation to Scully; he became obsessed with aliens after the mysterious disappearance of his younger sister, Samantha, in 1973. It has only been due to his connections in Congress that he was able to continue his work on the highly unorthodox X-Files. The agents investigation revealed that the aliens were removing evidence of their experiments by controlling a paralyzed abductee, Billy Miles, who eventually recovered and testified about his experiences.()During their first year together, Mulder and Scully investigated a variety of cases involving extraterrestrial phenomena. While looking into the disappearance of an Air Force pilot in Idaho, Mulder was approached by a mysterious man that Mulder called Deep Throat. He claimed to have an interest in Mulders work, becoming his informant from that point onwards.() The agents also investigated the abduction of a woman in Iowa,() and the cover-up of a UFO crash in Wisconsin. During the latter investigation, they met Max Fenig, a multiple abductee.() Mulders actions on this case prompted Section Chief McGrath to shut down the X-Files, but his decision was vetoed by Deep Throat. However, Deep Throats trust was tested after he lied to him regarding an investigation involving a captured extraterrestrial. During this case, Mulder introduces Scully to Lone Gunmen, an extreme government watchdog group.()Based on a tip from Deep Throat they discover experimentation involving the creation of alien-human hybrids in Maryland. A mysterious assassin starts killing all those involved and captures Mulder. To save Mulder, Deep Throat helps Scully steal an alien fetus from Fort Marlene, Maryland. While Mulders captors make the exchange, Deep Throat is killed. Shortly afterward, the X-Files is shut down by Mulder and Scullys new boss, Assistant Director Skinner (Pileggi).() Season 2 Scully is reassigned to teach at the FBI Academy while Mulder is given lowly surveillance assignments. After he investigates of extraterrestrial cases at Arecibo Observatory in Rico, (), Mulder is given a new partner, Krycek (Lea), and meets a new informant, X (Williams).() Mulder is recruited to assist in a hostage negotiation crisis when Duane Barry, an alien abductee, holds four people hostage. When Barry is captured, an alien implant is removed from his body, which Mulder provides to Scully for further analysis.()Barry escapes from the hospital and kidnaps Scully, believing that if he brings her to the original abduction site, Skyland Mountain, the aliens will take her instead of him. Mulder heads there but is delayed by Krycek, who is revealed to be an agent working for the Smoking Man (B. Davis). By the time Mulder makes it to the top of the mountain Scully is gone. Barry, who insists that aliens took her dies soon afterward following an interrogation by Krycek. When Krycek vanishes, Skinner re-opens the X-Files, claiming thats what the conspirators will fear most.()Scully turns up comatose in a hospital three months later close to death with no explanation about how she got there. Mulder is insistent that the Cigarette Smoking Man is to blame for what happened to Scully, and using a go-between, Skinner provides him with his address. Mulder confronts the Cigarette Smoking Man at gunpoint but is convinced that hell never know the truth if he kills him. Mulder tenders his resignation but is convinced by Skinner not to do so, who relates to him a paranormal experience he had during Vietnam. Mulder is provided the ability to get revenge on Scullys captors by X, but is convinced by Scullys sister Melissa to visit her at bedside instead. Scully recovers and returns to work shortly afterwards.() The agents later investigate a case involving alien biology being injected into teenagers in Wisconsin, and once again they encounter Deep Throats killer, who is killed by the local sheriff.()When investigating a case involving the murder of identical doctors, the agents come across a shapeshifting Alien Bounty Hunter (Brian Thompson) responsible for executing a series of alien clones. During this case a grown woman claiming to be Mulders sister Samantha appears, telling Mulder of the Bounty Hunters objectives and that she has the ability to identify him.() When Scully is kidnapped by the Bounty Hunter, Mulder is forced to trade Samantha for her. After a botched assassination attempt on the Bounty Hunter, Samantha falls into a river and is killed. It is soon however revealed that the Samantha Mulder encountered was actually one of many alien clones of Samantha, the remainder of whom are killed by the Bounty Hunter as well. Through the help of X, Mulder pursues the Bounty Hunter to his spaceship in the Arctic. Mulder is nearly killed when he is exposed to the Bounty Hunters toxic blood, but is saved by Scully.()The fourth Lone Gunman, the Thinker, hacks into the Department of Defenses files, copying decades worth of classified information on aliens onto a digital tape that he gives to Mulder. Mulder angrily finds that the entire tape is encrypted in Navajo and attacks Skinner when he talks to him about the matter. The Cigarette Smoking Man begins a frantic search for the tape and visits Mulders father, who calls Mulder to see him shortly afterwards. Before he can reveal anything to Mulder however, he is murdered by Alex Krycek. Mulder, who has been showing increasingly erratic behavior due to his water being spiked with LSD, confronts Krycek near his apartment, but Scully, fearing that Mulder will be blamed for his fathers murder if he kills him, shoots Mulder instead. Scully brings Mulder to New Mexico where she introduces him to Albert Hosteen, a code-talker who can translate the digital tape. Alberts grandson shows Mulder a boxcar filled with alien-like corpses. The Cigarette Smoking Man tracks Mulders location however and orders the boxcar burned.() Season 3 With Mulder missing, Scully returns to Washington, where she is suspended for failing to attend an OPR meeting concerning Mulders behavior. While passing through the metal detector at FBI Headquarters it goes off, causing her to discover a small metallic chip that is removed from the base of her neck. The Cigarette Smoking Man is grilled on the digital tape by his superiors, a group of old men known as the Syndicate. Mulders unconscious body is found near the boxcar and is nursed back to health by the Blessing Way chant performed by Albert Hosteen (Red Crow Westerman). Scully is approached by one of the Syndicate members, known as the Well-Manicured Man (John Neville), who warns her that she is going to be killed, either in her apartment or by someone she trusts. Scully believes this to be Skinner, but he instead reveals that he has possession of the digital tape, which he had stolen from the agents office. Scullys sister is mistakenly killed in Scullys apartment by Krycek and Luis Cardinal.() Mulder returns to Washington and along with Scully track down a Victor Klemper, who reveals to them the location of a mining facility where the agents find an elaborate filing system tracking smallpox records. Returning to Klempers home they are met by the Well Manicured Man who claims the data was collected by people like his father during the Cold War. Realizing the true intent of its use, Bill Mulder (Donat) threatened to go public so Samantha was taken to keep him quiet. Skinner hopes to exchange the digital tape for Mulder and Scullys reinstatement, but it is stolen from him by Krycek, who narrowly escapes a car bomb meant to kill him. Skinner is still able to get Mulder and Scully reinstated however by convincing the Cigarette Smoking Man that Hosteen and other Navajos memorized the contents of it.()After purchasing an alien autopsy video, Mulder captures a Japanese diplomat suspected of murdering the videos maker. Although forced to let him go, Mulder holds onto a satchel he was carrying, leading him to a ship, the Talapus, that he believes has salvaged a U.F.O. Meanwhile Scully finds a group of women who all claim to be alien abductees and claim that they recognize her. Mulder obtains a photo of World War II Japanese scientists, one of whom Scully recognizes, that he believes may be transporting an alien-human hybrid on a train.() Mulder manages to get aboard the train, and is locked in a train car containing the hybrid with an assassin and a bomb soon set to go off. Meanwhile Scully is confronted by another member of the Syndicate known as the First Elder (S. Williams), who claims during her abduction she was placed on a similar train car and experimented upon by the Japanese scientists. Mulder is saved from the traincar by X, who pulls him out seconds before it explodes.()A diver on a French vessel is possessed by an alien creature taking the form of oil. When the remainder of the crew ends up in the hospital with radiation burns, Mulder and Scully investigate. While Scully visits with an old friend of her fathers who was investigating the same thing as the French vessel during World War II, Mulder tracks down the source for the French vessel to a salvage broker who was buying government secrets on U.F.O.s from Alex Krycek, who was selling the contents of the digital tape. Meanwhile the black oil transfers to the divers wife, then to Krycek just as Mulder captures him.() Mulder attempts to get the digital tape from Krycek, but Krycek escapes and turns it over to the Cigarette Smoking Man instead in exchange for the location of the salvaged U.F.O.. Meanwhile, Skinner is shot by Cardinal for looking into why the murder case on Scullys sister was terminated. By protecting Skinner Scully is able to get her hands on her sisters killer. The agents track down the location of the salvaged U.F.O. to an abandoned missile silo but are stopped by the Cigarette Smoking Man. Meanwhile the alien exits Krycek and returns to its ship, resulting in him being locked in the silo.()The Syndicate would later attempt to discredit Skinner as an aide to the agents by staging and framing him for the murder of a prostitute in a hotel room. With the assistance of Mulder and Scully, Skinner is able to prove his innocence and ultimately kill the culprits after an apparent supernatural mediation with an ethereal manifestation that has occupied his dreams since a near death experience in Vietnam. Season 4  Season 5  Season 6  Season 7 After the events of the season six finale, Skinner and Michael Kritschgau are desperately attempting to find the truth behind the so-called alien object. Meanwhile, Mulder is still imprisoned by his own frenetic brain activity. Scully and Skinner are unaware of Special Agent Fowleys duplicity - she is working for the Smoking Man. Scully then travels to Africa to unravel the secrets of the alien artifacts, finding something that looks like a buried spaceship buried on the Coast. The object may prove that life originated elsewhere, and all religion is based on the Navajo contact with alien life.() Unsuccessful, Scully returns from Africa to revisit Mulder in D.C., but instead she finds out that he has disappeared. She contacts Kritschgau and Skinner (who is forced into betrayal by Krycek) to find her partner. The Cigarette Smoking Man has taken Mulder to a place where all his problems seem to have disappeared. Fowley helps Scully locate Mulder, which leads to her death at the hands of the Cigarette Smoking Man.()While investigating a bizarre disappearance of a young girl from her home, Mulder becomes obsessed with the number of children who have vanished in similar circumstances. Scully fears that he is emotionally involved due to his sisters disappearance.() At the same time it is revealed to him that his mother, Teena Mulder, committed suicide. He then tries to prove that his mother did not take her own life, but is ultimately forced to accept that his mothers death was by her own hand. He is led by a man whose son disappeared years earlier to another truth - that his sister may be among the souls taken by walk-ins, saving the souls of children doomed to live unhappy lives. Together they locate evidence that proves that Samantha was abducted by the Cigarette Smoking Man, and was forced to live in a now abandoned US Army base. It is later revealed that Samantha had become a walk-in spirit.()After a young boy with cancer (whose parents refuse medical treatment because it opposes Gods will) recovers miraculously, Scully is intrigued. What she soon discovers is that his cure is not miraculous, but scientific - the work of the Cigarette Smoking Man. Eager, if wary, to learn of the truth behind his secrets, Scully agrees to travel with him to acquire the cure to all mankinds diseases - but is forbidden to tell Mulder. Scully is met by a man named only as the Cobra who is willing to give her the cure, but is instead shot dead by the Black-Haired Man. Mulder is then able to contact Scully, but is too late as the Cigarette Smoking Man has destroyed the cure and all evidence of it.()Mulder and Scully investigate a case which leads them back to Oregon, as in the pilot episode. With a series of Alien abductions taking place, Mulder and Scully are contacted by Billy Miles. Scully falls ill during the investigation and returns to Washington, D.C. The Cigarette Smoking Man contacts Marita Covarrubias and Krycek (after having him incarcerated in a Tunisian prison), in an attempt to revive the government conspiracy. With Covarrubias unwilling to assist, and Krycek seeking revenge, they contact Mulder after he visits an alien crash site. Skinner and Mulder return to Oregon, while Scully is hospitalized in Washington, D.C. Mulder becomes trapped by an alien device, and is abducted by an Bounty Hunter together with Miles and several others. Skinner returns to Washington, D.C. where Scully informs him that she is pregnant.() Season 8 Scully meets Doggett (Patrick), the leader of an FBI taskforce organized to conduct a search for Mulder.() Although the search ultimately proves unsuccessful, Doggett is assigned to the X-files and works with Scully to look for explanations to several cases.() When Scully learns that several women have reportedly been abducted and impregnated with alien babies, she begins to question her own pregnancy and fears for her unborn child.()Doggett introduces Scully to Reyes (Gish), an FBI specialist in ritualistic crime, shortly before Mulders deceased body suddenly appears in a forest at night.() Following Mulders funeral, Skinner is threatened by Krycek that he must kill Scullys baby before it is born. Miles, a multiple abductee who disappeared on the same night as Mulder, is returned deceased but his dead body is resurrected and restored to full health.() Mulder also returns from death, with Scully supervising his recovery. Fully rejuvenated, Mulder investigates several X-files, against orders to do so, but soon gets fired, leaving Doggett in charge of the cases. Mulder continues to provide input on an unofficial capacity. With Scully on maternity leave, Doggett is assigned a new partner, an inexperienced agent who is obsessed with the X-files, but the relationship is only temporary.()Reluctantly accepting Kryceks assistance, Mulder, Doggett and Skinner learn that an alien virus recently created in secret by members of the States government has replaced several humans, including Miles and several high-ranking FBI personnel, with so-called alien Super Soldiers. Krycek claims that the soldiers are virtually unstoppable aliens who want to make sure that humans will not survive the colonization of Earth. They have learned that Scullys baby is a miraculously special child and are afraid that it may be greater than them. They have only recently learned of the babys importance, which is why Krycek told Skinner to kill the unborn child earlier.() When Miles arrives at the FBI Headquarters, Mulder, Doggett, Skinner and Krycek help Scully to escape with Special Agent Reyes who drives her to a remote farm. Shortly after Skinner kills Krycek, Scully delivers an apparently normal baby while the alien supersoldiers surround her. Without explanation, the aliens leave the area as Mulder arrives. While Doggett and Reyes report to the FBI Headquarters, Mulder takes Scully and her newborn baby back to her apartment.() Season 9 After the events of the season eight finale, Mulder goes into hiding. Scully is again re-assigned to the Academy and Reyes becomes Doggetts new FBI partner at the X-Files office. Doggett asks Scully for help on a case involving an EPA official who died after his car was forced off a bridge by a woman he picked up. The unknown womans identity is later found out, Shannon McMahon, being one of Doggetts former Marine associates. She reveals to Doggett that she is a Soldier. This leads them to a clandestine laboratory where a secret experiment is taking place on board on a naval ship. They later find connections with the experiments on the ship to Scullys child, William()Hopeful about reuniting with Mulder, a complete stranger offers his service to drive Mulder out of hiding. Scully takes the offer, but unknowingly gets herself and Mulder in even more danger. The Shadow Man, a government agent follows Scully. It is then known that he is a Super Soldier bent on killing Scully and Mulder. As confirmed in this episode, a Super Soldiers only weakness is magnetite, which leads to the death of the Shadow Man.() Later on, Scully, Doggett and Reyes find evidence of a dangerous UFO cult which has found a second spacecraft similar to one Scully studied in Africa two years ago (as seen in Sixth Extinction). Misled by the FBI, the agents enlist the help of Lone Gunmen to protect Scullys son after they learn that the UFO cult apparently intend to kill the child.() Doggetts gets run over by a car, leading him to be sent to the local hospital. As Follmer (Elwes) and the Toothpick Man (Dale) are trying to uncover the plans of the three agents, Scully and Reyes leaves D.C. to find Scullys son.()Doggett finds a strange disfigured man in the X-Files office; believing he is Mulder, they test his DNA. The DNA test reveals him to have the same DNA pattern as Mulder. The disfigured man sticks a needle into William, which the other agents believe to be a virus of somekind. But is later revealed to be a cure for Williams powers. The unnamed man is later revealed to be Spender (Chris Owens), Mulders half-brother.() Mulder returns from hiding to only be discovered looking for classified information at an army base and, after allegedly killing an apparently indestructible Super Soldier, he is placed on trial to defend the X-files and himself. But with the help of  Kersh, Scully, Reyes, Doggett, Spender, Marita Covarrubias (Holden) and Gibson Praise, Mulder breaks out. Mulder and Scully travels to Mexico to find an old wise man, who is later revealed to be the Smoking Man (B. Davis). The Smoking Man is later killed by commands from Knowle Rohrer (Baldwin).() Production  Conception and early work At the beginning, Chris Carter did not think of creating a mythology for the episodes focusing on extraterrestrial life, because they were just stories we wanted to tell, which involved Mulder (Duchovny) on his personal quest joined in with his partner, Scully (Anderson). Eventually, the writers saw that the most personal episodes were the ones centering on the government conspiracy. Another reason for the development of the mythology, was that the producers were afraid of not creating a thread between the episodes centering around the conspiracy, being that they felt it would be pretentious if they did not do it.()According to Carter, the mythology sprung from the pilot episode and its follow up, Deep Throat, which set up the idea that aliens had been around for many years. Carter sees the final scene of Deep Throat as the launching moment for the entire mythology. The main theme for the show starts with these episodes, being Mulders quest to find the truth about his sister, Mulder. Mulders quest for the truth helped build the mythology, since his investigation took him into cases about the paranormal.(After a series of stand-alone episodes featuring UFOs and extraterrestrials early in the first season, the shows mythology developed largely based on the pregnancy of actress Anderson, who became pregnant midway through the first season. Executive producer Spotnitz described it as the best thing that ever happened to the series., also saying This mythology really ended up running through the life of the series, all because Gillian Anderson became pregnant.() Although there were initially thoughts about Scully (Anderson) giving birth to an alien baby, ultimately the writers decided to work around Andersons pregnancy. The writers decided on closing the X-Files at the end of the season to separate Mulder and Scully from one another, and have Scully abducted, who would later reappear in a coma.() In addition to the creation of the storyline concerning Scullys abduction, Andersons reduced role in the first half of the second season permitted the writers to develop some of the other characters in the show including Assistant Director Skinner (Pileggi), Smoking Man (B. Davis) and X (Williams), and resulted in the introduction of the character Krycek (Lea).() Krycek, who was initially created by writer Gordon to temporarily replace Scully as Mulders partner for three episodes eventually grew into a character that lasted seven seasons on the show.() Creation of mythology characters Image:FrankSpotnitz.jpg|thumb|left|200px|Spotnitz at the April 2008 York Comic ConPrior to the season two episode, Breath the Smoking Man mostly lurked around in the shadows and smoked cigarettes. The Smoking Man uttered only four audible words in the entire first season of the show, all of them being in Tooms. Goodwin did not trust B. Davis to take on the part as arch-nemesis to Mulder. It was later revealed to the producers that Davis was running an acting school, and teaching such actors as Lawless, who would make an appearance in the ninth season.(In the two-part episodes Colony and End Game, Chris Carter and Spotnitz along with some help from Duchovny created what would become a character named the Bounty Hunter. According to Carter, Duchovny came to him and said it be great if we had like an alien bounty hunter? Carter was positive towards the idea.( The actor, Brian Thompson, auditioned for the role in a casting session, where he was competing with another actor. Spotnitz and Carter had not much time to cast this character, but they knew this casting would be important since they intended the character to become a character. Thompson was chosen according to Spotnitz because he had a very distinctive look about him, most notably his face and mouth. After casting him, they told Thompsons agent that he needed a cut, because he was originally envisioned as a US Air Force pilot whod been shot down. When Thompson came to Canada there had been some misunderstanding between them, and he hadnt been told of the hair cut. So the hairstyle seen in this and every episode since was a compromise between Thompson and the producers.() Mythology development: season 3-5Chris Carter admits that Duchovny was very involved in shaping the shows mythology. His first notable efforts were End Game and Anasazi. After writing the episode, Carter met up with a man who watched over the show by the Network. He wanted the show to explain the phenomena in each episode. Carter responded with: the interesting part about this for me was going to be telling stories where you left people wondering at the end, with the possibility that it could be real, but never ever stating that this is in fact the truth. Anasazi was the first episode of a three-parter where the writers introduced the government conspiracy arc following the Syndicate. Clip introduced the idea of genetic material that was taken through inoculations.(At the end of season two the oil was introduced, which was an alien creature which invaded bodies and made them into living hosts. The Black oil was able to enter through a victims mouth, eyes or nose; it would leave a victims body to get back to its original form or get a new host. Later on in the shows mythology, it is discovered that the Black oil is the Colonists lifeform; the oil was brought to Earth by meteorites to create hosts of the human population living there. The season four two-parters Tunguska and Terma hit the writers when they were trying to conceive a big and fun canvas to tell stories. So they decided to create a story which had connections to the Russian gulags, which led to a natural idea that the Russians were experimenting separately from the Syndicate to create a vaccine for the Black oil. Shiban felt it was natural creating an arms race-like story between the United States and Russia, being that the War had ended a few years earlier.(With the season five episodes Patient X and The Red and the Black, the mythology became too hard for some viewers to follow. These two episodes marked the introduction of the rebels who were fighting against the Colonists for their plan to colonize the known universe. These Alien rebels were of the same race as the Bounty Hunters. Cassandra (Cartwright) and Spender (Chris Owens) would make their first appearances in these two episodes. Two other characters, Diana Fowley (Rogers) and Gibson Praise (Jeff Gulka) were introduced to the series mythology in the season five finale, The End. The X-Files feature film and seasons 6-7  Season eight and The New X-Files The season eight premiere, Within, started the storyline following the Super Soldiers and the search for Mulder.( As Carter always believed the only way to get the audience to keep watching the show was to give them answers. So when they casted Patrick as Doggett a new lead character, since Duchovny had sued the Network and Carter for more money, while wanting to leave, the court said he must appear in 12 episodes in the eighth season and then leave.()()() When introducing Doggett into the series, they wanted to give him an enemy, this eventually led to the Super Soldiers, who rose up in Within to take on the role as the new government conspirators. The reason for creating a new enemy was to make sure not to just create a new Mulder. The original idea for the Super Soldiers was that the States Defense Department was developing genetically modified human beings, this was the non-alien explanation, while these characters eventually became the new aliens. Scully took Mulders role as a believer and handed her previous role as a skeptic to Doggett.(Carter himself has admitted that the mythology became complex and a bit too difficult to follow, and even more difficult for the writers to add more layers on to it. While saying it got more interesting in some ways but at the same time less interesting in some other ways, he said he understood why long-time fans of the show were discontent at seeing a Mulderless season, but at the same time said the new characters introduced new fans to the show who reacted positively to the changes.(Gishs character Reyes, who would become a character in season nine, made her first appearance in Is Not Happening. When creating the character for the episode, they wanted to give the character a personality who had much in common with both Mulder and Scully. Her first shot was four in the morning, her first scene in the episode was to run down a hill to discover a former abductee.() The character along with Skinner be moved up to character status in the ninth season.()The original plan for season nine was to exit both Mulder, Scully and baby William out of the storyline in the following season. Season 10 would follow a storyline where the aliens were not the central focus of the mythology, since many of the writers, most notably Spotnitz felt that the alien-conspiracy storyline had gone on long enough and played itself out. Season 10 would focus on what happened to Doggetts son, Luke, and the character of Reyes.( Reception  References  Notes  Bibliography *  External links * EatTheCorn - a site dedicated to explaining the mythology of The X-Files* * http://www.xfiles.com/* http://www.xfilesnews.com/
23759074
Hybrid_electric_truck
File:165Hybrid.jpg|thumb|Hino hybrid diesel-electric truck.A hybrid electric truck is a form of truck that uses electric vehicle (HEV) technology for propulsion, instead of using only a combustion engine.According to a report from Research, the global market for hybrid medium- and heavy-duty trucks and buses will increase from 9,000 vehicles sold in 2010 to more than 10 times more (more than 100,000 vehicles) in 2015.During this five-year period, the firm forecasts that a total of nearly 300,000 hybrid electric trucks will be sold worldwide.(http://www.pikeresearch.com/newsroom/300000-hybrid-trucks-and-buses-to-be-on-the-road-by-2015) History In 2003, GM introduced a hybrid diesel-electric military (light) truck that is equipped with a diesel electric and a fuel cell auxiliary power unit. Hybrid electric light trucks were introduced in 2004 by Benz (Sprinter) and SPA (Daily Bimodale).International Truck and Engine Corp. and Corp. have been selected to manufacture diesel-electric hybrid trucks for a U.S. pilot program that is serving the utility industry in 2004. Vehicles File:Pepcos hybrid diesel-electric bucket truck WAS 2010 8914.JPG|thumb|PEPCOs hybrid diesel-electric utility truck exhibited in the 2010 Auto Show.In mid-2005, Isuzu introduced the Elf Diesel Hybrid Truck to the Japanese market. They claim that approximately 300 vehicles, mostly route buses are using the Hinos HIMR (Hybrid Inverter Controlled Motor & Retarder) system. In 2007, high petroleum price meant a hard sell for hybrid trucks() and appears the first U.S. production hybrid truck (International DuraStar Hybrid).()Other vehicles are:* Big mining machines, for example the T 282B dump truck or Keaton Vandersteen L-2350 loader are powered that way. Also there was several models of BelAZ (7530 and 7560 series) in USSR (now in Belarus) since 1970.()*NASAs huge Crawler-Transporters are diesel-electric.*Fuso Canter Eco Hybrid is a diesel-electric commercial truck.*Motors (a Toyota subsidiary) has the worlds first production hybrid electric truck in Australia ( diesel engine plus a  motor).()*Dynamics Balance Hybrid Electric is a gasonline-hybrid electric medium dutry truck based on the Ford E-450 chassis.Other hybrid petroleum-electric truck makers are Trucks, MAN AG with TGL Series, Motors and Trucks with Puncher. Powertrains Hybrid electric truck technology and powertrain maker: Friedrichshafen, Corporation, Dynamics. Fleets Enterprises (CCE) has the largest fleet of hybrid electric trucks in North America. The hybrid electric tractors are the standard bulk truck that the company uses for large deliveries. CCE plans to incrementally deploy 185 of the hybrid electric trucks across the United States and Canada in 2009, bringing their total number of hybrid electric delivery trucks to 327, the largest such fleet in North America. The company has 142 small hybrid electric delivery vehicles on the road.() The trucks are powered by Corporations hybrid electric drivetrain systems.()In 2010, the UPS fleet in Philadelphia has expanded with 50 new hybrid electric trucks. Legislation By a vote, the States House of Representatives approved the  (for heavy duty hybrid vehicles) authored by representative Sensenbrenner. The term advanced heavy duty hybrid vehicle means a vehicle with a weight between and  that is fueled, in part, by a electricity storage system. See also * truck* vehicle conversion* conservation* electric bus* American Council for Freight Efficiency* hybrid* Retrofit* Mountain Institute References  External links * Rocky Mountain Institute announces North American Council for Freight Efficiency to help reinvent trucking and carry just as much freight on half the energy
23775979
Lesquerella_kingii
Lesquerella kingii is a species of flowering plant in the mustard family known by the common name King bladderpod. It is native to western North America from Utah to California, where it grows in dry and rocky habitat, such as deserts and adjacent mountain slopes. This is a perennial herb growing a small, hairy stem from a caudex. The leaves form a patch or rosette around the caudex, each up to 6 centimeters long and round, oval, diamond, or spoonlike in shape. The inflorescence is an erect or mostly upright raceme of bright yellow mustardlike flowers. The fruit is a hairy capsule under a centimeter long suspended on a short, often curvy pedicel.There are three subspecies. One, the San Bernardino Mountains bladderpod (ssp. bernardina), is a very rare plant known from only a few spots near Big Bear in the Bernardino Mountains of southern California. Because of threats to the plant from mining and other human activities, this subspecies is treated as an species on the federal level.(California Native Plant Society Rare Plant Profile: ssp. bernardina)ReferencesExternal links*Jepson Manual Treatment*USDA Plants Profile*Photo gallery
23784547
Garth_Paltridge
footnotes Garth William Paltridge, (born 4 April 1940, Brisbane, Queensland), is a retired Australian atmospheric physicist.  He is presently a Visiting Fellow at the National University and Emeritus Professor and Honorary Research Fellow at the Institute of Antarctic and Southern Oceans Studies (IASOS), of Tasmania.()CareerPaltridge obtained a BSc in 1961 from the of Queensland, a PhD in 1965 from of Melbourne and a DSc in 1976 from the of Queensland. He worked as a Postdoctoral Fellow at the Mexico Institute of Mining and Technology in 1966, then as Senior Research Scientist for the Radio and Space Research Station at Park, Buckinghamshire, England, from 1967-1968. In 1968 he took up a role as Research Scientist at the CSIRO, Australia, where he remained until 1981. During that time he worked briefly as a Consultant to the Meteorological Organization in 1975 in Geneva, Switzerland, where he was involved in the early development of the World Climate Program, and in 1979 he was posted as Senior Visiting Scientist at National Oceanic and Atmospheric Administration (NOAA). He was elected as a Fellow of the Academy of Science in 1980. In 1981 he was seconded as Director of the Environmental Executive of the of Petroleum, and in 1982 he returned to the CSIRO as Chief Research Scientist, where he remained until 1989. He briefly served as Senior Visiting Scientist at the National Climate Program Office from 1989-1990. From 1990 to 2002 he was Professor and Director of the Institute of Antarctic and Southern Oceans Studies at the of Tasmania and at the same time, from 19912002, he was the Chief Executive Officer of the Antarctic Co-operative Research Centre at the of Tasmania.()()Paltridge was involved in studies on stratospheric electricity, the effect of the atmosphere on plant growth and the radiation properties of clouds.( Paltridge researched topics such as the optimum design of plants and the economics of climate forecasting, and worked on atmospheric radiation and the theoretical basis of climate. In terms of scientific impact, his most significant contribution has been to show that the earth/atmosphere climate system may have adopted a format that maximises its rate of thermodynamic dissipation, i.e. entropy production. This suggests a governing constraint by a principle of maximum rate of entropy production. According to this principle, prediction of the broad-scale steady-state distribution of cloud, temperature and energy flows in the ocean and atmosphere may be possible when one has sufficient data about the system for that purpose, but does not have fully detailed data about every variable of the system.()Paltridge has published more than 100 books and scientific papers.()Selected publications*Paltridge, G. W., Global dynamics and climateA system of minimum entropy exchange, Q. J. R. Meteorol. Soc., 101, 475484, 1975.*Paltridge, G. W. and C. M. R. Platt, Radiative Processes in Meteorology and Climatology, Developments in Atmospheric Sciences, vol. 5, Elsevier Scientific Publishing Company, Amsterdam, Oxford, New York, 1976, ISBN 0-444-41444-4.*Paltridge, G. W., The steady-state format of global climate, Q. J. R. Meteorol. Soc., 104, 927945, 1978.*Paltridge, G. W., Climate and thermodynamic systems of maximum dissipation, Nature, 279, 630631, 1979.*Paltridge, G. W., Thermodynamic dissipation and the global climate system, Q. J. R. Meteorol. Soc., 107, 531547, 1981.*Paltridge, G. W., A physical basis for a maximum of thermodynamic dissipation of the climate system, Q. J. R. Meteorol. Soc., 127, 305313, 2001.*Paltridge, G. W., Stumbling into the MEP Racket: An Historical Perspective, in A. Kleidon and R. D. Lorenz eds., Non-equilibrium Thermodynamics and the Production of Entropy: life, earth, and beyond, Springer, 2005, 33-40, ISBN 3-540-22495-5.*Paltridge, G. W., G. D. Farquhar, and M. Cuntz, Maximum entropy production, cloud feedback, and climate change, Geophys. Res. Lett., 34, L14708, 2007.*Paltridge, G. W, A. Arking and M. Pook, Trends in middle- and upper-level tropospheric humidity from NCEP reanalysis data, Theor. Appl. Climatol., 98, 351-359, 2009.*Paltridge, G. W., The Climate Caper: Facts and Fallacies of Global Warming, Connor Court Publishing, Ballan, 2009, ISBN 978-1-921421-25-9.ReferencesExternal links*Garth Paltridges home page, Australian National University*Garth Paltridge, publications.
23809308
Getlio_Vargas
 signatureGetlio Vargas Signature.svgGetlio Dornelles Vargas, better known as Getlio Vargas (; April 19, 1882August 24, 1954) served as President of Brazil, first as dictator, from 1930 to 1945, and in a democratically elected term from 1951 until his suicide in 1954. Vargas led Brazil for 18 years, the most for any President, and second in Brazilian history to Emperor Pedro II. He favored nationalism, industrialization, centralization, welfare and populism  for the latter, Vargas won the nickname O Pai dos Pobres (Portuguese for The Father of the Poor). Despite his promotion of workers rights, Vargas was a staunch anti-communist.Vargas was brought to power by political outsiders and the and file of the Armed Forces in the Revolution of 1930, a reaction to his loss in rigged elections earlier that year. His ascent marked the end of the Brazilian oligarchic Old Republic and states dominated com leite politics. He successfully influenced the outcome of the following Presidential election, and instituted an authoritarian corporatist regime in 1937 known as Estado Novo (New State), prolonging his hold onto power. Vargas went on to appease and eventually dominate his supporters, and pushed his political agenda as he built a propaganda machine around his figure.Vargas sought to transform Brazil from a plantation-based economy into an industrialized powerhouse, under the guidance of government intervention. His embrace of developmentalism was expressed not only in strong rhetoric, but also by lending protection to domestic industries and in a heavy investment budget, aimed at kick-starting strategic sectors and setting up the necessary infrastructure. Vargas created state monopolies for oil (Petrobras), mining (Vale), steelmaking (Siderurgy Company), alkalis (Alkalis Company) and automobiles (Motors Factory). His policies shaped the Brazilian economic debate for decades, from the leftist governments of Kubitschek and Goulart to the Miracle in the right-wing military dictatorship. The protectionist trend was reversed with the liberal reforms of Collor and Henrique Cardoso, by the 1990s.With the global rise of democracy in the aftermath of War II, Vargas agreed to cede power in free elections, thus ending the Era. His popularity earned him a late Presidential term, but mounting pressure and political strife over his methods led him to suicide. He was the first President in the country to draw widespread support from masses, and is regarded as the most influential Brazilian politician of the twentieth century.(Hassan Arvin-Rad, Maria Jos Willumsen, Ann Dryden Witte. Industrializao e Desenvolvimento no Governo Vargas: Uma Anlise Emprica de Mudanas Estruturais. de So Paulo. Estudos Econmicos, Vol 27 No 1.) He was also a lawyer and landowner, and occupied the 37th chair of the Brazilian Academy of Letters from 1943 until his death in 1954.BackgroundVargas was born in Borja, Grande do Sul, on April 19, 1882, to Manuel do Nascimento Vargas and Cndida Dornelles Vargas. His father had origins in So Paulo, while his mother was descended from a wealthy family of Azorean Portuguese descent.(KOIFMAN, Fbio. Presidentes Do Brasil: De Deodoro A Fhc.)The son of a traditional family of gachos, he embarked on a military career at first, then turned to the study of law. Entering Republican politics, he was elected to the Rio Grande do Sul state legislature and later to the federal Chamber of Deputies in 1922, where he became the floor leader for his states delegation in Congress. He served as Finance Minister from 1926 to 1928 under President Washington Lus, from which post he resigned to enter the gubernatorial race in his home state. Once elected Governor of Grande do Sul, he became a leading figure in the opposition, urging the end of electoral corruption through the adoption of the universal and secret ballot.He and his wife Darcy Lima Sarmanho, whom he married in March 1911, had five children.According to legend, Vargass real love was not his wife but Aimee de Sa Sottomaior, later de Heeren, recognized by the international fashion press as one of the worlds most glamorous and beautiful women.(Best Dressed List)  The relationship was a Brazilian state secret, although Vargas did mention her in his diary which was published after the death of his wife.  Aimee de Herren, later living between France and the US and admired by other famous statesmen like the four Kennedy brothers, Joseph, John, Robert and Edward, never confirmed nor denied the rumor.(- Aimee de Herren, the woman in Getlios Life)Vargas and the Revolution of 1930Between the two World Wars, Brazil was a rapidly industrializing nation popularly regarded as the sleeping giant of the Americas and a potential world power. However, the oligarchic and decentralized confederation of the Old Republic, dominated by landed interests, in effect, showed little concern for promoting industrialization, urbanization, and other broad interests of the new middle class.File:Revoluo de 1930.jpg|thumb|left|Getlio Vargas (center) and his followers pictured by Claro Jansson during their short stay in Itarar (So Paulo) on the way to Rio de Janeiro after the successful Brazilian Revolution of 1930.Bourgeois and military discontent, heightened by the Depressions impact on the Brazilian economy, led to a bloodless coup dtat on October 24, 1930 that ousted President Washington Lus and the elected president Prestes. Regional leadership, dissatisfied with the state of So Paulos political dominance, gathered around the states that formed the so called Liberal Alliance - Minas Gerais, Paraba and Rio Grande do Sul.  They had backed Vargas, the defeated candidate in an electoral process that had been questioned and denounced as fraudulent by both sides, as was often the case in the period known as the Republic (18891930). Vargass Liberal Alliance drew support from wide ranges of Brazils burgeoning urban middle class and a group of tenentes, who had grown frustrated to some extent with the politics of coronelismo and com leite. The military, traditionally active in Brazilian politics, deposed Washington Lus and installed the runner-up Vargas as provisional president.Image:Cartaz Revolucionrio 1.jpg|thumb|250px|Vargas being squeezed in the hand of a giant bandeirante on a recruiting poster of the 1932 Revolution (the text reads Down with the Dictatorship).Vargas was a wealthy pro-industrial nationalist and anti-communist who favored capitalist development and liberal reforms. Opposition to him would later be radicalized in the 1932 movement that was initially aimed at the establishment of a new constitution, but was in truth an oligarchic attempt at faade democracy.The revolt was beaten, but a new constitution came out in 1934. After that, Vargas seized absolute power and controlled dissidents through press and mail censorship, stripping the country of the of most of the trappings through which it eventually might hope to become the democracy that he had purported to defend in 1930. His tenuous coalition also lacked a coherent program, being committed to a broad vision of modernization, but little more specific. Vargas long career (including his eventual dictatorship, modelled, surprisingly considering the liberal roots of his regime, almost along the lines of European Fascism), may be explained by his balancing the conflicting ideological constituencies, regionalism and economic interests within the vast, diverse and socio-economically varied nation.Interim presidencye Roosevelt.jpg|thumb|left|Vargas and Franklin Roosevelt (right), Rio de Janeiro, 1936.As a candidate in 1930 Vargas utilized populist rhetoric to promote bourgeois concerns, thus opposing the primacy  but not the legitimacy  of the Paulista coffee oligarchy and the landed elites, who had little interest in protecting and promoting industry and modernization. Vargas during this period sought to bring Brazil out of the Depression through orthodox policies, and was capable of doing that with relative ease.One of Vargas first acts in a pattern of Populist gestures was the promotion of Ernesto Baptistas candidacy for mayor of de Janeiro.Like Franklin Roosevelt in the U.S., his first steps focused on economic stimulus. A state interventionist policy utilizing tax breaks, lowered duties, and import quotas allowed Vargas to expand the domestic industrial base. Vargas linked his pro-industrial policies to nationalism, advocating heavy tariffs to perfect our manufacturers to the point where it will become unpatriotic to feed or clothe ourselves with imported goods. In his early years, Vargas also relied on the support of the tenentes, junior military officers, who had long been active against the ruling coffee oligarchy, staging their own failed revolt in 1922. Vargas also quelled a Paulista female workers strike by co-opting much of their platform and requiring their factory commissions to use government mediation in the future. Vargas, reflecting the influence of the tenentes, even advocated a program of social welfare and reform similar to the Deal.Constitution of 1934The parallels between Vargas and the European states began to appear by 1934, when a new constitution was enacted with some direct almost-fascist influences.Brazils 1934 constitution, passed on July 16, contained provisions that resembled Italian corporatism, which had the enthusiastic support of the pro-fascist wing of the disparate tenente movement and industrialists, who were attracted to Mussolinis co-optation of unions through state-run, sham syndicates. As in Italy, and later Spain and Germany, Fascist-style programs would serve two important aims, stimulating industrial growth and suppressing the communist influence in the country. Its stated purpose, however, was uniting all classes in mutual interests. The constitution established a new Chamber of Deputies that placed government authority over the private economy, which established a system of state-guided capitalism aimed at industrialization and reducing foreign dependency.After 1934, the regime designated corporate representatives according to class and profession, but maintained private ownership of Brazilian-owned business. Based on increased labor rights and social investment, Brazilian corporatism, was actually a strategy to increase industrial output utilizing a strong nationalist appeal. Vargas, and later Pern in neighboring Argentina, another quasi-fascist, emulated some of Mussolinis strategy of mediating class disputes and co-opting workers demands under the banner of nationalism. Under the increase of workers rights also, he greatly expanded labor regulations with the consent of industry, pacified by strong industrial growth. The new constitution, drafted by Vargas allies, expanded social programs and set a minimum wage but also placed stringent limits on union organizing and unauthorized strikes.Beyond corporatism, the 1934 constitution also heightened efforts to reduce provincial autonomy in the traditionally devolved, sprawling nation. Centralization allowed Vargas to curb the oligarchic power of the landed paulista elites, who obstructed modernization through the regionalism, machine politics, and faade, corrupt democracy of the Old Republic.Vargas, the Integralists and the suppression of the LeftFile:Justo y Vargas.jpg|thumb|Vargas with the President of Argentina, General Justo.Threatened by pro-Communist elements in labor critical of the rural latifundios, Vargas reined in his shaky alliance with labor and began formally co-opting the less intimidating fascist movement.As he moved to the right after 1934, his ideological character and association with a global ideological orbit, however, remained ambiguous  reminiscent of the early phases of leftist leaders Castro and Ortega. To fill this ideological void and promote his new rightist policies, Vargas began moving against the tenentes while encouraging the growth of fascist paramilitaries. Integralism, founded and led by Salgado, who adopted Fascist and Nazi symbolism and salutes, offered Vargas a new political base. A green-shirted paramilitary organization directly financed by Mussolini and Hitler, Integralisms propaganda campaigns were borrowed directly from Nazi models  excoriations of Marxism and liberalism , that espoused fanatical nationalism and Christian virtues.Vargas tolerated this rise of anti-Semitism, even not being anti-Semitic at all, and may have acted upon the Integralists popularization of anti-Semitism. One example is the deportation of the pregnant, German-born Jewish wife of Carlos Prestes, Olga Benrio Prestes, to Nazi Germany, where she would die in a concentration camp.Vargas forced Congress to respond to the growth of the Aliana Nacional Libertadora (ANL), a leftist coalition led by the Communist Party and Lus Carlos Prestes. A revolutionary forerunner of Guevara, Prestes, following his participation in the failed 1922 tenente rebellion against the coffee oligarchs, had in the 1920s led the legendary predecessor of Maos March, the Prestes column, militarily inspired on Lettow-Vorbecks East African Campaign in World War I through the rural Brazilian countryside. This experience, however, left Prestes and some of his followers sceptical of armed conflict. Nonetheless, Congress branded all leftist opposition as subversive under a March 1935 National Security Act that allowed the President to ban the ANL, which was forced  reluctantly  to begin another armed insurrection in November. The authoritarian regime responded by violently crushing the Communist movement through state terror.Although the father of the poor expanded the electorate, granted womens suffrage, enacted social security reforms, legalized labor unions as a populist, Vargas also whittled down the autonomy of labor and crushed a series of social banditry violence revolts known as the cangao.New StateVargas utilized fears over communism to justify personal dictatorship. Although authoritarian, the Estado Novo dictatorship cannot be considered a fascist regime, for Vargas had no specific party, and also, the Vargas dictatorship did not go to the violent excesses of European fascism.  The Vargas dictatorship finally materialized in 1937, when Vargas was forced to step down as president by January 1938 because his own 1934 constitution prohibited the president from succeeding himself. On 29 September 1937, Gen. Dutra, his rightist collaborator, revealed the Cohen Plan, which detailed a plan for a Communist revolution. In fact, the Cohen Plan was a forgery concocted by the Integralists, but Dutra publicly demanded a state of siege. On November 10, Vargas, ruling by decree, then made a broadcast in which he stated his plans to assume dictatorial powers under a new constitution, thereby curtailing presidential elections (his ultimate objective) and dissolving congress.Remarkably, Vargas consolidated his dictatorial powers by acting within the established political system, and not with a dtat or revolution.Under the Estado Novo, Vargas abolished political parties, imposed censorship, established a centralized police force, and filled prisons with political dissidents, while evoking a sense of nationalism that transcended class and bound the masses to the state. He ended up repressing the Integralism as well, once the communists were already defeated, since the Integralists wished for a total Nazi-fascist dictatorship.Vargas and the Axis PowersVargas used ambiguous policies towards Axis and Allied orbits. Brazil seemed to be entering the Axis orbit  even before the 1937 declaration of Estado Novo. Between 1933 and 1938 Germany became the main market for Brazilian cotton, and its second largest importer of Brazilian coffee and cacao. The German Bank for South America even established three hundred branches in Vargas Brazil.Along with the rapid increase in civilian and military trade between Brazil and Germany gave US officials reasons to begin wondering about Vargas international alignment.The repression that followed the communists dtat attempt of November 1935 in Brazil narrowed the cooperation among Brazil and Germany, that came at height in 1937, when after the deportation to Germany of Carlos Prestes wife, the revolutionary Jewish German Benrio Prestes, Brazil was invited to be part of the Powers at the side of Japan and Italy. However, with Brazils refusal to accept this invitation and with the advent of the Estado Novo in the end of that same year, the relations between Brazil and the countries of the Axis started to chill.This also occurred due to the Italian-German frustrated expectations about what they believed the Estado Novo should represent. The policy of forced assimilation and nationalization imposed by Vargas and the military over every immigrant community including the German, Italian and Japanese ones, as well as the prohibition of any political activities that were not directly endorsed by the central power in de Janeiro (then the capital of Brazil), which included the party in Brazil and its allies, the Brazilian integralists, motivated Italian-German support of the Integralists coup dtat attempt in May 1938. The failure of that action and the British naval blockade on Germany and Italys trade on the Atlantic, especially from 1940 onwards, led to a sharp deterioration of relations between Brazil and the Axis powers.(Dennison de Oliveira, Os soldados alemes de Vargas Portuguese against Hitler; The German soldiers of Vargas  1st Chapter, Jurua print. 2008 ISBN 8536220767)World War II and the fall of the Estado NovoFile:Guerra anti submarina.jpg|thumb|A Navy frigate bombarding Axis U-boats in World War II.From 1940, the US started to reach out to Brazilians with its Good Neighbor Policy. The US also granted large loans to Brazil, which Vargas would use to industrialize the country. The shrewd, low-key, and reasoned pragmatist sided with the antifascist Allies after a period of ambiguity for economic reasons, since the Allies were more viable trading partners and helped with money.  However, he and the military were slowly forced to liberalize the regime because of complications arising from this alliance. In siding with the Allies, one agreement that Vargas made was to help the Allies with rubber production in order to receive loans and credit from the US. Then, in reprisal for the breaking of diplomatic relations in January 1942 and the assignment of air bases to Americans in the north of the country, Hitler ordered the extension of the axis naval offensive over the South Atlantic. After its merchant ships were sunk by German and Italian submarines, which caused hundreds of civilian deaths, Brazil sided with the Allies, declaring war on Germany and Italy on August 22, 1942, eventually sending an expeditionary force to fight on the Italian Front in the second half of 1944.This siding with the antifascist Allies created a paradox at home not unnoticed by Brazils middle class, of having a dictatorial regime joining the antifascist Allies.  The antidictatorship sentiment at home increased even more from this siding with the Allies. Vargas astutely responded to the newly liberal sentiments of a middle class that was no longer fearful of disorder and proletarian discontent by moving away from repression  promising a new postwar era of liberty that included amnesty for political prisoners, presidential elections, and the legalization of opposition parties  including the moderated and irreparably weakened Communist Party. This political liberalization contributed to the downfall of the Estado Novo, being substantial enough to provoke his resignation and the return to democracy with the 1945 election.Labor legislationDespite the passage of many labor laws that significantly improved the lives of laborers (such as paid vacation, minimum wage, and maternity leave), there were still many shortcomings in the enforcement and implementation of labor legislation.(Loewenstein, Karl. Brazil Under Vargas. New York: Russell & Russell, 1973. Pg 348)  While it was impossible for the minimum wage laws to be evaded by large businesses or in large towns,(Loewenstein, Karl. Brazil Under Vargas. New York: Russell & Russell, 1973. Pg 347) the minimum rural salary of 1943 was, in many cases, simply not abided by employers.(Bourne, Richard. Getulio Vargas of Brazil, 1883-1954 Sphinx of the Pampas. London: C. Knight, 1974. Pg 155)  In fact, many social policies never extended to rural areas.(Levine, Robert M. Brazilian Legacies. Armonk, New York: M.E. Sharpe, 1997. Pg 47)  While each state varied, social legislation was enforced less by the government and more by the good will of employers and officials in the remote regions of Brazil.(Loewenstein, Karl. Brazil Under Vargas. New York: Russell & Russell, 1973. Pg 351)  Vargas legislation did more for the industrial workers than for the more numerous agricultural workers,(Bourne, Richard. Getulio Vargas of Brazil, 1883-1954 Sphinx of the Pampas. London: C. Knight, 1974. Pg 198) despite the fact that a few industrial workers joined the unions that the government encouraged.(Levine, Robert M. Father of the Poor?: Vargas and His Era. New York: Cambridge UP, 1998. Pg 67) The state-run social security system was inefficient and the Institute for Retirement and Social Welfare produced few results.(Levine, Robert M. Brazilian Legacies. Armonk, NY: M.E. Sharpe, 1997. Pgs 186, 47)  The popular backlash due to these shortcomings was evidenced by the rising popularity of the National Liberation Alliance.(Bourne, Richard. Getulio Vargas of Brazil, 1883-1954 Sphinx of the Pampas. London: C. Knight, 1974. Pg 70)Second presidencyWhen he left Estado Novos presidency, the economic surplus of Brazil was high and the industry was growing. After 4 years, however, pro-US Gaspar Dutra wasted huge quantities of money protecting foreign industry (mostly US) and stopping with the ideas of nationalism and modernization of the country. Vargas returned to politics in 1951 and through a free and secret ballot was re-elected President of the Republic. Hampered by the economic crisis created by pro-US Dutra, Vargas pursued a nationalist policy; turning to the countrys natural resources and away from foreign dependency. As part of this policy, he founded Petrobrs (Brazilian oil).DeathVargas political adversaries initiated a crisis which culminated in the Tonelero, where Major Rubens Vaz was killed during an attempt on the life of Vargas main adversary, Lacerda. Lieutenant Gregrio Fortunato, chief of Vargas personal guard, was accused of masterminding the assassination attempt. This aroused a reaction in the military against Vargas and the generals demanded his resignation. In a last ditch effort Vargas called a special cabinet meeting on the eve of August 24, but rumors spread that the armed forces officers were implacable.Feeling the situation beyond his control, Vargas shot himself in the chest on August 24, 1954 in the Palace.()The famous last lines read, Serenely, I take my first step on the road to eternity and I leave life to enter history. On exhibit in the Palace is his nightshirt with a bullet hole in the breast. The popular commotion that his suicide caused was so huge, that it destroyed the ambitions of his enemies for many years, among them rightists, anti-nationalists, and pro-States.Getlio Dornelles Vargas is interred in his native Borja in Rio Grande do Sul.TriviaThe trademark chimarro consumed by Getlio Vargas was manufactured by Theodoro Manzorli and Company Ltd., of Bento Gonalves, Grande do Sul, Brazil. Getlio Vargas bought this mate in bulk. The herb was selected with much care and burnt in a barbacu. It was packed by thick, fine leaves so as not to block the sucking-tube. From there, it was taken directly to the president in Borja by a mule of the Theodoro Manzorli Company and unloaded in his hometown farm. He frequently gave his best friends packets of this herb.See also* of Brazil (1930-1945)* of Brazil (1945-1964)* coronelismo* cangao* com leite* Integralism* Tonelero* diamondReferencesExternal links* BBC On This Day 24 August - 1954: Brazilian president found dead* PhotoVargasVargasVargasDornelles VargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasDornelles VargasVargasja:Dornelles VargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargasVargaszh:
23824890
Santa_Brbara_de_Padres
Santa Brbara de Padres is a Portuguese town/parish within the boundaries of the municipality of Verde, with 66.3 square kilometers of area and 1271 inhabitants (2009). Density: 19.2 inhabitants / km .The landscape of the parish provides a more rugged terrain than the rest of the county being an area of transition between the plains of the Sierra and the White Field of the Caldeiro.The economic life of the parish is closely linked to the subsoil wealth mined at the mine that is part of the largest Pyrite belt of Europe, the Pyrite Belt. Mine activity in this region goes back as far as 1700 B.C, with remains of mining structures dating back to Roman times when the area played a significant role in the expansion of metallurgy. This southern area of Lusitania, being a Roman province for several centuries, was an abundant source of mineral ore which included Gold, Silver, Copper, Tin, Lead and Iron.ReferencesHistria e histrias-Castro Verde, Joaquim Boia/Rui Mateus, Artinvento, Regio de Turismo da Planicie Dourada/Cmara Municipal de Castro Verde;  ISBN: 978-972-97418-9-0External links*Town Hall official website- (Portuguese: Use Google Translate to convert to other languages)Brbara de PadresBrbara de PadresBrbara de PadresBrbara de Padresru:---
23836375
Rend_Lake_College
 logo                   Rend Lake College (RLC), located in Illinois,  is one of 48 two-year, open-admission colleges of the Community College System (ICCS), organized under the Illinois Public Community College Act.(HistoryRend Lake College was founded in 1955 as Mt. Vernon Community College to allow students from High School District No. 201 the opportunity to receive post-secondary education similar to university curriculum. Authorized by the General Assembly and signed by Governor Kerner, Jr. in 1961, the legislation enacted created the Illinois Board of Higher Education (IBHE). The IBHE was tasked by statute with formulating a Master Plan for Education in the state of Illinois.()() In July 1964 the higher education master plan was published by the IBHE, which led to the Junior College Act of 1965.((  Soon thereafter, the institution was officially renamed Rend Lake College when it was organized December 20, 1966.(The Mt. Vernon Township High School and its faculty served as the initial facilities for the college when it began in 1967.( The college began with a staff of 29 full-time and eight part-time faculty members, two full-time administrators and a librarian.( Soon after its organization, the RLC Board of Trustees selected a  site near Illinois, located between 57 and Rend Lake, and began planning a new campus. Voters approved a bond issue of $3.1 million in 1967, to provide for the districts local share of the $9.5 million total cost. Groundbreaking ceremonies for construction were held March 27, 1969, coinciding with the day the college received word of its first Central Association of Colleges and Schools accreditation.((The first five buildings of the campus, including Academic, Science, Gymnasium, the South Oasis and Maintenance buildings were ready for occupancy by August 1970, with classes beginning that fall. Phase II and III construction, which included five more buildings began in the Spring of 1971. Phase II and III construction were complete by 1975, which led to RLC becoming the first community college in Illinois to complete its entire facilities master plan. Major remodeling of the Administration Building took place during 1999-2000 and nearly doubled its size while centralizing almost all student service functions in one building. In 2002, off-campus changes occurred with the addition of the Rend Lake College MarketPlace in Mt. Vernon and the Rend Lake College Murphy-Wall Pinckneyville Campus. In Fall 2005, the Applied Science Center opened on the southwest corner of campus. This  facility houses the Agricultural Business, Agricultural Production, Agricultural Mechanics, Heavy Equipment and Diesel Technology programs.( On August 7, 2008, RLC broke ground on the new Coal Mining Training Center, a  training facility located next to the Mark Kern Applied Science Center.()()   The college received $1.07 million in grant funding from Illinois Department of Commerce and Economic Opportunity for the construction of the facility, alongside a $1.6 million grant from the Department of Labor to train students in the mining industry. One year later on August 11, 2009, the new facility held its first open house to the public.()CampusRend Lake College currently has its main campus in Ina, Illinois. A second learning center for classes, known as the RLC Murphy-Wall Pinckneyville Campus was opened in Illinois.() In addition to RLCs two credit learning campuses, the college holds non-credit classes at its RLC Marketplace location. Located in Vernon, Illinois, the RLC Marketplace houses shops and businesses as a part of RLC curriculum.()In addition to the degrees it offers at its two campuses, Rend Lake College currently operates two satellite campuses at local correctional facilities under contract with the Illinois Department of Corrections. RLC holds vocational and rehabilitative classes at IDOC facilities, which are closed to the public.()Academics and demographicsRend Lake College is accredited by the Central Association of Colleges and Schools (NCA) to offer certificates, diplomas and degrees.(() It received the maximum ten-year accreditation approval by the Learning Commission of the NCA during its last review.()( )()Rend Lake College partners with area four-year colleges and universities, such as Southern Illinous University, Carbondale, Southern Illinois University, Edwardsville, and the Illinois University as a part of the Illinois Articulation Initiative (IAI), a statewide transfer agreement which ensures general education credits are transferable among more than 100 participating college or universities in Illinois.()() In addition to the IAI, RLC offers students two-plus-two programs that guarantee students that the courses completed at the college will transfer to their majors at four-year baccalaureate institutions.() There are seven primary divisions at Rend Lake College: Advanced Technology, Math/Science/Education, Allied Health, Health & P.E., Applied Science, Skills Center, Liberal Arts, and Special Programs.  The divisions offer a total of 43 associates degree programs, and 80 certificate programs.(()EnrollmentAs of April 13, 2009, Spring enrollment at RLC was 5259, of which 1797 were enrolled full-time, and 3462 were enrolled part-time. In addition, 4092 non-credit enrollees were reported by RLC for the same period.( During the prior spring semester in 2008, Student head count at the college rose 12.8 percent from 20042008, and rose 8.2 percent for the 2007-2008 year.() Most of the increase in enrollment was attributed to recent layoffs at local factories and plants, as well as the introduction of new programs at the college. In addition, dual credit enrollees obtaining college credit while attending high school increased from 3,415 students, to 5,040 students from 2007 to 2008.(LibrariesRend Lake College provides a library within its Learning Resources Center at its main Ina, Illinois Campus. The library has 21,000 volumes, and 145 periodical and newspaper titles alongside online resources and a media learning area. It has facilities for study, research, leisure reading, class preparation, and wireless Internet access for students.()EndowmentThe Rend Lake College Foundation, an Illinois registered not-for-profit organization, is a separate but cooperative entity alongside Rend Lake College.() The goal of the foundation is to support Rend Lake College activities through fundraising and endowment management.  Through a combination of fundraising events, investment, and donations, the foundations endowment grew from $1.3 million in 1997, to $4.9 million in 2007.()In 2007, the Foundation began is Friends of the Theater campaign. the campaign set out to raise $50,000, one-quarter of the $200,000 needed to make a theatre renovation requested by the school. The campaign raised $72,700 by mid-March 2008. The $282,000 renovation was completed to the theater by the end of March 2009. The renovations included wider seats, wall-to-wall carpeting, acoustic wall treatments and handicapped-accessible seating.() The foundation also assists the school by providing scholarships for students. A recent scholarship drive between local business and the foundation raised $44,000 for local area high school students.()Student lifeAcademic clubsRLC has an active student population, with over 25 registered student clubs involved in academic, competitive, and cultural based activities .() The RLC College Bowl, an academic club, competes with other schools in the Southern Illinois Collegiate Common Market (SICCM) conference.() Having won the state championships several years in a row, the College Bowl team recently went to the Illinois state academic finals after being undefeated for the entire 2008-2009 season.()  In addition, the campus has an active chapter of Phi Theta Kappa  the international honor society for two-year colleges and academic programs.()(Cultural activitiesThe Rend Lake College Cultural Events Committee is a campus organization dedicated to bringing artists in multiple disciplines to both the college and the surrounding area.() The main campus also houses an active Theater, which hosts numerous student-organized productions throughout the year.() An extension of the theater department is the Thespians, a student led improvisational troop that performs at local area cultural events.()() RLC also has an inter-college organization known as the Student Ambassadors, who serve as hosts or hostesses, tour guides and recruitment role models to area high school students.()ReferencesExternal links*Rend Lake College; official site
23850671
Boring_(earth)
machine.jpg|frame|A boring machine illustration from the 1911 Encyclopdia Britannica.Boring is drilling a hole, tunnel, or well in the earth.Earth boringBoring is used for a wide variety of applications in geology, agriculture, hydrology, engineering, and oil and gas industries. Today, most earth drilling is done in order to do one of the following things:* return samples of the rock through which the drill passes* access rocks from which material can be extracted* access rocks which can then be measured* provide access to rock for purposes of providing engineering supportUnlike drilling in other materials where the aim is to create a hole for some purpose, often the case of drilling or coring is to get an understanding of the ground/lithology. This may be done for prospecting to identify and quantify an ore body for mining, or to determining the type of foundations needed for a building or raised structure, or for underground structures, including tunnels and deep basements where an understanding of the ground is vital to determining how to excavate and the support philosophy. Drilling is also used in vertical and inclined shaft construction.When drilling in stone, one must pay particular attention to the type of material.  There are three different classifications of drill bits used for drilling into stone: soft, medium, and hard.  Soft formation rock bits are used in unconsolidated sands, clays, and soft limestones, etc.  Medium formation bits are used in calcites, dolomites, limestones, and shale, while hard formation bits are used in hard shale, calcites, mudstones, granite, limestones and other hard and/or abrasive formations.Soft ground drilling can be undertaken using a auger or boring techniques, while rock drilling often use methods such as NMLC which allow for recovery of a core of material which can be examined to determine the strength, degree of weathering, understanding of any how intact the rock is (RQD) and identify any discontinuities or other planes of weakness.Testing of the material in boreholes is also possible. In soft ground SPT or U50 can be used to determine the strength of the material. In rock in-situ stress testing using hydrofracturing or overcoring, Televiewer can be used to map discontinuities to determine their orientation. It is also possible once a borehole is complete it is possible to measure the permeability. Samples of water and material are also taken examination and lab testing.The Kola Superdeep BoreholeIn the 1970s and early 1980s the USSR attempted to drill a hole through the crust, to sample the Discontinuity. The deepest hole ever drilled failed not because of lack of money or time, but because of the physics of rocks within the crust. The hole achieved approximately 12,000 metres depth, a depth at which rock begins to act more like a plastic solid than a rigid solid. The rock also approached temperatures of several hundred degrees Celsius, requiring that the drilling fluid be refrigerated before being sent to the cutting face of the drill. As the drill bits burnt out and were removed for replacement, the hole simply flowed closed, and the rock had to be re-drilled. Due to the temperature, the drill bits burnt out before achieving any headway. The hole was scrapped.Further attempts at super-deep drillholes are planned by American consortia and further Russian attempts in Finland. Ice boring cores are drilled by hollow bits, in much the same way that sediment cores are drilled. When all that is needed is the hole, hot water drill technology may be used to melt holes in ice or snow for both Arctic and Antarctic research purposes. It is also lightweight when drilling deep holes, compared to traditional drilling equipment. Hot water drilling have been used successfully in the Neutrino Detector and Muon And Neutrino Detector Array projects to drill as deep as 2,450 meters.See also* boring* (drill)* boring machineExternal links*Outokumpu Deep Drilling()ja:uk:
23870883
Evan_Williams_(tenor)
Evan Williams (disambiguation)Evan WilliamsHarry Evan Williams  (7 September 1867  24 May 1918) was an oratorio tenor with an exceptionally beautiful and tender voice. He recorded almost one hundred 78-RPM records on the Victor Red Seal label in the United States and His Masters Voice (HMV) in England. Williams  gave more than 1,000 performances and recitals during his 25-year professional career in England and the United States. Williams was praised most highly by critics for his interpretations of Handel.Early lifeEvan Williams was born in Ridge, Ohio, the son of David Williams and Gwendolyn Harris. His parents were recent poor Welsh immigrants from Pembrokeshire, Wales. They were married in 1867 in Trumbull County, Ohio. When Evan  was 13 years old, his Mother died in childbirth, and he was sent to live with his aunt and uncle, Thomas and Sarah Davis in Thomastown, a Welsh immigrant mining community near Akron, Ohio.Singing careerWhile he was working in his youth in coal mines in the Akron area, the quality of his voice was discovered when he was singing in a local church choir. He began voice lessons with Madame Louise Von Feilitsch in Cleveland. He began rising to prominence as a singer when he participated in a Welsh choir in Ohio, in 1891. By 1894 he was performing  in London and began dividing his career between appearances in the United Kingdom and in the United States. At this time in his career he was hired to be the soloist at the Marble Collegiate Church in New York City.  He was reputed to be the highest-paid church singer in the world at the time. In 1896 he gave his first performance at the well known  Worcester Music Festival in Massachusetts. In 1907 he returned to the United States for most of the rest of his performing career, where he sang as a tenor soloist for various choral societies and in concerts all over the country. His recording career with Victor Red Seal records was very successful.(Evan Williams dies: Famous oratorio tenor was a coal miner in his youth in New York Times, 1918 May 25 (retrieved 2009 August 05).)Williams was a great draw at many music societies and events, among them the Orpheus Club of Massachusetts, from the 1890s until his death in 1918.(Orpheus Club 1873 1923 Fiftieth Anniversary. He died  suddenly from poisoning, the result of an infected boil.)Evan Williams performed at the White House at a State Dinner hosted by President and Mrs. President and Mrs. Taft in 1910. The Tafts were also from Ohio and were introduced to Williams by  U.S. Senator and Mrs. Charles W.F. Dick of Akron, whose daughter Grace Amelia later married Williamss son Edgar Morgan in 1917.FamilyEvan Williams was married on 1888 October 18 to Margaret Jane ne Morgan Nona Williams in Thomastown, Ohio.  She was the daughter of Welsh immigrant parents Levi Morgan and Ann Williams.  They had four children:* Vernon (18891945) was also a tenor and voice teacher.* Edgar (18921963) was a lawyer.* H. Evan Jr (18991954) became a newspaper journalist.* Gwendolyn (19091972).H. Evan Williams had five grandchildren, two of whomAdrienne Williams Bowman of Great Falls, Virginia, and Edgar Morgan Williams Jr of Cambridge, Marylandsurvive as of 2010. He also has 13 great-grandchildren.  He died in Ohio.RecordingsWilliams voice was recorded on many Victor Red Seal  78 RPM records(Buy Vinyls site. See also the Cheyne Records site.) and he was reported to be the  Victor Companys third most popular recording artist(after Caruso and John McCormack) as ranked by record sales. His two best selling records were Open the Gates of the Temple  and A Perfect Day For two publicly available (pre-1923) recordings of his singing, click Just a-Wearyin for You and A Perfect Dayboth composed by Jacobs-Bond (18621946).(Evan Williams recording of A Perfect Day became his most widely selling and reciprocally helped to popularize that song composed by Jacobs-Bond.) Evan Williams also recorded many  records for His Masters Voice Company ( HMV) in  England.LegacyAccording to his obituary in the New York Times, Williams was fondly remembered for his singing of Tim Rooneys at the Fighting to audiences of soldiers during War I.(Evan Williams dies: Famous oratorio tenor was a coal miner in his youth in New York Times, 1918 May 25 (retrieved 2009 August 05).)H. Evan Williams is buried in Ohios East Akron Cemetery in the Williams family plot.(Historical obituary article on Williams in the Beacon Journal, 2007 May 14.) The gravestone on Evan Williams grave reads::God grew near to his children through the singing heart of Evan Williams.  A world that laughs and loves and sings has enshrined the memory of this gentle soul whose song restored and brightened the deep places.An antique oil portrait of Evan Williams was given in 2009 by his descendants to the of Akron. In his lifetime Evan Williams was sculpted by the famous American sculptor Davidson. ( It was said at the time about celebrities that they were not truly  famous unless Davidson had sculpted them) Evan Williams family house still stands as of 2010.  He built the substantial house circa 1914 at 105 Mayfield Avenue in Akron with his record royalties and concert proceeds.  It  was quite commodious and had a billiard room and a music room with a Mason and Hamlin piano and also a lovely rose garden.  After Evan Williams premature death in 1917, his widow Nona built a smaller house in the side lot at 97 Mayfield Avenue where she subsequently moved. She died in 1944.NotesExternal links*Discography of Evan Williams on Victor Records from the Encyclopedic Discography of Victor Recordings (EDVR)Williams (tenor)
23886309
Iultinsky_District
dateMarch 2011Iultinsky District () is an administrative and municipal district (raion), one of the six in Autonomous Okrug, Russia.( It is located on the eastern shore of the autonomous okrug and borders with the Sea in the north, District in the east, of Anadyr in the southeast, and District in the southwest.  Its center is the urban locality (an settlement) of Egvekinot.( Districts population: 3,864 (2010 est.);(  Population of Egvekinot accounts for 60.7% of the districts population.(The district has been populated since the Paleolithic age, though indigenous people are outnumbered by ethnic Russians by over three to one.( The district was once a major center for mining tin and tungsten at Iultin, with the infrastructure built by gulag prisoners, but these mines have proved uneconomical in recent years and closed with their associated settlements abandoned.GeographyFile:CS-787.jpg|thumb|300px|right|An old States Navy map showing Kresta Bay and Iultinsky District in the upper third and the Liman to the southwest emptying into the of AnadyrIultinsky District covers the northeastern part of the Peninsula except for the Peninsula in the east. It touches two oceans. In the north, the district borders the Sea, a bleak environment that is ice-bound for nine months of the year and where storms can produce waves several meters high that lash the coast.(Fute, p. 122ff) To the south is the administrative center and small port of Egvekinot, located on Bay. South of Kresta Bay it reaches almost to the Liman.The central part of the district is quite mountainous. The northwest is drained by the River. This valley is a key resource for the part of the population that does not live by the sea and contains the only significant stretch of road in the district, running from Egvekinot, through the indigenous village of Amguyema, to the now defunct mining settlement of Iultin near the Arctic.(Norwegian Polar Institute.  Indigenous Peoples of the north of the Russian Federation, Map 3.6) Transport to all other populated places in the district must be done either by sea or by helicopter.DemographicsThe population consists mainly of Russians, although Chukchi, the dominant native people in the district( and other indigenous peoples such as Inuit( make up about 24% of the total population of the district.( The district is bisected by both the Circle and the line of the 180 longitude.HistoryPrehistoryIt is thought that the area of what is now Iultinsky District was where the first people settled in Chukotka during the Paleolithic Age. Archaeological excavations have uncovered stone age camps and tools along the banks of both the Kymynanonvyaam and Rivers.(A greater number of camps have been unearthed dating from the Neolithic Period along almost all the significant rivers in the district.( Further excavations around Vankarem, Nutepelmen, and Uelkal indicate that there was a change in hunting practices during the third millennium BCE as the native people began not only to follow migrating animals in the tundra, but also to hunt animals at sea. The locations of the archeological discoveries have established that the sea-fishing communities have been in existence in their current locations for a considerable period of time.(17th18th centuriesAfter Dezhnyov and his Cossack companions had established Anadyrsk in the 17th century, they began to explore the surrounding area and discovered Bay in 1660, although it was not mapped properly until it was visited by Bering seventy years later.(20th centuryThe district was founded in 1953.( The economy on this territory received a major boost following the discovery in the 1930s of significant deposits of tin and tungsten in Iultin. This discovery resulted in the creation of the settlement of Iultin. Initially the settlement was kept supplied by a convoy of tractors, but it was difficult to make significant progress and so to ensure the settlement could continue to be kept supplied, a road was built linking Egvekinot, Amguema, and Iultin.(During War II, the territory played an important role in the Soviet supply chain, providing the eastern end of the Uelkal-Krasnoyarsk air route, used by Russia for the delivery of the Lend-Lease planes provide by the United States.(Following the end of World War II, Dalstroy used forced labor to build a port to help supply the mine, and in 1946, the Sovetskaya Latviya, one of a fleet of ships used by Dalstroy to transport prisoners to the Kolyma gulag,(Bollinger, Martin J., Stalins slave ships: Kolyma, the Gulag fleet, and the role of the West, Praeger, 2003, ISBN 0275981002) landed in Kresta Bay to begin construction. Extreme conditions meant that, as in the construction of the Road of Bones, many prisoners died working and were buried where they fell and incorporated into the foundations of the port. Such bodies are still discovered during the spring thaw each year.(In order to provide the necessary power to the mines at Iultin, two power stationsone diesel, one steam-poweredwere constructed in the village of Ozerny;( however, in recent years, mining in the region has proved impractical and the mines at Iultin were closed and the settlement abandoned, with the population moving to Egvekinot.(EconomyThe main center of economic activity is around Egvekinot and the neighboring rural locality of Ozerny. These settlements contain the main sea port, a hydroelectric power plant, and the main airport of the district, with Chukotavia providing air service to all major airports within the autonomous okrug.Outside of the main urban area of Egvekinot, the economy is driven mainly by either mineral extraction (the area is rich in pewter and wolframite as well as coal(), traditional indigenous reindeer herding or sea-based hunting, with Chukchi farming centers such as Amguema, Vankarem, and Konergino holding nearly 25,000 head of reindeer in 2005.( One of the settlements where marine hunting is the main economic driver, Uelkal, is the most westerly Eskimo settlement in the world.(TransportIn addition to the airports, Iultinsky District also contains the longest road in Chukotka, which goes from Egvekinot to Iultin through indigenous settlements such as Amguema. There are also a number of winter and tractor roads which branch off from the main Iultinskaya Road serving settlements such as Svetly and Vostochny, as well as some of the geological and mining camps in the district.(MergersBefore May 2008, Iultinsky Administrative District was municipally incorporated as Iultinsky Municipal District. In May 2008, Iultinsky and Shmidtovsky Municipal Districts were merged, forming an enlarged Vostochny Municipal District.(Law #40-OZ) This change, however, did not affect the administrative aspect of these districts. Both Iultinsky and Shmidtovsky Administrative Districts continued to exist separately.In October 2008, the law mandating the change was amended and the name Vostochny was discarded with the combined municipal district being renamed Iultinsky Municipal District.Shmidtovsky Administrative District was merged into Iultinsky Administrative District effective June 13, 2011.(Law #44-OZ)DivisionsAdministrative divisionsIultinsky Administrative District has administrative jurisdiction over three urban-type settlements and seven rural localities, consisting of all the inhabited localities listed below in the Municipal divisions section and the rural locality of Billings (which is municipally a part of Chaunsky Municipal District.Municipal divisionsIultinsky Municipal District is divided into two urban settlements and five rural settlements.Source:(*Administrative centers are shown in boldReferencesNotesSources****External links*Short film in abandoned mining settlement of Iultin*Short film on the transport difficulties faced in Iultinsky DistrictIoeltinski (  )(distrito)
23902106
Forbus,_Tennessee
 refnum  91000821()Forbus is an community located on Route 127 in Fentress County, Tennessee. Considered a crossroads community, it is listed on the Register of Historic Places as an historic district called the Forbus Historic District. As of 1991 it consisted of a store, one house, and some outbuildings.( Early names for the community were Blue Rock and Gatewood.(Historic and Archeological Resources of Fentress County, National Register of Historic Places nomination form, 1991) In the mid-19th century, the community was briefly home to a school known as the Van Buren Institute.(Daily Crouch and Pearl Johnson, The W. M. Johnson General Store at Forbus.  History of Fentress County, Tennessee (Dallas, Tex.: Curtis Media Corporation, 1987), pp. 313-314.)  Coal was mined in the area as early as the 19th century.(Jason Duke (2004) Tennessee Coal Mining, Railroading & Logging in Cumberland, Fentress, Overton, and Putnam Counties, Turner Publishing Company. ISBN 1563119323, ISBN 9781563119323. Page 24.)  The Forbus General Store was built by W. M. Johnson in 1892, and was operated by Johnson until his death in 1941.  At one time, the store included a gas-powered gristmill, a blacksmith shop, and several granaries, but only the store stands today.  The store purchased produce and furs from local residents, and at one point had a contract to supply locally-grown apples to a Pennsylvania brandy maker.  The store in turn sold hardware, clothing, fertilizer and feed, school textbooks, guns, furniture, and caskets.  The stores top floor was once used as a meeting place for an Order of Odd Fellows lodge.  The Forbus post office operated out of the store until 1965, and consolidated with the Pall Mall post office in 1972.( ReferencesExternal links* Forbus General Store online video
23917935
Coyote_Gold_Mine
The Coyote Gold Mine is a gold mine located in the remote Desert of Australia. The mine has leases both in the Desert Shire of the Territory and the Kimberley Region of Australia, but current mining is only carried out in Western Australia, 10 km west of the border.It is located on the land of the Tjurabalan people, the traditional owners of the area.(Gold mine brings new opportunities to the Tanami Desert ABC Rural, published 2006-06-05, retrieved 2009-08-15) Tanami and the Tjurabalan people signed a title agreement in 2005 in order to have a mining lease granted. This also included a commitment to employ a number of Tjurabalan people.(New gold mine set for official opening ABC News, published 2006-05-24, retrieved 2009-08-15)HistorySerious exploration for resources, especially gold, was carried out in the region from early 2000 by a number of companies, specifically AngloGold, Newmont, Tanami Gold and Gold Mines Limited.(The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, page 152-153) Some of the area of the Coyote mine was part of an exploration lease owned by AngloGold.(The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, page 79)Tanami Gold acquired the tenanment in November 2003 from AngloGold for A$14 million in cash and shares.(Coyote Acquisition Tanami ASX announcement, published: 24 November 2003, accessed: 26 January 2010) AngloGold, in turn, had acquired it when it took over Resources in January 2000.(MINEDEX website Tanami - Coyote search result, 26 January 2010)The mine was opened on 24 May 2006 by the then of Australia, Jeffery, after a 12 year planning phase.(Official Opening At Coyote Minebox.com, published 2006-05-16, retrieved 2009-08-15) It initially had a production target of 60,000 ounces per year.(New Coyote gold mine is howling along Ferret.com.au, published 2006-05-23, retrieved 2009-08-15)(Big opening for Tanami Golds Coyote Mining international, published 2006-05-23, retrieved 2009-08-15)In October 2006, Tanami had to temporarily suspend mining to cut costs as its treatment facility experienced difficulties in the commissioning.(Tanami shares take a dive Mining Top News, published 2006, retrieved 2009-08-15) In late 2006, Tanami was in talks with Gold Mining in regards to a merger, but talks were later called off amid concerns that the treatment plant at Coyote would need further investment.(Monarch, Tanami may revisit merger next year Australian, published 2006-12-09, retrieved 2009-08-15)In January 2007, the Coyote Pit 2 was flooded in a major rain event. Mining was resumed in Pit 1 in April 2007.With the financial crisis in 2008, Tanami had to borrow $7.7 million to continue its mining operation at Coyote.(Tanami Gold in $7.7m bailout Northern Territory News, published 2008-09-26, retrieved 2009-08-15)In 2008-09, ore was mined in the Coyote Open Pit 1 and 2 as well as the Gonzales lode underground operation. Once the Coyote pit will be exhausted, which is scheduled for September 2009, two other open pits will be mined, the Kookaburra and Sandpiper pits.ProductionProduction of the mine:Sources* The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, Louthean Media Pty Ltd, Editor: Ross Louthean* Western Australian Mineral and Petroleum Statistics Digest 2008 Page 34: Principal Mineral and Petroleum Producers - Gold References  External links * Tanami Gold website* Official opening speech of the Governor General
23927024
Arnold_Lava_Tube_System
The Arnold Lava Tube System (or Arnold system) is series of tubes within Deschutes County, Oregon, of the States. It is located several miles southeast of the city of Bend. The system starts within the National Forest on the northern flank of Volcano, heads northeast onto BLM land before finally terminating on property near Horse Ridge. The system acted as a conduit for the lavas from Lava Top Butte that later fed the Badlands rootless shield.() The lava flow that created the Arnold system is also referred to as the basalt of Lava Top Butte and is related to the Horse Cave lobe which is a lava flow that created the Lava Tube System.() The lava flows of Lava Top Butte, the Badlands, the Horse system, and the Arnold system all have a geologic age around 80,000 years old.( History The system got its name from Greeley of NASA who named it during his study of lava tubes for the Department of Geology and Mineral Industries.() He based it on one of the first discoveries in the system: Arnold Ice Cave. The cave was discovered by Americans as early as 1889 and referred to as the Crook County Ice Caves.() Arnold Ice Cave was also the site of an early ice mining operation.() The ice was sold to the city of Bend and relieved the ice market which was cornered by one of the early saloon keepers.( At one time, a trench was chopped into the ice by Jim Anderson and Phil Coyner in the 1950s. They gained access to about a half mile of passage.( Years later, after the ice mining had ceased, the cave filled back up with ice, and the inner passages within the cave proved to be inaccessible to exploration attempts.() Many years later, in the early 1970s, Ronald Greeley, during his research on lava tubes, named one of the caves in the system. Deg Cave was named after the initials of Donald E. Gault, the Branch Chief for Planetology at Ames Research Center.()Though Americans lay claim to the discovery of the caves, they had been known long before to native Americans and as early as 1370 AD. This was determined from carbon dating nearby Charcoal Cave no. 1.( Conservation The lava tubes of the Arnold system have long been used by locals for varying purposes including recreational usage. Unfortunately, a major sector of the public remains uneducated and the caves repeatedly suffer from vandalism and human-induced degradation. The Central Oregon Conservation Task Force (COCTF), under the guidance of Larry King and Garry Petrie, documented the abuse of the caves.()() climbing in and around the caves marred the natural beauty with that of climbing bolts and chalk residue.(( Reports of native American art being ignored by rock climbers were commonplace.(() Rock climbers used climbing chalk in and around the sensitive rock art despite posted notice signs.(( In addition to this, sign defacement, illegal fire pits, and vegetation destruction also occurred.( The 1997 year alone resulted in an estimated damage report of $71,000.() Eventually, the COCTF removed the climbing bolts from several of the caves in an effort to partially restore the caves to their original state.(In the times past, other kinds of destructive behaviors affected the cave system. Bats were seen as target practice by those who entered the caves with guns. Sometimes bats were killed and their bodies left behind.() The caves once used to be large bat habitats, especially for the nationally listed sensitive species, the big-eared bat.( The caves have been so severely impacted that bat populations in the majority of these caves have dwindled to very small amounts or being nonexistent.()(In addition to the endangerment of the native bat species,() defacement of the caves is also ubiquitous. One report by a mineral and gem collector notes the removal of rare lava stalagmites from inside Wind Cave in a chamber believed to have been previously unexplored.() This same collector also made a habit of removing ancient artifacts from caves in the area.( Artifacts from which mankind could have learned about its ancient past. Today, many people still enjoy the lava tubes and respect their beauty and the creatures that make it their home. Yet, reports still persist of vandalism to the caves. gates have been broken and made useless by those persisting to enter caves during seasonal bat closures.( Parties continue to be a problem when individuals enter the caves and litter the ground with garbage, broken glass, and human feces.Conservation and restoration efforts are ongoing. The States Forest Service and the of Land Management, in collaboration with the High Desert Grotto, maintain the cave system.() The goal is to preserve the natural state of caves for bat use and for safe recreational use. The Oregon High Desert Grotto is an affiliate of the Speleological Society which shares the values of preserving these unique resources.() Resources of geological, biological, archaeological, and ecological value. Bat Closures The caves of the Arnold system are closed during the hibernation period of the bats. The closure dates for hibernation is between the periods of November 1 to April 15. Access to the caves ceases on November 1 and resumes on April 15.() Recently, gates have been installed on many of the caves in an effort to restore the bat habitats.Bat maternity colonies also exist in a few of the caves, though to what extent they still flourish is indeterminate. Closures for those caves with maternity colonies is between April 16 and September 30.( Maternity colonies have been noted in the past in Wind Cave, Bat Cave, Deg Cave, and Charlie-the-Cave.( Caves of the Arnold Lava Tube System There are 19 caves in the Arnold system. Out of those 19, only 8 are longer than two to three hundred feet. Lava Tube Caves The major caves of the Arnold system are in this category. Wind Cave is the longest and most difficult to traverse at 3,839 feet in slope length.( Miscellaneous Caves A few other caves exist in the system. They are mostly very small talus caves along the collapse trench walls. One other, Woolhiser Cave, appears to be a rather large surface tube and is offset from the main lava tubes.ReferencesExternal links* Arnold Lava Tube System Access Dates at High Desert Grotto* http://www.opb.org/programs/ofg/segments/view/1162?qcave Field Guide video (at 2:10 Arnold Ice Cave)
23944571
Lars_Westman
Lars Westman (born 27 September 1938 in stersund) is a Swedish film maker and cartoonist.Life and workWestman was born in the north of Sweden. He studied art (Kursverksamheten) at University of Stockholm 1963; art and advertising at Beckmans Reklamskola Stockholm 1964; and Swedish Television Producer-school 1969 He now has four children and nine grandchildren. He has worked for ten years as a typographer, and has been involved in filmmaking for nearly 50 years, primarily for television in Scandinavia. Broadcast more than 280 films in Sweden, Finland, Norway, Denmark, Germany, France, USA, satellite by Art and Discovery Channel.  Three films for cinema in Scandinavia. Prizes in Canada, Germany, Bulgaria, Sweden, Brazil. Gained lifelong-stipendium for filmmakers inSweden by the Swedish Cultural Ministry. Bo Widerbergs prize for the totalproduction given by SVT, Swedish Filminstitute, Swedish Filmlaboratories, SwedishFilmmakers Union.Filmography (selected)*1966: Habla Fidel (director)*1968: Sanningen om Bstad (director)*1970: Kamrater, motstndaren r vlorganiserad (director, cinematographer & editor)*1994: Maria och krleken  (cinematographer)*2000: G p vatten  (director  & cinematographer)FilmmakingOne of the projects, a series entitled AROUND THE WORLD took him to 42 countries.Hehas lived in Africa and made 20 films about struggle and culture in Africa. Hehas depicted what the life of a seven years-old boy can be like if he is born with aserious skin disease (The Fish Scale Disease) in VICTOR, A TRIUMPH. Together withmidwife Signe Jansson he made a film, often shown in maternity wards, whose aim isto make our start in life easier: Birth. He has filmed underwater births in theUnion, several programs on drought and starvation in Africa during 1970s,several films about development  I CAN, I TRY, I DEAR TO. A film aboutcalligraphy and the role of art in China FROM THE OLD COMES THE NEW. Followedstriking mineworkers in 1969-70 in COMRADES, OUR ENEMIES ARE WELLORGANIZED.Portrayed a radioctive accident in Brazil I HAVE CECIUM IN MY BLOOD AND I AM SCARED.As well the effect of Chernobyl accident in Scandinavia  LAPS, MOUNTAIN AND RAINDEER.He filmed his mothers life and death during 20 years, FACING DEATH. The building ofthe longest bridge in Europe between Sweden and Denmark WALKING ON WATER in sixyears for cinema and television.Films about art and poetry THE POETGENERAL, AMADO BAHIA, PICTURES UNDER THE SURFICE,WHAT IS THE DRAGON DOING IN SWEDEN?, FROM THE OLD COMES THE NEW.  About the MSTsstruggle for earth in Brasil OCUPAR, RESISTIR, PRODUZIR.At present Lars Westman is filming the roots of Shulamusic in Bahia, a second filmabout MST, following up the radioactiv accident in Goiania and a film about love forScandinavian television, THE LOVEFILM.Some of the filmsTELEVISION 6 minDESERT ISLAND 6 min  Prize in MamaiaTHE BOX 5 min  Prize in MamaiaDOTS  20 minBAKA BAKA LITEN KAKA 4 min 8 mm colorAnimated black and white 16 mm films 1959-65 THE BRIDGEOPENER  40 min black and white 16 mm 1963About Biafra and the Atom bomb  in the small country Sweden. TO NOT SPEAK ABOUT TARZAN  40 min black and white 16 mm 1966Monkeys and human beings at the zoo. THE TRUTH ABOUT BSTAD 48 min black and white 16 mm 1968 Quality Prize SwedishFilminstituteAbout a demonstration against apartheid VIET ROCK 48 min black and white 16 mm 1967 Quality Prize Swedish FilminstituteThe work on a theater in Stockholm  about Vietnam War. WHAT DID THE CHINESe SAY? Together with Sven Wernstrm 20 min  black and white 16 mm 1963 First Prize SwedishTelevision.A Cartoonists life. WHERE HAVE YOU BEEN? NOWHERE.WHAT HAVE YOU DONE? NOTHING.  28 min black and white 16 mm1965.A childs daily life. Fiction/documentary. THE SCHOOL AT THE SEATogether with Sven Wewrnstrm  28 min  black and white 16 mm1966Playa Giron, Cuba. THE SCHOOL IN THE MOUNTAIN Together with Sven Wernstrm 28 min  black and white 16 mm 1966Maestra Alfabetizasion in Cuba. HABLA FIDEL Together with Sven Wernstrm 28 min  black and white 16 mm 1966Fidel speaks to one million Cubansat The Revolution Square Havana, Cuba. MAZORRA  58 min  black and white 16 mm 1968Mental Hospital outside Havana, Cuba. THE LINEWorkers situatione on L M Ericssons fabric in Sweden. 1969. Black and white 16 mm,28 min.SECUR?SECURITAS and ABAB, two companies working with security in Sweden. 58 min 16 mmcolor, 1970.COMRADES, THE ENEMY IS WELLORGANIZED Together with Lena Ewert 93 min. black and white 16 mmm/35 mmFirst Prize in Porretta, Italy and  Quality Prize Swedish Filminstitute.About a strike in a mine in the north of Sweden.30 YEARS HAS GONE COMRADESTogether with Fredrik Gertten, Uld Sdergren.Following up the strike 30 years later 1980 58 min video color TACKSEN IS FORGOTTENTogether with Mats Beckman  38 min  black and white VIDEO1971Migration to the citys.LAVERTogether with Mats Beckman  38 min black and white VIDEO 1971A mine forgotten. ITS CHRISTMAS AGAIN. 20 min  black and white 16 mm1971A lonely mans Christmas. YOUNG AND WILD Together with Birgitta Bergmark 58 min  black and white and color 16 mm and VIDEO 1972Car-born youngsters. BISHOP HILL  20 min  color 16 mm 1974Swedish emigrants in USA.CHILDRENS WORKIn the glass industries in Sweden. 16 mm black and white 28 min 1974 DRYNESS, FAMINE, OPRESSIONETogether with Bjrn Kumm, Schyman  48 min color 16 mm 1974The Tuaregs situation in Sahel, 7 years without rain. Mali, Niger. TANGOSI Together with Bjrn Kumm, Gudrun Schyman 28 min color 16 mm 1974Portrait on a tuareg woman in a starvation camp. Niger, Tchad. JOSIAH WATERSELLERTogether with Bjrn Kumm, Gudrun Schyman  28 min  color 16 mm 1974Portrait of a man selling water in a slum area in Nima Accra Ghana. CACAO Together with Bjrn Kumm, Gudrun Schyman 28 min  color 16 mm 1974Portrait of a girl working with cacao, Ghana MARIAMATogether with Bjrn Kumm, Gudrun Schyman  28 min color 16 mm 1977portrait of a girl in slum area Gambia CORA  55 min  color 16 mm 1977Music film about the Griot  Historyteller. Gambia FULA  55 min  color 16 mm  1977Fula tribes music in Gambia. FOOD AS A WEAPON 48 min  color 16 mm 1977Senegals biggest farmer and supermarketowner, alebanes family uses the droughtsituatione to enlarge his company. RESISTENS, BALANG BAA NYANJI  48 min color 16 mm 1981A Coup Dtat in Senegambia. THE RAPE OF NIMBATogether with Alf Westman 58 min  color 16 mm 1980Portrait of a black supervisor in the Swedish owned mine Lamco, Liberia. IMAGES OF AFRICA Together with Dan Schyman 5 - 12 min color Betacam 199613 short films about dans, music, magic, theater, rituals, writings, songsand art for a Congress in Denmark.Ivory Coast, Benin, Ghana, Mozambique, South Africa. PICTURES UNDER THE SURFACE  48 min  color Betacam 1997A CROQUI-LESSON 28 min color Betacam 1978During ten years collected material on the process of making artwith famous Swedish concretist Lennart Rodhe. WHAT IS THE DRAGON DOING IN SWEDEN? Together with Lars Berglund 58 min color Betacam1987A chines Calligrapher living and teaching in Stockholm, Sweden. OUT FROM THE OLD COMES THE NEW.Together with Pierre Bjrklund, Lars Berglund 58 min color Betacam 1987Chines calligraphy and painting artist make art in front of the camera. WHAT WE SOW WE HARVESTS. 48 min color 16 mm 1987mining in Sweden. ALERT! 58 min color 16 mm 1988After Harrisburg nuclear accident, the security plans around the nuclear plantBarsebck in Sweden and Denmark. LAPS, MOUNTAINS, REINDEER. 28 min color 16 mm 1988The effects on Sweden by the Chernobyl  nuclear accident. THE BIRTHTogether with Gudrun Schyman.My sons birth 1979. 58 min color 16 mm. 58 min.I TRY, I CAN, I DEAR,Five films 28 min color video about the first years progress to learn to sit, walk, eat, talk of my sons life, 1980.DAYCARE CENTEROne year about childrens contradictions,  color video 90 min. 1983.AROUND THE WORLD Together with Janne Forsell 1989-1997  42 films 28 min color BetcamPoetic documentaries about food, music, art, religione, streets and roads, citys andvillages inGREECE, EGYPT, INDIA, PAKISTAN, MONGOLIA, VIET NAM, THAILAND, CHINA, BALI,SINGAPORE, HONG KONG, SWEDEN DALARNA, AUSTRALIA, PAPUA NEW GUINEA, BORNEO, VANUATU,HAWAII, USA, ALASKA, SOUTH DAKOTA, MEXICO, BRAZIL, ARGENTINA, PERU, CHILE, CUBA, TRINIDAD, CAMEROUN, BURKINA FASO, MADAGASCAR,TANZANIA,FRANCE, ITALY, PORTUGAL, SCOTLAND, SPAIN, ALBANIA, BULGARIA, RUMANIA, RUSSIA, AUSTRIA. URUGUAI-MALMOE Together with Fredrik Gertten 55 min color Betacam 1998Emigrants life in Sweden and Uruguai.SAMBAFOOTBALLTogether with Fredrik Ekelund 55 min color DVCam 1998The history of Brazilian football and how to save treetchildrens life. WALKING ON WATER  Together with Fredrik Gertten 93 min color DVCam/35 mm  2000Building of a bridge Sweden-Denmark during sex years. THE POETRYGENERALTogether with Fredrik Gertten  55 min color  DVCam  2002portrait of the poetry festival in Malmoe, Sweden and the manager of the festivalLasse Sderberg.SILHOUETTE, AN AFRICAN JOURNEYTogether with Fredrik Gertten 48 min color DVCam  2002A Swedish dans company in Tanzania.RUA PAPA URBANO/ SAO PAULO II  26 min color DVCam  2003A woman living in slum area in Bahia.  Honorary Prize in Cine Eco FestivalPortugal.LULA, WE WANT LAND and AS LONG AS HUNGER EXISTTogether with Lennart Kjrling 50 min color 2006-2008The MST struggle for bread and earth in Brasil.CESIUM IN MY BLOODTogether with Zenildo Barretto 55 min color 2007Following up of the Goiania radioactive accident 1987DO YOU LOVE ME?Together with Niels-Pagh Andersen, Thomas Stenderup 55 min color 2006My love relationes in my life. GARRINCHA AND HOT DOGS  Together with Fredrik Ekelund 55 min color 2007Football player Garrinchas Swedish son take up the roots.AMA DO JORGEThe Brazilian writer Amados work and life and death. 50 min video 2000.ELEGYA tribute to violinista Teixeiras music in de Janeiro 2009 color video59 min.Own work*THE WONDERFUL SOURCE 48 min color Betacam filmed 1987The connection with African traditional art and Picasso, Matisse etc.*LUTA  58 min color Betacam filmed 1987Master Class of Lutaplaying.*ROOTS OF THE SLAVERYHaleys lies and the African history.*SCHIZOPHRENIAMy fathers life and Swedens Schizophrenia.*CLIMATE CHANGEThe war on the water resources.*MATA ATLANTICAA forest once upon a time.*BASS MUSICHellborgs music and life in USA, Syria, Sweden, India.*CROSS AND VAGINARodhes and Courbets art.*SAMBABLUESThe roots of Samba in Brazil.*MARIA AND HER LOVEA adopted Brazilian girls life in Sweden.*ART AS SCIENCEWith singer Sven Kristersson. 2009*TO LIVE WITH RADIOACTIVITYAbout cancer and leukemia in Sweden after Chernobyl accident.*SLEEPPeople sleeping around the world.*FUNERALFuneral ceremonies around the world.*HADARS TESTIMONYA miners life in north in Sweden.*MACUMBASlave history and ceremonies in Bahia Brazil.*RAINPoetic film about rain in tropic countries.*WHAT DO YOU THINK?My three year old sons thoughts and questiones.*IN A REFUGEES FOOTSTEPSAbout the first political refugees after War II in Sweden.Roadmovie in Brasil.*IN THE COWS EYESThe Swedish writer Lidmans poetical struggle.*ELEGYA tribute to violinist Teixeiras music in Rio de Janeiro 2009.*SCHIZOPHRENIAMy fathers life and Swedens schizophrenia.*CHILDRENS LOVEFollowing my childrens love affairs during 50 years. 90 min *LIBERTYWhat are the US doing in Liberia?*WHAT MY EYES HAVE SEENRetrospective around the world. 3 hours video color.External links**Westman
23957650
Belt_filter
right|thumb|400px|Diagram of a belt filter: sludge in the feed hopper is sandwiched between two filter cloths (shown green and purple). Fluid is extracted initially by gravity, then by squeezing the cloth through rollers. Filtrate exits through a drain, while solids are scraped off into a container.The belt filter (sometimes called a belt filter press) is an industrial machine, used for solid/liquid separation processes, particularly the dewatering of sludges in the industry, mining and treatment. The process of filtration is primarily obtained by passing a pair of filtering cloths and belts through a system of rollers.  OperationThe feed sludge to be dewatered is introduced from a hopper between two filter cloths (supported by perforated belts) which pass through a convoluted arrangement of rollers. As the belts are fed through the rollers, water is squeezed out of the sludge. When the belts pass through the final pair of rollers in the process, the filter cloths are separated and the cake is scraped off into a suitable container.(Belt filter press, how it functions)A belt filter is generally used in phosphatic fertiliser plants to separate the solid from slurry. It comprises washing to different zone to minimise the product losses. Belt filters use a vacuum system to minimise offgas and effluent during operations. It has applications in many other areas of industry.ImprovementsThe effectiveness of the operation can be increased by creating a pressure difference across the filter cloth. The filter cloth is directed though a zone where either pressure or vacuum pushes water from the filter cloths and ultimately to drain. (United States Patent 4212745 (July 1980))The sludge can be combined with a filter aid or flocculant the help the filtration process and reduce blinding of the filter cloth. (Filter cloths can be cleaned throughout the operation of the process by means of water sprays positioned on the return section of the belt. (US Patent 5569382 - Belt filter device having a cleaning spray head (October 1996))ReferencesPicturesSome of the belt filter presses examples from www.dinworks.fi pagework scheme of belt press from www.beltpres.net pageBelt PresHigh Efficiency in Sludge DewateringFurther reading*preparation plant*Paper Sartell Millde:Bandfilternl:Zeefbandfilter
23968430
Institute_of_Molecular_Biotechnology
The Institute of Molecular Biotechnology (IMBA) is an independent research organisation founded as a joint initiative of the Academy of Sciences in cooperation with the company Ingelheim an international pharmaceutical company with headquarters in Germany. IMBA operates in close collaboration with the Institute of Molecular Pathology, Boehringers basic research center both located next to each other at the Campus Vienna Biocenter (VBC).Main Research AreasIMBAs vision is to understand the fundamental molecular mechanism in molecular biological processes and currently focus in biology, interference, and epigenetics research performed by independent research groups. The topics actually addressed at the institute are:*Bones, Immunity and Cancer (Josef Penninger)*Epigenetic Regulation by the Polycomb and Trithorax group proteins (Leonie Ringrose)*The piRNA Pathway in the Drosophila Germline - an RNA based Genome Immune System (Julius Brennecke)*Mechanisms of RNA silencing in human cell (Javier Martnez)*Asymmetric cell division and proliferation control in Drosophila (Jrgen Knoblich)*RNA-directed DNA elimination in Tetrahymena (Kazufumi Mochizuki)*Design and function of molecular machines (Thomas Marlovits)Core FacilitiesIMBA services are shared with the Institute of Molecular Pathology (IMP) offer a state-of-the-art infrastructure for scientists who are dedicated to making a difference in biological molecular research.Services offered comprise the Bioinformatics department for sequence analysis, scientific mining with hardware and software infrastructure. The BioOptics facility offers analytical cytometry, cell sorting and microscopy. The Electron Microscopy facility provides two transmission electron microscopes of 100 kV and 300 kV. The Genomics department, for  microarray services and next-generation sequencing devices. There is a protein chemistry department for spectrometry experiments. The Max Perutz Library provides information service for all literature needs.An animal house helps managing mice colonies, and other facilities include the service department, the workshop, an art department and a kindergarten at service for the staff of the IMP.Associated projectsThe Vienna Drosophila RNAi Center (VDRC) is located at IMBA, and is available to researchers worldwide. It collects an library with above 22,000 Drosophila strains.The animal facility supervises care of mice and hosts the Austrian Network for Functional Mouse Genomics which focus on transgenic mouse technologies.International PhD ProgramThe Campus Vienna Biocenter and the of Vienna coordinate a high-standard international PhD program to training outstanding students who want to pursue a scientific career. The students are selected twice a year and are invited to Vienna for a week of interviews, where the candidates talk to all the group leaders and get to know the institute facilities. The successful candidates are selected in agreement with principal investigators choices and the students perspectives.HistoryIn 1999 the Institute of Molecular Biotechnology was founded as a joint initiative of the Austrian Academy of Sciences and Boehringer Ingelheim. The Austrian Government and the city of Vienna would also contribute to its funding and in 2002 the geneticist Josef Penninger started  as the Scientific Director of IMBA who would recruit Barry Dickson as the first group leader in house and who is actually the director of the neighbor institute Institute of Molecular Pathology (IMP).The construction of the institute started in 2003 until 2006 when it was finally inaugurated. The institute lies wall-to-wall with the IMP, to enhance collaborations and with whom they share the scientific facilities.IMBA goes on expanding and in 2007 the Vienna Drosophila RNAi Center (VDRC) in collaboration with the IMP is opened.Since 2007 IMBA has a Scientific Advisory Board (SAB) for decision making chaired by Nobel prize winner Eric Kandel.AwardsEven being a newcomer in the Molecular Biology community, the IMBA has soon received recognition in the form of awards to its researchers and grants for outstanding projects.Josef Penninger, the scientific director has been elected as a full member of The Austrian Academy of Sciences (AW), he has been awarded with the Jung Prize for Medicine by the Jung-Stiftung for Science and Research, the Descartes Prize for Research by the European Commission and has received the Carus-Medal by the German Academy of Sciences Leopoldina.During his time in the institute, Dr. Barry Dickson was recognized with the Wittgenstein Award which is the most generously supported research program in Austria, awarded by the Federal Ministry for Science.The institute has also received support by the European Research Council and Kazufumi Mochizuki has received one of the Research Councils first awarded ERC Starting grants.Science CommunicationIMBA is concerned on reaching science to the public, and it has started a program to teach basic scientific knowledge in Molecular Biology in collaboration with the incorporated society Dialog Gentechnik, the result opened in 2006 as the Vienna Open Lab as the first biomolecular hands-on laboratory in Austria, which only after few months from is opening, already welcomed its thousandth guest.External links*Institute of Molecular Biotechnology (IMBA) official website*Campus Vienna Biocenter*International PhD Program in Molecular Life Sciences*Vienna Drosophila RNAi Center (VDRC)*Austrian Network for Functional Mouse Genomics*Vienna Open Labfr Molekulare Biotechnologiede Biotecnologa Molecular
23985005
Saxon_Highlands_and_Uplands
The Saxon Highlands and Uplands () refer to a region mainly in the south of Saxony with small elements also in southeast Thuringia and northeast Bavaria. It comprises, from (south)west to (north)east, of the Vogtland, the Ore Mountains, Switzerland, the Lusatian Plateau and the Hills.The amalgamation of several major geographical units by the working group for Ecological balance and Regional Character at the Academy of Sciences in Leipzig, that includes a break-up of the old natural region of  Oberlausitz, has not been fully recognised officially, because this division has not yet been accepted by federal authorities like the fr Naturschutz (BfN), but does broadly follow the logic of other groupings such as that of the Upland which border it to the west and includes the Forest, Highland, Forest and Fichtelgebirge.Whilst the Thuringian-Franconian Upland, like the adjacent Palatine-Bavarian Forest run from northwest to southeast, these low Saxon mountains generally run from west-southwest to east-northeast. The Vogtland, whose German section lies mainly in the natural region in the Free State of Saxony that gives it its name, forms the actual link to the Thuringian-Franconian Upland.The new internal subdivisions of the Ore Mountains have since been adopted by the BfN. Natural sub-divisions The following list shows the current division of natural regions. Main geographical units according to Meynen and the BfN are shown with an asterisk (*).* Saxon Highlands and Uplands** 41 (D17) Vogtland* (partly in Thuringia)*** 410 East Thuringian-Vogtland Plateau *** 411 Middle Vogtland Peak District*** 412 Upper Vogtland **** Elstergebirge** 42 (D16) Mountains**** Ore Mountains*** Ore Mountains*** Ore Mountains** 43 (D15) Chalk Sandstone Region* *** 430 Switzerland*** 431 Mountains (German part of the Mountains which also stretch into the Republic)** to 44 (D14) Mountainous part of Upper Lusatia**** 441 Lusatian Plateau Alternative sub-divisions according to Meynen and BfN The older division of the Ore Mountains into major units by Meynen is as follows (in brackets their location within the new classification):* 42 (D16) Mountains (Erzgebirge)** 420 Southern foothills of the Ore Mountains (extreme southwest of the Ore Mountains)** 421 Upper Western Ore Mountains (Ore Mountains apart from the extreme southwest and extreme northeast, southern part of the Ore Mountains)** 422 Upper Eastern Ore Mountains (southern part of the Ore Mountains) ** 423 Lower Western Ore Mountains (Extreme northeast of the Ore Mountains, north and centre of the Ore Mountains) ** 424 Lower Eastern Ore Mountains (North and centre of the Ore Mountains) See also * regions of Germany Sources * Map of the natural regions in Saxony at www.umwelt.sachsen.de (pdf, 859 kB)* BfN** Map services** Landscape fact files*** Vogtland**** Upper levels of the East Thuringian-Vogtland Plateau and the Middle Vogtland Peak District**** Upper Saale Valley**** Northern East Thuringian-Vogtland Plateau (excluding lake district)**** Plothen Lake District**** Ronneburg Arable and Mining Region (Northeastern East Thuringian-Vogtland Plateaus)**** Lower levels of the Middle Vogtland Peak District**** Intermediate levels of the Upper Vogtland**** Lower levels of the Upper Vogtland*** Ore Mountains (Erzgebirge)**** Southern foothills of the Ore Mountains**** Upper levels of the northern foothills of the Western and Middle Ore Mountains**** Lower levels of the Western Ore Mountains**** Lower levels of the Middle Ore Mountains **** Upper levels of the Eastern Ore Mountains**** Lower levels of the Eastern Ore Mountains**** Tharandt Forest (northern part of the Eastern Ore Mountains)*** Kreidesandsteingebiet und Oberlausitz**** Saxon Switzerland (excluding the Elbe Valley)**** Upper Elbe Valley**** Upper Lusatian Plateau**** Zittau HillsBergland und Mittelgebirge
23991824
Jinniu_Energy
Hebei Jinniu Energy Resources Co, Ltd. () is a conglomerate company engaged in coal mining, construction material businesses, chemical production business, electricity power business and trading business. This company also engaged in the production and distribution of glass fibre and methyl alcohol through its subsidiaries. During end of year 2008, this company produced 12 million tons of raw coal and 4.92 million metric tons of clean coal, as well as sold approximately 9.67 million metric tons of commercial coal. During the end of year 2009, this company had six major subsidiaries and three major associates.(Jinniu Energy at Google Finance)This company is listed in Stock Exchange.References
24003120
IMIDRO
Iranian Mines and Mining Industries Development and Renovation Organization (IMIDRO) is a major holding company active in the mining sector in Iran. IMIDRO has 8 major companies and 55 operational subsidiaries active in steel, aluminum, copper, cement and mineral exploitation fields.(http://www.iran-daily.com/1388/3468/html/economy.htm)In 2002 IMIDRO and its subsidiaries had 49.3 thousand employees with a total asset value of 33.5 thousand billion Rials. In 2002 IMIDRO subsidiaries annual turnover value was estimated at 3.23 thousand billion Rials and their export at 448 million dollars in 2002.(http://www.exmi2008.com/english/imidro.html)Foreign projectsIn 2009, IMIDRO reported that 9 countries including Syria, Venezuela, Bolivia, Algeria, Lebanon, Ecuador, Iraq, Belarus and one of the Mid-Asian countries will have plants which will be constructed by Iranian engineers.(http://steelguru.com/news/index/2009/11/15/MTIwNDE3/Iran_to_construct_cement_plants_in_9_countries.html) Iran is the 5th cement producer in world.(http://www.presstv.com/detail.aspx?id133493&sectionid351020102)In 2009 Iran produced some 65 million tons of cement per year and exported to 40 countries.(http://www.tehrantimes.com/index_View.asp?code213927)Main subsidiaries*Al-Mahdi Aluminum Company*Ehdas Sanat Company (ESC) - Cement company*Steel Company (ESCO)*Aluminum Company (IRALCO)*Iranian Minerals Production and Supply Company (IMPASCO)*Khuzestan Steel Company (KSC)*Mobarakeh Steel Company (MSC)*National Iranian Copper Industries Company (NICICO)*National Iranian Steel Company (NISCO)*Ministry of Industries and Mines Institute for Training and Research*Persian Gulf Mining & Metal Industries Special Zone (P.G.S.E.Z)See also*in Iran*Mining and Industrial Company*in Iran*in Iran*IDROReferences(External links*IMIDRO*Persian Gulf Mines and Metals;Videos*PG Special Economic Zone
24011114
Jos_de_los_Reyes_Berreyesa
box_width      Jos de los Reyes Berrelleza (also spelled Berreyesa) was born at Santa Clara de Ass in Californias on January 6, 1785, the third child and first son in the family of Mara Gertrudis Peralta and Nicholas Antonio Berrelleza.(FamilyTreeMaker.com. Descendants of Luis Cayetano (Berrelleza) Berreyesa. Retrieved on August 14, 2009.) He served as an army sergeant at El Presidio Real de San Francisco. In 1805, he married Mara Zacarias Bernal at Mission Santa Clara. The couple had 13 children during 18071833, with 10 living past infancy.( They moved in 1834 to hold land in Almaden Valley, in present day Clara County, California.Rancho San VicenteIn 1842, Jos de los Reyes Berreyesa received from Governor Bautista Alvarado a grant giving him one square league, or , of the land he had been cultivating, called Rancho San Vicente, near the Teresa Hills and at the south end of Almaden Valley. The grant included a large section of the rocky hills upon which a rich source of mercury-carrying cinnabar ore was found in 18441845, and the discovery was made public. Mercury was an important part of gold- and silver-mining operations, and was in demand the world over, and especially in the California gold fields after 1848. The neighboring grant, Los Capitancillos, was held by Justo Laros, who claimed the mercury mine was part of his land.( The Fossat or Quicksilver Mine Case,  U.S. Supreme Court, 69 U.S. 2 Wall. 649 649 (1864)) Andres Castillero also claimed the mercury mine was part of his land. Robert Walkinshaw and some other men squatted on the land in February 1845 and began to take lumber and limestone away for sale in August.(The United States vs. Andres Castillero: New Almaden : transcript of the record, Volume 1. United States District Court, California, Northern District. 1859.)  The Almaden mercury mine began producing a small amount of rich ore in 1846. Bear Flag RevoltIn 1846, during the Flag Revolt, three of the Californio sons of Jos de los Reyes Berreyesa were imprisoned by C. Frmont in California, where one of the sons, de los Santos Berreyesa, had been serving as alcalde.(Eldridge, Zoeth Skinner. The Beginnings of San Francisco: From the Expedition of Anza, 1774, to the City Charter of April 15, 1850 : with Biographical and Other Notes, Z.S. Eldredge, 1912, pp. 406408.) Accompanied by two cousins, twin sons of de Haro, the 61-year-old father went to see how his sons were being treated in prison. After they landed their boat in San Rafael, the three men were shot and killed by three of Frmonts men, including Carson,( and they were stripped of their belongings.( When asked by prisoner Jos de los Santos Berreyesa whether their father had been killed, Frmont said it might have been a man named Castro. A soldier of Frmonts was seen wearing the elder Berreyesas serape, and Frmont refused to assist Jos de los Santos Berreyesa in retrieving it as a final token of their father to give to their mother. The three brothers resorted to buying the serape from the soldier for the extortionate price of $25.(Eldredge, Zoeth Skinner. The Beginnings of San Francisco, 1912. Appendix D: The Murder of Berreyesa and the De Haros. Hosted at SFGenealogy. Retrieved on August 16, 2009.) Later, Carson told OFarrell that he regretted killing the Californios, but that the act was only one such that Frmont ordered him to commit.(See also*family*Jos Berreyesa families of California*Berreyesa (disambiguation)*of CaliforniaReferencesExternal links* Berreyesa family photos
24034063
Dust_514
Dust 514  is an upcoming console-based MMOFPS set within the Eve universe, developed by Games. It was announced on August 18, 2009 at the Developers Conference in Germany and was introduced with a short trailer featuring realtime footage of the game.()() This game will be the first game developed by CCP since Online, and it is currently being developed by CCPs Shanghai studio. According to Hilmar Veigar Petursson, the CEO of CCP Games, the game is being developed exclusively for the PlayStation 3 and PlayStation Vita.(() Description The game features users fighting ground battles in wars on planets in the Online universe.() According to a preview by Edge, the events that happen in this game will affect the EVE Online universe. Battles in this game can also determine who controls various planets in the EVE universe, and users in DUST 514 can interact with users from the EVE universe such as providing mercenary assistance during planet battles.() In an interview conducted by Simon Carless of Gamasutra, Petursson said that he hopes these Online and DUST 514 communities will meld over time, bridging the two environments. He also wanted to establish a relationship between the flying-oriented nature of Eve Online and the infantry-oriented nature of DUST 514, saying while the fleet does the flying, the infantry does the dying.( According to Informer, this gives fans and players of Eve Online a new challenge in testing their FPS skills.( )A preview in PC World states that the plot behind the game will deal with cloned soldiers, and that some of these plot elements will be explained in an upcoming Eve Online novel.()On March 10, 2010 CCP Games and Epic Games China reached an agreement to license Engine 3.() Fanfest 2009 thumb|right|The original logo for DUST 514, used from its announcement up to E3 2011.At Eve Onlines Fanfest 2009, more information was released about Dust 514 during the keynote speech. In the speech it was revealed that Dust 514 will be linked with Eve Online using phased implementation strategy at specific stages during the life-cycle of both games, but neither will require the other in order to work. Players will not have classes, instead players will decide on their specialization through the choices they make. Customizable vehicles will be available to all players, using a high-medium-low slot system similar to Eve Online. During matches there will be a commander who will have an RTS-style perspective. A form of player housing will also be available.()DUST 514 will not require a subscription fee to play, instead using a micro-transaction model. DUST will have two currencies, interstellar kredits (ISK) and aurum (AUR). ISK is the same currency as in EVE Online and will be earned in-game through completing contracts, conquering planets and mining resources. AUR can only be bought with real money.() Fanfest 2011 At EVE Fanfest 2011 a small amount of teaser information was released. Setting the official release date to SoonTM as well as showcasing CCPs vision for both Dust and Eve in the trailer A Future Vision. In this trailer CCP has hinted that eventually the games will exist in one world and integrate seamlessly, allowing everything from the basic cross game interaction to calling in strikes from orbiting ships.() E3 2011 At the Sony Press Conference, it was confirmed that Dust 514 is to be released exclusively on the PlayStation 3 and PlayStation Vita.(Dust 514 Exclusive to PS3 and Vita Next Summer | The Gaming Liberty.com)( A beta would be held before the end of 2011 followed by a release in the spring of 2012.  CCP has dropped the Xbox 360 as a potential platform, in an interview it was revealed that the choice of PlayStation 3 was partly influenced by Sonys more open platform allowing Dust 514 to connect to the EVE Online Server, Tranquillity.() EVE Alliance Tournament IX (2011) During the final stages of the Tournament, in one of the studio discussions sections, a  CCP developer described the beta phase as beginning late in 2011, and lasting for a longer-than-average period, as a means of establishing a fully backgrounded environment ready for the final release of the game.  There would be limited access to the beta sessions -- no indication was given as to whether or not these would involve direct co-ordination with EVE itself. Gamescom 2011 A demonstration of the game was present for journalists. Gameplay Gameplay in Dust 514 will follow a similar setup to popular titles like Halo or (video game) while still including its unique features. Players take the role of a freelance mercenary available for hire (confirmed multiplayer-online only). Also available is CVC (or Corporations vs. Corporation matches) which take place at the request of Corporations in Eve. Although the Dust players will be mercenaries, they can also seize territory from planets within the EvE universe for their own alliance and corporation, which will take place in the form of Corporation vs. Corporation matches. Thus allowing Dust corporations to build infrastructure on taken territory, but it is unclear what manufacturing power Dust corps will hold.()  The current limit for online matches is set at 64 (32 vs 32).() However CCP has stated that the limit may increase by release or afterward. This is probably due to the Unreal 3 Engines current limit on online play.() References  External links **First Dust 514 trailer*Dust 514 page on EVELOPEDIA514514514514
24061342
AMS_Device_Manager
AMS Device Manager is plant asset management(Plant Asset Management ARC Advisory Group.) software from Emerson Process Management. It provides a single application for predictive diagnostics, documentation, calibration management, and device configuration for managing field instruments and digital valve controllers.AMS Device Manager is based on open communication standards, and is a core component of the PlantWeb digital plant architecture.Common usesAMS Device Manager is used in chemical (Low-Cost Startup, Predictive Maintenance DuPont), food & beverage, life sciences (Simplifies Instrument and Valve Maintenance Lilly), LNG, metals & mining (Experience Savings Through Process Automation Tyco), oil & gas (Achieves 99% Availability Chevron), power (Sustain Plant Reliability and Save Money We Energies), pulp & paper (Significant Savings on HART Devices Appleton), refining, and water & wastewater companies. It is used to increase quality (Reduce Maintenance Costs and Unscheduled Shutdowns AkzoNobel), throughput (Saves Money, Improves Plant Reliability Cargill), and availability (Checking Safety Interlocks Saves Time and Money Syngenta), while reducing costs around operations & maintenance (Saves Money Using Predictive Diagnostics Alabama Power), safety, health & environment (, energy & utilities (, and waste & rework (Increases Productivity and Minimizes Maintenance Costs Cabot). In addition, AMS Device Manager facilitates plants and mills to startup faster (Significantly Reduces Commissioning Time Ineos) and deliver a significant return on investment (Saves $98,000 by Commissioning Devices Lonza).CommunicationAMS Device Manager supports Digital instrument inputs and outputs; HART, Foundation fieldbus,  PROFIBUS DP, and WirelessHART.ReferencesExternal links*Emerson Process Management*PlantWeb*AMS Suite*AMS Device Manager
24070958
Dunlap_Coke_Ovens
 governing_body  Sequatchie Valley Historical AssociationThe Dunlap Coke Ovens are the remnants of a coke production facility near Dunlap, in the U.S. state of Tennessee.  Built in the early 1900s, the facility consists of five batteries of 268 ovens, which operated under various companies until the early 1920s.(Gary Hayes and Claudette Stager, National Register of Historic Places Nomination Form for the Dunlap Coke Ovens, 1985-05-20.)  The ovens are now listed on the Register of Historic Places, and are maintained by the Sequatchie Valley Historical Society as part of Dunlap Coke Ovens Park.The rise of the steel industry during the Industrial Revolution brought about an exponential increase in the demand for coke, a fuel derived from the carbonization of coal that was used primarily in the production of iron.  The Dunlap coke facility, which converted coal mined atop Fredonia Mountain into coke for use in blast furnaces in nearby Chattanooga, brought drastic change and modernization to Dunlap and the central Valley, the economy of which had long been based on agriculture.(  While the ovens themselves are all that remain from Dunlaps coke production operations, the Sequatchie Valley Historical Society has redeveloped the coke ovens area into a substantial public park and museum. LocationThe Sequatchie Valley is a long, narrow syncline valley carved into the southern section of the Plateau.  Dunlap, the county seat of Sequatchie County, is located near the center of the valley.  The relatively steep walls of the Plateau rise roughly  above the valley floor, which is traversed by the River.  Fredonia Mountain, a section of the western valley wall, rises steeply a few miles west of Dunlap.  The Dunlap Coke Ovens are situated at the base of Fredonia Mountain, along a stream known as Coops Creek.  The ovens and surrounding park are located on Mountain View Road, just under a mile west of downtown Dunlap.The Dunlap ovens and the coking processleft|210px|thumb|Sandstone facing of two ovensThe Dunlap Coke Ovens facility consists of five batteries&mdash; four double batteries of ovens built back-to-back in staggered formation, and one single battery of ovens resting against an embankment.  The batteries are all approximately  tall and  wide, and range in length from  to .  The largest battery contains 100 ovens built back-to-back, and the smallest battery contains 24 built back-to-back.  The lone single battery contains 38 ovens, and measures .  Each battery rests on a foundation of clay.((Carson Camp, Coke Ovens Walking Tour Map.  Retrieved: 2009-08-21.)right|250px|thumb|1879 illustration showing coke ovens in operation at an unnamed locationThe ovens themselves are  in diameter, with sandstone exteriors and firebrick interiors.  Each oven has an opening at the top and a window on the side.  In the early 1900s, railroad tracks ran across the top of each battery.  An incline railway connected the ovens to a coal mine further up the mountain slope, and railroad cars would carry coal from the mine to the tops of the batteries and dump the coal into the ovens top openings.(Henry Camp, Sequatchie County (Memphis, Tenn.: Memphis State University Press, 1984), pp. 70-76.)    During the coking process, a laborer would level the deposited coal through the side window using a scaper.  Once the coal was ready, the side window would be sealed with clay, leaving a  opening to allow the entry of air.  The process, which essentially involves heating coal in a closed chamber to remove its volatile material, took about 72 hours.  At the end of the process, the clay seal was broken, and the coke was removed and placed on a train for shipment to an iron furnace in Chattanooga.  Two tons of coal typically produced one ton of coke.(Historyright|210px|thumb|Reconstructed commissary (now the Coke Ovens Museum)The arrival of the railroad in the 1880s brought major coal mining operations to the southern Cumberland Plateau.  Coal was first mined on Fredonia Mountain in 1899, although it was considered too soft for domestic purposes.(  The following year, the Douglas Coal and Coke Company purchased a  tract of land around the base of Fredonia Mountain for the mining of coal and production of coke.(Carson Camp, The Boom Years in Dunlap.  Originally published in the Running Water Historical News, June 1995.  Retrieved: 2009-08-21.) By 1902, Douglas had constructed the first 50 coke ovens, developed several coal mines, built the incline railway, and had established a company town with a commissary and clubhouse.  The company suffered from labor problems, however, and never quite developed a method of separating the dirt from the coal.  In 1904, Douglas halted operations.(Carson Camp, The Company Town.  Originally published in the Running Water Historical News, June 1995.  Retrieved: 2009-08-21.)  left|210px|thumb|Shed and tools on display at the Dunlap Coke Ovens Park mine replicaThe Chattanooga Iron and Coal Company purchased the Douglas operation in 1905, and the following year built a steam-powered coal washer and constructed additional coke ovens.  Chattanooga Iron and Coal owned quarries in Georgia and a blast furnace in the Tannery Flats section of Chattanooga.  At its blast furnace, the company used coke from its Dunlap operation to convert iron ore mined at its Georgia quarries into pig iron.(  The operation proved profitable until 1916, when a boiler explosion destroyed its coal washer.  The company built a new washer and added more coke ovens that year, but the cost and poor performance of the new washer drained the company financially.(  In 1919, the company sold its entire iron and coke operation to the Southern States Iron and Coal Company.(    By 1920, Dunlap effectively consisted of two towns, just under a mile apart.  Dunlap proper (the towns courthouse square and downtown area) had a population of 765, whereas the company town operated by Southern States Iron and Coal (at the present coke ovens park site) had a population of 700.  The companys 350-man Dunlap workforce included a sizeable African-American population that was segregated.  The coke ovens required a crew of 85 to remain in full operation.  Southern States Iron and Coal produced coke at Dunlap until 1922, when it shut down its Dunlap operations.  In 1928, brothers E.P. and E.K. Rosamund purchased Southern States Dunlap properties with plans to revive the coke operation, but with the onset of the Great Depression and plummeting coal prices, their plans never materialized.(Dunlap Coke Ovens Parkright|210px|thumb|Amphitheater, with battery of ovens in the backgroundAfter the 1920s, the Dunlap Coke Ovens lay dormant for over a half century.  By the 1980s, all that remained of the Dunlap operations were the ovens, a slate pile and coal washer ruins, two company houses (drastically modified), and the clubhouse.  Some of the ovens retained only their sandstone frame, some retained only their brick interiors, and some had collapsed entirely.(  In 1985, the ovens were added to the National Register of Historic Places.  The property, which had come under the ownership of the Bowater Corporation, was donated to the Sequatchie Valley Historical Association later that same year.  With the help of hundreds of volunteers, the association cleared tons of trash from the area, and the Dunlap Coke Ovens Park opened in 1987.(Carson Camp, Preserving Our History.  Originally published in the Running Water Historical News, June 1995.  Retrieved: 2009-08-21.)  To raise funds for park staffing and maintenance, the Sequatchie Valley Historical Association built an amphitheater adjacent to one of the oven batteries, and held its first annual Coke Ovens Bluegrass Festival.  In 1989, the park received $71,000 from the estate of Rhea County historian David Henry Gray, which it used to reconstruct the commissary on its original foundation.  The reconstructed building now houses the Coke Ovens Museum.(Carson Camp, Reconstructing Our History.  Originally published in the Running Water Historical News, June 1995.  Retrieved: 2009-08-21.)  Along with the museum, ovens, and amphitheater, Dunlap Coke Ovens Park includes a coal mine replica with mining machinery on display, the ruins of the 1906 coal washer, a replica of the Dunlap depot, a caboose, and various park shelters.  A hiking trail now follows the incline railway grade to the former mining areas atop Fredonia Mountain.(Annual Bluegrass FestivalThe parks signature event is the annual bluegrass festival, which takes place the first weekend in June.(http://www.cokeovens.com/)The event attracts bands and fans from around the region, including the strong bluegrass community in Chattanooga. The festival continues the long friendship between bluegrass musicians and the historical association. Local pickers played an integral role in the development of the park from the beginning, providing effort, connections, and entertainment to help with clean-up, construction, and fundraising. The event is promoted as family-friendly.(Charli Wyatt, Coke Ovens Slaves, Video. 27 minutes. 2008)DocumentaryIn 2008, filmmaker Charli Wyatt produced a half-hour program about the park and bluegrass festival. Coke Ovens Slaves tells the story of the volunteers and musicians who work to preserve local history and culture through the Coke Ovens park and festival. The program aired several times on Chattanoogas PBS station, WTCI. A DVD was also released locally. The title of the film refers to a song written by Ed Brown, the festivals music director and an original member of the historical society.(Charli Wyatt, Coke Ovens Slaves, Video. 27 minutes. 2008)Bluegrass MonumentIn 2008, a group of local bluegrass fans erected and dedicated a monument to those bluegrass musicians who have performed at the park or in the Sequatchie Valley. Musicians names are inscribed on stone slabs on each side of the monument.(Charli Wyatt, Coke Ovens Slaves, Video. 27 minutes. 2008)ReferencesExternal links*Dunlap Coke Ovens Museum &mdash; official site*Tennessee History for Kids article about the park  
24075573
Metabaltoceras
Microbaltoceras is an extinct genus of actively mobile carnivorous cephalapod of the family Baltoceratidae, essentially a Nautiloid, that lived in what would be America during the Ordovician from 490466 mya, existing for approximately .(PaleoBiology Database: Metabaltoceras, basic info)TaxonomyMetabaltoceras was named by Flower (1964). Its type is Metabaltoceras fusiforme. It was assigned to Baltoceratidae by Flower (1964); and to Ellesmerocerida by Sepkoski (2002).(R. H. Flower. 1964. The Nautiloid Order Ellesmeroceratida (Cephalopoda). State Bureau of Mines and Mineral Resources, New Mexico Institute of Mining and Technology, Memoir 12:234)(J. J. Sepkoski. 2002. A compendium of fossil marine animal genera. Bulletins of American Paleontology 363:1-560)MorphologyThe shell is usually long, and may be straight (orthoconic) or gently curved.  In life, these animals may have been similar to the modern squid, except for the long shell.References
24088556
Sphaeralcea_gierischii
Sphaeralcea gierischii (Gierisch mallow) is a species of globemallow native to the United States. The species has only recently been described and only 9 populations are currently known, in Utah and Arizona. It is threatened by mining for gypsum, and in 2009 it was listed as a candidate for protection under the Species Act.(Gierisch mallow (Sphaeralcea gierischii))(Rare Plant in Utah, Arizona New Candidate for Endangered Species Protection)EcologySphaeralcea gierischii is a plant.  References 
24103547
Wedding_cake_topper
File:Wedding cake 2004 SMC.jpg|thumb|right|This Scottish-themed cake topper is made out of fondant.A wedding cake topper is a small model that sits on top of the cake, normally a representation of the couple in formal wedding attire.HistoryThe wedding cake topper was dominant in United States weddings in the 1950s where it represented togetherness.()   Today, these decorative figurines are often part of the couples decorative theme or wedding reception style.(Glossary Terms for Wedding Stationery Retrieved on 2009-04-29)Traditional wedding cake toppers depict the couple in formal attire and are often the only part of the cake which can be kept over the years, apart from photographs of it.(Allow Your Wedding Cake Toppers To Reflect Your Personalities, Donald Saunders, Buzzle, September 13, 2007)While traditionally the bride and groom were in formal atire, with the bride in a long white wedding dress, complete with veil, and the groom in black morning dress,(Unusual Wedding Cake Toppers Can Be Quite A Talking Point, Donald Saunders, Buzzle, April 28, 2007) today there are many more designs available.( There are specific ones for the style and theme of the wedding, for instance, traditional toppers for a formal wedding, and for less formal ones, there are comical wedding cake toppers or ones depending on the couples hobbies.( In recent times, wedding cake toppers have reflected the growing diversity in marriages. Multi-ethnic wedding toppers are now available,(Cake toppers break with cookie-cutter past, Micheal E. Ross, MSNBC, June 2, 2005)(Multi-ethnic cake topper, Ebony, November 1, 2005) along with same-sex wedding toppers as well.(JOURNEYS; Mining the Gold In Gay Nuptials, Sarah Robertson, York Times, December 19, 2003)(Gay couples rewriting wedding etiquette, Sasha Talcott, Globe, March 21, 2004)See also*FigurineReferences(
24129316
Inzersdorf_(Vienna)
Inzersdorf (before 1893 Inzersdorf am Wienerberge, 1893 - 1938 Inzersdorf bei Wien) was before 1938 an independent municipality, and is now a part of the 23rd district Liesing.Today, the cadastral commune Inzersdorf has got an area of 854,06 hectare and is so on the biggest part of the district.But in the 19th century, independent Inzersdorf had also got place in the today 10th viennese district, and bordered on the villages Vsendorf, Leopoldsdorf, Ober and Unterlaa, and (in the West) on Erlaa. Geography thumb|The Liesing river in Inzersdorf between Steinsee (Stone Lake) and Schlosee (Palace Lake)The village is located in a flat marsh, thus a lot of clay was deposited in the area by the river. That was the basis for 19th centurity brickworks, whose mining holes remain until today as lakes.Geologically spoken, most parts of Inzersdorf are built on rubble from Pleistocene. In the south-east and west of the village, quaternary loam exists. The north is counted among the geological era of Holocene. History In 1120 and 1125, Inzersdorfs first mention occurred as Imicinesdorf respectively Ymizinisdorf thus meaning village of Imizi(n). It is supposed that the founder of the village was a man named Imizi, Imizo or Imizin.(Austria Lexikon: Inzersdorf) Until the beginning of the 16th century, the commune involved two villages: Inzersdorf and Willendorf. But after the of Vienna in 1529, when both villages were destroyed, only Inzersdorf was re-built.But peace didnt least long, and in the of Vienna, Inzersdorf was destroyed again. This time, Maria Katharina von Kinsky brought foreign settlers to the place.When the brothers Geyer von Osterburg ruled the village in the 16th century, Inzersdorf became the hub of evangelic church. Many Protestants settled down nearby.Years passed by and the lordship of Inzersdorf changed very often. In 1857, Ziegelbaron (Brick Baron) von Drasche-Wartinberg inherit the holding. The now aborning industrial location specialized on brickproduction and in 1872, the factories already produced 100 millions of bricks (by comparison: in 1848, they only produced 16 millions).Because of that, the viennese administration decided to integrate the northern part of Inzersdorf, where the factories were located, into the 10th Viennese district Favoriten.After the integration of that northern part which was called now Inzersdorf-Stadt(Inzersdorf-City), the rest of the village was economical degraded. In the next few years, Inzersdorf orientated onto the nearby city Liesing.After the Anschluss (annexation of Austria into Greater Germany by the regime), Inzersdorf was mergered together with Liesing and 13 other villages into Great-Vienna. Together, these villages built the new 25th district of Vienna. After the end of the World War, Inzersdorf stayed inside of Vienna, while other villages came independent again. In 1954, Inzersdorf became part of the 23rd Viennese district Liesing. This district had had much industrie before Second World War, and because of this, was bombed much by the Allies. But re-building proceeded fast, and in the end of the 20th century, new housing estates were built. In the years of 1988 until 1993, the estates Traviatagasse and Othellogasse were formed. This had big bearings on the number of inheritants of Inzersdorf: While in 1951, the cadastral commune had had about 6.000 inheritants(Ferdinand Opll: Liesing: Geschichte des 23. Wiener Gemeindebezirks and seiner alten Orte. Jugend and Volk, Wien 1982, ISBN 3-7141-6217-8. S. 198), today there are about 14.500 people living in Inzersdorf.(An exact number can not be delivered because the registration districts dont match with the cadastral communes. The registration districts Blumental, Draschegrnde, Inzersdorf, Neu-Erlaa-Neustift and Schwarze Haide altogether had 14.694 inheritants in 2001.  Source: Ortsverzeichnis 2001 Wien, published by Statistik Austria, Vienna 2005, p. 101-102) Culture thumb|St. Nikolaus ChurchOriginally both a baroque chteau from 17th century and a second younger one were situated in Inzersdorf. The castles were damaged by bombings in the Second World War and knocked down in 1965 when the motorway A 23 Sdosttangente was built. The former palace garden is used today as a public park.The classicistic St. Nikolaus Church in the town center was built between 1818 and 1820. There had been a gothic building before that was destroyed in a fire on 8 June 1817.(Franz R. Vorderwinkler: Sakrale Kunst in sterreich) Other well-known buildings are the Maria-Theresien-Schlssel which was constructed by an architect coming from the environment of Bernhard Fischer von Erlach and the Grnberger-Schlssl, a summer residence built in 1720/30.The arm of coats of Inzersdorf shows three ears of corn growing out of a heart, being framed by a golden lion and a golden horse. --> People * Donner (19001992), wife of Syng-man, President of South Korea* von Drasche-Wartinberg (18111880), Austrian industralist (de)* Popp (18691939), Austrian feminist* Rosa Aloisia Katharina Frstin von Kinsky (17831842), owner of the Herrschaft Inzersdorf* Trimmel (born 1924) (de)* Virilli (18721951), mayor References ( Bibliography & Further reading * Freund: Inzersdorf am Wienerberge, Inzersdorf am Wienerberge 1882* Opll: Liesing: Geschichte des 23. Wiener Gemeindebezirks und seiner alten Orte. und Volk, Wien 1982, ISBN 3-7141-6217-8* Platt: Die Flurnamen im 10., 12. und 13. Wiener Gemeindebezirk und in Inzersdorf. Dissertation, Wien 1997* Streissler: Die Inzersdorfer Ziegelarbeiter: Eine sozialstatistische Fallstudie zur Industrialisierung im Raum Wien. Diplomarbeit, Wien 1991 External links * wien.at - Inzersdorf* * History of Inzersdorf til 1848* History of the St. Nikolaus(Wien)
24143431
Country_Club_Mall
Country Club Mall is a shopping mall located in Vale, Maryland, a suburb of Maryland in County, Maryland. The mall has 47 retail units, as well as 5 vendor stands on the main concourse. The largest retailers in the mall are Wal-Mart, Bon-Ton, Sears, and JCPenney. Also located in the Country Club Mall is the Theatres 6, the largest movie theatre in Allegany County. The mall is managed by Gumberg Asset Management Corp.HistoryThe mall was built after the state of Maryland spent $12 million on a road that facilitated the regions growth. This is believed to have led to the closings of smaller stores in Cumberland.() The  property is a portion of a larger  parcel. Before 1979, most of the parcel, including portions of the  subject property, was used for strip mining and a golfcourse. The strip mine was filled in 1979, and the shopping center was built in 1981.  In 1979 the strip mine was filled in order to create the mall, which opened 2 years later in 1981. Almost a year after the mall opened, the Sears was completed. In its current form, the mall is  in size..http://www.mde.state.md.us/assets/document/brownfields/countryclub.pdfSurrounding AreaCountry Club Mall is located in Allegany County in Western Maryland.  The mall attracts residents from numerous counties in Maryland, Pennsylvania and West Virginia. It is the only enclosed shopping mall within .()  It is located right off of 68.EventsSpecific events are offered sporadically for different months and occasions but there are also events that occur at a scheduled time every year. Waldenbooks booksellers offer childrens story times throughout the year. Around Easter, the Easter bunny visits the mall and the mall will hold different events catered towards children and adults. Different bakeries and other food vendors will set up shop around the mall depending on the time of year. When Christmas comes around Santa Clause comes to take pictures and give presents to the children. Chick-fil-A holds a Bingo game every Tuesday morning from 9:15  10:15 a.m. Girl Scouts of America has a stand when it is time to sell cookies to anyone interested. Lastly, many fundraising organization such as Rachel Cares which is sponsored by St. Judes Hospital for Children comes to raise money for cancer research.()NotesExternal links*Official website
24168611
Sino_Gold
#REDIRECT Gold Mining
24181453
Canpotex
 intl              Canpotex, short for Canadian Potash Exporters , is a Canadian potash exporting and marketing firm, incorporated in 1970 and operating since 1972.( Based in Saskatchewan, Canpotex manages the entire Saskatchewan potash exporting industry (excluding Canadian and US sales), including transportation and delivery.()  It has been criticized as a cartel.(http://www.financialpost.com/opinion/columnists/Canpotex+cartel+bureau/3453808/story.html)Canpotex is the worlds largest exporter of potash, selling over nine million tonnes of potash in 2008,( representing about one-third of global capacity.()() The global potash market is considered a duopoly between Canpotex and Potash Co, a similar consortium which exports Belarussian and Russian potash; the two collectively control 70% of global potash exports.()Member producersCanpotex is wholly owned by its three member producers:((*Corporation of Saskatchewan (PotashCorp)  54% of potash exported*Mosaic Company  37%*Agrium  9%In August 2010, Australian mining giant Billiton announced intentions to acquire PotashCorp, though its bid was blocked by the Canadian government in November 2010 and subsequently withdrawn.(() BHP publicly intended to exit the Canpotex partnership as it prefers to market its minerals itself.() As over half of Canpotexs sales volumes ware produced by PotashCorp, both Agrium and Mosaic issued concerns.( The Saskatchewan government also issued concerns, citing that the breakup of Canpotex would likely result in lower tax revenues for the government.()FacilitiesFile:Canpotex train in BC.JPG|thumb|left|The majority of Canpotex potash is shipped to west coast terminals via CPR lines, in dedicated hopper railway carsFile:SRM-West.jpg|thumb|left|Canpotex potash railway car on display at the Railway Museum.Canpotex operates over 5,500 specialised hopper cars for inland transportation of potash from landlocked Saskatchewan to ports,() and operates solely on Pacific Railway lines.() In 2011, Canpotex started on the construction of a new $55 million rail car maintenance yard near the town of Saskatchewan used to perform maintenance and manage the inventory of railcars. ()The majority of its potash is shipped overseas to Asian, American, and Oceanic markets() through Neptune Terminals, partly owned by Canpotex, in Vancouver, Columbia.() Since 1997, Canpotex has additionally exported through Portland Terminals (owned by Canpotex and operated by Morgan) in Portland, Oregon.( Canpotex additionally ships smaller quantities of potash through the Lawrence Seaway via Bay, Ontario, and has access to ports on the Coast and of Mexico.()ShipsCanpotex has committed $900 Million to the manufacture of 15 cargo vessels.  The first of these vessels, the Saskatchewan, built as a joint venture with U-Sea received its first load of 58,000 metric tons of potash in the of Vancouver in November 2010.(Press Release November, 19, 2010)  The Saskatchewan was built by Imabari Shipbuilding of Japan and is capable of carrying 60,000 metric tons.(Arrival in Port of Vancouver )References
24197793
Thomas_H._Hoatson_House
 refnum  94001426()The Thomas H. Hoatson House, now known as the Laurium Manor Inn, is a house located at 320 Tamarack Street in Michigan.  It was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1994.(  At , it is the largest mansion in the western Peninsula of Michigan.( Thomas H. Hoatson The Hoatson House was designed by Charles W. Maass and brother, Frederick A. Maass and built in 1908 for Thomas Hoatson Jr.(  Hoatsons father, Thomas Sr., emigrated from his native Scotland to Canada in 1852.(Alvah Littlefield Sawyer, A history of the northern peninsula of Michigan and its people, The Lewis publishing company, Chicago, 1911, pp. 816-817.)  Thomas Sr. arrived in Mines, Ontario, where, on October 20 1861, Thomas Jr. was born.(  In 1865, the family moved to the United States, first to Michigan where Thomas Sr. worked at the Mine, then to Michigan and the Ridge Mine.(Edwin James Collins and Edwin James Collins Jr., Genealogy of the Thomas Hoatson Family, 1950 (revised 1986)) In 1870, the family moved a final time to Michigan, where Thomas Sr. began work as superintendent of the and Hecla Mining Company, a position he held until his death in 1897.(Thomas Hoatson Jr. attended school in Calumet until he was seventeen, after which he followed in his fathers footsteps and went to work for the Calumet and Hecla Mining Company.(  Shortly after 1900, Hoatson was involved in organizing the Bisbee Mine in Arizona,( along with his elder brother James( and other investors. Thomas Hoatson was elected second vice-president of the company.(  The mine later changed its name to the Calumet and Arizona Copper Mine, and proved wildly successful, netting the investors, including Hoatson, substantial wealth.  Despite the Arizona location of the Bisbee mine, Hoatson chose to make his home in the Peninsula. He also served as vice-president of several other mines, as well as president of the Calumet State Bank and a director of the First National Bank of Calumet.(On November 24 1886, Hoatson married Cornelia Chenowyth( of Rockland.(  The couple had six children:( Gussie, Calvin Dean, Chester, James Ramsey, Gertrude, and Grace Lorimer.(  Thomas Hoatson Jr. died on February 1, 1929.( History Thomas Hoatson Jr. built his house as a surprise for his wife and children.(  He hired architect Charles Maass to design the house; the final construction cost was $50,000.(Hoatson, Thomas H., House from the state of Michigan, retrieved 9/1/09)  The house, completed in 1907, is notable for the technological advancements included in the design.(After Hoatsons death, the house passed through the hands of a series of owners, some of whom stripped the original stained glass and lighting fixtures.( In 1989, current owners Dave and Julie Sprenger purchased the Hoatson House and turned it into a bed-and-breakfast(LAURIUM from Hunts Guide to Michigans UPPER PENINSULA, retrieved 9/1/09) under the name Laurium Manor Inn.(  The house is open to the public for accommodation and for tours,(  and is a Heritage Site associated with the National Historical Park.(Keweenaw Heritage Sites from the Keweenaw National Historical Park, retrieved 9/1/09) Description of the Hoatson House from the Houghton Daily Mining Gazette, December 23, 1906The Hoatson House is a -story wood-frame structure of Neoclassical design.  The house is rectangular with a red sandstone foundation and clapboard exterior.(  The front facade is symmetric, with a central portico with columns sheltering the main entrance and a one-story porch to each side.(  A hipped roof with gabled dormers sits atop the house.(Morgan Davis, Hoatson House (Laurium Manor Inn) from Copper Country Architects, Buildings by Charles Maass; retrieved 9/1/09) The interior has 45 rooms covering 13,000 square feet,( and boasts exceptionally fine detailing.(  The first floor contains a library measuring  by , a dining room measuring  by , and a reception hall measuring  by  with triple staircase.(  Also on the first floor are a den with an iridescent tile fireplace surround and painted murals,( a kitchen, and pantry space.(  The second floor had six bedrooms and three bathrooms.(  The third floor had three more bedrooms, a bathroom, a cedar room, and a billiard room measuring  by 50 feet.(References Further reading Sprenger, Dave. History and Tour of the Laurium Manor Inn. Laurium: Laurium Manor Inn, 1998 External links *Laurium Manor Inn
24207717
Gwalia_Gold_Mine
The Gwalia Gold Mine is located at Gwalia, a few kilometres south of Leonora, Australia. It was originally established by Welsh miners in the late 19th century and Hoover, the later of the United States, served as the mine manager in its early days from May to November 1898.(St Barbara website - Leonora accessed: 3 September 2009)(Gwalia Historic Site - History accessed: 4 September 2009)It is operated by Barbara Limited.( Apart from Gwalia, St Barbara also operates the Loch Gold Mine at Marvel Loch and owns the Gold Mine, which is placed in care and maintenance.(St Barbara website - Southern Cross accessed: 3 September 2009)(St Barbara website - Operations overview accessed: 3 September 2009)All three mines were previously owned by the now defunct mining company of Gwalia Limited.(The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, page 520) Sons of Gwalia went into administration on 30 August 2004 and the companys gold mining operations were sold to St Barbara in March 2005 for A$38 Million, having been valued by the Sons of Gwalia directors at A$120 Million. While Marvel Loch was operational before and after the sale, the Gwalia mine was already placed in care and maintenance at the time of the transaction. A fourth mine, the Dam Gold Mine, ceased operation in June 2005 and has since been sold by St Barbara.(Sons of Gwalia Limited at delisted.com.au accessed: 3 September 2009)(St Barbara Mines Limited - Lodgement of Open Briefing published: 28 June 2005, accessed: 3 September 2009)(The West Australian, published 16 March 2005, accessed: 3 September 2009)HistoryFile:Sons of Gwalia.JPG|150px|thumb|left|of Gwalia logoEstablished in 1896 as the Sons of Gwalia mine, it was named after an archaic Welsh word for Wales, Gwalia.(The Sons of Gwalia reef was discovered by three prospectors who worked it for a brief time. After selling out to George Hall for 5,000 the later recouped his investment after only one month. In search for additional capital, Hall began negotiations with a London firm, Bewick Moreing, who sent Herbert Hoover, a 23-year-old engineer, to the site. Hoover recommended Bewick Moreing purchase the mine, which they did with a cash commitment of 100,000 on 17 November 1897.() He suggested himself as manager of the project and successfully reduced costs at the mine by hiring Italian labour.(A fierce rivalry between Gwalia and neighbouring Leonora developed and a tram service was established between the two towns in 1903. From the 1920s, the town started to decline when external factors like the falling gold price started to affect the mine. On 21 December 1963, the gold mine at Gwalia closed and the town was reduced in population from 1,500 to 40.( The Sons of Gwalia mining company was delisted for the first time on 4 February 1964.( In 65 years of operation, the mine had produced 2,500,000 ounces of gold.(The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, page 105)mines Kalgoorlie Leonora.jpg|200px|thumb|right|Gold mines in the Kalgoorlie - Leonora regionIn the 1980s, a new Sons of Gwalia company, formed by the brothers Peter and Chris Lalor, descendants of Lalor,(How sons of Lalor built, then sank, Sons of Gwalia Sydney Morning Herald, accessed: 4 September 2009) started retreating old tailings before mining the old workings. In 1999, having concluded mining the Gwalia open pit, it started to develop an underground operation, passing through old workings by 2001.(On 4 September 2000, a flight to the Gwalia mine with seven SGW employees failed to land, instead continuing on to Burketown, where it eventually crashed, having run out of fuel. The pilot and the planes seven passengers were killed.(Media Release re: Aircraft Accident SGW ASX announcement, published: 5 September 2000, accessed: 8 February 2010)From 2001 onwards, the mine was part of the companys Leonora operations, after it acquired the Gold Mine through a merger with Mining. Tarmoola is located 40 km north of the Gwalia mine.(Sons of Gwalia annual report 2003 accessed: 12 January 2010)In December 2003, the mine was placed in care and maintenance after known gold resources were exhausted.(Second Quarter Activities Report SGW quarterly report December 2003, published: 20 January 2004, accessed: 7 February 2010)After a rapid rise of the company, unauthorised gold and foreign exchange trading activities by chief financial officer Eardley Ross-Adjie in the year to June 2000, ended up costing Sons of Gwalia more than A$190 million.( Sons of Gwalia went into administration on 30 August 2004, following a financial collapse, with debts exceeding $800 million after suffering from falling gold reserves and hedging losses.(Ernst &Young agrees to $125m Sons of Gwalia settlement West Australian, published: 4 September 2009, accessed: 4 September 2009) Sons of Gwalia was Australias third-largest gold producer and also controlled more than half the worlds production of tantalum.(Sons of Gwalias gold hedging had big holes Sydney Morning Herald, published: 4 September 2004, accessed: 4 September 2009)St Barbara purchased the mine from insolvent Sons of Gwalia in March 2005 with a three year plan to reopen it.(After a three year redevelopment, production resumed at the mine in September 2008, with the first gold pour being carried out in October 2008.(First Gold Pour at Leonora Operations St Barbara website, published: 23 October 2008, accessed: 4 September 2009) The Hoover decline, named after the late President, was at 1,191 metres below surface as of 30 June 2009. The plant currently continues to operate on a campaign basis, one week on, one week off.(June 2009 quarterly report accessed: 3 September 2009)ProductionProduction of the mine:* 1 2002 results for January to September only.* 2 Combined result for the Leonora operations, consiting of Gwalia and Tarmoola. The Gwalia mine however closed in December 2003.Sources* The Australian Mines Handbook: 2003-2004 Edition, Louthean Media Pty Ltd, Editor: Ross Louthean* Western Australian Mineral and Petroleum Statistics Digest 2008 Page 34: Principal Mineral and Petroleum Producers - Gold* Gwalia Historic Site - Herbert Clarke Hoover* Hoovers Gold References  External links * Place Names Search Results - Gwalia Australia website* St Barbara website - Leonora operations* MINEDEX website* How sons of Lalor built, then sank, Sons of Gwalia Sydney Morning Herald - Article on the collapse of Sons of Gwalia
24226068
Communications_Workers_of_America_v._Beck
Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735 (1988) is a decision by the United States Supreme Court which held that, in a security agreement, unions are authorized by statute to collect from non-members only those fees and dues necessary to perform its duties as a bargaining representative. The rights identified by the Court in Communications Workers of America v. Beck have since come to be known as Beck rights, and defining what Beck rights are and how a union must fulfill its duties regarding them is an active area of modern States labor law.(Ford, Karen E.; Notestine, Kerry E.; and Hill, Richard N. Fundamentals of Employment Law. 2d ed. Washington, D.C.: American Bar Association, 2000. ISBN 1570738068; Friesen, Jennifer. The Costs of Fee Speech  Restrictions on the Use of Union Dues to Fund New Organizing. Hastings Constitutional Law Quarterly. 15:603 (1988).)(Holley, William H.; Jennings, Kenneth M.; and Wolters, Roger S. The Labor Relations Process. 9th ed. Florence, Ky.: Cengage Learning, 2008. ISBN 0324421443)(Werntz, Heidi Marie. Waiver of Beck Rights and Resignation Rights: Infusing the Union-Member Relationship with Individualized Commitment. Catholic University Law Review. 43:159 (1993).)(Hutchison, Harry G. A Clearing in the Forest: Infusing the Labor Union Dues Dispute with First Amendment Values. William & Mary Bill of Rights Journal. 14:1309 (2006).)(Hutchison, Harry G. Reclaiming the Union Movement Through Union Dues? A Postmodern Perspective in the Mirror of Public Choice Theory. University of Michigan Journal of Law Reform. 33:447 (2000).)(Hartley, Roger C. Constitutional Values and the Adjudication of Taft-Hartley Act Dues Objector Cases. Hastings Law Journal. 41:1 (1989).)(Hutchison, Harry G. Diversity, Tolerance and Human Rights: The Future of Labor Unions and the Union Dues Dispute. Wayne Law Review. 49:705 (2003).)BackgroundThe union security agreement is a contractual agreement, usually part of a union collective bargaining agreement, in which an employer and a trade or labor union agree on the extent to which the union may compel employees to join the union, and/or whether the employer will collect dues, fees, and assessments on behalf of the union.(Pynes, Joan. Human Resources Management for Public and Nonprofit Organizations. 2d ed. Hoboken, N.J.: John Wiley and Sons, 2004. ISBN 0787970786) Broadly speaking, there are three types of union security agreements::# The shop, where only union members may be hired, and an employee must remain a union member in order to remain employed;(:# The shop, where the employer may hire union or non-union workers, but employees must join the union in order to remain employed; and(:# The shop, where the employer may hire union or non-union workers, and employees need not join the union in order to remain employed.  However, the non-union worker must pay a fee to cover collective bargaining costs.( In the United States, the fee paid by non-union members under the agency shop is known as the agency fee.(Guerin, Lisa and DelPo, Amy. The Managers Legal Handbook. Rev. 4th ed. Berkeley, Calif.: Nolo, 2007. ISBN 1413307183; McCloskey, Margie Ransom and Rubin, Richard S. Union Security in the Public Sector: Types, Problems, Trends. Journal of Collective Negotiations in the Public Sector. 6:4 (1977).)(Mauer, Michael. The Union Members Complete Guide: Everything You Wantand Needto Know About Working Union. Annapolis, Md.: Union Communication Services, Inc., 2001. ISBN 0965948617)(Where the agency shop is illegal, as is common in labor law governing American public sector unions, a fair share provision may be agreed to by the union and the employer. The provision requires non-union employees a pay fair share fee to cover the costs of the unions collective bargaining activities. The fair share is similar to the agency shop, but usually more restrictive as to what may be charged to the non-member. Guerin and DelPo, The Managers Legal Handbook, 2007; McCloskey and Rubin, Union Security in the Public Sector: Types, Problems, Trends, Journal of Collective Negotiations in the Public Sector, 1977; Mauer, The Union Members Complete Guide: Everything You Wantand Needto Know About Working Union, 2001.)In the United States, unions established the closed shop, union shop, and agency shop since at least the 1880s.(Foner, Philip S. History of the Labor Movement in the United States. Vol. 5: The AFL in the Progressive Era, 19101915. New York: International Publishers, 1980. ISBN 071780562X) The Labor Relations Act (NLRA), the primary federal law governing labor relations in the United States, was enacted in 1935 and formally legalized the closed shop, union shop, or agency shop.(Rees, Albert. The Economics of Trade Unions. 3d ed. Chicago: University of Chicago Press, 1989. ISBN 0226707105) In 1947, however, Congress enacted the Act, which amended the NLRA.  Title I, Section 101 of the Taft-Hartley Act added a new Section 14 to the NLRA, part (b) of which banned the closed shop:(:Nothing in this Act shall be construed as authorizing the execution or application of agreements requiring membership in a labor organization as a condition of employment in any State or Territory in which such execution or application is prohibited by State or Territorial law.(Title I, Sec. 101. An Act to Amend the National Labor Relations Act, to Provide Additional Facilities for the Mediation of Labor Disputes Affecting Commerce, to Equalize Legal Responsibilities of Labor Organizations and Employers, and for Other Purposes. (80 Pub.L. 101.) June 23, 1947.)The Taft-Haftley Act did not, however, outlaw the union shop or agency shop (although it did place some procedural restrictions on their establishment and use).(During War II, Congress also banned union political contributions to federal campaigns. The Act, enacted in 1943, banned the use of union members dues to make direct contributions to candidates for federal office but did not ban indirect expenditures which educated union members or the public about a candidates voting record.(La Raja, Raymond J. Small Change: Money, Political Parties, and Campaign Finance Reform. Ann Arbor, Mich.: University of Michigan Press, 2008. ISBN 0472050281) The Taft-Hartley Act made the ban permanent.(Corrado, Anthony. Campaign Finance Reform: A Sourcebook. Washington, D.C.: Brookings Institution Press, 1997. ISBN 0815715811)(Goidel, Robert K.; Gross, Donald August; and Shields, Todd G. Money Matters: Consequences of Campaign Finance Reform in U.S. House Elections. New York: Rowman & Littlefield, 1999. ISBN 0847688682; Smith, Bradley A. Unfree Speech: The Folly of Campaign Finance Reform. Princeton, N.J.: Princeton University Press, 2001. ISBN 0691070458) In 1948, the U.S. Supreme Court held that the Taft-Hartley Acts ban on use of union dues for political purposes did not extend to internal communications directed at a unions own members.(States v. CIO, 335 U.S. 106 (1948).) Eleven years later, the Court refused to consider a federal district courts ruling that Taft-Hartley Act did not ban expenditure of union dues on communications with the public.(States v. Automobile Workers, 352 U.S. 567 (1957).)Disputes over the constitutional and statutory status of union shop and agency shop agreements began almost immediately after the passage of the Taft-Hartley Act.( In the Supreme Courts first major ruling on the issue in Employes Dept. v. Hanson, 351 U.S. 225 (1956),(Kearney, Richard C. and Carnevale, David G. Labor Relations in the Public Sector. 3rd ed. New York: CRC Press, 2001. ISBN 0824704207)(Railway Employes Dept. v. Hanson, 351 U.S. 225 (1956).) the Court held that the union security provisions of the Labor Act were constitutional,(( but withheld judgment as to the validity or enforceability of a union or closed shop agreement if other conditions of union membership are imposed or if the exaction of dues, initiation fees or assessments is used as a cover for forcing ideological conformity or other action in contravention of the First or the Fifth Amendment.((Railway Employes Dept. v. Hanson, 351 U.S. 225, 238.) The ruling in Hanson appeared to call into serious question the viability of union shop agreements. Five years later, in v. Street, 367 U.S. 740 (1961), the Court held that the Railway Labor Act denies the authority to a union, over the employees objection, to spend his money for political causes which he opposes.(Machinists v. Street, 367 U.S. 740, 749.) The high court also confronted the issue of remedy in Machinists v. Street, and outlined several options which unions and employers might adopt as well as rejecting remedies which the district court in the case had chosen.((Machinists v. Street, 367 U.S. 740, 771775.)  The Supreme Court returned to the union security issue three more times in 1963.  In v. General Motors Corp., 373 U.S. 734 (1963), the Court held that agency fees equal to dues are not prohibited by the National Labor Relations Act.(NLRB v. General Motors Corp., 373 U.S. 734 (1963).)( Nonetheless, in Retail Clerks v. Schermerhorn, 373 U.S. 746 (1963), the Court questioned whether an agency fee set at a level equal to member dues was unfair because it set collective bargaining fees higher for non-members than for members.(...if nonmember payments, equal to those of a member, go entirely for collective bargaining costs, the nonmember will pay more of these expenses than his pro rata share. The member will pay less and to that extent a portion of his fees and dues is available to pay institutional expenses. The unions budget is balanced. By paying a larger share of collective bargaining costs the nonmember subsidizes the unions institutional activities. Retail Clerks v. Schermerhorn, 373 U.S. 746, 754.) After reargument, however, the Court in Retail Clerks v. Schermerhorn, 375 U.S. 96 (1963), did not reach the issue again and instead decided the case on narrow procedural grounds (concluding that Floridas law outlawed the union shop provision at issue).(Retail Clerks v. Schermerhorn, 375 U.S. 96 (1963).)(Twomey, David. Labor and Employment Law: Text & Cases. 14th ed. Florence, Ky.: Cengage Learning, 2009. ISBN 0324594844) The Court further elaborated on the issue of remedies in Clerks v. Allen, 373 U.S. 113 (1963), allowing agency fee payers to opt out of all political expenditures rather than enunciate specific examples but refusing to allow them to act as a class.((Railway Clerks v. Allen, 373 U.S. 113 (1963).) The Supreme Court extended its constitutional and equity analysis to public employees in v. Detroit Board of Education, 431 U.S. 209 (1977), holding that, where public employee collective bargaining exists and agency fee clauses are clearly authorized by law, public employee agency fee mechanisms are also constitutional.(((Carelli, Richard. Ruling Eases Non-Union Dues Payments. Associated Press. June 29, 1988.)(Abood v. Detroit Board of Education, 431 U.S. 209 (1977).)Similarly, the Labor Relations Board (NLRB) had had occasion since 1945 to address the union shop and agency fee issues. Among its key cases was In re Union Starch & Refining Co., 87 NLRB 779, (1949).(In re Union Starch & Refining Co., 87 NLRB 779, (1949), enfd, 186 F.2d 1008 (CA7), cert. denied, 342 U.S. 815 (1951).)(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 767.)  The Board held in Union Starch that unions were permitted to charge nonmembers agency fees that were nearly equal to full union dues so long as these agency fees were uniform in nature and no additional requirements were made in violation of NLRA Section 8(a)(3)(B) or 8(b)(2).((In re Union Starch & Refining Co., 87 NLRB 779.) A second important case,(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 754.) Teamsters Local No. 959, 167 NLRB 1042 (1967), the Board concluded that special assessments or fees could not be part of the agency fee.((Teamsters Local No. 959, 167 NLRB 1042 (1967).) Reacting to the Supreme Courts ruling in Retail Clerks v. Schermerhorn,(Detroit Mailers Union No. 40, 192 NLRB 951, 952 (1971).) the Board held in Detroit Mailers Union No. 40, 192 NLRB 951 (1971) that certain fraternal activities may be included in the agency fee so long as they are not special assessments.((Detroit Mailers Union No. 40, 192 NLRB 951 (1971).) The Board also ruled repeatedly on a number of issues associated with agency fees. It held in several cases that the NLRA does not permit the collection of assessments through the agency fee.(H. Muehlstein & Co., 118 NLRB 268 (1957); Convair (Pomona), 122 NLRB 1531 (1959), rev. (other grounds) NLRB v. Guided Missile Lodge 1254, 241 F.2d 695 (9th Cir. 1957); Toms Monarch Laundry & Cleaning Co., 161 NLRB 740 (1966); International Longshoremens Assn. Local 1180, 266 NLRB 954 (1982).) The RLA, in contrast, does.((Electric Auto-Lite Co., 92 NLRB 1073 (1950), affd, NLRB v. Queen CIty Valves, Inc. 196 F.2d 500 (6th Cir. 1952).) The Board also held that when determining what an assessment is, facts (not labels) matter most.(International Harvester Co., 95 NLRB 730 (951).)(Tool and Die Makers Lodge No. 113, IAM, 207 NLRB 795 (1973), enfcd. NLRB v. Die & Tool Makers Lodge 113, 231 F.2d 298 (7th Cir. 1956); Anaconda Copper Mining Co., 110 NLRB 1925 (1954).)In the years just before the Supreme Court took up the Beck case, however, it elaborated on its previous agency fee rulings.  In v. Railway Clerks, 466 U.S. 435 (1984), the Supreme Court concluded that the agency fee may only cover those activities directly related to the unions role as a collective bargaining representative.  These included national conventions (where dues levels were set and union programs debated and established), social activities (which enhanced union solidarity, especially during negotiations), grievance handling, contract negotiation costs, and union communications, but excluded union organizing activities.((((Belman, Dale; Gunderson, Morley; and Hyatt, Douglas. Public Sector Employment in a Time of Transition. Ithaca, N.Y.: Cornell University Press, 1996. ISBN 0913447676)(Ellis v. Railway Clerks, 466 U.S. 435 (1984)) The Court in Ellis also wrestled with the issue of rebates, and concluded that a union could not simply rebate agency fees to workers for that would essentially constitute an forced, interest-free loan fro the worker to the union.(( In 1985, the Court held in Makers v. NLRB, 473 U.S. 95 (1985), that a union member may resign at any time without notice.(Pattern Makers v. NLRB, 473 U.S. 95 (1985).) Thus, Pattern Makers further undermined the union shop by giving workers the right to resign from the union at any time and incur no penalty (such as termination of employment).  The Court also crafted additional rules regarding agency fees in v. Hudson, 475 U.S. 292 (1986). In Teachers, the union had failed to minimize the risk that agency fees might be used for impermissible purposes and had failed to provide agency fee payers with adequate information about how the agency fee was calculated.(((Teachers v. Hudson, 475 U.S. 292, 304309.) Now the Supreme Court imposed a third requirement, that agency fee payers must be offered a timely, fair, and objective mechanism for challenging the computation of agency fees.((( The Court did uphold, however, the use of interest-bearing escrow accounts for holding disputed dues.(Teachers v. Hudson, 475 U.S. 292, 309310.)Despite these many rulings, the Supreme Court had never extended its agency fee rulings to unions covered by the National Labor Relations Act( and many lower courts were confused as to the state of the law.(Topol, David H. Note: Union Shops, State Action, and the National Labor Relations Act. Yale Law Journal. 101:1135 (March 1992).) In 1986, the 2nd Circuit Court of Appeals ruled against non-union workers in a case very similar to Beck involving the Auto Workers.((Price v. Auto Workers, 795 F.2d 1128 (1986).)Becks complaint and lawsuitIn 1968, the Workers of America (CWA) used union members dues, in part, to support Vice President Humphreys campaign for President of the United States(Sawyer, Kathy. Union Ordered to Refund Dues to 18 C&P Workers. Washington Post. March 8, 1983.) and Senator Tydings re-election campaign.(Harry Beck was a maintenance worker with the Chesapeake & Potomac Telephone Co. (C&PT) in Maryland and a CWA organizer.((Federman, Stan. Man, Union Spar On Political use of Agency Fee. The Oregonian. January 25, 1988.) Beck protested the use of his union dues for a political cause in which he did not believe and asked for a refund.( The CWA refused, arguing that using union dues for political expenditures was appropriate and legal.( In the early 1970s, after disagreeing with national CWA officials over a union organizing drive in suburban Baltimore, Maryland, Beck resigned from the union and began to pay the $10-a-month agency fee.(( Beck continued to protest the use of his agency fee for political purposes, and asked the CWA to provide a more accurate accounting of how much money it spent on politics.( The union refused.( In June 1976, Beck and 19 other non-union members of the CWAs unit at C&PT sued the union for a refund.(((((Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 739740.) The Right to Work Legal Defense Foundation provided legal counsel and support to Beck and the other 18 workers.((( Beck quit C&PT in 1979 and moved to Oregon, where he worked at CWA-organized job at Telephone & Telegraph and continued to pay his agency fee.(The issue of agency fee payments was a national and serious one.  By 1984, about 5 percent of employees at work sites covered by a union contract had opted not to join the union and instead pay an agency fee.(Perl, Peter. The Case of the Reluctant Union Contributor. Washington Post. November 2, 1984.) In 1987, the same number of workers covered by CWA contracts were agency fee payers.( At the time of the Beck case in 1987, a majority of unions had set the agency fee about equal to full union dues.(Court to Rule on Union Dues. United Press International. June 1, 1987.) More than 90 percent of all collective bargaining agreements (covering six million workers) made under the authority of the NLRA contained an agency fee provision.(Prior dispositionU.S. District Court Judge James R. Miller, Jr. ruled in favor of Beck and the 19 other co-plaintiffs in March 1983.(((Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 740.)(Beck v. Communications Workers of America, 468 F. Supp. 93 (Md. 1979).) Beck et al. claimed that CWA had not only breached its of fair representation but had also violated the agency fee payers First Amendment rights as enunciated by the Supreme Court in Railway Employes Dept. v. Hanson.((Virginia, Charles R. Comment: Communications Workers v. Beck: Supreme Court Throws Unions Out on Street.  Fordham Law Review. 57:665 (March 1989).) Applying the clear and convincing evidence standard, the district court found that CWA could not show that 21 percent of the agency fee was spent on collective bargaining purposes alone, ordered an immediate refund of all dues collected since January 1976, and directed CWA to establish a record-keeping system which segregated collective bargaining and non-collective bargaining accounts.((( The refund was about $5,000 for all 20 workers.(CWA (and many other unions) quickly implemented a time-and-expenditures accounting system to meet the courts order.( CWA also appealed the ruling.States Court of Appeals for the Fourth Circuit agreed to hear CWAs appeal in November 1984, and handed down its ruling in October 1985.(Beck v. Communications Workers of America, 776 F. 2d 1187 (4th Cir. 1985).) In a 2-to-1 ruling, the appellate court upheld the district courts ruling.((Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 740741.) The 4th Circuit Court found that the district court had erred in applying the clear and convincing standard, but on the basis of a statutory interpretation of the NLRA and the duty of fair representation claim found that the district court had correctly concluded that the agency fee was being illegally spent on items not related to collective bargaining.(( CWA petitioned for a rehearing banc, which was granted in April 1986.(Beck v. Communications Workers of America, 800 F. 2d 1280 (4th Cir. 1986).) In a curiam decision issued in September 1986, the 10 judges ruled 6-to-4 that the court had jurisdiction over the case on one or more grounds.(Five of the six judges held that the appellate court had jurisdiction on the duty of fair representation issue but not constitutional grounds.  A sixth judge held that the appeallate court had jurisdiction on constitutional grounds and duty of fair representation, but did not concur with the other five judges on the reasoning regarding jurisdiction over the duty of fair representation issue. Since six of the 10 judges felt the appellate court had jurisdiction of some sort, the appellate court agreed to hear the case. Beck v. Communications Workers of America, 800 F. 2d 1280 (4th Cir. 1986).) The majority also held that the three-judge panel had ruled correctly, and held in favor of Beck again.((  CWA appealed again.The U.S. Supreme Court granted certiorari on May 31, 1987.((Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 482 U.S. 904 (1987).) In a surprising move, the U.S. Department of Justice supported CWAs appeal.((( The Solicitor General at the time, Fried, argued that the voluntary nature of collective bargaining agreements (including agency fee clauses) made the issue of coercion moot.(Fried, Charles. Order and Law: Arguing the Reagan Revolution: A Firsthand Account. New York: Simon & Schuster, 1990. ISBN 0671725754) Because states could and did ban agency fee agreements, there was no governmental action on which to base a constitutional claim against the union.( And because Section 8(a)3 plainly requires uniform dues and fees (e.g., unions could not charge agency fee payers more nor less than regular members), the Justice Department felt Becks claim was justified.( Upset by the Justice Departments stand, Republican Senators Helms, Quayle, Symms, and Thurmond filed an curiae brief urging the Supreme Court to rule in Becks favor.(The Beck case was argued before the Supreme Court on January 11, 1988.((Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735 (1988).)At the time, however, there was a concern that the court could split and issue no ruling.(Savage, David G. Justices to Hear Controversial Cases. Los Angeles Times. January 11, 1988.) Associate Justice F. Powell, Jr. had retired from the Supreme Court on June 26, 1987.(Taylor, Stuart Jr. Powell Leaves High Court. New York Times. June 27, 1987.) President Reagan nominated Judge Bork of the States Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia to fill Powells seat on July 1,(Boyd, Gerald M. Bork Picked For High Court. New York Times. July 2, 1987.) but after a contentious nomination battle the U.S. Senate rejected Borks nomination 58-to-42 on October 23.(Greenhouse, Linda. Borks Nomination Is Rejected. New York Times. October 24, 1987; Bronner, Ethan. Battle for Justice: How the Bork Nomination Shook America. New York: Sterling, 2007. ISBN 140275227X) Six days later, President Reagan nominated H. Ginsburg, Borks fellow judge on the D.C. circuit court of appeals, for the Supreme Court.(Brinkley, Joel. President Selects Appellate Judge to Become Justice. New York Times. October 30, 1987.) But Ginsburg withdrew his nomination eight days later after media reports that he had occasionally smoked marijuana as a law student and law professor.(Robert, Steven V. Ginsburg Withdraws Name As Supreme Court Nominee, Citing Marijuana Clamor. New York Times. November 8, 1987.) Reagan nominated Kennedy, a judge on the States Court of Appeals for the Ninth Circuit, for the high court on November 11, 1987.(Greenhouse, Linda. Reagan Nominates Anthony Kennedy to Supreme Court. New York Times. November 12, 1987.) Kennedy was unanimously confirmed on February 3, 1988.(Greenhouse, Linda. Senate, 97 to 0, Confirms Kennedy to High Court. New York Times. February 4, 1988.) Kennedy had been unable to participate in oral argument in the Beck case, and Supreme Court tradition holds that a justice who has not participated in oral argument cannot participate in the decision a case (with only a few, rare exceptions).((Brigham, John. The Cult of the Court. Reprint ed. Philadelphia, Pa.: Temple University Press, 1991. ISBN 0877228280)RulingAssociate Justice J. Brennan, Jr. delivered the opinion of the Court, joined by Chief Justice Rehnquist and Associate Justices White, Marshall, and Paul Stevens.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 738.) Associate Justices Blackmun, Day OConnor, and Scalia joined in Parts I and II.(  Justice Blackmun filed a concurring opinion in part and a dissenting opinion in part, in which Justices OConnor and Scalia joined.(  Associate Justice Anthony Kennedy took no part in the consideration or decision of the case.(The 20 workers sought relief on three claims: 1) That the agency fee was too high to cover only collective bargaining activities as authorized by NRLA Section 8(a)(3); 2) That the high agency fee breached the CWAs duty of fair representation; and 3) That the high agency fee violated the workers First Amendment rights.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 742.)Justice Brennan first addressed the jurisdictional question that divided the 4th Circuit Court of Appeals and asserted court jurisdiction over both the duty of fair representation and constitutional challenges.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 742744.)Brennan next turned to the workers first two claims.  The majority noted that NLRA Section 8(a)(3) contains two provisions which clearly permit agency fee agreements.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 744745.) For the majority, The statutory question presented in this case, then, is whether this financial core includes the obligation to support union activities beyond those germane to collective bargaining, contract administration, and grievance adjustment. We think it does not.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 745.) The majority reviewed the Courts previous decision in Machinists v. Street and found it controlling.( The majority further concluded that Section 8(a)(3) and Section 2, Eleventh of the Railway Labor Act were statutorily equivalent.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 745746.) The majority reviewed at length the legislative history of both the Railway Labor Act and the National Labor Relations Act to provide support for this conclusion, and to show why in each case Congress had approved of agency fee agreements.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 747761.) Relying on the Courts analysis of the Railway Labor Act in Street, the Supreme Court said CWA was not justified in concluding that Section 8(a)(3) permits the collection of agency fees in excess of the amount necessary to cover the costs of collective bargaining.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 754755.) The majority further found that the legislative history of the NLRA, the Taft-Hartley Act, and RLA showed that Congress intended to restrict agency fee agreements to cover collective bargaining alone and no other purposes.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 755761.)Turning to the constitutional question, Brennan wrestled with the fact that ...in Railway Employees v. Hanson, 351 U.S. 225 (1956), Court held that because the RLA pre-empts all state laws banning union-security agreements, the negotiation and enforcement of such provisions in railroad industry contracts involves governmental action and is therefore subject to constitutional limitations.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 761.) The question before the Court in Beck, then, was whether such governmental action extended to the acts of unions in the private sector where there was no such federal pre-emption. CWA argued that because Section 14(b) of the NLRA permits each state make its own choice in this regard, there could be no federal pre-emption and thus no governmental action.( Brennan concluded for the majority that the Supreme Court need not decide the issue: The Courts doctrine was to rule narrowly on grounds of statutory construction where possible, and that issue had already been decided on statutory grounds in the workers favor.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 761762.)The Supreme Court affirmed the judgment of 4th Circuit Court of Appeals.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 762.)DissentAssociate Justice Blackmun, joined by Justices OConnor and Scalia, concurred with the majoritys assertion of jurisdiction in Part I of the ruling and with the majoritys decision in the breach of duty of fair representation claim in Part II, but dissented from Part III and the holding in Part IV.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 763.) For Blackmun, the problem was that the majority had relied too heavily on Street, not utilized its traditional methods of statutory construction, and substituted a new method of statutory construction to strain to make Beck accord with Street::Without the decision in Machinists v. Street, 367 U.S. 740 (1961), involving the Railway Labor Act (RLA), the Court could not reach the result it does today. Our accepted mode of resolving statutory questions would not lead to a construction of 8(a)(3) so foreign to that sections express language and legislative history, which show that Congress did not intend to limit either the amount of agency fees (or what the majority labels dues-equivalents) a union may collect under a union-security agreement, or the unions expenditure of such funds. The Courts excessive reliance on Street to reach a contrary conclusion is manifested by its unique line of reasoning. No sooner is the language of 8(a)(3) intoned, than the Court abandons all attempt at construction of this statute and leaps to its interpretation over a quarter century ago of another statute enacted by a different Congress, a statute with a distinct history and purpose. See ante, at 744745. I am unwilling to offend our established doctrines of statutory construction and strain the meaning of the language used by Congress in 8(a)(3), simply to conform 8(a)(3)s construction to the Courts interpretation of similar language in a different later-enacted statute, an interpretation which is itself not without its difficulties. Abood v. Detroit Board of Education, 431 U.S. 209, 232 (1977) (characterizing the Courts decision in Street). I therefore dissent from Parts III and IV of the Courts opinion.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 763764.)Blackmun then applied a plain meaning construction of the statutory language to both the RLA and NLRA, and concluded that CWA had not violated the NLRA.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 764769.) The NLRB, Blackmun said, had not changed its policy on agency fees nor its justifications for its conclusions. Justice Blackmun pointed to the NLRBs decision in In re Union Starch & Refining Co. and Detroit Mailers Union No. 40, and noted that the Justice Department had adopted a similar view in its amicus curiae brief.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 767.) Blackmun also chastised the majority for mis-stating the NLRBs conclusion in Teamsters Local 959::Contrary to the Courts suggestion, the NLRB has not embraced and then repudiated the view that, for purposes of  8(a)(3), periodic dues and initiation fees mean only those fees necessary to finance collective-bargaining activities. Ante, at 752, n. 7. Teamsters Local No. 959, 167 N. L. R. B. 1042 (1967), does not demonstrate otherwise. In Teamsters Local, the NLRB held that working dues designated to fund a union building program and a credit union were actually assessments not contemplated by the proviso to  8(a)(3). Id., at 1044. The Board found that the union itself regarded the levy as a temporary assessment, clearly distinct from its regular dues. Ibid. Moreover, because the financing for the programs was constructed in such a way that the union treasury might never have received 90% of the moneys, the Board concluded that the working dues were actually special purposes funds, and that the support of such funds cannot come from periodic dues as that term is used in  8(a)(3). Ibid. In Detroit Mailers, the NLRB distinguished such assessments from periodic and uniformly required dues, which, in its view, a union is not precluded from demanding of nonmembers pursuant to  8(a)(3). 192 N. L. R. B., at 952.(Blackmun noted that the majority cannot cite one case in which the Board has held that uniformly required, periodic dues used for purposes other than collective bargaining are not dues within the meaning of 8(a)(3).(Like the majority, Blackmun too extensively reviewed the history of the RLA and NLRA but rejected the majoritys reading of those histories.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 769780.) The Supreme Court had previously held that the RLA was not identical to the NLRA, he wrote, and had cautioned lower courts and appellants that they should draw parallels between the two statutes very carefully. The majority, Blackmun concluded, had not made a careful comparison this time, and therefore its conclusions based on the similarities between the RLA and NLRA should be rejected.(Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 487 U.S. 735, 776777.)Critiques of the Beck rulingA number of criticisms have been made of the Beck ruling. These critiques include those made by supporters of the decision who feel the Supreme Court did not go far enough, and critiques made by those who feel the Courts ruling was wrongly decided.A number of legal scholars who support the outcome of the ruling nonetheless criticize the Supreme Courts approach to Becks First Amendment challenge.(((((((((((((Levin, Adam and Li, Jenny Schneider. Between A Rock and A Hard Place: Writers and Actors Navigate Hollywoods Rough Roads to Employment During Labor Strikes. Loyola of Los Angeles Entertainment Law Review. 21:371 (2001).) These scholars strongly criticize the Court for not deciding the case on First Amendment grounds, and argue that a constitutional ruling on agency fee issues would provide for clearer decisions, a sounder basis for workers to challenge agency fee calculations, and enhanced free speech rights not only for dissenting workers but for all employees.(((((((((((((A second major criticism of the case is that the Court did not clearly define what the First Amendment violation was.  The Supreme Court has a long-standing doctrine of not ruling on a statutes constitutionality if a case may be decided on statutory grounds.(Kohler, Thomas C. Setting the Conditions for Self-Rule: Unions, Associations, Our First Amendment Discourse and the Problem of DeBartolo. Wisconsin Law Review. 1990:149 (January 1990/February 1990).) Subsequently, the Beck courts discussion of First Amendment issues was perfunctory, acknowledging that there might be grounds for a First Amendment challenge but refusing to discuss the issue further. This has generated confusion among legal scholars and workers as to what First Amendment challenges may be brought. For example, critics have pointed out that a claim under the First Amendment can only be brought when there is state action, as opposed to private action.(((The Constitutions protections of individual liberty and equal protection apply in general only to action by the government. ... With a few exceptions, such as the provisions of the Thirteenth Amendment, constitutional guarantees of individual liberty and equal protection do not apply to the actions of private entities. v. Leesville Concrete Company, 500 U.S. 614, 619 (1991).) The Supreme Courts early agency fee decisions (Hanson, Street, and Ellis) found that state action occurred under the Railway Labor Act because the Act prohibited union shops.((To add to the confusion, in dicta in Steelworkers v. Weber,, the Supreme Court explicity said that a collective bargaining agreement does not involve state action: Since the Kaiser-USWA plan does not involve state action, this case does not present an alleged violation of the Equal Protection Clause of the Fourteenth Amendment. United Steelworkers v. Weber, 443 U.S. 193, 200 (1979). See also: v. Michigan Chamber of Commerce, 494 U.S. 652, 665 (1990).) Yet, although the Court went to great lengths to identify the similarities between the RLA and NLRA in Beck, the Court (in dicta) refused to decide whether state action had occurred under the NLRA.( Legal scholars have pointed out that the Beck Court cited two cases which did find state action under the NLRA, but did not make any determination in Beck.( One scholar has concluded that the Courts tests for determining state action are not useful enough to determine the issue.( Adding to the confusion is that the Supreme Court has never made it clear how to apply a First Amendment analysis to labor law. The Court and legal scholars point out that labor law is considered unique in the American statutory and constitutional framwork, which may mean that traditional First Amendment analyses do not apply.(Wellington, Harry. Labor and the Legal Process. New Haven, Conn.: Yale University Press, 1968.)(Glendon, Mary Ann. The New Family and the New Property. Toronto: Butterworths, 1981. ISBN 0409834106; Selznick, Philip. Law, Society and Industrial Justice. New York: Transaction Publishers, 1980. ISBN 0878556109; Bok, Derek. Reflections on the Distinctive Character of American Labor Laws. Harvard Law Review. 84:1394 (1971). As Prof. Kohler as noted, the Supreme Court repeatedly cites Justice Blackmuns partial concurrence in v. Retail Store Employees Union, Local 1001 (Safeco), 447 U.S. 607 (1980), in which Justice Blackmun noted the special and unique delicate balance between First Amendment law and peaceful labor relations which the NLRA embodied. See: Kohler, Setting the Conditions for Self-Rule: Unions, Associations, Our First Amendment Discourse and the Problem of DeBartolo, Wisconsin Law Review, January 1990/February 1990.) The Court consistently has upheld the validity...of the Labor Act. In doing so, the Court has repeatedly referred to the special nature of labor legislation to explain its unusual deference to a statute so incompatible with judicially developed constitutional norms.(Kohler, Setting the Conditions for Self-Rule: Unions, Associations, Our First Amendment Discourse and the Problem of DeBartolo, Wisconsin Law Review, January 1990/February 1990, p. 155.) It may be that the Courts existing standard for assessing government interference with speech (the scrutiny standard) is inappopriate to apply to labor law.(In his concurrence in Abood v. Detroit Board of Education, 431 U.S. at 260, n.14 Justice Powell argued that when examining First Amendment concerns in agency fee cases, the Supreme Court has purposefully avoided a standard of review. See also: Lazarus, Edward P. Closed Chambers: The First Eyewitness Account of the Epic Struggles Inside the Supreme Court. New York: Crown, 1998. ISBN 0812924029; Harpaz, Leora. Justice Jacksons Flag Salute Legacy: The Supreme Court Struggles to Protect Intellectual Individualism. Texas Law Review. 64:817 (1986); Brudney, William. Association, Advocacy, and the First Amendment. William & Mary Bill of Rights Journal. 4:1 (Summer 1995).) Many of these analyses conclude that the Beck court should have clarified these issues, and absent such clarification the First Amendment rights of workers remain unprotected.Third, some legal scholars have criticized the ruling for not establishing a right which can be successfully exercised in the real world.(Canfield, Jeff. Note: What A Sham(e): The Broken Becks Rights System in the Real World Workplace. Wayne Law Review. 47:1049 (Fall 2001).) The Supreme Court itself recognized in Abood that implementing its limitations on agency fees would be difficult to administer, and in dicta suggested that further rulings would clarify its thinking.(Abood v. Detroit Board of Education, 431 U.S. 209, 23637.) But the Beck decision did not provide this clarification. The ruling did not address whether or how unions should inform workers of their Beck rights, what charges are germane to collective bargaining, or what remedies non-members have if their rights are violated.( Because of this confusion, some lower courts have gone so far as to approve schemes whereby union members may assert their Beck rights only during limited window periods (in apparent contravention of Pattern Makers) and that Beck objectors renew their objection annually (in apparent contravention of General Motors).((Greg, Aron. Note: The Constitutionality of Requiring Annual Renewal of Union Fee Objections in an Agency Shop. Texas Law Review. 78:1159 (April 2000).) A U.S. government report has concluded that it is uncertain whether notifying employees of their Beck rights but not other rights available under the NLRA would effectively protect workers rights.(McCallion, Gail; Treacy, Vince; and Whittaker, William. Labor Controversies: Suspension of Davis Bacon, Open-Shop Bidding Requirements, and Beck Rights. CRS Report 93-458E. Washington, D.C.: Congressional Research Service, April 15, 1993.)Other observers conclude that Beck was wrongly decided.  The reasons for reaching this conclusion vary, however.  Some critics, in reviewing the Supreme Courts First Amendment jurisprudence, have found that there is no simply no First Amendment burden imposed by an agency fee which includes charges not related to collective bargaining.(Blair, H. Union Security Agreements in the Public Sector. Cornell Law Review. 60:183 (1975); Gaebler, David B. Union Political Activity or Collective Bargaining? First Amendment Limitations on the Uses of Union Shop Funds. University of California, Davis Law Review. 14:591 (1981); Rauh, Joseph L. Legality of Union Political Expenditures. Southern California Law Review. 34:152 (1961); Woll, Albert J. Unions in Politics: A Study in Law & the Workers Needs. Southern California Law Review. 34:130 (1961); Note: Union Security in the Public Sector: Defining Political Expenditures Related to Collective Bargaining. Wisconsin Law Review. 1980:134.) Others conclude that while there may be some infringement on free speech, the voluntary nature of collective bargaining does not raise it to the level of state action under existing Supreme Court doctrine.(((Weiler, Paul C. Governing the Workplace: The Future of Labor and Employment Law. Cambridge, Mass.: Harvard University Press, 1990. ISBN 0674357655; Rogers, Joel. Divide and Conquer: Further Reflections on the Distinctive Character of American Labor Laws. Wisconsin Law Review. 1990:1; Weiler, Paul C. Striking a New Balance: Freedom of Contract and the Prospects for Union Representation. Harvard Law Review. 98:351 (1984); Weiler, Paul C. Promises to Keep: Securing Workers Rights of Self Organization Under the NLRA. Harvard Law Review. 96:1769 (1983); Lang, Jonathan. Toward a Right to Union Membership. Harvard Civil Rights-Civil Liberties Law Review. 12:31 (1977); Cantor, Norman L. Forced Payments to Service Institutions and Constitutional Interests in Ideological Non-Association. Rutgers Law Review. 36:3 (1983).)(Dau-Schmidt, Kenneth G. Union Security Agreements under the National Labor Relations Act: The Statute, the Constitution, and the Courts Opinion in Beck. Harvard Journal on Legislation. 27:51 (1990).) Many conclusions about state action rely on the fact that the NLRA grants unions the right to charge agency fees, thus making the union a state actor.( But scholars critical of Beck point to the Courts ruling in v. Metropolitan Edison Co., where the Supreme Court held that even a governmental grant of power is insufficient to create state action.((Jackson v. Metropolitan Edison Co., 419 U.S. 345 (1974).)(Unions are also granted the right to negotiate collective bargaining agreements, and these agreements are heavily regulated by the federal government.  Yet, in his concurring opinion in Abood, Justice Powell rejected the conclusion that collective bargaining agreements cause unions to be state actors: If collective-bargaining agreements were subjected to the same constitutional constraints as federal rules and regulations, it would be difficult to find any stopping place in the constitutionalization of regulated private conduct. See: Abood v. Detroit Board of Education, 431 U.S. 209, 252 n.7 (1977) (Powell, J., concurring).) At least one commentator has concluded that the Courts First Amendment analysis in Beck is unbalanced because it fails to take into account the associational liberties also protected by the First Amendment.(Fifth, some analyses conclude that the Courts method statutory interpretation in the Beck is flawed. Justice Blackmun made this claim in his dissent (as noted above).  Some legal commentators agree, noting that the ruling rejects the Courts well-settled doctrines of statutory construction, which leads to a misinterpretation of Congress legislative intent.((Sixth, critics have argued that the Beck Court misapplied its duty of fair representation doctrine. One legal commentator has concluded that the Supreme Courts duty of fair representation decisions do not lead to the conclusion that agency fees can be restricted solely to collective bargaining purposes.(Cantor, Norman L. Uses and Abuses of the Agency Shop. University of Notre Dame. 59:61 (1983).) Another has argued that the modern labor unions can only meet their duty to fairly represent workers if they engage in lobbying and legislative activity,(Hyde, Alan. Beyond Collective Bargaining: The Politicization of Labor Relations Under Government Contract. Wisconsin Law Review. 1982:1; Hyde, Alan. Economic Labor Law v. Political Labor Relations: Dilemmas for Liberal Legalism. Texas Law Review. 60:1 (1982).) a conclusion which undercuts the Beck courts decision as well.Seventh, some scholars point out that the Beck ruling may lead to unanticipated outcomes. At least one commentary on Beck concludes that Beck rights, if successfully implemented, may lead large numbers of workers to resign from a union during a strike.(((Follett, Jeffrey. The Union as Contract: Internal and External Union Markets After Pattern Makers. Berkeley Journal of Employment and Labor Law. 15:1 (1994).) These workers will be able to continue to work during a strike (incurring none of the disadvantages a strike brings), and yet will still be able to enjoy the benefits of collective bargaining (assuming the strike is successful and an agreement is negotiated).(((Clark, James H. Jr. Comment: Pattern Makers v. NLRB: the Supreme Court Removes the Resignation Restriction as a Method to Achieve Union Solidarity. Willamette Law Review. 22:503 (1986)) The strike is the most powerful weapon unions have,(Yoder, Dale. Personnel Management and Industrial Relations. 6th ed. New York: Prentice-Hall, 1942; Winch, David M. Collective Bargaining and the Public Interest: A Welfare Economics Assessment. Toronto: McGill-Queens Press, 1989. ISBN 0773506969; Zajicek, Anna M. and Nash, Bradley Jr. Lessons From the UMWA. In The Transformation of U.S. Unions: Voices, Visions, and Strategies From the Grassroots. Ray M. Tillman and Michael S. Cummings, eds. Boulder, Colo.: Lynne Rienner Publishers, 1999. ISBN 155587813X) and undermining the unions ability to strike would put labor unions at a distinct disadvantage in collective bargaining.((( The NLRB and Supreme Court have acknowledged the role that agency fee payers can play in undermining strikes. In v. Textile Workers Union, 409 U.S. 213 (1972), the Supreme Court ruled that once a union member had resigned, the union could not punish that worker for crossing picket lines.(NLRB v. Textile Workers Union, 409 U.S. 213 (1972).) And in Pattern Makers League v. NLRB, (as noted above) the Court said unions must permit members to resign at any time. Decisions like these have informed the NLRBs rulings on the issue as well. The Board found that an employer did not commit an labor practice when it distributed notices to employees prior to a strike that outlined an employees rights during a strike (including the right to become an agency fee payer and cross picket lines).(Laundry, Dry Cleaning, Government and Industrial Service, Local 3, 275 NLRB 697 (1985).) The Board also held that, once a single employee has inquired about their right to become an agency fee payer, it is legal for an employer to notify all workers about this right.(Lear Siegler, Inc., Inc., d/b/a Safelite Glass, 283 NLRB 929 (1987).) But in the absence of an employee-initiated iniquiry, it is not, the Board says, legal for employers to approach striking workers and ask them to become agency fee payers.(Naperville Ready Mix, Inc., 329 NLRB 174 (1999).) The negative implications of widespread worker resignation from unions prior to or during a strike is clear, some argue.((( This may be changing, however, as more unions turn away from strikes and toward campaigns.( It is also unclear how Beck may impact dues checkoff (an agreement between the employer, union, and employee under which the employer agrees to deduct union dues directly from the employees paycheck and turn it over to the union).((Hardin, Patrick; LaVaute, James R.; and OReilly, Timothy P. The Developing Labor Law: The Board, the Courts, and the National Labor Relations Act. 3d ed. Washington, D.C.: American Bar Association, 1992. ISBN 0871796643; Leibig, Michael T. and Kahn, Wendy L. Public Employee Organizing and the Law. Washington, D.C.: Bureau of National Affairs, 1987. ISBN 0871794993) In 1991, the NLRB held that dues checkoff agreements create an obligation to pay dues in the same way that becoming a union member does.(International Brotherhood of Electrical Workers, Local No. 2088 (Lockheed Space Operations Co.), 302 NLRB 322 (1991).) It is possible that Beck and subsequent rulings could also undermine dues checkoff agreements.(ImpactFurther Supreme Court rulingsThe Beck case created widespread confusion about how best to implement the rights the Supreme Court identified in its ruling.(((Kochkodin, Michael C. Comment: A Good Politician Is One That Stays Bought: An Examination of Paycheck  Protection Acts & Their Impact on Union Political Campaign Spending. of Pennsylvania Journal of Labor and Employment Law. 2:807 (Spring 2000).)(Rhode, Lisa. Casenote: Section 8(a)(3) Limitation to the Unions Use of Dues-Equivalents: The Implications of Communications Workers of America v. Beck, 108 S. Ct. 2641 (1988). University of Cincinnati Law Review. 57:1567 (1989).) The Supreme Court has addressed the agency fee issue six times in the two decades since its holding in Beck,(Six times in two decades is an exceedingly high number. See: Hartley, Constitutional Values and the Adjudication of Taft-Hartley Act Dues Objector Cases, Hastings Law Journal, 1989, p. 2.) each ruling considering additional union expenditures which may or may not be charged to non-union members.The Court first revisited the issue in Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association in 1991.(v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507 (1991).) The Court was sharply divided, writing four opinions that were supported in whole or in part by varying numbers of Justices and citing divergent reasons for supporting those parts of the decision they supported.(Quoted in Armstrong, Court Allows Teachers Union To Charge Agency Fees, Education Week, June 5, 1991.)(Marcus, Ruth. Court Ruling Stipulates Kinds of Fees Public Unions Can Assess Nonmembers. Washington Post. May 31, 1991.)(Greenhouse, Linda. High Court Eases Car Search Rules. New York Times. May 31, 1991.)(Davis, Jr. W. Kearns. Crawford v. Air Line Pilots Association: The Fourth Circuit Determines What Expenses a Union May Charge to Nonunion Workers. North Carolina Law Review. 72:1732 (September 1994).) All nine Justices rejected a broader argument put forward by the objecting employees that the employees should not have to pay for activities of the national union ... that were not undertaken directly on behalf of the ... bargaining unit.( Eight justices agreed that unions could not charge agency fee payers for lobbying activities.(((Armstrong, Liz Schevtchuk. Court Allows Teachers Union To Charge Agency Fees. Education Week. June 5, 1991.) But on other issues, the court split. The case was more difficult to adjudicate because it involved state action (the bargaining unit was composed of public employees) and thus brought First Amendment issues into consideration((Imber, Michael and Van Geel, Tyll. A Teachers Guide to Education Law. 2d ed. Mahwah, N.J.: Lawrence Erlbaum Associates, 2001. ISBN 080583754X) and because of the unique nature of the unions dues structure.(The collective bargaining unit was affiliated with the Education Association (NEA). Almost no NEA locals provide their own collective bargaining activities. NEAs national headquarters provides this service through a unit called UniServ, with one or more full-time, professional UniServ staff representatives assigned to each bargaining unit (or, in the case of small or isolated bargaining units, to a cluster of local unions). A large majority of dues paid by NEA members goes to the national union to pay for UniServ activities, with only a small portion being collected by the local union, often for non-collective bargaining purposes. The unified dues structure and UniServ model complicated the Courts decision in Lehnert. See: Urban, Wayne J. Gender, Race, and the National Education Association: Professionalism and Its Limitations. Annotated ed. Florence, Ky.: Taylor & Francis, 2000. ISBN 0815338171; National Education Association. In Encyclopedia of Education. Vol. 4. 2d ed. James W. Guthrie, ed. Newe York: Macmillan Reference USA, 2003. ISBN 002865594X; Lieberman, Myron. Understanding the Teacher Union Contract: A Citizens Handbook. 2d ed. New York: Transaction Publishers, 2000. ISBN 0765806819; Culbertson, Drena. Teachers Seek Influence Through Regional Group. Free-Lance Star. August 12, 1975.) Writing for the majority, Justice Blackmun established a three-prong test for determining the constitutionality and statutory legality of agency fee charges in public employee bargaining units: 1) The charges must be germane to collective bargaining activity; 2) The charges must not significantly burden the non-members free speech rights; and 3) Charges must be justified by the need for labor peace or to avoid the rider problem.((((Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 514519.)(Only four justices supported the three-prong test. See: McLaughlin, Sean. A Devil In Disguise: How Paycheck Protection Legislation Violates the First Amendment. Seton Hall Legislative Journal. 27:113 (2002).) Acceptable charges included that part of affiliation fees which are spent on collective bargaining,(Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 522524.) collective bargaining expenditures destined for other states,(Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 527.) expenditures for national union publications insofar as they support collective bargaining,( information services and other miscellaneous items that are not political nnor public in nature and which benefit of all workers even though they do not directly impact the bargaining unit,(Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 529.) expenditures to attend union meetings and conventions,(Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 529530.) and strike expenses (whether the strike is legal or not).(Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 530532.) Non-chargeable expenses include: Lobbying, electoral, or other political activities not directly related to contract bargaining or implementation;(Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 519522.) political or public activities aimed at winning a greater budget for the collective bargaining unit;( litigation or publications reporting on litigation that does not concern directly concern the bargaining unit;(Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 528.) and public relations efforts (including informational picketing, media purchases, signs, posters, and buttons) designed to enhance public respect for the workers profession.(Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association, 500 U.S. 507, 528529.) At least one legal scholar believes the Lehnert decision shifted away from the Courts traditional rationale that agency fees must have a strong link to collective bargaining purposes::Subtly, but with significant impact..., the Supreme Court in Lehnert shifted away from its previous emphasis on the nexus between the expense and collective bargaining. Unlike its predecessors, Lehnert did not stress that the benefit to the unit must be in the area of collective bargaining or labor-management issues. Its statement that for an expense to be charged there must be some indication that the payment is for services that may ultimately enure to the benefit of the members of the local union implies that the benefit to the worker need not be in the form of increased leverage against the employer.(Davis, Crawford v. Air Line Pilots Association: The Fourth Circuit Determines What Expenses a Union May Charge to Nonunion Workers, North Carolina Law Review, September 1994, p. 1746. (footnotes omitted))Adding additional confusion, the Lehnert court also concluded that even charges germane to collective bargaining were impermissible if they burdened First Amendment rights too heavily in order to achieve the policy outcomes intended by Congress (although the Court did not identify what constituted an impermissible level of burden).(Adams, R. Bradley. Note: Union Dues and Politics: Workers Speak Out Against Unions Speaking for Them. University of Florida Journal of Law & Public Policy. 10:207 (Fall 1998).)( The impact of Lehnert, however, appears minimal.  At least one legal scholar refused to list Lehnert among the past decades most important cases in the public education law.(Ruben, Alan Miles. The Top Ten Judicial Decisions Affecting Labor Relations in Public Education During the Decade of the 1990s: The Verdict of Quiescent Years. Journal of Law & Education. 30:247 (April 2001).) Both courts and legal scholars have questioned whether the judicial system should be drawn into this micro-level of dispute resolution.(Siemer, Calvin. Comment: Lehnert v. Ferris Faculty Association: Accounting to Financial Core Members: Much A-Dues About Nothing? Fordham Law Review. 60:1057 (April 1992).)(Quoted in Lucid v. City and County of San Francisco, 774 F. Supp. 1234 (N.D. Cal. 1991).)Other Supreme Court rulings since Lehnert have focused more narrowly on technical issues.  In Line Pilots Association v. Miller, 523 U.S. 866 (1998), the Supreme Court addressed the issue of whether non-members must use the unions arbitration process in order to challenge the calculation of agency fees.(Walsh, Mark. Supreme Court Hears Challenge From Right To Work Group. Education Week. April 1, 1998.) In a 7-to-2 decision, the Court held that agency fee payers did not have to exhaust the unions challenge procedures.(Air Line Pilots Association v. Miller, 523 U.S. 866, 880; Russo, Charles J. Encyclopedia of Education Law, Volume 2. Thousand Oaks, Calif.: SAGE Publishers, 2008. ISBN 1412940796; Walsh, Mark. Supreme Court Ruling Is a Defeat for Unions. Education Week. June 3, 1998.)(Houston, Melvin. To Mandate or Not Mandate Arbitration: An Analysis of Air Line Pilots Association v. Miller. Thurgood Marshall Law Review. 24:279 (Spring 1999).) The same year, the Court addressed the issue of whether a union committed an unfair labor practice if its collective bargaining agreement contained the original NLRA language on union shops but no additional information (such as information about the Supreme Courts rulings in Beck and other cases). A unanimous Supreme Court held in v. Screen Actors Guild, 525 U.S. 33 (1998) that a union did not breach its duty of fair representation by merely including the language of the NLRA, as amended.(Marquez v. Screen Actors Guild, 525 U.S. 33, 4248.) The Marquez Court relied heavily on its ruling in v. News Syndicate Co., 365 U.S. 695 (1961), where it had previously held that the NLRB had no authority invalidate a contract clause solely because the clause mirrored statutory language but did not go further to advise members to not violate the law.(Devaney, Dennis M. and Kehoe, Susan E. The NLRB Takes Notice to the Max in Paramax. Hofstra Labor Law Journal. 11:1 (Fall 1993).) About a decade later, the high court revisited the agency fee issue three more times.  It upheld in v. Washington Education Association, 551 U.S. 177 (2007), a Washington state ballot initiative which required public employee unions to obtain each members and nonmembers prior authorization before spend their dues or agency fees for election-related purposes.(Davenport v. Washington Education Association, 551 U.S. 177 (2007).) The decision was moot even before it was handed down, because the State Legislature had already changed the law to make it easier for unions to comply.(Himebaugh, Daniel A. Consider the Source: A Note on Public-Sector Union Expenditure Restrictions Upheld in Davenport v. Washington Education Association. Journal of the National Association of Administrative Law Judiciary. 28:533 (Fall 2008).) The ruling was very narrowly decided, however, leading to much criticism. Correctly understood, this decision promises little and delivers even less because it fails to deal decisively and comprehensively with the issues that both earlier private sector and public sector union dues disputes illuminated but failed to settle.( Other legal scholars expressed dismay that the Davenport Court did not confront the First Amendment issues raised by the case.(Jaffe, Erik S. Campaign Finance and Free Speech: When Easy Cases Make Bad Law: Davenport v. Washington Education Association and Washington v. Washington. Cato Supreme Court Review. 200607:115 (2006/2007).)( A year later, in v. Karass, 07-610 (2008), the Supreme Court held that it was not unconstitutional for a local union to charge nonmembers for national litigation expenses unrelated to local collective bargaining activities.(Hutchison, Harry G. Liberty, Liberalism, and Neutrality: Labor Preemption and First Amendment Values. Seton Hall Law Review. 39:779 (2009).)(Locke v. Karass, 07-610 (2008).) In 2009, the Supreme Court held in v. Pocatello Education Association, 07-869 (2009), that a states refusal to agree to dues checkoff did not abridge a unions First Amendment rights.(Ysursa v. Pocatello Education Association, 07-869 (2009), at 511.)(Larsen, Zachary C. The Egalitarian First Amendment: Its History and a Critique of Text, Rights, Negative Liberty, and Our Republican Constitutional Structure. North Carolina Central Law Review. 31:153 (2009).)Regulatory and NLRB actionsOn April 13, 1992, President H. W. Bush issued an executive order, E.O. 12800, that required contractors doing business with the federal government to provide their non-union employees with notice of their Beck rights.(Gerstenzang, James. Bush OKs Order on Political Use of Union Dues. Los Angeles Times. April 14, 1992.)(Cantor, Joseph E. Political Spending by Organized Labor: Background and Current Issues. CRS Report No. 96-484 GOV. Washington, D.C.:  Congressional Research Service, February 18, 1998.)(Pear, Robert. Bush Attacks Way Unions Are Using Nonmembers Fees. New York Times. April 12, 1992.)(Devroy, Anne. Bush Moves to Enforce Union Curb. Washington Post. April 14, 1992.)(Heilbronner, Steven. Bush Takes Steps to Restrict Union Collections. United Press International. April 14, 1992.)(Bunis, Dena. Bush Irks Unions About Use of Dues. Newsday. April 14, 1992.) Executive branch officials estimated that about 2 million to 3 million (10.5 percent to 15.8 percent) of the 19 million workers represented by labor unions are nonmembers,((((( and that NLRB officials had issued more than 300 citations accusing unions of not notifying their members of their Beck rights.( Labor leaders dismissed the Executive Order, claiming they already met the requirements set down by the Supreme Court.( The Bush administration estimated the Executive Order would keep $1.2 billion to $2.4 billion a year from being collected by labor unions.(((( The administration also said it would order the U.S. Department of Labor (DOL) to issue new regulations that would require unions to report in far greater detail the amount of money they spend on political activities, lobbying, and collective bargaining.(( Bush also asked Congress to enact legislation formally encoding the Beck ruling into federal labor law.( Unions and Democrats derided the action as election year politicking, while right-to-work advocates hailed it as long overdue.((((( At least one legal scholar criticized the order for not doing enough to implement the Beck decision, and for putting the onus of notification on the employer rather than the union.(Burns, David M. Requiring Unions to Notify Covered Employees of Their Right to Be An Agency Fee Payer in the Post Beck Era. Catholic University Law Review. 48:475 (Winter 1999).)The Clinton, Bush, and Obama administrations have each taken action to either rescind or reinstate this Executive Order. President Clinton issued Executive Order 12836 on February 1, 1993, which revoked Executive Order 12800.((Contrubis, John and Lee, Margaret Mikyung. The Use of Compulsory Union Dues for Political Purposes: A Legal Analysis. CRS Report No. 97-618A. Washington, D.C.: Congressional Research Service, 1997.)(McCallion, Gail. The Use of Union Dues for Political Purposes and Agency Fee Objectors. CRS Report No. 97-555E. Washington, D.C.: Congressional Research Service, 1998.) The Labor Department subsequently withdrew its Bush-era regulations on union financial reporting on December 21, 1993.((((Pierce, Greg. Unions No Longer Required to Reveal Political Funding. Washington Times. January 12, 1994.) President W. Bush then issued Executive Order 13201 on February 16, 2001, largely reinstating Executive Order 12800 and ordering DOL to re-issue its regulations.(Greenhouse, Steven. Bush Is Moving to Reduce Labors Political Coffers. New York Times. February 16, 2001; Knutson, Lawrence I. Unions Criticize Bushs Labor Policy Changes. Los Angeles Times. February 17, 2001; Swoboda, Frank. Bush to Sign Orders Curtailing Labors Influence. Washington Post. February 17, 2001; President Rolls Back Policies Favored By Organized Labor. Associated Press. February 17, 2001.) A coalition of unions sued to enjoin enforcement of the Executive Order.  The United States district court for the District of Columbia overturned the Executive Order on the grounds that the NLRA gave the NLRB exclusive jurisdiction over Beck rights, but the D.C. Circuit Court of Appeals reversed, the Supreme Court refused to hear the case, and Executive Order 13201 went into effect.((UAW-Labor Employment and Training Corporation v. Chao No. 01cv00950 (DC), rev. 325 F.3d 360, cert. dend. 541 U.S. 987)(Beck Notice Requirement Retracted. Fair Employment Practices Guidelines. February 15, 2002.) The last action was taken on January 30, 2009, when President Obama issued Executive Order 13496, revoking E.O. 13201 and the DOL regulations yet again.(DOL Rescinds Rule on Beck Rights Notice Pursuant to Obama Executive Order. Labor Law Reporter  Labor Relations. April 4, 2009; Obama Administration Says to Organized Labor: Welcome Back To The White House. Business & Management Practices. February 20, 2009.)The National Labor Relations Board (NLRB) struggled to implement the Courts holding in Beck. In 1989, the National Right to Work Committee polled NLRB offices nationwide, posing as workers and asking about the requirement to pay union dues.(Scully, Matthew. Survey Finds NLRB Misleads Workers. Washington Times. August 10, 1989.) The group found that Board agents and other staff at 22 of 29 offices gave the wrong information.( Although the NLRB initially dismissed the report,( within a few weeks the agency admitted its errors and ordered all its regional offices to review recent developments in labor law and provide accurate information on agency fee rights.(Scully, Matthew. NLRB Brushes Up On Law After Right-to-Work Criticism. Washington Times. August 23, 1989; King, John. NLRB Orders New Training Following Right to Work Committee Study. Associated Press. August 29, 1989.)In 1992, for only the second time in its history,((Swoboda, Frank. Labor Board to Address Dues Issue. Washington Post. May 5, 1992.)(Kovach, Kenneth A. and Millspaugh, Peter. Implementing the Beck and Lehnert Union Security Agreement Decisions: A Study in Frustration. Business Horizons. MayJune 1995.) the National Labor Relations Board undertook a regulatory rulemaking aimed at resolving the divergent, complex issues raised by the Beck decision.  The proposed rulemaking was announced in May 1992,( and the proposed rule issued on September 22, 1992.((Zebrak, Scott A. Comment: The Future of NLRB Rulemaking: Analyzing the Mixed Signals Sent by the Implementation of the Health Care Bargaining Unit Rule and by the Proposed Beck Union Dues Regulation. Administrative Law Journal. 8:125 (Spring 1994).)(Proposed Union Dues Regulation. 57 FR 43635 (1992-09-22); NLRBs Stephens Cites Advantages of Rulemaking to Deal With Beck Issues. Daily Labor Report. October 15, 1992; NLRB Notice of Proposed Rulemaking and Oral Argument on Enforcing Beck v. Communications Workers of America. Daily Labor Report. September 22, 1992.) But after three and a half years of inaction on the proposed regulation, the Board withdrew the rule on March 19, 1996concluding that it could proceed faster through its more traditional case-by-case approach.((Board Drops 1992 Proposal to Engage in Rule-Making for Agency Fee Procedures. Daily Labor Report. March 19, 1996.)Shortly after the labor board published its proposed rule, it issued its first ruling addressing the issues raised in the Beck decision.  In Electrical Workers IUE, Local 444 (Paramax Systems), 311 NLRB 1031 (1993), the Board held that Beck imposed a duty on unions to provide information on members and nonmembers Beck rights via the mail at least once a year, whether an employee has requested the information or not.((Electrical Workers IUE, Local 444 (Paramax Systems), 311 NLRB 1031 (1993).) But over the next several years, the NLRB ruled on almost no other Beck cases even though nearly 400 complaints had been brought before the Board.(Gould, William B. IV. The labor Boards Deepening Somnolence: Some Reflections of a Former Chairman. Creighton Law Review. 32:1505 (June 1999).)(Pierce, Greg. NLRB Dismisses Workers Claim for Union Dues Used in Politics. Washington Times. April 6, 1994.)(Landauer, Robert. Recent National Labor Rulings Bring Hillsboro Technicians Name to Fore. Oregonian. February 28, 1996.) Finally, the Board consolidated 28 Beck cases under California Saw & Knife Works, 320 NLRB 224 (1995).(((California Saw & Knife Works, 320 NLRB 224 (1995), enfd. sub. nom., International Association of Machinists and Aerospace Workers v. NLRB, 133 F.3d 1012 (7th Cir. 1998), cert. denied, 119 S. Ct. 47 (1998).) The Association of Machinists and Aerospace Workers (IAM) provided a Beck notification to each member yearly via its monthly magazine, and required members to exercise these rights once a year during a window period.((California Saw & Knife Works, 320 NLRB 224, 230231.) The Board held that the union had committed an unfair labor practice by failing to provide a Beck rights notice to new members and by not providing a Beck rights notice to new members who were resigning from the union but had not yet received the annual notice,((California Saw & Knife Works, 320 NLRB 224, 231.) but did not commit a ULP by failing to notify resigning union members of their Beck rights at the time of their resignation.(( The Board distinguished its holding in California Saw from its prior ruling in Paramax Systems, and found the window period (as well as other restrictions on the submission of resignation and objector status) to be an unfair labor practice.(California Saw & Knife Works, 320 NLRB 224, 233237.) The Board rejected numerous challenges to the way agency fees were calculated, challenges made, and expenditures verified.(California Saw & Knife Works, 320 NLRB 224, 237243.) The California Saw decision was criticized for only applying to nonmembers.( The NLRB addressed the Beck rights of members shortly thereafter in United Paperworkers International Union, Local 1033 (Weyerhauser Paper Co.), 320 NLRB 349 (1995).(United Paperworkers International Union, Local 1033 (Weyerhauser Paper Co.), 320 NLRB 349 (1995), revd on other grounds, Buzenius v. NLRB, 124 F.3d 788 (6th Cir. 1997), Paperworkers International Union v. Buzenius, 525 U.S. 979 (1998) cert. granted, cert. vacated and remanded in light of Marquez v. Screen Actors Guild.) In that case, the NLRB upheld its ruling in California Saw and said that yearly notice to current members, including the rights outlined by the courts and NLRB (not just the statutory language of the NLRA), was all that was required of unions.((United Paperworkers International Union, Local 1033 (Weyerhauser Paper Co.), 320 NLRB 349.)Two years later, the NLRB decided on the preferred remedy that should be imposed where a union failed to inform employees of their Beck rights. In Rochester Manufacturing Co., 323 NLRB 260 (1997), the Board ordered that the union return to the quo ante, give all workers their Beck rights notice, give each all workers the opportunity to submit agency fee calculation objections for every dues collection period at issue, and the reimburse each objecting employee.((Rochester Manufacturing Co., 323 NLRB 260 (1997).)From 1994 to 1998, the NLRB issued 18 consolidated or single Beck cases.(Legislative effortsThe Supreme Courts Beck decision generated a great deal of legislative activity at both the federal and state levels.Congressional actionThe first Congressional attempt to codify the Beck decision into law occurred a year after the Beck decision.  Representative DeLay introduced H.R. 2589, the Workers Political Rights Act of 1989, on June 8, 1989.(((((Workers Political Rights Act of 1989. 101st Congress, 1st Session. H.R. 2589/S. 1645) The bill, which died in committee, would have amended the Election Campaign Act of 1971 to: 1) Add union political committees to the list of action committees regulated by the Election Commission; 2) Require unions to give each worker separate, yearly Beck notices; 3) Require unions to give each worker Beck notices when they join the union and when they resign from the union; 4) Require unions to undergo independent audits each year to verify the calculation of agency fees; and 5) Require unions to provide members detailed information on the calculation of agency fees.(((((Additional action followed over the next several years. In July 1990, Senator Hatch proposed an amendment to the Senatorial Election Campaign Act of 1989 (S. 137), a major finance reform bill then under consideration in the U.S. Senate. The Hatch amendment was defeated on a close vote of 59-to-41.(http://thomas.loc.gov/cgi-bin/bdquery/L?d101:./temp/~bda47lN:11-20(Amendments_For_S.137)&./temp/~bdWTfR S.AMDT.2438 to S.137 To protect the rights of workers to choose whether their collective bargaining dues or any other payment required as a condition of employment shall be used for political purposes. Sponsor: Sen Hatch, Orrin G. UT (introduced 7/31/1990). Latest Major Action: 7/31/1990 Status: Amendment SP 2438 not agreed to in Senate by Yea-Nay Vote. 4159.) Senator Boren then proposed a less restrictive amendment to S. 137, which was adopted by a vote of 57 to 43.(http://thomas.loc.gov/cgi-bin/bdquery/L?d101:./temp/~bda47lN:11-20(Amendments_For_S.137)&./temp/~bdWTfR S.AMDT.2439 to S.137 Relating to payments to labor organizations in lieu of dues. Sponsor: Sen Boren, David L. OK (introduced 7/31/1990) Latest Major Action: 7/31/1990. Status: Amendment SP 2439 agreed to in Senate by Yea-Nay Vote. 5743.) Although the amended bill passed the Senate on August 1, 1990, it was never referred to the House and died at the end of the congressional session.(Alexander, Herbert E. and Corrado, Anthony. Financing the 1992 Election. Armonk, N.Y.: M.E. Sharpe, 1995. ISBN 1563244373) DeLay reintroduced his Beck bill in 1991, where it died again without action.((((Workers Political Rights Act of 1991. 102d Congress, 1st Session. HR 2915.) In 1996, Representative W. Fawell introduced the Worker Right to Know Act (H.R. 3580), a bill to amend the NLRA to ban unions from charging any worker (member or nonomember) fees unrelated to collective bargaining, contract administration, or grievance adjustment unless the worker gave the union explicit, annual consent.((((((The Worker Right to Know Act. 104th Congress, 2d Session. H.R. 3580.) Hearings on the legislation occurred, but the bill died in committee. In 1997, Senator Coverdell introduced a bill (S. 497, the National Right to Work Act of 1997) which would have banned all compulsory union membership.(((((National Right to Work Act of 1997. 105th Congress, 1st Session. S. 497/HR 59.) Introduced in the House as well, both bills died in committee.The last major push for congressional action came in 19961997.  Several bills had been introduced in both the House and the Senate.(Worker Paycheck Fairness Act. 105th Congress, 1st Session. H.R. 1625; Paycheck Protection Act. 105th Congress, 1st Session. S. 9; Common Sense Campaign Reform Act of 1997. 105th Congress, 1st Session. S. 976 (incorporating S. 9).) The most prominent was Senator Nickles Paycheck Protection Act, which Senate Majority Leader Lott re-introduced in 1998.(Paycheck Protection Act. 105th Congress, 2d Session. S. 1663.)(Corrado, Anthony. The Legislative Odyssey of BRCA. In Life After Reform: When the Bipartisan Campaign Reform Act Meets Politics. Michael J. Malbin, ed. New York: Rowman & Littlefield, 2003. ISBN 0742528332) The issue became caught in campaign finance reform legislation that year. Section 501 of the Bipartisan Campaign Reform Act of 1997 (BRCA)(Bipartisan Campaign Reform Act of 1997. 105th Congress, 1st Session. S. 25.) merely codified the Beck decision, but the Paycheck Protection Act went much further and required all workers to affirm on an annual basis whether their dues could be used for political purposes.((Schmitt, Eric. Threat Is Seen to Campaign-Finance Bill. New York Times. September 30, 1997.)(Marcus, Ruth. Union Fees Dispute Threatens Finance Reform. Washington Post. September 30, 1997.)(Green, John Clifford. Financing the 1996 Election. Armonk, N.Y.: M.E. Sharpe, 1999. ISBN 0765603853)(Green, Mark. Selling Out: How Big Corporate Money Buys Elections, Rams Through Legislation, and Betrays Our Democracy. New York: HarperCollins, 2004. ISBN 0060735821) Senator Lott offered the Nickles bill as an amendment to the BRCA, which many Democrats (and some Republicans) saw as a poison pill amendment.((((( Under procedures adopted by the Senate, Senators would need to reject the Lott amendment before voting on the BRCA.((((Schmitt, Eric. McCain Lacks Votes to Lift Deadlock on Campaign Bill. New York Times. October 3, 1997.) But with Republicans unwilling to vote against the amendment (which was popular with their conservative base), the Lott amendment was added to the BRCA and the Beck amendment died along with the BRCA after a number of other procedural votes.(((((Schmitt, Eric. Campaign Finance Measure Blocked in 2 Senate Votes; Main Foe Says Bill Is Dead. New York Times. October 8, 1997.)Several bills were offered in Congress over the next few years to either ban agency shop agreements or to adopt various provisions of the 1997 Nickles bill, but all of them died in committee.(Worker Paycheck Fairness Act of 1999. 106th Congress, 2d Session. H.R. 2434; Common Sense Federal Election Reform Act of 2001. 107th Congress, 1st Session. S. 602; Campaign Finance Integrity Act of 2001. 107th Congress, 1st Session. S. 559; Campaign Finance Improvement Act of 2001. 107th Congress, 1st Session. H.R. 1516; Citizen Legislature and Political Freedom Act. 107th Congress, 1st Session. H.R. 1444; Workers Bill of Rights. 107th Congress, 2d Session. H.R. 4636; Workers Freedom of Choice Act. 107th Congress, 2d Session. H.R. 3632.) An analysis of the major bills under congressional consideration from 1988 to 1997 found, however, that nearly all of them suffered from significant legal flaws, and none went far enough in protecting workers Beck rights.(Felsberg, Eric J. Note: Creating a Beck Statute: Recent Congressional Attempts and a Proposal for the Future. Hofstra Labor and Employment Law Journal. 15:247 (Fall 1997).)State actionsMany states have proposed or passed legislation to address the Supreme Courts ruling in Beck for public employee unions. The National Labor Relations Act does not cover state or local public employees, and leaves it up to each state to grant these workers collective bargaining rights.(Hogler, Raymond L. The Employment Relationship: Law and Policy. New York: Rowman & Littlefield, 1989. ISBN 0912675470; Gould, William B. IV. A Primer on American Labor Law. 4th ed. Cambridge, Mass.: MIT Press, 2004. ISBN 0262572184) By 2000, 28 states and the of Columbia had enacted a collective bargaining law for some or all of their public employees.(Gargan, John J. Handbook of State Government Administration. Volume 75: Public Administration and Public Policy. New York: CRC Press, 2000. ISBN 0824776607) Paycheck protection actslegislation requiring public employee unions to obtain permission from all workers on an annual basis in order to collect dues or fees for any purpose not germane to collective bargainingwere introduced in a number of state legislatures or became ballot initiatives.((Dreyfuss, Robert. Paycheck Protection Racket. Mother Jones. May/June 1998; Asher, Herbert B. American Labor Unions in the Electoral Arena. New York: Rowman & Littlefield, 2001. ISBN 0847688666; Landy, Marc Karnis and Milkis, Sidney M. American Government: Balancing Democracy and Rights. 2d rev. ed. New York: Cambridge University Press, 2008. ISBN 0521862752; Ellis, Richard J. Democratic Delusions: The Initiative Process in America. Lawrence, Kan.: University Press of Kansas, 2002. ISBN 070061155X) In 1992, voters in Washington state approved Initiative 134,the nations first paycheck protection act.( Similar ballot initiatives and legislation appeared in 26 states in 1998.(((Love, Thomas. Declaring War on Union Political Dues. Nations Business. January 1998.)(Berman, Evan M.; Bowman, James S.; and West, Jonathan P. Human Resource Management in Public Service: Paradoxes, Processes, and Problems. 2d ed. Thousand Oaks, Calif.: SAGE Publishers, 2005. ISBN 1412904218) The battle in California over that states initiative, Proposition 226, was particularly important because supporters of the initiative believed a win there would lead to adoption of the proposal in many more states.(Thurber, James A. and Nelson, Candice J. Campaign Warriors: The Role of Political Consultants in Elections. Washington, D.C.: Brookings Institution Press, 2000. ISBN 0815784538; Lannon, Albert Vetere. Fight or Be Slaves: The History of the Oakland-East Bay Labor Movement. Lanham, Md.: University Press of America, 2000. ISBN 0761818693) But despite the support of Governor Wilson( and a lead of roughly 35 points in the polls in April,(Sawyer, Jon. California Proposition Targets Union Giving. Louis Post-Dispatch. June 1, 1998; Espe, Erik. Chamber Opposes Proposition 226. Business Journal-San Jose. June 1, 1998.) the initiative went down to defeat 52-to-48 on election day in June after a fierce battle.(Bayer, Amy. Election 98 California Primary: Union Victory on Proposition 226 Called Political Miracle. San Diego Union Tribune. June 4, 1998.)(An almost identical ballot initiative in California, Proposition 75, was defeated in 2005 by a 53.5 to 46.5 margin. See: Voters Talked to Union Members on Prop. 75. Bee. November 10, 2005; Fund, John. And the Winners Are... Street Journal. November 14, 2005; Wildermuth, John. Republican Strongholds Left Schwarzenegger in the Cold. Francisco Chronicle. November 13, 2005.)The defeat of the initiative had a significant effect nationwide.  Similar initiatives and legislation were defeated in 29 states by 2002.(Helpern, Martin. Unions, Radicals, and Democratic Presidents: Seeking Social Change in the Twentieth Century. Santa Barbara, Calif.: Greenwood Publishing Group, 2003. ISBN 0313324719) By September 2009, only five states had adopted the proposal via initiative or legislation (Idaho, Michigan, Ohio, Washington, and Wyoming), while a sixth (Colorado) had done so via executive order.((Sherk, James. What Do Union Members Want? What Paycheck Protection Laws Show About How Well Unions Reflect Their Members Priorities. Center for Data Analysis Report #06-08. Heritage Foundation, 2008; Issue Brief  Paycheck Protection. National Alliance for Worker and Employer Rights, September 3, 2009.)Legislative prospectsProspects for addition initiatives and legislation at the federal and state level appear mixed as of 2009. Former Federal Election Commission Chair A. Smith (who opposes compulsory unionism) has argued that even the most stringent laws are unlikely to have any impact, as the number of agency fee payers is small compared to the number of union members.(Smith, Bradley A. A Free-Speech Salve: End Compulsory Unionism. Washington Times. June 29, 2007.) At least one legal scholar has questioned the constitutionality of paycheck protection laws,(McLaughlin, Sean T. A Devil in Disguise: How Paycheck Protection Legislation Violates the First Amendment. Seton Hall Legislative Journal. 27:113 (2002).) while another, detailed analysis of the Washington state effort has concluded that instead of decreasing the amount of union dues available for political expenditures paycheck protection actually increased it (from approximately $630,000 to approximately $780,000) as unions shifted member dues internally to account for the agency fees going toward collective bargaining.(See also* of United States Supreme Court cases, volume 487* of United States Supreme Court cases* of United States Supreme Court cases by volume* of United States Supreme Court cases by the Rehnquist CourtReferencesExternal links*Full text of the decision courtesy of Findlaw.com*Agency Fee/Fair Share Information from the Federation of Teachers*Sample Beck notice from the Auto Workers
24234528
Frederick_Newton_(cricketer)
Frederick Arthur Newton (16 September 1890 - 8 August 1924) was an English cricketer who played first-class cricket  for Derbyshire between 1909 and 1919. Newton was born at  Denaby Main, Yorkshire. He was an all-round aportsman and twice played as goalkeeper for F.C.  in 1905/6 and 1906/7, and later played football for Whitwell St Lawrence. He made his cricket debut for Derbyshire in July 1909 against Northamptonshire when he made 30 in his first innings. He only played one more match that season. In 1910 he played a dozen matches. Against Warwickshire he achieved his best first class score of 87 in the first innings.  In the second innings of this match Warren and John Chapman achieved a record 9th wicket stand.  Newton played two games in 1911, three in 1912 and a final game in 1919.Newton was a right-hand batsman and played 37 innings in 20 first class matches with an average of 13.61 and a top score of 87. He was a leg-break bowler and bowled two overs for the loss of 21 runs without taking a wicket.(Frederick Newton at Cricket Archive)Newton was killed in a mining accident at Warsop Main Colliery, Nottinghamshire  at the age of 33.His elder brother known as Frank Newton played centre forward for Chesterfield  FC on 98 occasions, and scored 23 goals from 1902 to 1905.References
24244318
William_F._Fox
Col. William F. Fox (1840-1909) was the Superintendent of Forests at the Adirondack Park in New York State.Fox was born in Ballston Spa, New York on January 11, 1840.  He graduated from the Engineering Department of College in 1869. He fought in the Civil War and wrote extensively about his war experiences.  His Chances of Being Hit in Battle was published by Century Magazine in 1888,  In 1898, he published Regimental Loses. He then wrote New York at Gettysburg (three volumes), Slocum and His Men and a biography of General Green.Foxs family was in the lumber business.  He visited Germany to study scientific forestry methods there.  From 1875 to 1882, he was a private forester for the Blossburg Coal, Mining and Railroad Company in Bossburg, PA.  He became a New York State employee in 1885, as assistant secretary to the Forest Commission.  He was an Assistant Forest Warden from 1888 to 1891, and became the first Superintendent of Forests upon the creation of the Adirondack Park.His reports as Superintendent of Forests were instrumental in the founding of the York State College of Forestry at Cornell.References
24262554
Znaur_Gassiev
File:   2009.jpg|thumb|Znaur Gassiev (right) and Medoev (left), 2009Znaur Nikolaevich Gassiev (, , Znauyr Gassity; born 17 March 1925( Leaders of South Ossetia) in Tskhinvali, Ossetian Autonomous Oblast, SSR, Union), is a Ossetian politician, who was one of the leaders of the South Ossetian independence movement in the early 1990s, which culminated in the South Ossetia War.Gassiev was born in Tskhinvali in 1925, but soon moved with his parents to Moscow. In 1935 the family went back to Tskhinvali, where Znaur Gassiev finished secondary school in 1942. He enrolled in the Physics and Mathematics Faculty of the South Ossetian State Pedagogical Institute, but was drafted into the Army to fight in War II during the period 1942 to 1944. Upon completion of his studies in 1947, he started working as a teacher, teaching mathematics and physics in various schools in Tskhinvali.( Min. of Press and Mass Communications: Biography of Znaur Nikolaevich Gassiev - Chairman of the 4th convocation of the Parliament of South Ossetia)In 1951, Gassiev moved to Tblisi, where he worked as a teacher for four years, and at the same time studied at the Mining Department of the Polytechnic Institute, where he graduated with honours in 1955. He then started working at the Mining Department of Kvaisa, where he held several ranks.(Gassiev subsequently moved into politics, first working as the head of the industrial and transport committee of Dzau district. In the early 1960s, he was appointed the chairman of the Tskhinvali branch of the Communist Party, as well as the head of the administration of Tskhinvali city. In 1963, he went to the Party School, from which he graduated with honours in 1965. Then, until 1972, he worked as deputy chairman of the South Ossetian executive committee.(In 1991, when armed aggression was starting, he was elected first secretary of the South Ossetian Communist Party, and also headed the Supreme Council when South Ossetia declared its independence. As chairman of parliament, Gassiev was Head of State of South Ossetia. In early 1992, Gassiev handed over power to Kulumbegov, a former chairman of the Supreme Council, who had been imprisoned in Tblisi by Georgian police until then.((Rulers.org: South Ossetia)Since 1992, Gassiev remained active in politics, being re-elected as an MP in the 1994 election.( Gassiev was once again elected in the 2004 election, where he ran as a member of President Kokoitys Unity Party. Following the Unity Partys electoral victory, Gassiev was once again elected chairman of Parliament.After the South Ossetia war, Gassiev was appointed head of the governments commission to deal with the resulting emergencies.( Kommersant: The head of South Ossetia government has been sacked (18 August 2008))( President of South Ossetia: Decree on the Extraordinary Commission in the aftermath of the Georgian aggression (17 August 2008))Gassiev, then 84 years old, did not run in the 2009 election,( Candidates for the Unity Party at the 2009 elections) and was replaced as speaker by Kochiev.On 27 October 2010, Gassiev was appointed State Advisor to President Eduard Kokoity.()References|-|- 
24283655
Quincy_Street_Historic_District
 refnum  88000143()The Quincy Street Historic District is a historic district located along the 100, 200, and 300 blocks of Quincy Street, along with 416 Tezcuco Street, in Michigan.  The Town Hall and Fire Hall is located in the district.  The district was listed on the Register of Historic Places in 1988.( Description left|thumb|South side of 100 block of Quincy St. The Wright Block is in the distance.left|thumb|South side of 200 block of Quincy St. Note Art Deco bank building on left.left|thumb|North side of 300 block of Quincy St.left|thumb|South side of 300 block of Quincy St.The Quincy Street Historic District covers the central portion of Hancocks business district consisting of the first three blocks of Quincy Street, plus two adjacent properties.(Quincy Street Historic District from the state of Michigan, retrieved 9/5/09) The district includes three governmental structures (the Town Hall and Fire Hall, post office, and a county office building) along with forty-two commercial buildings.(  The majority of the structures within the district were built between 1880 and 1915. The commercial buildings range from two to five stories, and are of frame, brick, or brick and stone construction.( The district is notable for the widespread use of local red sandstone.( History and Significance In 1869, a major fire destroyed 75% of the buildings in Hancock, which were primarily made of wood.(Historic Hancock Tour from the city of Hancock)  This made room for the construction of more substantial structures during the latter years of the 19th century.The district contains a large number of well-preserved structures built around the turn of the century.  These structures indicate the relative prosperity of Hancock at the time, when copper mining in the Peninsula was a strong industry.(  Many of the structures were designed by leading architects of the Peninsula, including Charlton, Gilbert and Demar, and are significant for their scale and quality, and the reflection of the ethic diversity of late 19th century Hancock.(Significant buildings in the district include:*First National Bank Building (1888) 101-103 Quincy Street.  The First National Bank Building was originally designed by Byron H. Pierce as a two-story building, its corner entrance specifically intended to exemplify the buildings location at the entrance to Hancocks main street.(1888 Bank Building, Historic Hancock Tour from the city of Hancock)  In 1903, the building was enlarged by Charles Archibald Pearce with a third floor and a 40-foot addition on the north side.(*The Wright Block (1899) 100-102 Quincy Street. The Wright Block was designed by Charlton, Gilbert, and Demar.  The eastern portion of this building still retains much of its original appearance, with a sandstone facade.(The Wright Block, Historic Hancock Tour from the city of Hancock)  The western portion was covered in 1952 with Vitrolite, a pigmented structural glass.(*Detroit & Northern Michigan Savings & Loan Association (1939) 200 Quincy Street.  This building was constructed in 1939 in the then-popular Deco style.(Art Deco Building, Historic Hancock Tour from the city of Hancock)  The building uses contrasting Bedford limestone and black granite, and sports the streamlined surfaces, vertical elements, and stylized geometry popular in the Art Deco style.(*Post Office (1934) 221 Quincy Street. This building, constructed during the Depression, was a Works Authority project, overseen by architect Louis A. Simon.(Post Office, Historic Hancock Tour from the city of Hancock)  The original design called for a more ornate facade and galbed slate roof, but as the building neared completion the current flat roof and simplified facade was used.(*First National Bank (1905) 240 Quincy Street.  This building was originally constructed in 1905, but in 1913 the facade was renovated, converting it to a Neo-Classical style with limestone columns, entry pediment, and balustrade at the top.(Neo Classical Building, Historic Hancock Tour from the city of Hancock) A third story was added to the building in the 1940s.(*Nutinis Supper Club (1906) 321 Quincy Street. This building still sports its pressed-metal cornice, with the original brackets and other details.(300 Block of Quincy Street, Historic Hancock Tour from the city of Hancock)right|thumb|North side of 100 block of Quincy Street, looking west, c. 1906. The First National Bank Building is in the foreground right.  Compare this image to the image in infobox, taken over 100 years later.References
24305058
CanadaMali_relations
CanadaMali relations concern the bilateral relationship between the countries of Canada and the Republic of Mali. Relations have been characterized in 2009 as excellent and becoming more extensive by the Government of Canada.(Government of Canada, Canada  Mali Relations, Date Modified: 2009-07-06 http://www.canadainternational.gc.ca/mali/bilateral_relations_bilaterales/index.aspx?menu_id7&menuL) President Toumani Tour of Mali viewed the relationship in 2009 as one of co-operation and friendship.(Rpublique du Mali, ATT lors de la remise hier de deux otages canadiens, suisse et allemand  leur pays respectif, Primature 24-04-2009, translated from the French http://www.primature.gov.ml/index2.php?optioncom_content&do_pdf1&id2167) Owing to the Canadian governments policies on aid, approximately two-thirds(Morrison, David R. 1998. Aid and Ebb Tide: A History of Canadian Development Assistance, Wilfrid Laurier University Press, p. 352, 295.)(OECD. DAC7b Tying Status of Bilateral ODA, OECD. Stat Extracts) of the one billion dollars (constant 2007 US $)( that Canada has provided in bilateral development assistance(OECD. DAC2a ODA Disbursements, Stat Extracts, Aid type: ODA, total net. Date last updated April 2009.http://stats.oecd.org/Index.aspx?DataSetCodeTABLE2A) to Mali over the period 19602007 has returned to the Canadian private sector in the form of procurement contracts, chiefly in technical consulting, telecommunications, hydroelectricity, and railways.(Canadian International Development Agency. Mali : CIDA funded projects, Project Browser, http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/cidaweb/cpo.nsf/fWebCSAZEn?ReadForm&idx00&CCML) Canadas contribution represented 7% of Malis total country-to-country aid receipts of $14.0 bn. over this period, ranking it fifth-largest after France, Germany, the States, and the Netherlands.(Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development, ODA by Recipient by country, ODA Total, Net disbursements, OECD.Stat, extracted on 30 Jul 2009 03:34 UTC. http://stats.oecd.org/Index.aspx?DataSetCodeODA_RECIPIENT) More than 99% of Canada-to-Mali aid disbursements have been in the form of grants, with concessional loans comprising $7.1m. (0.8%).(OECD. ODA Loans, Gross disbursements, Stat Extracts, extracted on 30 Jul 2009 http://stats.oecd.org/Index.aspx?DataSetCodeTABLE2A) Canada has also channeled aid indirectly to Mali via multilateral institutions including the Bank and agencies of the Nations, and this is estimated at $355m. (constant 2007 US $) over 19752007, or 5% of Malis total multilateral aid receipts of $7.2bn. over the same period.(OECD. DAC2a ODA Disbursements, Stat Extracts, Aid type: Imputed Multilateral ODA. Date last updated April 2009.http://stats.oecd.org/Index.aspx?DataSetCodeTABLE2A) In 2009, Mali was among twenty developing nations designated to benefit from a focusing of 80% of Canadas development aid budget.(CIDA. Canada Moves on Another Element of its Aid Effectiveness Agenda, News Release, February 23, 2009 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/NAT-223132931-PPH) Canadian imports of cotton from Mali peaked at Cdn.$20m. in 1999, but have ceased entirely since 2005; Canada had an overall trade balance with Mali of Cdn.$22m. during the period 19902008.(Industry Canada, Trade Data Online) Canada averaged Malis 19th-most important import partner during 19832004, but fell out of the top 25 during 20052007, and has not figured among Malis top 25 export recipients with the exception of years 19871989, when Canada ranked between 7th and 22nd.(United Nations. Mali  Table 1: Imports by principal countries, Table 2: Exports by principal countries, International Trade Statistics Yearbook, 1991:I:552-553, 1994:I:648-649, 2004:I:709-710, 2005 (online), 2008 (online). No Malian trade data are reported for 19911995.http://comtrade.un.org/pb/FileFetch.aspx?docID2487&typecountry%20pageshttp://comtrade.un.org/pb/FileFetch.aspx?docID1169&typecountry%20pages) Canadian mining investment in Mali in 2009 was estimated by the Canadian government at Cdn.$500m.(Canada  Mali Relations, Modified: 2009-07-06) and grew from four Canadian-owned mining properties in Mali in 1991 to 73 in 2005.( From 1996 to 2007, approximately US$267m., or 3% of Malis total revenue from industrial gold production, went to the Canadian company IAMGOLD Corporation(((( and its investors, including both of Canadas public pension funds.(( The two mines part-owned by IAMGOLD yielded half of Malis gold output over this period.(( According to IAMGOLDs South African co-partner in these mines, Ashanti, 40% of earnings went into the Malian economy through various government revenues, workers salaries, Malian sub-contractors and local community development initiatives.((( As Malis gold mines were estimated to contribute 8% of the domestic product in 2007,(International Monetary Fund. 2008. Mali: Selected Issues, Country Report No. 08/286, May 8, 2008, p.11 http://www.imf.org/external/pubs/ft/scr/2008/cr08286.pdf) IAMGOLDs mines comprised about 34% of Malis economy. Sixty percent of these mines revenue went to foreign stakeholders, including IAMGOLD, AngloGold Ashanti and its sub-contractors, the World Banks International Finance Corporation, and European creditors.(( In 2006, for every 100,000 of the Canadian population, 2.7 persons were born in Mali.(Statistics Canada, Place of birth for the immigrant population by period of immigration, 2006 counts, Date Modified: 2009-03-27 http://www12.statcan.ca/census-recensement/2006/dp-pd/hlt/97-557/T404-eng.cfm?LangE&T404&GH4&GF1&SC1&S1&OD) By comparison, France, Malis former colonizer, reported in 2006 having 69.6 officially registered Malians per 100,000 of its population.(France-Diplomatie, Prsentation du Mali, http://www.diplomatie.gouv.fr/fr/pays-zones-geo_833/mali_350/presentation-du-mali_996/index.html ; Government of France, Ministre de lIntrieur, 18.05.2006  Dplacement de M. NicolasSARKOZY au Mali, http://www.interieur.gouv.fr/misill/sections/a_l_interieur/le_ministre/interventions/archives-sarkozy-2005-2007/18-05-2006-deplacement-mali)HistoryFormal diplomatic ties between Mali and Canada were signaled by the openings of Malis embassy in Ottawa in 1978,(LAmbassadeur Mamadou Bandiougou Diawara, Welcome, Mali Embassy, website (Accessed 31 July 2009) http://www.ambamalicanada.org/english/a1.html) and Canadas embassy in Bamako in 1995.(Government of Canada, Canada  Mali Relations, Date Modified: 2009-07-06 http://www.canadainternational.gc.ca/mali/bilateral_relations_bilaterales/index.aspx?menu_id7&menuL) Mali has been a recipient of Canadian development aid since 1972, according to the Canadian embassy website.( Statistics from the for Economic Co-operation and Development state that Canada has contributed development assistance to Mali steadily since 1962, just three years after Malis independence from France. Expressed in constant 2007 US dollars, Canada disbursed a net total of $936 million in bilateral aid between 1960 and 2007, making Canada responsible for 4.0% of Malis total bilateral and multilateral aid receipts of $23.5 billion over this period, and ranking it as Malis fifth-largest bilateral donor after France (16.5% of Malis ODA), the Netherlands (9.4%), the United States (7.6%) and Germany (5.2%).( Only US$7.1m. of Canadian aid was in the form of loans, all being made during the 1970s; Canadas loans to Mali represented 0.41% of the total of US$1.75bn. (2007$) made by all donors.(Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development, ODA Loans, Gross disbursements, OECD.Stat, extracted on 30 Jul 2009 03:34 UTC. http://stats.oecd.org/Index.aspx?DataSetCodeODA_RECIPIENT) Canada has also contributed aid to Mali via multilateral institutions, which collectively were responsible for 39.8% of Malian aid receipts since 1960; for the period from 1975 to 2007, Canada provided US$355m., or 4.9% of Malis $7.2bn. in multilateral aid.(Organisation for Economic Co-operation and Development, ODA by Recipient by country, Stat Extracts, Type of aid: ODA (OA) Imputed Multilateral, extracted on 30 Jul 2009 03:34 UTC. http://stats.oecd.org/Index.aspx?DataSetCodeODA_RECIPIENT)Canadas involvement from 19771996 in Senegals and Malis transport sectors via CANAC Consultants Ltd. and CANARAIL was described in a 1999 review by the International Development Agency (CIDA) as aiming to improve the effectiveness and efficiency of railway operations in Mali. Unfortunately, none of the projects fulfilled this mission, primarily due to external circumstances beyond their control...; CIDA nevertheless concluded that Canada has made a significant contribution to the survival of Malis railways has achieved significant outputs and notable social and economic effects; the outputs included the supply of one hundred rail cars, nine locomotives and five ktonnes of rail track and parts, all fabricated in Canada, at an investment of Cdn.$38.8m.(CIDA, Canadas Railway Program in Mali, undated, 9 pp. Downloaded March 2009.http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/prnEn/EMA-21813240-PL9)(CIDA. Investments in the Rail Sector in Senegal, 9 pages, (1999?)) According to a United Nations 2006 investment guide for Mali, the Quebec consulting firm CanaRail was assigned a 30-year lease to modernise Malis state railroad RCFM (Rgie du Chemin de Fer du Mali), and Transrail SA, was ranked as Malis third-largest planned foreign investment (CFA 19.7 bn, US $37 m.) during 20012005.(United Nations; International Chamber of Commerce. 2006. An Investment Guide to Mali. Opportunities and conditions, New York: UN, October 2006, p. 9, 15, 16.http://www.unctad.org/en/docs/iteiia20062_en.pdf) In 2003, the former Canadian National Railway rail consultancy subsidiary Canac and Frances Getma received a 25-year lease of the Senegalese-Malian railway, acquiring a 51% ownership of the Transrail public-private partnership, to which the governments of Senegal and Mali each retained 10% shares, private investors held 10% and the employees held 9%; the Transrail consortium received $132m. in loans from the Bank Development Association, the Development Bank, and other lenders.(World Bank. 2004. Project Appraisal Document on a Proposed Credit in the Amount of SDR 22.2 million (US$32.8 million equivalent) and a Proposed Grant in the Amount of SDR 10.8. million (US$15.9 million equivalent) to the Republic of Mali for the Transport Corridors Improvement Project, February 11, 2004.http://www-wds.worldbank.org/servlet/WDSContentServer/WDSP/IB/2004/01/27/000094946_04010604002983/Rendered/PDF/multi0page.pdf)(Transrail SA (Mali), Railway systems and operators, Janes World Railways, Nov 06, 2008.http://www.janes.com/articles/Janes-World-Railways/Transrail-SA-Mali.html) Canac-Getma terminated or early-pensioned 632 employees and focused on freight instead of passenger operations.(Muni, Vincent. 2007. On the slow train through Senegal, Le Monde diplomatique, March 2007: 11.) Canac was acquired in 2004 by the American firm Savage Companies, and Savage sold its Transrail shares to Belgiums Vecturis in 2007.(Keita, Daba Balla. 2007. Interview exclusive du Directeur Gnral de TRANSRAIL-SA : Rinscrire Transrail dans son environnement social et conomique, a dit Eric Peiffer, Nouvel Horizon, 12/09/2007 http://www.maliweb.net/category.php?NID21979) CIDAs contribution to CANAC has come under criticism, including from the group Le Collectif Citoyen pour la Restitution et le Dveloppement Intgr du Rail, which described the consequences of the rationalization process as disastrous; passenger traffic was reduced with the closure of 26 of 36 stations, to focus on the rapid export of cotton to the Dakar coast.(Lcuyer, Franois. En mal de mondialisation, lAfrique?, Le Devoir, 24 janvier 2007, p. a7.http://www.alternatives.ca/article2765.html)(Vincent Muni, On the slow train through Senegal, Le Monde diplomatique, March 2007: 11.) Canadian Rick Antonson reported in a 2004 Mali travelogue that the Dakar-Bamako passenger train service was highly sporadic, operating less than once per week.(Antonson, Rick. 2008. To Timbuktu for a Haircut  A Journey Through West Africa, Toronto: Dundurn Group, pp. 2930, 208.) In a 2007 review of its Mali programming, the World Bank noted that the quality of rail service did not improve as anticipated. International goods traffic has remained stagnant; the lengths of track where trains can only move extremely slowly still total some 230 kilometers, compared to the target of 30 kilometers; the level of investments remains far too low. The concession is politically unpopular in Mali and there is a significant danger that unless outstanding issues can be quickly addressedinvestment policies, continuation of passenger servicethe privatization may be in danger.(World Bank. 2007. Mali. Country Assistance Evaluation, November 12, 2007, p. 23) According to the Malian citizens collective, Cocidirail, a Transrail audit revealed a deficit over 20032006 of $20m., and the Senegalese and Malian ministries of transport jointly declared in 2008 that Transrail had failed to run the railway more efficiently than the state-owned services.(Faillite de la concession du chemin de fer Mali-Sngal : Transrail accumule un dficit de 8 milliards Fcfa, LObservateur, 08/09/2008)(Cloutier, Myriam. 2009. The Little Engine That Couldnt, Alternatives International Journal, Vol.02, No. 1, May 2009.http://www.alternatives.ca/plan/article4775.html) Ottawa-based transportation consulting firm CPCS Transcom also participated in the Mali-Senegal Railway privatization project, and was a member of the railway concessioning group that received a World Bank Presidents Award for Excellence in 1999.(World Bank Railway Concessioning Group Recognised, CPSC Transcom website, accessed July 2009 http://staff.cpcstrans.com/files/publications/awards/Award-WorldBankPresidents.pdf)In the telecommunications sector, during 19751994, CIDA supported the Programme panafricain de tlcommunications (PANAFTEL) infrastructure project (Cdn.$170m.) in five West African countries including Mali, and Canadian private sector partners included Bell Canada International, CANAC, and SEGIBEL (a consortium of BCI and SEGITEL).(Canadian International Development Agency. Examen du rendement des services dinfrastructure  Sommaire des resultantssic, Gatineau, Quebec, p. 9, accessed August 2009 http://w3.acdi-cida.gc.ca/INET/IMAGES.NSF/vLUImages/Performancereview5/$file/ISPR_Results_F.pdf) Canadas Development Research Centre has had at least eighty technical projects in Mali since 1971, including support for community telecentres in Bamako and Timbuktu between 1998 and 2009, to enhance public access to computers and the Internet.(International Development Research Centre. Projects in Mali, web page accessed August 2009.http://www.idrc.ca/en/ev-83054-201-1-DO_TOPIC.html)Canada has been active in the development of Malis energy infrastructure since the mid-1970s, with C$23m. invested up to 1999, according to CIDA. CIDA-funded projects in this sector included the Slingu Dam Energy Transmission Line (19761980), the Bamako Electricity Sector Strengthening (19912000), and the Bamako-Sgou Very High Tension Connector Line project (19761980). The latter projects purpose was to bring hydroelectric power to the city of Sgou and environs via the construction of a 280-km. connector line and hydro poles from Bamako. At a cost of C$9.1m., CIDA concluded that project has gone beyond achieving its purpose, by furnishing Canadian materials that were judged to be adequate and very well suited to the climatic regions, through the training of four Malian managers, and by benefiting five Canadian firms, including Hydro-Qubec International, through a total of C$7.7m. in supply contracts.(Canadian International Development Agency, Bamako-Sgou Very High Tension Connector Line Project, Mali, Gatineau: CIDA, 1999?, 8 pp. Downloaded March 2009.http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/prnEn/EMA-21813240-PL9http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/INET/IMAGES.NSF/vLUImages/Performancereview5/$file/ISPR_E_Results.pdf) Concerning a $6.3m. Malian hydroelectric project awarded in 1997 by CIDA, the Office of the of Canada identified serious problems in the selection of the winning company, finding that CIDA failed to show due diligence in response to complaints from competing bidders, and that it failed to disqualify one bidder despite its lacking the minimum relevant experience.(Office of the Auditor General of Canada, Case Study 14.2Lack of Due Diligence in Selecting a Contractor for a $6.3 Million Contract, 2000 October Report of the Auditor General of Canada, Chapter 14, Date Issued: 2007-11-15 http://www.oag-bvg.gc.ca/internet/English/att_0014se02_e_10892.html) Laval, Quebec-based Transelec /Common inc was identified as the $6.3m. CIDA contract beneficiary, and it installed a 150 kV, 130 km line in Mali.(Industry Canada. Transelec /Common inc  Complete Profile, Information by Industrial Sector > Canadian Nuclear Energy Industry > Company Directory http://www.ic.gc.ca/app/ccc/srch/nvgt.do?langfra&prtl1&sbPrtl&estblmntNo123456009526&profilecmpltPrfl&profileId501&appsold)(LeBreton, Marjory, Hon. 1999. Question Period, Debates of the Senate (Hansard), Parliament of Canada, 1st Session, 36th Parliament, Volume 137, Issue 142, June 1, 1999.http://www.parl.gc.ca/36/1/parlbus/chambus/senate/DEB-E/142db_1999-06-01-e.htm?LanguageE&Parl36&Ses1)(Standing Committee on Foreign Affairs and International Trade, House of Commons, Evidence, June 7, 2001 http://www2.parl.gc.ca/HousePublications/Publication.aspx?DocId1040819&LanguageE&Mode1&Parl37&Ses1) For its construction of 500 km. of high-tension hydro lines in Mali that will be able to significantly improve Malians quality of life, the Quebec City engineering firm of Lambert Somec was awarded one of nine Canadian Awards for International Cooperation by the Minister of International Cooperation, the Honourable Susan Whelan in 2003; CANAC Incorporated was also among the award recipients that year.(Minister Whelan Presents International Cooperation Award to Lambert Somec Inc. of Quebec City, Canada NewsWire, 6 February 2003.)During the 1980s and 1990s, CIDA supported the pour la mise en valeur du fleuve Sngal (OMVS) (Senegal River development organization) and Dam projects in Mali for agricultural irrigation and hydroelectric power generation.(CIDA. Mali  Programming Framework, October 2000, Section 3.2.1, Last Updated: 2008-06-05 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/NAT-6595532-JCA) Two Canadian public interest groups, the Halifax Initiative and Probe International cited CIDA documents which reported that CIDA had contributed at least Cdn.$76m. to Manantali-related projects, including, in addition to Hydro-Qubec, supply contracts in 1993 to Dessau Associates and SNC-Shawinigan(SNC-Shawinigan Inc. is listed as a subsidiary of SNC Lavalin by Industry Canada, Certificates of Amalgamation (CBCA), Corporations Canada Monthly Transactions, 2008 February, Date Modified: 2009-01-12.http://strategis.ic.gc.ca/eic/site/cd-dgc.nsf/eng/cs03723.html) for consulting work, to Sulzer Canada in 1998 for turbines, and to Tecsult International for turbine installation.(Probe International. Government Secrecy Threatens Canadian Democracy, June 1, 2001, http://www.probeinternational.org/foreign-aid/government-secrecy-threatens-canadian-democracy)(NGO Working Group on the Export Development Corporation. 2001. Senegal, Mauritania and Mali  Manantali Dam, in: Reckless Lending  Volume II: How Canadas Export Development Corporation Puts People and the Environment at Risk, p. 18-21 http://www.halifaxinitiative.org/index.php/Pub_ECAs_Reports/297 (May 2001)) The Manantali Dam disrupted ten centuries of recession agriculture, in which farmers planted on the Senegal River floodplain after the rainy season, and this led to numerous problems, including reduced food production, disease for humans and livestock, loss of recession agriculture, loss of pasturage for livestock, and loss of acacia forests  which had devastating human consequences. Additionally, the economic costs may not be outweighed by the benefits provided from the development of river resources...; hydroelectric power was first delivered from Manantali to the Malian capital of Bamako in 2002.(Vick, Margaret J. 2006. The Senegal River Basin: A Retrospective and Prospective Look at the Legal Rgime, Natural Resources Journal, 46(1): 211243.)The International Development Agency supported two projects in Mali with Dveloppement international Desjardins, the international development arm of the Quebec-based cooperative union, Group. From 19972007, the Support Project for Urban Housing (Cdn.$5.0m.) sought to increase home ownership among low-income families in Bamako by guaranteeing mortgages that were financed by the Government of Mali and private players.(CIDA, Support Project for Urban Housing, Project Browser, Project Number: A019387-001 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/cidaweb/cpo.nsf/vWebProjByNumEn/6F6B5CFE7FEFBDFD852570130045EDE6) In 2000, Canadas Auditor-General cited anomalies in the administration of this project, including failure to award the partner contract via a competitive process, bureaucratic delays leading to none of the scheduled 1,400 guarantees being issued during the first year, and failure of the Government of Mali to contribute its agreed-upon share.(Office of the Auditor General of Canada, Case Study 14.1Mali Mortgage Financing Project, 2000 October Report, Chapter 14, Date Issued: 2007-11-15 http://www.oag-bvg.gc.ca/internet/English/att_0014se01_e_10891.html) The Cdn.$7.3m. Nysigiso Network Support Project  Phase II (19982008) was aimed at reduction through the provision of secure savings and credit services in the city of Sgou to clients including farmers and small entrepreneurs, 30% of whom were women.(CIDA, Nysigiso Network Support Project  Phase II, Project Browser, Project Number: A019386-001 http://www.acdi.gc.ca/cidaweb/cpo.nsf/vWebProjBySectorEn/15AEE12A2815D11A852570130045EDE3)(CIDA, Nysigiso: Malis House of Providence, Regions and Countries, Last Updated: 2008-04-14 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/NAT-63094316-J4L.)Mark Nathanson, a Canadian-born businessman, has been credited with the discovery a major gold deposit at Sadiola in western Mali in 1988.(Gooding, Kenneth. 1996. Sadiola  Nathansons luckiest strike, Financial Times (London), February 9, 1996)(Nathanson Centre Advisory Board, Nathanson Centre for the Study of Organized Crime and Corruption, York University, Toronto, web page accessed July 2009 http://www.osgoode.yorku.ca/NathansonBackUp/page4executivepersonnel.htm) This find led to the development of the Toronto-based company IAMGOLD Corporation (previously AGEM), and its joint venture with Malian, South African, and Bank partners to establish the SEMOS (Socit dExploitation des Mines dOr de Sadiola S. A.) consortium.(IAMGOLD Corporation, Technical Report on the Sadiola Gold Mine, May 31st, 2004, p.3-4 http://nyse.10kwizard.com/cgi/image?&ipage2831527&doc3&fdl1&odef8&dn2&quest1&rid12) Sadiola and the nearby Yatela mine, under similar ownership, have been responsible for one-half of Malis industrially-mined gold production over the period 19962007.(Sadiola & Yatela production: IAMGOLD Annual Reports: 1997: p.26 of 103; 1998: 8; 1999:2,13 of 91. 20002003 figures from: AngloGold Annual Reports 2000: 14; 2001:24; 2002:33; 2003:25. 20042007 figures from AngloGold Ashanti Annual Reports 2006:7476; 2008:33,35,70,72. Mali gold production: Banque de France, Rapport annuel de la Zone franc, 2007:177, 2004:161, 2001:149, 1999:275.)Following IAMGOLDs Sadiola discovery, Canadas Barrick Gold acquired three properties in Mali, and conducted testing there during 19951997.(Etruscan Resources picks up new African properties and Agbaou properties, The Northern Miner. Toronto, Ont.: Jun 4/10, 2001. Vol. 87, N 15; pg. 14.) In 1998, Barrick formed a joint venture with South Africas AngloGold, providing AngloGold management control over Barricks properties in Mali.(Africa scoured for new gold finds, The Globe and Mail, Toronto, Ont.: May 25, 1998. pg. B.7.) Toronto-based junior mining company Etruscan Resources acquired Barricks Djelimangara property in Mali in 2001.(Etruscan Resources Inc.: Gold Target to be Diamond Drilled South of Sadiola, Business Wire. New York: Aug 17, 2004. pg. 1.)(Etruscan Resources picks up new African properties and Agbaou properties, The Northern Miner. Toronto, Ont.: Jun 4/10, 2001. Vol. 87, N 15; pg. 14) In 2007, Canadian junior mining company Goldbelt Resources Ltd. acquired Barricks remaining two properties in southern Mali,(Goldbelt buys Barricks projects, Platts Metals Week, New York: Oct 15, 2007. Vol. 78, N 42; pg. 17.) and Goldbelt was acquired by Norways Wega Mining ASA in 2008.(Goldbelt Resources Ltd. Wega Mining completes compulsory acquisition of Goldbelt Resources, news release, April 7, 2008.http://www.sedar.com) A map of mining titles in southern Mali, dated June 2008 and published on the Government of Malis mining ministry website labels one property as belonging to Barrick Exploration.(Direction Nationale de la Geologie et des Mines (Rpublique du Mali). 2008. Situation des titres miniers de Mali sud, Mali Sud : Information sur la situation des titres miniers, Mise  jour faite par: Bourema DJIGUIBA, Ingnieur des mines:arpenteur http://www.dngm.net/index.php?lFRA&a60200)While Canada-to-Mali extractive sector investment is concentrated in Toronto and Vancouver-based companies,(Refer to section 5.5, Mining.) firms headquartered in the Canadian province of Quebec command investments in most other sectors.(Refer to section 4.1, Trade, Commodities, Services) However, the province of Brunswick has enjoyed a unique and close relationship with Mali. In 2003, Mabo Tour, the daughter of the President of the Republic of Mali, Toumani Tour, completed a course of study at the of Moncton; as of 2005, 35 students from Mali were enroled at this institution. A three-year co-operation agreement signed in 2005 between the governments of Mali and New Brunswick was renewed for another five years in 2008,(Communications New Brunswick. 2005. Co-operation agreement renewed with Mali, Oct. 15, 2008 http://www.gnb.ca/cnb/news/iga/2008e1499ig.htm) and in 2008, Malian President Tour was conferred an honourary doctorate degree by the Universit de Moncton.(Universit de Moncton, LU de M accordera un doctorat honorifique au prsident de la Rpublique du Mali, news release, 01 octobre 2008 http://www.umoncton.ca/nouvelles/info.php?pagecommuniques2008&id5717&campus_selectionm) The Collge communautaire du Nouveau-Brunswick received the distinction of chevalier de lOrdre national du Mali in 2005, in recognition of its collaboration since 1991 with the Institut Universitaire de Gestion de Bamako, au Mali.(Communications New Brunswick. 2005. Le CCNB est nomm chevalier de lOrdre national du Mali, news release, September 29, 2005, http://www.gnb.ca/cnb/newsf/pet/2005f1265te.htm) The University of Moncton graduated five students from Mali in the spring of 2009.(Universit de Moncton, Liste FINALE de fvrier et mai 2009, Mise  jour : 22 mai 2009  15 h, accessed August 2009 http://www2.umoncton.ca/cfdocs/finissants/finissants2.cfm?orderLieu)Canada and Mali have established at least two community twinning relationships. In a striking reversal of humanitarian flows, the citizens of the Malian village of Sanankoroba (situated 30 km south of Bamako) raised one hundred dollars as emergency relief to benefit their sister community of Sainte-lisabeth, Quebec, which had been affected by the American ice storm of 1998. The Sanankoroba  Ste-lisabeth twinning was established in 1985 via contacts with World Youth and SUCO (Solidarit Union Coopration) and continues in the areas of exchange visits and technical support.(CIDA, Claude Giles helps farmers in Mali, Media Room  Canadians Making a Difference in the World, Last Updated: 2008-04-14. Accessed March 2009.)(Historique du jumelage entre Ste-lisabeth et Sanankoroba) SUCO, which has been active in Mali since 1967, was contracted by CIDA in 19972001 and extended from 20022009 to execute similar development projects in sixty villages, as part of CIDAs long-standing theme of decentralization of Malian government services.(Gosselin, Claudie; Tour, Bani. 2000. Cohrence des politiques et interventions canadiennes dans la lutte contre la pauvret : le cas du Mali, Ottawa: North-South Institute, p. 25, 30.http://idl-bnc.idrc.ca/dspace/handle/123456789/30100)(CIDA. Community Mobilisation and Decentralization  Phase II, Project Browser, Last Updated: 2009-08-29 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/cidaweb/cpo.nsf/vWebCSAZEn/CF36DDEE72F24618852570130045EDD4) In 1999, Leblanc was the first General of Canada to make a state visit to Mali, during which he toured Sanankoroba, in the company of the Malian President.( In 2008, the Canadian city of Moncton, Brunswick partnered with the Commune of Kaladougou in southwestern Mali, with the intent of a knowledge sharing partnership regarding communications.(City of Moncton. Moncton-Kaladougou Partnership, website, accessed August 2009 http://www.moncton.ca/Government/Kaladougou.htm)In 2004, the Honourable Goodale, then Canadas Minister of Finance met with parliamentarians and civil society groups in Mali,(Le ministre canadien des Finances rencontre les parlementaires et la socit civile: au cur de la gouvernance malienne, lEssor n15272, 2004-08-23 http://www.essor.gov.ml/cgi-bin/view_article.pl?id7601) and in 2005, in concert with other nations in the G8 group, he agreed to cancel 100% of the debt of 18 heavily-indebted low-income countries, including that of Mali.(Hirano, Ko. 2005. G-8 OKs accord on large 100% debt waiver for poor states, Knight Ridder Tribune Business News, Washington: Jun 12, 2005. pg. 1)(Department of Finance. 2005. Canada Proposes 100 Per Cent Debt Relief for Worlds Poorest Countries, News, Ottawa, February 2, 2005, 2005008 http://www.fin.gc.ca/n05/05-008-eng.asp) About $2 billion of Malis foreign debt was written off, such that the total debt declined from 49% of the Malian domestic product in 2005 to 20% in 2006.(OECD, African Economic Outlook, 2007/2008, p. 424-5) Annual external debt service payments fell from 3.1% of GDP in 1987 and 3.0% in 1997 to 1.3% in 2006.(Calculated from: World Bank, Mali, Data & Statistics, Mali at a glance, 9/24/08 http://devdata.worldbank.org/AAG/mli_aag.pdf) Indicative of the strengthening commercial ties between Canada and Mali, the Canadian government established a Trade Commissioner Service with the Canadian Embassy in Bamako in 2005.(Government of Canada, Welcome to the Canadian Embassy in Mal, Date Modified: 2009-05-15 http://www.canadainternational.gc.ca/mali/offices-bureaux/ambassador_msg_ambassadeur.aspx?langeng) The Mali Embassy has set up five honorary Mali consulates in five of Canadas provinces.(Mali Embassy, Contacts, website, accessed July 2009)Comparative social indicatorsSince 1990, when the Nations Development Programme first published its annual Development Index for 160 or more countries of the world, Canada and Mali have continuously occupied the extreme opposite ends of the human development spectrum, ranking among the top five and bottom five countries, respectively.(United Nations Development Programme. Human Development Report, 19902007/2008 editions, http://hdr.undp.org/en/) The development gap between these two countries steadily narrowed by 5% points between 2000 and 2006: Malis Development Index value improved at the fourth-fastest rate between 2000 and 2006, for the 138 countries where these data are extant. While in 2000, Malis HDI value of 0.343 was 35.1% of that for Canada (0.950), by 2006, the Malian HDI, 0.390, was 40.4% of Canadas (0.970).(United Nations Development Program. Human Development Report, 2007/2008, Table 2, p. 233-237 http://hdr.undp.org/en/)In 1990, the average expectancy at birth of Malians was 45.0 years, or 69% of the world average of 65.5, an improvement over 1980 when it was 65% of the average (34.8 years vs. 53.4 years).(United Nations Development Programme. 1991. Human Development Report 1991, New York: Oxford University Press, p. 127 http://hdr.undp.org/en/reports/global/hdr1991/) In 2005, the Malian life expectancy rose further to 53.1 years, 78% of the world average.(United Nations Development Programme. 2007. Human Development Report 2007/2008, New York: UNDP, p. 232 http://hdr.undp.org/en/reports/global/hdr2007-2008/) The Canadian International Development Agency notes that Malis GDP per capita increased from US$220 in 2000 to US$380 in 2005.(CIDA. 2007. Executive Report of the Canada-Mali Cooperation Program Evaluation, Gatineau: Canadian International Development Agency, p. 7 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/inet/images.nsf/vLUImages/Evaluations/$file/Mali-ExecutiveReportEnglish-E.pdf) However, relative to world averages, Malians have experienced regression both in terms of power parity incomes, and in adult literacy rates. In 1960, when corrected for international price differences (US PPP $), the Malian GDP per capita was 22.6% of the world average ($400 vs. $1,770), and in 1988 it was 11.5% of the world average ($500 vs. $4,340).( By comparison, in 2005, Malis GDP per capita was $1,033, or 10.8% of the world average of $9,543.( The adult literacy rate in Mali was estimated at 23% in 1985( (world average: 76.4%) and 24.0% for 19952005 (world average: 82.4%).( Between 1950 and 2050, the United Nations predicts that Malis population growth rate is peaking between 2000 and 2015 at 3.0% per year.(United Nations Department of Economic and Social Affairs/Population Division. 2009. World Urbanization Prospects: The 2007 Revision, New York, U.N., p. 136-137.http://www.un.org/esa/population/publications/wup2007/2007WUP_Highlights_web.pdf)Development co-operationCIDA, the International Development Agency, reported disbursing $326m. to Mali from 1996/97 to 2005/06 (nominal Canadian dollars), of which 26% was allocated to governance-related programming, followed by education (24%), health, population and fertility (17%), energy (7%), and agriculture (6%).(CIDA. 2007. Executive Report of the Canada-Mali Cooperation Program Evaluation, Gatineau: Canadian International Development Agency, p. 2 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/inet/images.nsf/vLUImages/Evaluations/$file/Mali-ExecutiveReportEnglish-E.pdf) In 2009, over thirty per cent of Canadian development support to Mali was targeted to education and 20% to health.(CIDA, Mali  overview, website, Regions and Countries  Sub-Saharan Africa  Countries A-Z Index  Sub-Saharan Africa  Mali, Last Updated: 2009-06-01 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/mali-e) The precise fractions of Canada-to-Mali aid stipulated for the procurement of Canadian goods and services have not been reported. Canadas overall proportion of aid has declined steadily since the 1950s and 1960s, when it exceeded 80%; in the early 1990s, CIDA internal analysis found that 6869% of disbursements for sub-Saharan Africa went to Canadian-sourced purchases, well above the 50% lower bound established at that time.(( In conformance with a Paris Declaration on Aid Effectiveness target, Canadas Minister of International Cooperation announced in 2008 that by fiscal year 20122013, the Government of Canada will entirely untie its international development aid.(Speaking Notes by the Honourable Beverley J. Oda on International Cooperation Days, Last updated 2008-11-17 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/FRA-111515918-RMV) Over the 19622007 period, given that Canada-Mali aid was tied at 80% until 1990, at 70% from 19912000, and at the declining rates reported to OECD in the following table, it can be estimated that of the total US$936m. (2007 dollars) provided, approximately 66%, or $616m., has re-entered the Canadian economy through Malis purchases of products and services from Canadian businesses and non-profit organisations.In a 2007 internal evaluation of its programming in Mali, CIDA identified a number of unique strengths that Canada has demonstrated. These include developing Malis public finance management system via the $20m. PAMORI project from 1997 to 2002, which helped enable the Malian tax directorate to increase internal revenues as a share of the national budget from 61.2% in 1996 to 72.2% in 2005; an increase in assisted births in northern Mali, where Canadas health programming was focused, from 40% in 2001 to 53% in 2006; and the intention of the Malian government to adopt a Canadian marketing model for its Projet dappui aux filires agricoles (PAFA). Numerous cultural impediments to CIDAs efforts are also discussed, including deficiencies in the management of the civil service, the slowness of governmental reforms, a culture of impunity, weaknesses in the execution of budgets ... the lack of participation of civil society, the slowness of decentralization is a major preoccupation of Canadian support and the GoM of Mali still tends to intervene in the private sector, with consequences that are not always conducive to growth. The reforms that would create a favourable environment for private sector development are far from completed (CIDA 2007: 69).( In 2004, Canada was one of the few donors to have remained involved in the reform of Malis judicial system (PRODEJ),(Pringle, Robert. 2006. Democratization in Mali. Putting History to Work, Washington: United States Institute of Peace, p. 24 http://pdf.usaid.gov/pdf_docs/PNADO612.pdf) and CIDAs 2007 evaluation underlines the challenges: judicial reform in Mali is at a standstill for several reasons, primarily the lack of political will and ownership (2007: 19).( Similar challenges face efforts towards civil service reforms, according to CIDA: all the goodwill displayed by the GoM toward reform cannot hide the fact that grave problems in civil service management are a major handicap for the implementation of those reforms, indeed in some cases dooming them to failure (CIDA 2007: 29).( At the Canadian International Trade Tribunal in 2003, CIDAs awarding of the PRODEJ contract ($6.95m, 20032010)(Implementation of the Ten-Year Justice Development Program (PRODEJ), Project Browser, http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/cidaweb/cpo.nsf/vWebProjByNumEn/FD0875A6266A8AA5852570130045EDE2) was the subject of a complaint filed by the Consortium Genivar  M3E  Universit dOttawa; the Tribunal determined in favour of the Consortium,(Canadian International Trade Tribunal, Consortium Geniva  M3E  Universit dOttawa, File No. PR-2002-074, Procurement  Determinations, Date Modified: 2003-12-11 http://www.citt.gc.ca/procure/Determin/pr2c074_e.asp) and the contract was awarded to them. The contribution of Ottawa-based engineering firm Genivar included the building of a court house in Bamako.(A research team from Canadas de Montral and Malis Regional Health Authority in Kayes evaluated a CIDA-supported maternity referral system in six districts of Kayes Region and found that, over 20022005, the rate of peri-natal maternal mortality was halved from 10.1% of cases observed to 5.1%, as the frequency of Caesarian section operations (through the training of general practitioners) tripled; they concluded that such programs can be implemented on a large scale without major external funding.(Fournier, Pierre, et al. 2009. Improved access to comprehensive emergency obstetric care and its effect on institutional maternal mortality in rural Mali, Bull. World Health Organ. 87:3038.http://www.who.int/bulletin/volumes/87/1/07-047076.pdf)The Broadcasting Corporation (CBC) has profiled one CIDA-funded human rights initiative for Malis people.(Gutnick, David. 2009. Fighting female mutilation one small village at a time, CBC website, Last Updated: Saturday, January 31, 2009 http://www.cbc.ca/world/story/2009/01/30/f-mali-excision.html) Reflecting a trend towards closer alignment and complementarity between the international donor community and recipient countries ownership of development strategies, Canadian aid to Mali has been compared with other donors according to indicators established in the Paris Declaration on Aid Effectiveness. In 2007, Canada performed better than the donor average in terms of the share of Canadian aid reported in Malis national budget, the share of Canadian technical co-operation aligned with Malis programming, aid passing through Malis procurement system, aid aligned to Malian programme-based approaches, and joint missions with other donors. However, Canada scored below average on its share of public sector aid that employed Malian public financial management systems, the number of implementations running parallel and independently of Malian agencies, the ratio of scheduled aid actually disbursed by the Malian government, and the proportion of projects jointly analysed with its partner donors.(OECD. 2008. lEnqute 2008 de suivi de la mise en uvre de la Dclaration de Paris sur lefficacit de laide  Mali.http://www.oecd.org/LongAbstract/0,3425,fr_33873108_33844430_41395890_1_1_21_37413,00.html)Canadian-based organizations have been carrying out development projects in Mali since the 1960s. The umbrella group Canadian Council for International Co-operation lists 18 Canadian NGOs in Mali, including the Aga Khan Foundation, Canadian Crossroads International, Canadian Center for International Studies and Cooperation, Canadian Red Cross, Cardinal Lger et ses Oeuvres, CARE Canada, Developing Countries Farm Radio Network, Plan Canada, Steelworkers Humanity Fund, USC Canada, and World Vision Canada.(Canadian Council for International Co-operation. Whos Who in International Development, Members by region/country, Mali. Accessed July 2009 http://www.ccic.ca/whoswho) CIDAs partnerships with not-for-profits also include the Quebec City-based Groupe Consultations CCISD (Center for International Cooperation in Health and Development) and Ste-Foy, Qubecs MIR Partenariats et dveloppement international (20052010, $7.3m., Paramedic Training Support).(CIDA, Paramedic Training Support, Project Browser, Project Number: A031027-003.http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/cpo.nsf/vWebProjByNumEn/9C540CF670446B8D852570130045EDE1) The Canadian Broadcasting Corporation has profiled a journalists training project sponsored by Farm Radio in southern Mali.(Gutnick, David. 2009. Better journalists make for better farmers, CBC website, Last Updated: Friday, January 2, 2009, http://www.cbc.ca/world/story/2008/12/18/f-farm-radio.html) In addition to donations and other private fundraising revenues, from fiscal years 199899 to 200607, these not-for-profit development NGOs collectively benefitted from CIDA grants of between Cdn$0.34m. and $7.23m. per year, an annual average of 8.4% of Canadas total aid package to Mali.(Canadian International Development Agency, Statistical report on International Assistance  Fiscal Year 20062007, Table D-4; Statistical Report on Official Development Assistance, 19981999 to 20052006, Tables M, D-4. http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/JUD-4128122-G4W) Through its Seeds of Survival program, Canada reports that it has been collaborating with communities in Mali since 1989, promoting seed banks and increased crop diversity through drought-resistant varieties.(USC Canada, Farmers in West Africa Celebrate Biodiversity with a Seed Fair in Douentza, May 30, 2006.http://usc-canada.org/?page_id85) Between 2003 and 2009, the Children Canada received a Cdn.$5m. grant from CIDA in support of their work against the of children from Mali and Burkina Faso who are sent to Cte dIvoire as agricultural labourers.(CIDA. Fight against child trafficking in West Africa, Project Browser, Project number A031531-001, http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/cidaweb/cpo.nsf/vLUWebProjEn/FA01083F3964096A8525701900318548?OpenDocument)TradeCommoditiesCanadas exports to Mali ranked it Malis 16th-most important trading partner in 1997, declining to 21st in 2004, and below 25th during 20052007; Canadas imports from Mali have not ranked it among Malis top 25 partners except for the years 19871989.( Over the period 19902008, Canadas product exports to Mali, $112m. (current US$) comprised 0.5% of Canadas total exports to Africa, while exports to all Africa countries, $22.0bn., were 0.5% of total Canadian exports; Canadian imports from Mali were 0.4% of Africa-to-Canada total, and African imports were 1.1% of the global-to-Canada total.(Industry Canada, Trade Data Online, Trade By Product (HS Codes). Queried July 2009 http://www.ic.gc.ca/tdo) Most Canadian exports to Mali enter duty-free, as the Government of Malis Mining Code permits foreign mining companies to pay no corporate tax for the first five years and import equipment duty-free throughout exploration and for three years of exploitation. After five years, there is a 35% tax, but that is reduced when profits are reinvested in Mali.(Oxfam America. 2007. Hidden treasure? In search of Malis gold-mining revenues, Boston: Oxfam America, p. 30 http://www.oxfamamerica.org/publications/hidden-treasure) During 20032008, the Canadian Bank Note Company exported an average of Cdn$1m. per year in fiscal stamps to Mali, used as tax registration decals for display on all Malian road vehicles; mineral exploration equipment and tax decals also dominate Canadas exports with neighbouring country Burkina Faso.(Industry Canada, Trade Data Online, Canadian Total Exports, NAICS code 32311  Printing http://www.ic.gc.ca/tdo) Public disclosure documents from CIDA record contracts under the Common Development Funds project for the Canadian Bank Note Company of $1,059,966 (20-12-2006), 73% disbursed,(Canada International Development Agency, Afrique Subsaharienne. Sub-Saharan Africa, p. 6 of 12 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/INET/IMAGES.NSF/vLUImages/Contracting3/$file/SUB-SAHARAN%20APRIL%202008.pdf) and $1,060,266 (02-01-2007), 0% disbursed.(Canada International Development Agency, Afrique Subsaharienne. Sub-Saharan Africa, p. 8 of 16 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/INET/IMAGES.NSF/vLUImages/Contracting2/$file/Janvier%2007%20Sub-Saharan%20Africa.pdf) An average of US$0.3 million annually between 2001 and 2007 was shipped from Canada to Mali in previously worn articles of clothing.(Industry Canada. Trade Data Online, HS Code 630900) In both 2007 and 2008, through CIDAs Canada Fund for Local Initiatives, oral contraceptives valued at $0.2 m. were supplied to women in Malis Dogon region.(CIDA, Mali  A Rite of Passage, Pass, web page, Last Updated: 2009-02-10 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/ANN-1223115414-MTY) Canada has gone from importing, at its peak in 1999, 6.7% of Malis total raw cotton exports (US$14m. out $210m.), to 0% from 2005 onward.(United Nations Commodity Trade Statistics Database, UN Comtrade, Data Query, Basic Selection, HS-1996 Classification, HS5201  Cotton, not carded or combed http://comtrade.un.org)(Industry Canada, Trade Data Online, Trade By Product (HS Codes), HS5201  Cotton, not carded or combed http://www.ic.gc.ca/tdo) Canadas global imports of raw cotton have also fallen by over 90%, from US$76m. in 1999 to $7m. in 2008, and in the latter year, 98.5% of it was imported from the United States. Mali was the seventh-largest cotton-exporting nation in 1999, and it has fallen from seventh to tenth position from 2003 to 2007.(United Nations. International Trade Statistics Yearbook, New York: United Nations, 2003 (Vol. II), p. 105; 2006 (Vol.II), p. 109 http://comtrade.un.org/pb/first.aspx) In their 2005/06 study tour of seven African nations to assess Canadas foreign policy record on that continent, Canadian Senators Hugh Segal and Peter A. Stollery heard in Mali that there was little will on the part of certain developed countries to make a trade deal on cotton. Standing in a cotton field in that country, Malian farmers passionately described the U.S. actions domestic protectionism as sabotage in that they were causing an increase in poverty instead of the desired poverty reduction that the U.S. government has been publicly calling for; the Canadian senators concluded that in Mali, the greatest demand that was made of us was not more aid, but rather a fair world trading system where cotton farmers could export their competitive products.(The Standing Senate Committee on Foreign Affairs and International Trade. 2007. Overcoming 40 years of failure: a new road map for Sub-Saharan Africa, Ottawa: The Senate.http://www.parl.gc.ca/39/1/parlbus/commbus/senate/com-e/fore-e/rep-e/repafrifeb07-e.pdf)Canadian international commodity trade patterns since 1990 can be characterized by aggregating product import and export volumes for the top 25 system codes for individual years in the Trade Data Online search interface to Canada data provided by Canada. Compared to the previous decade, the profile of Canadian exports to Mali has altered in the 2000s, with mining equipment and printed matter more than doubling their combined shares, from 17% during 19901999 to 37% from 20002008.( Printed matter comprises essentially tax decals and passports supplied to the Malian government via the Canadian Bank Note Company.(( Hydroelectric energy-related exports (hydro poles, hydraulic turbines) were limited to the years 19972001. Because some product codes, particularly mechanical and electrical devices, are generic in nature and potentially employed by several sectors including mining, railways, or telecommunications, the aggregates in the following table are underreported to some extent. ServicesFor its development projects in Mali between 2000 and 2007, the World Bank awarded technical consultancy and infrastructure contracts totalling U$12.7m. to a number of Canadian businesses, including GID Canada (consultancy, agricultural services), Geomar(La socit de commerce Geomar Inc. is listed as a subsidiary of SNC-Lavalin Inc. by Industry Canada, Certificates of Amalgamation (CBCA), Corporations Canada Monthly Transactions, 2008 February, Date Modified: 2009-01-12 http://strategis.ic.gc.ca/eic/site/cd-dgc.nsf/eng/cs03723.html)/Setade (consultancy, agricultural supply chains), PA Services Conseils (consultancy, funds management for rural electrification), Rail & Traction Canada Inc.(Government of Canada, Depository Services Program. Rail & Traction Canada Inc Pointe-Claire Qc, Public Accounts of Canada, 20052006, p. 97.http://dsp-psd.tpsgc.gc.ca/Collection/P51-1-2006-3-4.pdf) (equipment for Transrail railways project), Romic Marc Rail Inc.(Government of Canada, Depository Services Program. Socit Romic Marc Rail Inc St-Lazare Qc, Public Accounts of Canada, 20052006, p. 97.http://dsp-psd.tpsgc.gc.ca/Collection/P51-1-2006-3-4.pdf) (equipment for Transrail railways project), SNC Lavalin (rural infrastructure), Tecsult-Biman, as well as not-for-profit groups including SOCODEVI and CECI.(World Bank, Proc Contract Detail  Supplier)(World Bank, Contract Awards Search, Projects and Operations, Project: Mali, Supplier Country: Canada, website database, queried 21 August 2009 http://web.worldbank.org/WBSITE/EXTERNAL/PROJECTS/0,,menuPK:51565~pagePK:95864~piPK:95915~theSitePK:40941,00.html) Drummondville, Quebec-based engineering consultants Experco International received a $101k contract in 2004 for livestock management in Malis Niger region,(World Bank. Contractor: EXPERCO, Projects Database > Contracts/Contractors > Projects By Contractor.http://web.worldbank.org/external/projects/main?ProjectidP041723&theSitePK40941&pagePK104542&piPK95914&menuPK228443&contractid1251636) and also carried out land management work in Mali in the early 1990s.(Un bout de route vietnamienne conu  Drummondville, Le Soleil, 18/04/1995.) In 2005, Expercos manager in Mali, Marcel Yvon,(Permanent Mission of Mali to the United Nations. listing of foreign enterprises in Mali.http://www2.un.int/Countries/Mali/1164140111.pdf)(CIDA. Experco International, Programme de stages internationauz pour les jeunes, Dernire mise  jour : 2006-10-06.http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/cpb/zonejeun.nsf/Fr/JEF-912111858-KYF) was the sole Canadian among five expatriates granted Malian citizenship by the Government of Malis Council of Ministers.(Prsidence de la Rpublique du Mali. Communiqu du Conseil des Ministres du Mercredi 31 aot 2005, web page accessed September 2009 http://www.sgg.gov.ml/Ccm/ccm31aout05.pdf) The Government of Canada contributed a total of US$31.8m. to international financial institutions and regional development banks in support of programming in Mali from FY1999-2000 to FY 20062007.(CIDA, Statistical Report on International Assistance, 20062007, Statistical Report on Official Development Assistance, 19992000 to 20052006, converted to US dollars.http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/JUD-4128122-G4W)CIDAs Mali-related contracts involving Canadian business partnerships have included CRC Sogema (tax and educational reform, five contracts valued at Cdn.$72.6m, 19972009), SNC Lavalin (agricultural development, tax reform, two contracts, $34m., 19972015), Geomar Inc. and Fdration des Agriculteurs et Agricultrices Francophones du Nouveau-Brunswick (joint with SNC Lavalin).(CIDA, Project Browser, Country: Mali, Status: All) Since 1986, Quebec-based CRC Sogema has, through African Development Bank, CIDA and World Bank funding, been involved in numerous projects including the reform of Malis taxation system, the decentralisation of educational services, and banking reform.(CRC Sogema, Projects by Area, Mali)(CRC Sogema. CRC Sogema wins the Technical Assistance Project for Ecobank-Mali, news release, April 1, 2009 http://www.crcsogema.com/pages/nouvelles/crcsogemaremporteleprojetdassistancetechniquemali.aspx?langEN-CA) In 2006 at the Canadian International Trade Tribunal, a contract awarded by CIDA to the latter three organisations was contested on the grounds of unfair treatment by the Centre canadien dtude et de coopration internationale, the Socit de coopration pour le dveloppement international and LUnion des producteurs agricolesDveloppement international, who were competing bidders in partnership with Tecsult Inc.; the Tribunal dismissed the case, citing a lack of jurisdictional authority.(Canadian International Trade Tribunal. The Alliance Agricole Internationale, made up of the Centre Canadien dtude et de Coopration Internationale, the Socit de Coopration pour le Dveloppement International and lUnion des Producteurs Agricoles-Dveloppement International v. Canadian International Development Agency, File No. PR-2006-003, Order and reasons issued, Monday, August 21, 2006Home > Procurement > Determinations, Date Modified: 2006-09-18.http://www.citt.gc.ca/procure/Determin/pr2g003_e.asp) CIDAs Mali contracts also include the Canadian firms Edinova Editeur Conseil (textbook support), Rail & Traction Canada Inc. (support to Common Funds Development), Services Techniques DHG Lte (support to Common Funds Development), and Tecsult Eduplus Inc. (continuing education for teachers).(CIDA. Afrique et Moyen-Orient / Africa and Middle East, Janvier06 AFRIQUE final_2.xls , 13 pages http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/INET/IMAGES.NSF/vLUImages/Contracting2/$file/Janvier06%20AFRIQUE%20final_2.pdf)InvestmentNon-extractive sectorsIn 2005, the Quebec-based firm Seaquest-Infotel signed a CFA 2.9 bn. (US $5.3m.) contract with Malis national telephone service, SOTELMA, to provide a fibre-optic network for the city of Bamako.(Seaquest-Infotel, convention Sotelma SQI , Accessed July 2009) The contract was reportedly ended unilaterally by SOTELMA in 2007.(Ibrahim Guindo. Contentieux entre la SOTELMA et SeaQuest : La liaison  fibres optiques mise  mal, Le Public, 31/07/2007 http://www.maliweb.net/category.php?NID20626) Canadian shipments of telecommunications-related products to Mali totalled US$4.5m. between 2000 and 2006; this includes $1.7m in fibre cables (system HS code 900110) shipped in 2006, however in 2007 and 2008, no exports were reported in this sector.(Industry Canada, Trade Data Online  Trade by Product (HS Codes), HS codes 730820, 730890, 851719, 852510, 852520, 852719, 851790, 852990, 900110, 903039 http://www.ic.gc.ca/tdo)According to a Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD) survey in 2006 of foreign investment in Mali,( Canadian firms active there included Segibel/SOTELMA (telecommunications), two Internet service providers, Afribone(Vittin, Thophile. 2002. LInternet au Mali : Acteurs et Usages, MSHA, Pessac, p. 17, n.13 http://www.msha.fr/msha/publi/en_ligne/netafriq/publi/missionMALI.pdf) and Experco International, and a water drilling firm, Hydro Sahel. Canada has been exporting an average of U$185k annually in railway equipment into Mali over the period 20042008.(Industry Canada. Trade Data Online, By Product, HS codes: 730220, 860791, 860799.http://www.ic.gc.ca/tdo) Since 1998, the Canadian Bank Note Company has been doing business with the Government of Mali, providing printed sales tax stickers, holographic motor vehicle tax decals, and passports and passport printing equipment.(Canadian Bank Note Company, Business Units  Payment Systems  Documents  Revenue/Fiscal Stamps, Accessed July 2009 http://www.cbnco.com/paysys/paysys-docs-postage.php)(Canadian Bank Note Company  A Canadian Printed Product in Every Malian Vehicle, Business Wire (Ottawa), March 29, 2001, 15:50) In 2007, the Canadian Bank Note Companys passport-printing contract with Mali was renewed for five years.(De La Rue applies new pressure  Kenya, The Indian Ocean Newsletter, 30 January 2007.)Canada Pension PlanThe Pension Plan is the Canadian governments public retirement pension fund for all Canadian citizens who have worked in Canada, with the exception of citizens of the province of Quebec.(Refer to section 5.3, Quebec Pension Plan) The fund is managed by the Investment Board, and over 20062008, four Canadian firms active wholly or in part in Mali have received investments from the fund. Not included in the following table is SNC Lavalin, a Montreal-based international civil engineering firm which has carried out several CIDA and World Bank-sponsored projects in Mali;( the CPP had invested an average of $78m. in this companys shares over 20062008.(Quebec Pension PlanFor the one quarter of Canadas population residing in the province of Quebec, their public pension fund is administered by that province independently from the federal government. Managed by the de dpt et placement du Qubec, this fund has invested in three Canadian-domiciled firms, and one South African firm active in Mali during the 2000s, all in the subsoil extractive industry. These investments have represented between 0.01% and 0.06% of the Quebec funds total investments. QPP investees active in Mali that are not included in the following table are two Canadian firms operating in many countries: (a) Boart Longyear Group, a drilling services company working with a number of Canadian junior mining companies in Mali,( in which La Caisse invested $2.4m. in 2007 only, and (b) Montreal-based SNC Lavalin,( in which the QPP held an average of Cdn.$262m. in shares over 20062008.( Export Development CanadaDevelopment Canada, the Canadian governments export credit agency, has provided Canadian firms doing business in Mali with over Cdn.$10m. in financial support since 2005. All funds went to Canadian companies working in the non-extractive sectors, with the exception in 2007 of Cdn.$300k to the extractive sector.(MiningThe Government of Mali reported that mining surpassed cotton in its contribution to the national economy in 1997,(Campbell, Bonnie et al. 2007. Poverty Reduction in Africa: On Whose Development Agenda? Lessons from Cotton and Gold Production in Mali and Burkina Faso, Montreal: Universit du Qubec  Montral, p. 44. http://www.ieim.uqam.ca/spip.php?pagearticle-poissant&id_article3423) and it has remained Malis chief export earner.Natural Resources Canada estimated Canadian investment in Mali mining in 2009 at Cdn.$500 million (US $450m.), primarily in exploration for, and mining of gold.( The Nations Conference on Trade and Development (UNCTAD) reported the total stock of direct inward foreign investment in Mali in 2007 to be $1.3bn.(UNCTAD. Direct investment in reporting economy (FDI Inward), FDISTAT, Major FDI indicators, World Investment Report 2008.http://www.unctad.org/fdistatistics) In 2006, when Natural Resources Canada reported Cdn.$179m. in Canadian mining assets in Mali( (US$158m.), UNCTAD reported that Malis total FDI stock was US$966m.( so in that year Canadian mining assets represented 16% of total Malian foreign investment stock; averaged over 20012006, Canadian mining assets in Mali represented 31% of Malis total stock of foreign investment. Over 20032007, Canadas share of global gold fabrication declined from 5.6% to 4.4% while Malis rose from 1.8% to 2.4%.(Calculated from: Wagner, Wayne. 2008. Gold, in: Canadian Minerals Yearbook 2007, Natural Resources Canada, p. 24.15 http://www.nrcan.gc.ca/smm-mms/busi-indu/cmy-amc/content/2007/28.pdf)Averaged over four annual surveys from 20062009, Canadas Institute ranked Mali 18th-most favourable among 68 to 71 jurisdictions (Canadian provinces, Australian and U.S. states, countries) on its Current mineral potential index, an assessment of both unexploited mineral resources potential and the degree to which government policies encourage mining investment.( On the surveys Best practices mineral potential index, which assesses perceived mineral assets independently of social and regulatory environments, Mali plummeted from the top-most favourable position out of 64 locations in 2005/2006 to the fourth-least favourable position out of 71 in 2008/2009.( The Fraser Institute calculated that Mali had the least room for improvement of the 71 jurisdictions surveyed in 2008/2009: over six hundred mining company managers perceptions of the magnitude of Malis unexploited subsoil resources have diminished markedly, despite the countrys policy environment remaining attractive.(McMahon, Fred; Cervantes, Miguel. 2008. Survey of Mining Companies: 2008/2009, Vancouver: Fraser Institute, p. 17, 2123 http://www.fraserinstitute.org/researchandpublications/publications/6534.aspx) Despite intense gold exploration activity in Mali over the past two decades by Canada and other countries, no large gold deposits on the scale of Sadiola or Morila (both scheduled for closure in 2013) have yet to materialize. The Fraser Institute survey also deemed Mali the seventh-most favourable location out of 71 with respect to its environmental policy: 80% of miners surveyed considered these regulations as either encouraging or not a deterrent to investment.( On the Fraser Institutes Economic Freedom of the World index, which assesses the degree to which policies and institutions of countries determine such things as personal choice and freedom to compete Mali was given an average ranking of 94th place among 123 to 130 countries over 20002006, based on factors including government size, the security of property rights, and regulatory policies.(Gwartney, James; Lawson, Robert. 2008. Economic Freedom of the World, 2008 Annual Report, Vancouver: Economic Freedom Network.)Ten of the at least 19 foreign mining companies reported by the States Geological Survey as active in Mali in 2006 were incorporated in Canada.(Bermdez-Lugo, Omayra. 2008. The Mineral Industry Of Mali, in: Minerals Yearbook 2006, U.S. Geological Survey, p. 28.2. http://minerals.usgs.gov/minerals/pubs/country/2006/myb3-2006-ml.pdf) In mid-2009, Canadian firms holding mineral exploration licenses in Mali numbered at least fourteen (followed by home office location and resource(s) of interest, if not gold): Afcan Mining Corporation,(Rafferty, Eamonn. 2005. Media Steps heading to Aim. New Issues, Financial Times (London), May 2, 2005, p. 24) (acquired by Eldorado Gold Corporation, Vancouver, in 2005), African Gold Group Inc. (Toronto), African Metals Corporation (Surrey, B.C.; diamonds), Avion Gold Corporation (headquartered in Toronto, in 2008 acquired Malian gold properties previously mined by Vancouver-based Resources Ltd.), Axmin Inc. (Toronto), Delta Exploration Inc. (partnered with Rockgate Capital Corp., Vancouver; copper and uranium), Etruscan Resources Inc. (Halifax), Great Quest Metals Ltd. (Vancouver; diamonds, gold, phosphate), IAMGOLD Corp. (Toronto), Merrex Gold Inc. (Bedford, N.S.), Metalex Ventures Ltd. (Kelowna, B.C.), North Atlantic Resources Ltd. (Toronto; gold, oil & gas), Robex Resources Inc. (Sillery, Quebec), and Volta Resources (Toronto, acquired in 2008 three exploration licenses in Mali).(Volta Resources. 2008. Annual Report, p. 17) Ottawa-based Orezone Resources held two exploration permits in western Mali, however it reported abandoning them in 2007.(Orezone Gold Corporation. 2009. Annual Consolidated Financial Statements. For the years ended December 31, 2008 and 2007, March 25, 2009, pg. 17 http://www.orezone.com/pdf/2008%20FS%20Orezone%20Gold.pdf) Boart Longyear Canada (North Bay, Ontario), and formerly Quebecs St. Lambert Drilling, have undertaken drilling contracts in Mali for African Gold Group,(African Gold Group, Inc. Commences Geophysical Survey at Kobada, Mali, CCNMatthews, March 20, 2007) Avion Resources,(Avion Resources Commences Drill Program at Tabakoto and Segala Gold Projects in Mali, Marketwire, July 2, 2008) Delta Exploration Inc.,(Rockgate Capital Corp.: Drilling Commences at Falea Uranium Copper Project, CCNMatthews, March 20, 2007) Etruscan Resources,(Etruscan Resources. Drilling Commences in Mali, News release, Thu May 15, 2003 http://www.etruscan.com/s/NewsReleases.asp?ReportID102658&_TypeNews-Releases&_TitleDrilling-Commences-in-Mali) Merrex Gold(Merrex 2009 Drilling Triples Strike Length of Area 55 at Siribaya, Marketwire, September 3, 2009) and Robex.(Robex Completes Payments for Diangounte and Kata, at Mali, CCN Newswire, June 20, 2000) In 2007, Heritage Oil Limited acquired two oil exploration properties in Malis northern Gao region; the company was registered in Calgary, Canada up until 2008, however has since incorporated in Jersey, Channel Islands.(Heritage Oil) Selier Energy Limited, a subsidiary of Toronto-based North Atlantic Resources, signed a sharing agreement with the Government of Mali in 2007 for its oil concession in northern Mali, to undertake four years of exploration with US$11.9m. invested.(Communiqu du conseil des ministres, lEssor, n15894, 2007-02-15.http://www.essor.gov.ml/cgi-bin/view_article.pl?id14711)Of the Canadian-domiciled mining firms active in Mali, all but two are junior exploration companies. IAMGOLD Corp. (indirectly) and Avion Gold Corporation, are carrying out industrial-scale gold production in open-pit operations in western Mali. Vancouvers Resources produced 1,279 kg, or 2.2% of Malis gold output in 2006 at the Tabakoto mine and 1,769 kg in 2007 (3.4% of Malian total), however they reported incurring losses since production began in May 2006.(Nevsun Resources, Managements Discussion and Analysis  Annual Fiscal 2007, March 29, 2008, p. 4,5 http://www.sedar.com) Toronto-based Avion Gold acquired Nevsuns Tabakoto and Segala properties in Mali in 2008, and has predicted production of 66,000 ounces of gold (2,053 kg) in 2009.(Avion Resources Corp., Avion Resources pours firested gold on schedule! Segala Project on target to produce 66,000 oz Au in 2009, Press release, March 9, 2009 http://www.avionresources.com/pdf/Mar-9-2009-first-gold-pour.pdf.)Gold produced by Canadian-Malian-South African SEMOS consortiumIAMGOLD (formerly AGEM and International African Mining Gold Corporation) has been active in Mali since the late 1980s, and partnered in 1992 with South Africas AngloGold Limited (reincorporated as Ashanti in 2004). The Government of Mali issued their joint venture, incorporated as SEMOS, a mining exploitation permit in 1994 to undertake gold exploration in the Sadiola area of western Malis Kayes Region.(IAMGOLD Corporation. 2004. Technical Report on the Sadiola Gold Mine, May 31st, 2004, p. 3-4 http://nyse.10kwizard.com/cgi/image?&ipage2831527&doc3&fdl1&odef8&dn2&quest1&rid12) Financing, totaling U$250m., was obtained from the Finance Corporation of the Bank ($160m.), the Investment Bank, Germany Investment and Development Company (DEG), Development Finance Company (FMO), Proparco (France) and others.(Global Forum on InternationalInvestment. 2002. Foreign Direct Investment and the Environment: Lessons from the Mining Sector, Organisation for Economic Co-operationand Development, p. 123) Commercial exploitation of the Sadiola gold mine began in 1996, with the nearby Yatla mine opening in 2001. The two mines are collectively owned under the consortium (38% and 40% shares, respectively, to each of IAMGOLD and AngloAmerican Ashanti), with smaller shares held by the Government of Mali (18% and 20% respectively) and the World Banks International Finance Corporation (6% for Sadiola only).(IAMGOLD Corp. Sadiola Gold Mine, Mali and Yatela Gold Mine, Mali, company website, Operations > Operating Mines, accessed July 2009 http://www.iamgold.com/sadiola.php http://www.iamgold.com/yatela.php) The terms of IAMGOLDs and AngloGold Ashantis joint venture stipulate that the day-to-day operations are the administrative responsibility of AngloGold Ashanti,(IAMGOLD Corp., 2008 Health, Safety & Sustainability Report, p. 36) and AngloGold Ashanti collects an additional 1% of Sadiolas revenue for this service.( In August 2009, IAMGOLD announced that it had entered an option agreement permitting it to acquire a 51% ownership of Channel Islands-registered Avnel Gold Mining Ltd.(IAMGOLD Corp. IAMGOLD & Avnel announce option agreement on the Kalana Gold Project, news release, August 11, 2009 http://www.iamgold.com/documents/PR28-KalanaOptionAgreementFinal.pdf) Avnel had been operating the underground Kalana gold mine in southwest Mali since 2002, and recovering an annual average of 22,000 ounces of gold (680 kg) over 20062008, or about 1% of Malis total output.(Avnel Gold Mining Ltd., The Kalana Concession and Current Operations, website accessed August 2009 http://www.avnelgold.com/mining_ops/history/history.htmlhttp://www.avnelgold.com/mining_ops/current_ops/current_ops.html)The Sadiola and Yatla mines are scheduled for decommissioning and closure during 20102013.(AngloGold Ashanti, Report to Society 2008: 143) A satellite mine to Yatela, the Alamatoula pit, was closed in 2005.(AngloGold Ashanti. 5.3 Planning and implementing closure at Alatoula sic, Yatela, Report to Society 2005, Case studies  Mali, Section 5.3 http://www.anglogoldashanti.com/subwebs/InformationForInvestors/ReportToSociety05/values_bus_principles/environment/e_cs_mali_5_3.htm)The following table shows that the Sadiola and Yatela mines have been responsible for half of Malis gold output over the last decade.Sadiola and Yatla gold mine profits reported by IAMGOLD Corp. and AngloGold AshantiWhile IAMGOLD and AngloGold hold equal 38% and 40% shares in the Sadiola and Yatela mines, respectively, the net earnings reported in their individual annual reports differ. AngloGold Ashanti, while not reporting these mines earnings separately during five of the years between 1996 and 2008, reports for the remaining years total earnings of $248m., while IAMGOLD reports $308m. for all 13 years. The most recent five years during which both companies reported earnings show a discrepancy of 13% (AngloGold: $172m.; IAMGOLD: $198m.), with IAMGOLD reporting $26m. more, despite IAMGOLD reporting that AngloGold Ashanti received an additional 1% of earnings in return for management of the mines.(Revenue distribution of Sadiola and Yatla gold mines, 19962007AngloGold Ashanti published in 2008 breakdowns of the Sadiola and Yatela gold mine revenue, which it has managed since their inception in 1996 and 2001, respectively.( In 2007, AngloGold Ashanti also reported the total revenue injected into the Malian economy over these mines lifetimes up to 2006. The following table reports those figures, and imputes total revenue apportionment according to the 2008 percentages.The imputed earnings of both IAMGOLD Corp. and AngloGold Ashanti, U$156m. over 19962006, are 27% lower than the total revenue IAMGOLD reported in its annual reports over this period, U$214.9m (nominal currency). AngloGold Ashanti, and its predecessor AngloGold, did not report Sadiola and Yatela earnings separately in its annual reports for four years in this period, however the sum for the other six years, $224m. exceeded the IAMGOLD total by 4%, and the imputed earnings of $156m. are 30% lower.IAMGOLD Corp.s shares in the Sadiola and Yatla mines have been the subject of several legal disputes. In 2000, the Republic of Mali began collecting stamp duty taxes on SEMOSs export applications, and SEMOS contested this in 2001 at an arbitration tribunal of the World Banks Centre for Settlement of Investment Disputes (ICSID); SEMOSs argument was that it was exempt from such payments, since this tax applied only to companies registered under the 1999 Mining Code, and SEMOS had in its establishment conventions stability guarantees under the 1970 and 1991 Mining Codes. The ICSID decided in 2003 in favour of SEMOS, calling for the Malian government to reimburse SEMOS for the US$2.60m. it had unduly collected up to 2002.(Crawford, James et al. 2007. ICSID Reports, Cambridge University Press, p. 114-129.)(International Centre for Settlement of Investment Disputes. Socit dExploitation des Mines dOr de Sadiola S.A. v. Republic of Mali (ICSID Case No. ARB/01/5), http://icsid.worldbank.org/ICSID/FrontServlet?requestTypeGenCaseDtlsRH&actionValListConcluded) Frances Federation of Human Rights (FIDH) noted that a public audit in December 2003 concluded that the mines of Sadiola and Yatela owe the State approximately 15.6 million dollars in unpaid taxes on revenues and related fines between 2000 and 2002 (532 million CFA francs were paid by 30 June 2002) ... The armwrestling continued until the fourth quarter of 2005. In settlement, the State only received 5.2 million dollars, a third of the amount due (FIDH 2007: 40).( IAMGOLD reported in 2005 having paid a $2.0m. deposit towards its $5.9m. share claimed by the Malian government; further audit claims were received by IAMGOLD from Malis Tax Administration for 2005 and 2006.(IAMGOLD Corp. Annual Report, 2005: 78, 2006: 98, 2007: 114) In 2008, IAMGOLD listed among its other long-term assets the claim that the Government of Mali owed IAMGOLD $13.1m. in fuel tax, value added tax (VAT), and stamp duties receivable, down from $20.0m. reported as owed in 2007.(IAMGOLD Corp. Annual Report, 2008: 117) A footnote for Government of Mali funds owing in IAMGOLDs 2007 report stated that in addition, receivables and other current assets include an additional $10,221,000 (2006  $18,447,000) relating to similar items.(IAMGOLD Corp. Annual Report, 2007, p. 96) In 2009, the Government of Mali was predicted to refund the value-added tax (VAT) and import duty due on 200607 gold operations to mining companies, a sum amounting to US$122m, or 1.5% of GDP; this was agreed in order to maintain foreign investor confidence and thus underpin prospects for future development and production in the sector.(Economist Intelligence Unit. 2009. Country Report Mali, February 2009: 13.) Ottawa-based Kinbauri Gold Corporation received $3.8m. in settlement from IAMGOLD arising from a legal action in which Kinbauri claimed breach of contract, wherein IAMGOLD had failed to amalgamate in 1990 with Kinbauri.(Ontario court awards damages to Kinbauri, The Northern Miner, Toronto, Ont.: Jan 6/12, 2003. Vol. 88, N 46.)(IAMGOLD Corp. 2005. 2005 Year-end results, News release  English, March 9, 2006: 14, 28.http://www.sedar.com)IAMGOLDs shares in Malis mines represented 24% of the companys total gold production in 2008 (Annual Report 2008: 37), and these mines net earnings, $41m., accounted for 29% of IAMGOLDs global earnings (2008: 142).(Socio-economic and environmental impact studiesAt least eight independent groups have published studies of the broader impacts of the Canadian-Malian-South African joint-owned Sadiola and Yatela mines, namely, Canadas North/South Institute (2000),(Gosselin, Claudie; Tour, Bani. 2000. Cohrence des politiques et interventions canadiennes dans la lutte contre la pauvret : le cas du Mali, Ottawa: North-South Institute.http://idl-bnc.idrc.ca/dspace/handle/123456789/30100) Frances Les Amis De La Terre (Friends Of The Earth) (2003),(Godinot, Sbastien. 2003. Mission  la mine dor de Sadiola (Mali) : conclusions principales http://www.amisdelaterre.org/Mission-a-la-mine-d-or-de-Sadiola.html) Norways Chr. Michelsen Institute (2006) on behalf of the World Bank,(Jul-Larsen, Eyolf et al. 2006. Socio-economic effects of gold mining in Mali. A study of the Sadiola and Morila Mining Operations, Report R 2006:4, Bergen, Norway: Chr. Michelsen Institute http://www.cmi.no/publications/publication/?2340socio-economic-effects-of-gold-mining-in-mali) Oxfam America (2006),(Parker, Rani; Wood, Fred. 2006. Hidden Treasure? In search of Malis gold-mining revenues, Boston: Oxfam America http://www.oxfamamerica.org/publications/hidden-treasure) Frances International Federation of Human Rights,(Gourmelon, Isabelle et al. 2007. Mali. Mining and human rights. International fact-finding mission report, September 2007  N477/2, Paris: FIDH http://www.fidh.org/Gold-Mining-and-Human-Rights-in) the United Nations Global Compact,(Plackter Rubin, Lauren. 2007. Using communication and consultation to protect human rights during a village resettlement: The story of Anglogold Ashanti and three Malian villages. In: United Nations Global Compact, Embedding Human Rights in Business Practice II, United Nations Global Compact and the Office of the UN High Commissioner for Human Rights, 2007: 99111) and two research groups at the University of Quebec at Montreal including the Groupe de recherche sur les activits minires en Afrique (GRAMA).((Deneault, Alain; Abadie, Delphine; Sacher, William. 2008. Noir Canada: Pillage, corruption et criminalit en Afrique, Montreal: ditions cosocit, p. 27-38.)(Belem, Gisle. 2009. Quelle gouvernance pour la mise en oeuvre du dveloppement durable? lexprience de lindustrie minire du Mali, Ph.D. thesis, Environmental Sciences, de recherche, Corinne Gendron, Montral : Universit du Qubec  Montral, 2009)(Belem, Gisle. 2009. Mining, Poverty Reduction, the Protection of the Environment and the Role of the World Bank Group in Mali, in: Mining in Africa: Regulation and Development, London: Pluto Press/International Development Research Centre, p. 119-149.http://www.idrc.ca/en/ev-141152-201-1-DO_TOPIC.html) The two major and recurrent findings in these studies were (1) the public inaccessibility of information on the allocation of Sadiola and Yatela gold revenues, either from the companies or from the Government of Mali,((( and (2) the Government of Malis inadequate capacity to manage health and environmental aspects of these mines.((( In 2007, the Kingdoms for International Development (DFID) sponsored the Groupe dEtude et de Recherche en Sociologie et Droit Appliqu (GERSDA), a team of Malian researchers at the University of Bamako to investigate community relations with the Kalana gold mine (for which Canadas IAMGOLD announced an option to acquire majority control in 2009() and concluded that in Mali, the debate about the mining sector, and gold mining in particular, raises a range of contentious issues, and has seen the press and NGOs wrangling with mining companies and the government over the figures involved. ... These ... reports have expressed concerns about the way the government and mining companies negotiate Conventions of Establishment, about respect for environmental standards in mining sites, about mine workers conditions, and about how mining revenues are distributed and used. Malian NGOs have also expressed their disquiet about the yawning gap between the mining companies profits and the poverty and environmental problems in communities living near their mines.(Keita, Amadou et al. 2008. Tools for citizen empowerment: Increasing local participation and benefit in Malis mining sector, International Institute for Environment and Development, p. 8.)In its annual Health, Safety and Sustainability Report, IAMGOLD Corp. makes no mention of social responsibility activities in Mali, deferring to its managing partner, AngloGold Ashanti.(IAMGOLD Corp. 2008 Health, Safety and Sustainability Report, p. 36) AngloGold Ashanti has published its own social and environmental impact studies, including on the compulsory displacement and resettlement of three communities of 2,000 persons before the Sadiola mine began operation,(Mackenzie, A.G. et al. Four years after the move: Village relocation at Sadiola and Yatela gold mines, Mali, West Africa, 19 unnumbered pages, in: Report to Society, 2003, Section 7.4.http://www.anglogoldashanti.com/subwebs/informationforinvestors/ReportToSociety03/com_eastwestafrica.htm) development initiatives for communities surrounding the Sadiola and Yatla mines,(Mackenzie, AG; Pooley, J. Sustainability challenges: Community development initiatives at Sadiola and Yatela gold mines, Mali, West Africa, in: Report to Society, Anglogold, 2003, http://www.anglogoldashanti.com/subwebs/informationforinvestors/ReportToSociety03/com_eastwestafrica.htm#7.5) and four hundred wildlife fatalities over 20022004 attributed to elevated cyanide and sodium concentrations in the waste ponds.(Johnson, Graham A.; Donato, David. Avoidance of WildlifeFatalities: Hard Lessons from the African Sahel, SD05 Sustainable Development Conference, Alice Springs, Australia, 31 October  4November 2005, 18 unnumbered pages http://minerals.org.au.)In 2002 and 2003, French documentary film-maker Camille de Vitry began gathering testimony(De Vitry, Camille; avec les ressortissant-e-s de Sadiola. 2009. Lor ngre, Toulouse, France: Tahin Party, 2009.http://tahin-party.org/de-vitry.html) of adverse health effects from residents in the villages adjoining the Sadiola and Yatla mines, including very high rates of miscarriage among women living in Yatla (de Vitry 2009: 5658),( and respiratory ailments associated with the high dust levels (de Vitry 2009: 7273).( These investigations led de Vitry to lAssociation des ressortissants de Sadiola en France (ARSF), an immigrants group based in the Montreuil suburb of Paris, which met with representatives from AngloGold Ashanti in 2003.( In 2004, de Vitry screened her film Le prix de lor in Mali and in the same year, she reported that the Montreal-based Groupe de recherches sur les activits minires en Afrique (GRAMA) began to collaborate.In 2007, Richard Cox, AngloGold Ashantis General Manager at the time for the Sadiola and Yatla mines, responded by writing that a recent documentary and published NGO reports have highlighted community fears that our mining activity has and is having a negative impact on community health. Specific mention is made of the higher incidence of miscarriages, and the deterioration in water quality since the start of mining at Sadiola and Yatela. In response to this, Sadiola and Yatela are funding research by the Malian National Institute for Public Health Research INRSP in collaboration with the Malian National Laboratory of Health and the Department of Epidemiology of Parasitic Infections of the Faculty of Medicine to investigate and establish whether the community concerns are valid. The research has been planned in two phases  the first, a qualitative study, has been completed. The results of Phase 1 have suggested that further investigation is warranted. An outcome of Phase 1 was the recording of the population demographics to be researched in Phase 2  the quantitative study. Phase 2 has two parts: an analysis of water quality and an epidemiological study comprising a medical study and clinical and biomedical analyses. The outcome of the Phase 2 research is planned for the fourth quarter of 2007, in time for the annual Stakeholder Workshop.(AngloGold Ashanti. 2007. Message from Richard Cox, in: Country Report Mali Sadiola and Yatela 2006, p. 3 http://www.anglogold.com.au/subwebs/InformationForInvestors/ReportToSociety06/files/Sadiola.pdf) In 2007, Cox wrote that Phase 2 of the epidemiological study (quantitative study) was due for publication by the INRSP at the 2007 stakeholders workshop. However, the scale of the medical study delayed the completion of the clinical and biomedical analyses  a total of 21 villages and 11,675 people were surveyed by 75 specialists under the governance of the INRSP. In January 2008, the Prince Leopold Institute of Tropical Medicine (Belgium) conducted an audit of the methodology used in the quantitative study. The new target date for publication of Phase 2 epidemiological study is April 2008.(AngloGold Ashanti. 2008. Message from Richard Cox, in: Country Report Mali Sadiola Yatela 07, p. 1-2 http://www.anglogoldashanti.com/NR/rdonlyres/3D2243BA-03EB-43F8-AEC8-DFD4FBCB2876/0/sadiola_yatela.pdf) In AngloGold Ashantis country report for Mali in 2008 (combining information from Sadiola, Yatela and the Morila gold mine), a statement dated 6 March 2009 by Terry Mulpeter, the General Manager for Sadiola and Yatela, included: The sixth community workshop Sadiola and Yatela took place in January 2009 ... The forum disclosed that the concerns of the community about the effect of mining operations on health were unfounded following an investigation conducted by the Malian National Institute for Public Health (INRSP) in collaboration with the Malian National Laboratory of Health and the Department of Epidemiology of Parasitic Infections at the University of Bamakos Faculty of Medicine. These results will be communicated to the surrounding villages during 2009 ... Both Sadiola and Yatela sites were audited for compliance by the Cyanide Management Institute (ICMI) with results published during the first quarter. Sadiola is substantially compliant and there is an action plan for the operation to be fully compliant by the end of 2009. Yatela is fully compliant..(AngloGold Ashanti Limited. 2009. Message from Terry Mulpeter, Mali Country Report 2008, p. 3. Web page accessed 18 September 2009.http://www.anglogold.com/country/mali/mali.htm) This report also states that AngloGold Ashantis overall cost for its operations in Mali ($218.7m. for Sadiola, Yatela, Morila) exceeded gold income ($186.0m.) by 17.6%, that $80.0m. was paid in dividends and taxes to the Government of Mali, $16.2m. paid in salaries and wages, $0.62m. went to local community development and related initiatives, and that the Malian government refunded $3.0m in VAT (value-added tax) based on a 2006 exemption approved by the Minister of Finance (2009: 13); it was further noted that the primary occupational health risks at Sadiola and Yatela are dust, heat and noise (2009:19).( Revenue to the government and workers in Mali thus represented 52% of AngloGold Ashantis reported 2008 income from its mines in Mali.De Vitry states that AngloGold Ashanti constructed a zero-discharge dam around the Yatela tailings pond in 2004 to prevent cyanide run-off during the rainy season, and since then, Yatela residents have reported birth rates to be very satisfying, i.e., comparable to rates for the surrounding region (de Vitry 2009: 153154).( The construction of the discharge dam was also reported in an AngloGold email to the expatriates association, ASRF.(Orez. (K.). Epidemiological study in Sadiola : excellent results !, Organisation des Ressortissants  lEtranger des Zones minires, 12 fvrier 2009.http://orez.kofele.org/english/article/epidemiological-study-in-sadiola) Invited in early 2009 by AngloGold Ashanti to attend the annual community stakeholders workshop in Sadiola, de Vitry reported that the second phase of the AngloGold-funded epidemiological study was completed in 2009, that the results were reported to be excellent, with only dust-related respiratory illnesses still unresolved (de Vitry 2009: 153).( SHERPA, a Paris-based human rights group, since 2003 has represented Sadiola and Yatela miners and their families who experienced adverse health consequences (and fatalities) from work in the mines (de Vitry 2009: 104, 140, 147, 153).( SHERPA and Friends of Earth sic are listed by AngloGold Ashanti among the community stakeholders with complains sic for compensation at Sadiola and Yatela.(AngloGold Ashanti. Report to Society 2008, Stakeholders, Mali  Community  Sadiola Yatela http://www.anglogold.com/subwebs/informationforinvestors/reports08/stakeholders.htm.) In 2005, AngloGold reported that it is dust caused by traffic between the and Sadiola mines  situated about 30 kilometres apart  that is of greatest concern to neighbouring communities and that the company undertook road watering and the construction of an alternate road away from the affected villages in response.(AngloGold Ashanti. Emphasis on dust monitoring and management at Sadiola , in: Report to Society 2005, Section 5.5 http://www.anglogoldashanti.com/subwebs/InformationForInvestors/ReportToSociety05/values_bus_principles/environment/e_cs_mali_5_5.htm) At AngloGold Ashantis annual Sadiola and Yatela stakeholders consultation workshop for local communities; regional and national government; national and international non-government organisations; the media; mine management; AngloGold Ashanti and the IFC (Finance Corporation)(AngloGold Ashanti. Country report Mali Sadiola Yatela 2007, p. 24) in January 2009, issues raised included: ... review of progress made with the epidemiological study (AngloGold 2008: 143), that complaints were received from community members at Sadiola and Yatela, relating to the contamination of grazing land by mud, death of cattle, and water shortages in Sadiola and Farabakouta villages (2008: 145) and that two community protest actions occurred in 2008 at Sadiola concerning the water supply (2008:148).(AngloGold Ashanti. Stakeholders, Report to Society 2008) In 2008, the Sadiola and Yatela mines employed 364 persons directly by AngloGold Ashanti, and 566 through contractors (2008: 93);( 2.0% of employees in 2008 were reported to be expatriates, while in 2007 the ratios were 4.7% (Sadiola) and 5.7% (Yatela) (2008:108).(Only one article in major Canadian news sources, Vancouvers The Province, appears to have reported on the adverse health and environmental effects associated with the part-Canadian-owned Sadiola and Yatela mines, however no mention of IAMGOLD Corp. was made.(Mines create ecological time-bomb; Mali, Africas third-largest gold producer, harvests only dust, The Province, Vancouver, B.C., Oct 10, 2007. p. A.33.)In 2000, Canadas North/South Institute social audit of the Sadiola Mine included the recommendation that the Canadian aid program consider ways of getting involved in the region affected by the Sadiola gold mine, perhaps through the Canada Fund for Local Initiatives (2000: xviii).( Since 2003, the International Development Agency has since undertaken projects in the Kayes Region (where Sadiola and Yatela are situated) in the areas of health(CIDA. A Bright Future AheadReducing Maternal and Infant Mortality in Mali, Last Updated: 2008-04-14) and education.(CIDA. Making Textbooks Affordable, Media Room, Last Updated: 2009-01-15.http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/FRA-1151491-QGA) However, as has been noted by the March 2007 Advisory Group Report for the National Roundtables on Corporate Social Responsibility (CSR) and the Canadian Extractive Industry in Developing Countries, in the past, CIDA has partnered with civil society organisations that provided support to communities affected by mining operations. This work sought to strengthen communities capacity to effectively engage in decision-making processes regarding mining investments, thereby reducing the risk of conflict. It was reported that CIDA no longer supports this type of work.(National Roundtables on Corporate Social Responsibility (CSR) and the Canadian Extractive Industry in Developing Countries. 2007. Advisory Group Report, March 30, 2007, p. 52. http://www.mining.ca/www/media_lib/MAC_Documents/Publications/CSRENG.pdf) The eighteen-member advisory group, convened by the Government of Canada as part of national roundtable process to recommend corporate social responsibility measures for Canadian extractive firms operating in developing countries, consisted of representatives from industry, civil society and academia, including retired IAMGOLD Corp. geologist, Dennis Jones.(In 2009 at the Prospectors and Developers Association of Canada Convention, IAMGOLD Corp. chaired a roundtable discussion with invited government ministers from Mali, Faso, dIvoire, Togo and Canada. Malis Minister of Mines, Mamadou Igor Diarra, called for greater transparency by the foreign companies, increased investment in skills transfer and training of host nationals, and more detailed post-mining reclamation plans.(West Africans ask miners for more training, better transparency, Northern Miner, March 04, 2009) In 2004, IAMGOLD co-founder Mark Nathanson established a full scholarship for mineral exploration graduate students at University in Canada, with preference given to students from nine countries in Africa and Latin America where IAMGOLD Corp. owns concessions, including Mali.(The Maria Nathanson and IAMGOLD Corporation Graduate Scholarship in Geological Sciences and Geological Engineering, http://www.queensu.ca/calendars/sgsr/The_Maria_Nathanson_and_IAMGOLD_Corporation_Graduate_Scholarship_in_Geological_Sciences_and_Geological_Engineering.html) IAMGOLDs co-partner in Mali, AngloGold Ashanti, reported providing mining scholarships for ten Malian students at the University of Pretoria in South Africa in 2007, at a cost of $44k,(AngloGold Ashanti. 2008. Country Report Mali Sadiola Yatela, 2007, p. 16.http://www.anglogold.com/NR/rdonlyres/3D2243BA-03EB-43F8-AEC8-DFD4FBCB2876/0/sadiola_yatela.pdf) and again in 2008.( In 2007, CIDA provided Cdn.$10,000 in scholarship funds as part of its bilateral assistance envelope for Mali.(CIDA. 2009. Statistical report on International Assistance  Fiscal Year 20062007, p. 38 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/INET/IMAGES.NSF/vLUImages/stats/$file/CIDA_STATS_REPORT_ON_ODA%202006-07-E.pdf)The Kenieba Valley south of Sadiola in western Mali is home to a number of gold and diamond concessions owned by Canadian junior mining companies, including African Metals Corp.,(African Metals Corp., The Kenieba Diamond Concessions, website) Avion Gold Corp.,(Avion Gold Corporation, Current Projects, website accessed August 2009 http://www.aviongoldcorp.com/Projects/Current-Projects/default.aspx) Great Quest Metals(Great Quest Metals Ltd., Kenieba-Baroya, Projects  Mali) and Robex Resources.(Robex Resources Inc. Robex to Commence Drilling on Two Mali Gold Properties, News Release, 03/14/2005 http://www.robexgold.com/9360837/9/03142005.html) In 2006, the States Geological Survey estimated that 100,000 of the 200,000 people living in Kenieba were employed in small-scale and artisanal gold mining; half were women.( AngloGold Ashanti initially provided an alternate artisanal mining location for those orpailleurs, whose seasonal work was disrupted by the industrial Sadiola mine, however the Government of Mali halted the initiative, as the current mining code bars artisanal miners from working on industrially-registered concessions (Chr. Michelsen Institute 2006: 37).( On the Canadian-owned African Gold Group concession of Kobada in southern Mali in 2008, Malian artisanal miners discovered a gold nugget weighing 2.7 kg, which they sold to buyers in Bamako, rather than turning it over to the concession-holders.(Artisanal miners make big gold find in Mali, The Northern Miner, Mar 10  Mar 16, 2008, 94(3): 4) Industrial gold mining has supplanted small-scale gold mining steadily over the past three decades: by one estimate, Malis artisanal gold production fell from 4.6 tonnes in 1988 (88% of combined artisanal and industrial output) to 1.7 tonnes in 2001 (6% of total output)(Hatcher, Pascal. 2004. Mali: Rewriting the Mining Code or Redefining the Role of the State?, in: Bonnie Campbell, ed., Regulating Mining in Africa: For Whose Benefit?, Uppsala, Sweden: Nordiska Afrikainstitutet, p. 39-52.) The US Geological Survey estimated Malian artisanal gold production at 2.1 tonnes, or 3.9% of total gold output in 2006,( and 4.0 tonnes, or 8.4% of 2007 production.(Bermdez-Lugo, Omayra; Taib, Mowafa. 2009. Mali, Mauritania, and Niger Release, in: 2007 Minerals Yearbook, U.S. Geological Survey, p. 28.2.http://minerals.usgs.gov/minerals/pubs/country/2007/myb3-2007-ml-mr-ng.pdf)Immigration and remittancesThe 2006 Census of Canada estimated that there were 855 persons originally from Mali living in Canada, 390 having arrived since 2001;(Statistics Canada, Place of birth for the immigrant population by period of immigration, 2006 counts and percentage distribution, for Canada, provinces and territories  20% sample data, Date Modified: 2009-03-27 http://www12.statcan.ca/census-recensement/2006/dp-pd/hlt/97-557/T404-eng.cfm?LangE&T404&GH4&GF1&G50&SC1&SR1&S5&OA&D11) Malian immigrants comprised 0.0027% of Canadas population. France is the largest non-African country of residence for Malian immigrants. With a total population of 64.6m. in 2006, France was home to 120,000 Malians in 2005, of whom 45,500 were in possession of official status with a titre de sjour residence permit.(France-Diplomatie, Prsentation du Malihttp://www.diplomatie.gouv.fr/fr/pays-zones-geo_833/mali_350/presentation-du-mali_996/index.html ; Government of France, Ministre de lIntrieur, 18.05.2006  Dplacement de M. NicolasSARKOZY au Mali, http://www.interieur.gouv.fr/misill/sections/a_l_interieur/le_ministre/interventions/archives-sarkozy-2005-2007/18-05-2006-deplacement-mali) In 2006, Malians represented 0.070% (landed immigrants) and 0.19% (total immigrants) of the French population. Were Canada to adopt Frances ratio of 190 Malian total immigrants per 100,000 population, 59,000 Malians would be living in Canada, or about 70 times greater than the current level. If Canada matched per capita Frances legally-registered 45,500 Malians with residence permits, it would have 22,800 Malian-Canadians, or 27 times more than at present.In 2008, Canada released preliminary data surveying the remittance-sending behaviour of recent Canadian immigrants and found that 39% of immigrants of sub-Saharan African origin were remitting on average $2,500 per annum to their countries of origin. Immigrants from all countries with gross per capita domestic products under $2,000 (including Mali) had an average 33% remittance rate, with an average contribution of $2,100.(Houle, Ren and Grant Schellenberg, Remittance Behaviours Among Recent Immigrants in Canada, Statistics Canada Cat. No. 11F0019M No. 312, July 2008: 29) Assuming that 36% of the 855 immigrants remit an annual average of $2,300, Malian private inflows from Canada would amount to $708,000. This represents 1.2% of the level of Canadas bilateral official development assistance of $60.8m. in 20062007.(CIDA. 2009. Statistical Report on International Assistance. Fiscal Year 20062007, Gatineau, Quebec: CIDA, p. 38)If Canadas officially registered intake of Malians paralleled that of France, and if these 22,800 Malian-Canadians collectively made home remittances similar to those in Statistics Canadas 2008 preliminary survey of recent immigrants, with 36% of them sending $2,300 per year, total remittances from Canada to Mali would be around $19m. per annum; that is 31% of what CIDA provided in official bilateral aid to the country in 2006/2007. Such remittance levels would amount to about 0.3% of Malis GDP. By comparison, an estimate from the French government was that their countrys total of 120,000 Malian immigrants were remitting Euro 295m. to Mali in 2005, or 7% of the Malian GDP.(France, Ministre de limmigration, de lintgration, de lidentit nationale et du dveloppement solidaire, Discours de Brice Hortefeux au sige de lAgence Franaise de Dveloppement, 24 janvier 2008 http://www.immigration.gouv.fr/spip.php?pagearchdiscours2&id_rubrique321&id_article625) In a 2007 survey of citizens in 36 developing countries, Mali ranked third-highest after Lebanon and Bangladesh in reporting that they were receiving money from relatives living abroad: 42% of surveyed Malians said they were receiving remittances from relatives abroad either frequently or occasionally.(Pew Research Center. 2007. World Publics Welcome Global Trade  But Not Immigration, 47-Nation Pew Global Attitudes Survey, October 4, 2007, Q.105, p. 140.)Canadas restrictive immigration quotas for Malians have come under criticism. Journalist and long-time Africa correspondent Joan Baxter writes that Cameroonian and Malian friends with full-time jobs as journalists were turned down for visas to visit my family in Canada, despite my letters of invitation. They were told they could not prove they were not planning to stay. Many Africans have suggested to me over the years that Canada is even more restrictive and unfair in its visa practices than are other Western nations.(Baxter, Joan. 2008. Dust from our eyes: an unblinkered look at Africa, Hamilton, Ont.: Wolsak and Wynn, p. 53)There is at least one private agency in Canada for the adoption of Malian children, lAgence dadoption les enfants du Mand, based in Longueuil, Quebec.(Les Enfants du Mand, Boucherville, Qubec, Accessed July 2009) Certified in 2007 by Quebecs Minister of Health and Social Services, the agency was reportedly limited to five Malian adoptions in its first year, of abandoned and orphaned children, from an estimated total of 100150 Malian child adoptions worldwide.(Breton, Gilles. Mali  Une nouvelle agence ouvre le Mali aux Qubcois, January 2007, Qubecadoption.net, website accessed July 2009. http://www.quebecadoption.net/adoption/pays/nouvellesitu_archiv.php?pays2Mali#109) The total adoption cost was estimated to be between $13,000  $17,000 per child.(Lemay, Valrie. 2007. Lespace social de ladoption internationale reprage des enjeux autour de la cration dorganismes agrs en Afrique par lanalyse du discours dacteurs sociaux concerns, M.A. Thesis, Universit du Qubec  Montral, p. 27-28)The current state of relationsPresident Toumani Tour and a delegation of Malian officials paid a state visit to Canada in May 2005, including events in Ottawa and in Brunswick.(Ambassade du Mali au Canada, Canada-Mali, Le President Amadou Toumani Tour au Canada: Rcits, Tmoignages et opinions, Ottawa, 2005: 4,7)(Visite dtat prsident Tour au Canada : lconomie au cur des priorits, lEssor n15453 du  2005-05-16 08:00:00 http://www.malikounda.com/nouvelle_voir.php?idNouvelle3605) Tour also visited Quebec City in October 2008 for the annual Francophonie Summit.(XIIe Sommet de la Francophonie  Liste des participants http://www.francophoniequebec2008.qc.ca/fr/place/participants.php)The General of Canada, Jean included Mali in her 2006 state visit to five African nations, and she was only the second head of state after Mandela to address the National Assembly of Mali.(CIDA, Governor General Michalle Jean represents Canada on state visit to sub-Saharan and North Africa, Media Room, Last Updated: 2008-03-28 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/RAC-111616820-SSR)(Her Excellency the Right Honourable Michalle Jean Address to the National Assembly of Mali, Governor General of Canada, website, Updated: 2007-01-18 http://www.gg.ca/media/doc.asp?lange&DocID4932)In 2008, Canadas Department of Foreign Affairs provided a $600,000 grant to Lcole de Maintien de la Paix Alioune Blondin Beye (EMP), a training school for 800 African peacekeepers in Bamako.(Foreign Affairs and International Trade Canada, Disclosure of Grant and Contribution Awards Over $25,000: Foreign Affairs, Date Modified: 2008-12-23 http://w01.international.gc.ca/dg-do/index_fa-ae.aspx?langeng&p3&r18) Since 2006, instructors from Canadas Department of National Defence and the Pearson Peacekeeping Centre have provided training there, in concert with Mali, France and other European partners.(Government of Canada, Canada-Mali Relations, Embassy of Canada to Mali, website, Date Modified: 2009-05-04 http://www.canadainternational.gc.ca/mali/bilateral_relations_bilaterales/index.aspx?menu_id7&menuL)(Fortin, Steve. 2007. CF members make a difference at Bamako Peacekeeping School, The Maple Leaf, Canada Department of National Defense,, 19 September 2007 http://www.forces.gc.ca/site/commun/ml-fe/article-eng.asp?id3737)Virginie Saint-Louis was appointed the Canadian Ambassador to Mali in January 2009. One of her first official functions was to attend an annual stakeholders workshop sponsored by the Canadian/Malian/South African SEMOS gold mining consortium in Sadiola.(Maiga, Oumou H. 2009. Atelier de concertation des mines dor de Sadiola et Yatela, 26 janvier 2009, Aurorehttp://www.maliweb.net/category.php?NID39936) Malian-Canadians residing in the Canadian capital region have established a group whose mission includes the promotion of Canadian investment in Mali.(Le Regroupement des Maliens De La Region De La Capitale Nationale (RMRCN), website accessed July 2009 http://www.malienscn.ca) The Government of Malis Ministry of Housing, Land Affairs and Planning, in concert with several Malian banks, held its first Salon de lHabitat du Mali international exhibition in Montreal in May 2009, in order to encourage expatriate Malians to acquire land and homes back in Mali, as well as encourage foreign investment in their country by the diaspora.(Camara, Youssouf. 2009. Premier Salon de lHabitat du Mali  Montral, LIndpendant, 2009-05-22 http://www.malikounda.com/nouvelle_voir.php?idNouvelle21482)In 2009, the Government of Canada announced that Mali, along with neighbouring Ghana and Senegal and just four other African countries (Ethiopia, Mozambique, Sudan, Tanzania), was one of 20 developing nations to benefit from a concentration of four-fifths of Canada bilateral (country-to-country) aid.(CIDA, Canada Moves on Another Element of its Aid Effectiveness Agenda, News Release, February 23, 2009 http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/NAT-223132931-PPH) In April 2009, the intervention of Malian president Toumani Tour was instrumental in the release of two Canadian diplomats, Robert Fowler and Louis Guay, who had been taken as hostages in the Republic of Niger during December 2008. In an official communiqu, the Government of Mali quoted the Canadian Ambassador, Mrs. Saint-Louis, as thanking President Tour for showing once again, that he supports Canada, and President Tour responded that his country spared no effort to free the two Canadian diplomats on behalf of the cooperation and friendship between Canada and Mali.(Rpublique du Mali, ATT lors de la remise hier de deux otages canadiens, suisse et allemand  leur pays respectif, Primature 24-04-2009 http://www.primature.gov.ml/index2.php?optioncom_content&do_pdf1&id2167)The Canadian government in mid-2009 advised exercising a high degree of caution for persons traveling in Mali, and advised against all travel to the regions of Timbuktu, Gao and Kidal, owing to heightened security risks from groups there, including Tuareg rebels.(Department of Foreign Affairs and International Trade Canada, Travel Report for Mali, Last Updated: August 5, 2009 13:27 EDT http://www.primature.gov.ml/index2.php?optioncom_content&do_pdf1&id2167)The Honourable Cannon, Canadas Minister of Foreign Affairs, met in Mali, in August 2009, with President Toumani Tour to discuss bilateral and regional relations, and also visited the Canadian-government-supported cole de maintien de la paix Alioune Blondin Beye (EMP).(Diarra, L. 2009. Mali-Canada: Lawrence Cannon confirme un partenatiat privilegie, LEssor, n16517, 2009-08-31 http://www.primature.gov.ml/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id2880&Itemid1)Mali in 2010 was the site of one of three international and five Canadian consultative meetings during the first year of the Canadian governments Office of the Extractive Sector Corporate Social Responsibility Counsellor activities, with discussions held with members of civil society, the private sector, and embassy officials.(The Office of the Extractive Sector Corporate Social Responsibility Counsellor. 2010. Building a review process for the Canadian international extractive sector, Meeting Summary Report, Bamako, Mali, 12 and 13 July 2010, Foreign Affairs and International Trade Canada, http://www.international.gc.ca/csr_counsellor-conseiller_rse/assets/pdfs/Mali%20%20report.pdf (accessed March 4, 2011).)Common membershipsCanada and Mali both hold membership in a number of multinational organizations including:*and Agriculture Organization*Francophonie*Development Association*Monetary Fund*Olympic Committee*Interpol*for Economic Co-operation and Development*Nations*UNESCO*Health Organization*Trade Organization*BankQuotations*Rick Antonson, CEO & President, Tourism Vancouver: I walked over fields and roads strewn with litter. In Sgou, garbage ruled, shards of bright-coloured plastic poked through everywhere. But even my few weeks in this country forced me to accept the shabbiness, the torn living-room furniture the homeowner overlooks but guests notice. It was as though Mali had become the worlds rubbish bin. Malians were as likely to talk about the never-changing weather as about the never-changing mess. I should be no more appalled at the litter there than they would be at the plentiful table scraps we Westerners put in our garburators. In all my travels in Mali, I never found despair. Hardship, disappointment, poverty, indifference, and resignation were always evident, more so than hope. But never despair. The people have one another. Westerners dont understand Africa, I was told. They say everyones poor. That is not it. Africans are very happy in the good countries. Poor, yes, but what is that? They are happy. The visitors reward is to witness the resilence, the wealth, of the human spirit.(Antonson, Rick. 2008. To Timbuktu for a Haircut  A Journey Through West Africa, Toronto: Dundurn, p. 232, 235.)*Ali Farka Tour, musician, on his farm in Niafunk, Mali, in 2003, as told to Canadian journalist Joan Baxter: I prefer life here. That other life musical stardom was  if youll excuse my language  like dried crap; you step it in sic and it just doesnt stick. If God gave me big buildings in the United States or Canada or Japan or Germany or Australia, could I put them in my pocket and bring them home? No, thats impossible.(Baxter, Joan. 2008. Dust from our Eyes: An unblinkered look at Africa, Hamilton: Wolsak & Wynn, p. 28.)*Stephanie Nolen, Africa correspondent for the Globe and Mail, 20032008: Mali has a history as a centre of learning and cultural richness that stretches back to the 10th century. It has two large rivers and vast agricultural potential. It has an entrenched democracy, great accord between its many ethnic groups, a national commitment to consensus, strong initiatives to counter corruption and healthy respect for human rights. On paper, this country is a World Bank poster child. So why does the suffocating pall of poverty cling so tenaciously to this place? Landlocked, stable, without any headline-grabbing exports to fight over, Mali rarely garners much attention in the outside world ... its worth a closer look at what has happened, and what has not, in Mali.(Stephanie Nolen. A seemingly stable nation falling apart at the seams, The Globe and Mail, Feb 14, 2008. pg. A.15.)*Hlne Tremblay, Canadian writer and traveler, on a farming family in rural Mali: Avoiding migration to the city is a major concern. Often, educated people leave their village. To keep people at home the chief has refused funds to build a school for the last twenty years. But when the neigbouring village built a school, the chief changed his mind and finally agreed to accept the aid money. The village has now had a local school for three years.(Tremblay, Hlne (2003). A day at Kombre, Mali, Mirabel, Quebec: Families of the World Company, p. 15.)*Unnamed member of Sansanding commune, Mali; participant in village development project financed by SUCO Mali and Cardinal Lger et ses Oeuvres (Canada): Thanks to the partnership, truly everyone has received the money; it has been equitable; there has been equality in the division of funds between men and women. As a result of this transparency, there has been no exclusion. The experience has enabled people to regain trust in their structures. It has been a great innovation to see women associating with men, in the same space, thanks to the accompaniment process of SUCO-Mali/CLO. One of the most crucial elements of respect for individual and collective freedoms is the right to expression, freedom of speech. In the public arena everyone, literate and illiterate, is together.(Tremblay, Yves. 2006. From Popular Participation to Democracy: As the village goes, so the country will go, in: Telling Our Stories: Drawing policy lessons from development experience, Ottawa: Canadian Council for International Co-operation, p. 82-87.http://www.ccic.ca/e/002/capacity_building.shtml)*Ernest Akpoue, Trade Commissioner, The Embassy of Canada to Mali: Mali has established an attractive and competitive mining code which has conformed to international standards since 1991 and which was revised in 1999 to make it more attractive to private investors. ... There are 112 companies involved in mining, of which 56 are national and 36 foreign, including 10 Canadian companies. Foreign companies from Australia, the U.S., China, France, England, Norway, Russia, Malaysia, Turkey and Germany participate in every phase of mining activity, either alone or in partnership with each other or with local companies. ... With regard to the substances to be mined, Canadian companies must target in addition to gold: bauxite, iron, manganese, uranium, oil, construction materials (cement, lime) and substances for agricultural input like phosphates. As this is the best opportunity in the mining sector, Canadian companies must also target medium-scale operations in the form of small and medium-sized enterprises. At this time, this dimension is virtually inexistent sic in Mali, which seriously hinders the integration of mining into the national economic network.(Akpoue, Ernest. Canada Infoexport  Mining Sector Profile  Mali  December 2007, web page accessed July 2009 http://www.infoexport.gc.ca/eng/office.jsp?oid235)*Robert Calderisi, Canadian, former CIDA and World Bank economist for Africa: Ten Ways of Changing Africa ... 4. Focus direct aid on four to five countries that are serious about reducing poverty. Serious countries should be taken out of the intensive care unit. They no longer need the close monitoring they have received until now; instead, they should be given more generious and flexible support. Unfortunately, there are only five of them: Uganda, Ghana, Mozambique, Tanzania, and perhaps Mali.(Calderisi, Robert. 2006. The Trouble With Africa: Why Foreign Aid Isnt Working, New York: Palgrave, p. 209) *Evaluation Division, Canadian International Development Agency, on the Canada-Mali Cooperation Program: ...one of Canadas key strengths is the management and control of public finances. It would seem essential to continue efforts in this area, through long-term technical assistance, specialized supports to be gradually reduced over time, and sustained policy dialogue. Maintaining a close long-term partnership between Malian and Canadian stakeholders will considerably increase the likelihood of sustainability. In Mali, the state has resolutely undertaken a process of liberalization and withdrawal from activities more suited to the private sector, be it financial services, agricultural development or business, in order to focus on its kingly sic missions and on the creation of an environment favourable to investment and private sector development. This process has encountered major stumbling blocks, including the weakness of private operations and the lack of means to strengthen their capacities. Additionally, long decades of interventionism have left deep traces in ways of thinking.(Canadian International Development Agency. 2007. Executive Report of the Canada-Mali Cooperation Program Evaluation, December 2007, p. 19, 28. http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/inet/images.nsf/vLUImages/Evaluations/$file/Mali-ExecutiveReportEnglish-E.pdf)*Joan Baxter, Canadian journalist living in Mali, late 1990s/early 2000s: Newcomers from other parts of the planet often assume that cities such as Bamako are dens of abject suffering and misery. But inside many of those crumbling walls are mostly reasonably healthy and apparently happy people living difficult, but dignified lives. Yes, they have to deal with many big problems that would send me down a rabbit-hole of despair and depression. But for all the problems and hardships they have to confront every day, many of them matters of life and death, many Malians  like most Africans  remain stoic and cheerful, full of humour. They are both resigned to whatever fate God or Allah has in store for them and also ready to leap at any opportunity that comes their way to better their lot in life. It certainly helps that in some countries or parts of countries they still have their rich culture to fall back on.(Baxter, Joan. 2008. Dust from our Eyes: An unblinkered look at Africa, Hamilton: Wolsak & Wynn, p. 344-345.)Further reading and viewingText*Antonson, Rick. 2008. To Timbuktu for a Haircut  A Journey Through West Africa, Toronto: Dundurn Group. (travel memoir of one month stay in Mali, in 2004)*Baxter, Joan. 2008. Dust from our Eyes: An unblinkered look at Africa, Hamilton: Wolsak & Wynn. (a Canadian journalists 25 years in Africa, most recently, seven years in Mali; includes chapters on Malian culture, mining, foreign relations)*Belem, Gisle. 2009. Quelle gouvernance pour la mise en oeuvre du dveloppement durable? lexprience de lindustrie minire du Mali, Ph.D. thesis, Environmental Sciences, de recherche, Corinne Gendron, Montral : Universit du Qubec  Montral, 2009.http://www.archipel.uqam.ca/2044/*Belem, Gisle. 2009. Mining, Poverty Reduction, the Protection of the Environment and the Role of the World Bank Group in Mali, in: Mining in Africa: Regulation and Development, London: Pluto, Chapter 3.http://www.idrc.ca/en/ev-138476-201-1-DO_TOPIC.html*Campbell, Bonnie; Belem, Gisle; Nabe Coulibaly, Vincent. 2007. Poverty Reduction in Africa: On Whose Development Agenda? Lessons from Cotton and Gold Production in Mali and Burkina Faso, Montreal: Universit du Qubec  Montral. http://www.ieim.uqam.ca/spip.php?pagearticle-poissant&id_article3423*Canadian International Development Agency. 2005. Mali Policy Framework Implementation Strategy (20052010), web page, Last Updated: 2006-04-15. http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/CIDAWEB/acdicida.nsf/En/EMA-21812034-NEY*Canadian International Development Agency. 2007. Executive Report of the Canada-Mali Cooperation Program Evaluation, December 2007.http://www.acdi-cida.gc.ca/inet/images.nsf/vLUImages/Evaluations/$file/Mali-ExecutiveReportEnglish-E.pdf*De Vitry, Camille; avec les ressortissant-e-s de Sadiola. 2009. Lor ngre, Toulouse, France: Tahin Party, 2009. (166-page chronicle, in French, of the filmmakers work with gold miners and their families at the SEMOS mines, Mali, from 20022009) http://tahin-party.org/de-vitry.html*Deneault, Alain; Abadie, Delphine; Sacher, William. 2008. Noir Canada: Pillage, corruption et criminalit en Afrique, Montreal: ditions cosocit, p. 2738.*Gosselin, Claudie; Tour, Bani. 2000. Cohrence des politiques et interventions canadiennes dans la lutte contre la pauvret : le cas du Mali, Ottawa: North-South Institute.http://idl-bnc.idrc.ca/dspace/handle/123456789/30100*Gutnick, David. 2009. Better journalists make for better farmers, CBC website, Last Updated: Friday, January 2, 2009. (Canadian aid group Farm Radios work with Malian broadcasters) http://www.cbc.ca/world/story/2008/12/18/f-farm-radio.html*Gutnick, David. 2009. Fighting female mutilation one small village at a time, CBC website, Last Updated: Saturday, January 31, 2009. (Canadian aid-funded womens rights project among the Dogon of Mali) http://www.cbc.ca/world/story/2009/01/30/f-mali-excision.html*Hatcher, Pascale. 2004. Mali: Rewriting the Mining Code or Redefining the Role of the State?, in: Regulating Mining in Africa: For Whose Benefit?, Nordic Africa Institute, pp. 3952.http://www.nai.uu.se/publications/books/book.xml?id25099*Labarthe, Gilles; Verschave, Franois-Xavier. 2007. Lor africain: pillages, trafics & commerce international, Marseille: Agone, Oxfam France-Agir ici, Survie, Dossier noir n 22.*Tremblay, Hlne. 2003. A day at Kombre, Mali, Mirabel, Quebec: Families of the World Company. (Tremblay is a Canadian who has lived with families in 116 countries; profiles a 45-year-old cotton farmer, his three wives and extended family in southern Mali)http://www.fdmfow.orgVideo*De Vitry, Camille. 2007. The Price of Gold, video, 53 min. (dccumentary includes interviews in 2003 with residents of Farabana and Yatla, communities adjoining the SEMOS gold mines, attesting to adverse health consequences).http://orange.dailymotion.com/video/x2hx2e_the-price-of-gold_politics*Drolet, Stphane. 1998. Oumar 9-1-1, video, 53 min., Montreal: National Film Board. (documentary portrait of Burkinab and Malian immigrants living in Montreal, Canada)http://www.onf.ca/film/Oumar_9-1-1/*LEsprance, Sylvain. 2007. Un fleuve humain (English: The River where we live), video, 92 min., Montreal: Les Films du tricycle. (documentary jointly financed by the governments of Canadian and Quebec; profiles Malian canoe-builders, steamer captains, fish sellers, cattle herders, fishers, all who make their living in proximity to the River Niger) http://www.lesfilmsdutricycle.com/unfleuvehumain/*Salgues, Laurent. 2006. Rves de poussire (English versions: Dreams of Dust; Buried Dreams), video, 86 min., Montral : K-Films Amrique. Burkinab-French-Canadian co-production. (feature film about migrant gold-diggers and gold-washers, filmed in Essakane, northeastern Burkina Faso, property previously owned by Orezone Inc., transferred to IAMGOLD Corp. in 2009) http://www.laurentsalgues.com/reves_de_poussiere.html*Weyman, Bay. 2008. Road to Baleya, video, 89 min., Toronto: Close Up Films. (documentary of four Toronto musicians interactions with musicians in Bamako and villages in southwest Mali) http://closeupfilms.ca/Films/Road_to_Baleya.phpDiplomatic officesBoth nations maintain direct high-level diplomatic representatives.* of Mali in Ottawa* Embassy of Canada to MaliExternal links*Government of Canada  Canada Mali Relations*Canadian International Development Agency: Mali  Stories from the Field*Centre for Intercultural Learning, Country Insights  Mali (Canadian and Malian perspectives on effective social interactions in Mali)*Ministre de la Sant  Mali  Canada: une coopration exemplaire*Historique des relations de coopration sanitaire Nouveau Brunswick  Mali*Le Regroupement des Maliens De La Region De La Capitale Nationale (RMRCN) (Ottawa-based Malian-Canadian support group, promotion of Malian culture and investment)* Canada in Mali: Aid, Gold, Cotton, Migration* IAMGOLD Corporation* AngloGold Ashanti Limited* Avion Gold CorporationNotesSee also*relations of Canada*relations of Malitrangre du Canada
24320051
Saint_Petersburg
dateMarch 2010Saint Petersburg () is a city and a federal subject (a federal city) of Russia located on the River at the head of the of Finland on the Sea. In 1914 the name of the city was changed to Petrograd (), in 1924 to Leningrad () and in 1991 back to Saint Petersburg.In Russian literature and informal documents the Saint (-) is usually omitted, leaving Petersburg (, Peterburg). In common parlance Russians may drop -burg (-) as well, leaving only Peter (, pronounced as Piter; IPA: pitr).Saint Petersburg was founded by Tsar the Great on . From 1713 to 1728 and from 1732 to 1918, Saint Petersburg was the Imperial capital of Russia. In 1918 the central government bodies moved from Saint Petersburg (then named Petrograd) to Moscow.() It is Russias second largest city after Moscow with 4.8 million inhabitants. Saint Petersburg is a major European cultural centre, and an important Russian port on the Baltic Sea.Saint Petersburg is often described as the most Western city of Russia.(V. Morozov. The Discourses of Saint Petersburg and the Shaping of a Wider Europe. Peace Research Institute. 2002. Ciaonet.org) Among cities of the world with over one million people, Saint Petersburg is the northernmost. The Centre of Saint Petersburg and Related Groups of Monuments constitute a UNESCO World Heritage Site. Saint Petersburg is also home to The Hermitage, the largest museum in the world.() A large number of foreign consulates, international corporations, banks and other businesses are located in Saint Petersburg.HistoryOn  May, during the Northern War, the Great captured the Swedish fortress of Nyenskans on the Neva river in Ingria. On  May() closer to the estuary (5 km/3 miles inland from the gulf), on Zayachy (Hare) Island, he laid down the and Paul Fortress, which became the first brick and stone building of the new city.()File:Bronze Horseman002.jpg|thumb|upright|The Horseman, monument to Peter the GreatThe city was built by conscripted peasants from all over Russia; a number of Swedish prisoners of war were also involved in some years() under the supervision of Alexander Menshikov. Tens of thousands of serfs died building the city.(St Petersburg: Paris of the North or City of Bones?. The Independent. July 8, 2006) Later the city became the centre of Petersburg Governorate. Peter moved the capital from Moscow to Saint Petersburg in 1712, 9 years before the of Nystad of 1721 ended the war.During the first few years of its existence the city grew spontaneously around Trinity Square on the right bank of the Neva, near the Peter and Paul Fortress. However, Saint Petersburg soon started to develop according to a plan. By 1716 Trezzini had elaborated a project whereby the city centre would be located on Island and shaped by a rectangular grid of canals. The project was not completed, but is still evident in the layout of the streets. In 1716 Alexandre Le Blond was appointed chief architect of Saint Petersburg by Peter the Great.The style of Baroque, developed by Trezzini and other architects and exemplified by such buildings as the Palace, Kunstkamera, and Paul Cathedral, Collegia, became prominent in the city architecture of the early 18th century. In 1724 the Academy of Sciences, University and Academic Gymnasium were established in Saint Petersburg by Peter the Great.In 1725 Peter died at age 52. His push for modernisation of Russia had met opposition from the old-fashioned nobility  resulting in several attempts on his life and a treason case involving his own son.(Matthew S. Anderson, Peter the Great (London: Thames and Hudson, 1978)) Thus, in 1728, II of Russia moved his seat back to Moscow. But four years later, in 1732, under Empress of Russia, Saint Petersburg again became the capital of the Empire. It remained the seat of the Romanov Dynasty and the Imperial Court of the Russian Tzars, as well as the seat of the Russian government, for another 186 years until the communist revolution of 1917.In 17361737 the city suffered from catastrophic fires. To rebuild the damaged boroughs, a new plan was commissioned in 1737 by a committee under Christoph von Mnnich. The city was divided into five boroughs, and the city centre was moved to the Admiralty borough, situated on the east bank between the Neva and Fontanka.File:Palace Square, Saint Petersburg, Russia.jpg|thumb|left|Square, as the main square of the Russian Empire it was the setting of many events of great historical significanceIt developed along three radial streets, which meet at the Admiralty building and are now known as Prospekt (which is now perceived as the main street of the city), Street and Prospekt. A Baroque style dominated the city architecture during the first sixty years, culminating in the Elizabethan Baroque, represented most notably by Bartolomeo Rastrelli with such buildings as the Palace. In the 1760s Baroque architecture was succeeded by architecture.The Commission of Stone Buildings of Moscow and Saint Petersburg established in 1762 ruled that no structure in the city be higher than the Winter Palace and prohibited spacing between buildings. During the reign of the Great in the 1760s1780s, the banks of the Neva were lined with granite embankments.However, it wasnt until 1850 that the first permanent bridge across the Neva, Bridge, was allowed to open. Before that, only bridges were allowed. Canal (dug in 17691833) became the southern limit of the city.Among the most prominent neoclassical architects in Saint Petersburg (including those working within the style) were Vallin de la Mothe (Academy of Arts, Small Hermitage, Gostiny Dvor, New Holland Arch, Church of St. Catherine), Antonio Rinaldi (Palace), Felten (Hermitage, Church), Quarenghi (Academy of Sciences, Theatre, Yusupov Palace), Voronikhin (Mining Institute, Kazan Cathedral), Zakharov (Admiralty building), Thomas de Thomon (Spit of Vasilievsky Island), Carlo Rossi (Palace, Mikhailovsky Palace, Alexandrine Theatre, and Synod Buildings, General Staff Building, design of many streets and squares), Stasov (Triumphal Gate, Trinity Cathedral), and de Montferrand (Isaacs Cathedral, Column). The victory over Napoleonic France in the Patriotic War of 1812 was commemorated with many monuments, including the Column by Montferrand, erected in 1834, and the Triumphal Gate.File:SPB Admiralty 1890-1900.jpg|thumb|left|Saint Petersburg was, for a long time, capital of the EmpireIn 1825 the suppressed revolt against I of Russia took place on the Senate Square in the city, a day after he assumed the throne.By the 1840s neoclassical architecture had given way to various romanticist styles, which dominated until the 1890s, represented by such architects as Stackenschneider (Palace, Palace, Palace, New Michael Palace) and Thon (Moskovsky Rail Terminal).With the emancipation of the peasants undertaken by Alexander II in 1861 and an industrial revolution, the influx of former peasants into the capital increased greatly. Poor boroughs spontaneously emerged on the outskirts of the city. Saint Petersburg surpassed Moscow in population and industrial growth and grew into one of the largest industrial cities in Europe, with a major naval base (in Kronstadt), river and sea port.The names of saints Peter and Paul, bestowed upon original citys citadel and its cathedral (from 1725  a burial vault of Russian emperors) coincidentally were mirrored by the names of the first two assassinated Russian Emperors, Peter III (1762, supposedly a conspiracy led by his wife, Catherine) and Paul I (1801, Zubov and other conspirators who brought to power Alexander I, the son of their victim). The third emperors assassination took place in Petersburg in 1881 when Alexander II fell victim of narodniki (see the of the Savior on Blood).20th centuryFile:Desfile-uno-mayo-II--rusia--russianbolshevik00rossuoft.png|thumb|right|The Revolution of 1917 began in Saint Petersburg when the Bolsheviks stormed the PalaceThe Revolution of 1905 began in Saint Petersburg and spread rapidly into the provinces. In March 1917, during the Revolution Nicholas II abdicated both for himself and on behalf of his son, thus putting an end to the Russian monarchy.in front of Finland Station.jpg|thumb|left|160px|Lenin statue outside the Finland station. Between 1924 and 1991 the city was named Leningrad.The Revolution which ultimately brought Lenin to power, broke out in Petrograd on November 78, 1917 (months mismatch due to Julian/calendar differences).(Rex A. Wade The Russian Revolution, 1917 2005 University Press ISBN 0521841550) After that the city acquired a new descriptive name, the city of three revolutions() which recalls the fact that all these three major developments in the political history of Russia of the early 20th century occurred here.By March 1918 German troops invaded the of Estonia (now a part of Estonia) thus threatening Petrograd with bombardment and invasion, while anti-Soviet troops forming there aimed at taking the capital as well. Thus on March 12, 1918, the Soviets were forced to transfer the government to Moscow.( During the ensuing Civil War in 1919 general Yudenich advancing from Estonia repeated the attempt to capture the city, but Trotsky mobilised the army and forced him to retreat.On January 26, 1924, five days after Lenins death, Petrograd was renamed Leningrad. Later some streets and other toponyms were renamed accordingly. The city has over 230 places associated with the life and activities of Lenin. Some of them were turned into museums,() as well as cruiser Aurora  a symbol of the October Revolution and the oldest ship in the Navy.In the 1920s1930s the poor outskirts were reconstructed into regularly planned boroughs. architecture flourished around that time. Housing was nationalized; many bourgeois apartments were so large, that many people who had previously lived in slums now shared these communal apartments (kommunalkas). By the 1930s, 68% of the population lived in such housing. In 1935 a new general plan was outlined, whereby the city should expand to the south. Constructivism was rejected in favor of a more pompous architecture. Moving the city centre further from the border with Finland, Stalin adopted a plan to build a new city hall with a huge adjacent square at the southern end of Prospekt which could thereby become a new main street of Leningrad. However, after the war, the Soviet-Finnish border was moved to the north, and Nevsky Prospekt with the Palace Square maintained the functions and the role of a city center.In December 1931 Leningrad was administratively separated from Oblast. At that time it included Leningrad Suburban District, some parts of which were transferred back to Leningrad Oblast in 1936 and turned into District, Krasnoselsky District, District and District (renamed Pavlovsky District in 1944).()File:Blokada Leningrad diorama.jpg|thumb|right|A scene from the diorama  of Leningrad. The siege lasted 872 days and took the lives of over a million peopleOn December 1, 1934, Kirov, popular communist leader of Leningrad, was assassinated, which became the pretext for the Purge.(Stalins Terror: High Politics and Mass Repression in the Soviet Union by Barry McLoughlin and Kevin McDermott (eds). Palgrave Macmillan, 2002, p. 6)During War II, Leningrad was besieged by German forces.(Siege of Leningrad. Encyclopdia Britannica) The siege lasted 872 days( from September 1941 to January 1944.(Baldack, Richard H. Leningrad, Siege of Book Encyclopedia, Chicago, 2002, vol.12, page 195) The of Leningrad was one of the longest, most destructive, and most lethal sieges of a major city in history. It isolated the city from most supplies except those provided through the of Life across Ladoga, and more than a million civilians died, mainly from starvation. Many others were eventually evacuated or escaped by themselves, so the city became largely depopulated.File:Hero-Citi coin.jpg|thumb|left|150px|Leningrad was officially awarded the title of City on May 8, 1965On May 1, 1945 Stalin, in his Supreme Commander Order #20, named Leningrad, alongside Stalingrad, Sevastopol, and Odessa, hero cities of the war. However, a statute bestowing the honorary title of Hero City was only officially adopted on 8 May 1965 (the 20th anniversary of the victory in the Great Patriotic War), during the Brezhnev era. The of the Supreme Soviet of the USSR awarded Leningrad as a Hero City the of Lenin and the Star medal for the heroic resistance of the city and tenacity of the survivors of the Siege. The Obelisk bearing the Gold Star sign was installed later, in April 1985. In October 1946 some territories along the northern coast of the of Finland, which had passed to the USSR from Finland in 1940 under the peace treaty following the War were transferred from Leningrad Oblast to Leningrad and divided into Sestroretsky District and District, including the town of Terijoki (renamed Zelenogorsk in 1948).( Leningrad and many of its suburbs were rebuilt over the post-war decades, partially according to pre-war plans. The 1948 general plan for Leningrad featured radial urban development in the north as well as in the south. In 1953 District in Leningrad Oblast was abolished, and parts of its territory, including Pavlovsk, merged with Leningrad. In 1954 the settlements Levashovo, Pargolovo and Pesochny merged with Leningrad.(Leningrad gave its name to the Affair (19491952), a notable event in the postwar political processes in the USSR. A product of clan rivalries (where one side was represented by the leaders of the city Communist Party organization  one of the most significant in the country), it afflicted only an elite circle, so the victims of this affair were comparatively few. 23 leaders were sentenced to death, 181 to prison or exile (exonerated in 1954). About 2 thousand were expelled from the party and Komsomol and removed from leadership positions.()The Leningrad Metro underground rapid transit system, designed before the war, opened in 1955 with its first eight stations decorated with marble and bronze. However, after the death of Stalin, the perceived ornamental excesses of the Stalinist architecture were abandoned. In the 1960s1980s, as many new residential boroughs were built on the outskirts with few series of functionalist apartment blocks identical to each other, many families moved there from kommunalkas in the city centre in order to live in separate apartments. On June 12, 1991, simultaneously with the first Russian presidential elections the city authorities arranged the mayoral elections and the referendum upon the name of the city. The turnout was 65%; 66.13% of the total count of votes went to Sobchak who became the first democratically elected mayor of the city. Meanwhile the economy conditions continued to deteriorate.  For the first time since 1940s the food rationing was introduced, and the city received humanitarian food aid from abroad.( This dramatic time was being depicted in photographic series of Russian photographer Titarenko.(Ollman, Leah. Russian Photos Trace Images of Mortality and Memory. Angeles Times , August 3, 2001)(Dunne. Camera in a City of Shadows. Times, Dublin, May 05 , 2007) In 1995 a northern section of the Kirovsko-Vyborgskaya Line of the Petersburg Metro was cut off by underground flooding, thus creating a major obstacle to the city development for almost ten years.In 1996 Sobchak was defeated by Vladimir Yakovlev in the elections of the head of the city administration. The title of the city head was changed from mayor to governor. In 2000 Yakovlev was reelected again. His second term expired in 2004; the long-awaited restoration of broken subway connection was expected to finish by that time. However in 2003 Yakovlev suddenly resigned, leaving a governors office to Matviyenko. After that the law on the City Governor was changed, breaking the tradition of its democratic election by a universal suffrage, and in 2006 Matvienko was reapproved as governor by the city legislature. The residential building had intensified again, real estate prices inflated greatly which caused many new problems for the preserving of the historical part of the city.Although the central part of the city is watched by UNESCO (there are about 8,000 architectural monuments in Petersburg), the safety of its historical and architectural environment became disputable(Zagraevsky. Will Saint Petersburg share the same fate as Moscow? Zagraevsky.com) since after 2005 the demolition of older buildings in the historical centre went into practice.() In 2006 Gazprom announced an ambitious project to erect a 396-meter skyscraper opposite to Smolny, which could result in irretrievable loss of the unique line of Petersburg landscape. Urgent protests of citizen and prominent public figures of Russia against this project were not considered by Governor Matvienko and the city authorities until December 2010, when after the statement of President Medvedev it was finally decided to find a more appropriate location for this construction site.GeographyThe area of Saint Petersburg city proper is . The area of the federal subject is , which contains Saint Petersburg proper (consisting of eighty-one okrugs), nine municipal towns  (Kolpino, Selo, Kronstadt, Lomonosov, Pavlovsk, Petergof, Pushkin, Sestroretsk, Zelenogorsk)  and twenty-one municipal settlements.File:Petersburg Nikolskiy from Sowjetskaja Hotel.jpg|thumb|left|The golden-domed Isaacs Cathedral dominates the city skylinePetersburg is situated on the middle taiga lowlands along the shores of the Neva Bay of the of Finland, and islands of the river delta. The largest are Island (besides the island between Obvodny canal and Fontanka, and Kotlin in the Neva Bay), Petrogradsky, Dekabristov and Krestovsky. The latter together with Yelagin and Kamenny island are covered mostly by parks. The Isthmus, North of the city, is a popular resort area. In the south Saint Petersburg crosses the Baltic-Ladoga Klint and meets the Plateau.The elevation of Saint Petersburg ranges from the level to its highest point of  at the Orekhovaya Hill in the Heights in the south. Part of the citys territory west of Prospekt is no higher than  above sea level, and has suffered from numerous floods. in Saint Petersburg are triggered by a long wave in the Sea, caused by meteorological conditions, winds and shallowness of the Neva Bay. The four most disastrous floods occurred in 1824 ( above sea-level, during which over 300 buildings were destroyed(The level of flooding is measured near Petersburg Mining Institute, which is normally  a.s.l.)), 1924 , 1777 , 1955  and 1975 . To prevent floods, the Petersburg Dam has been constructed.( . .     , Leningrad: , 1981.)Since the 18th century the terrain in the city has been raised artificially, at some places by more than , making mergers of several islands, and changing the hydrology of the city. Besides the Neva and its tributaries, other important rivers of the federal subject of Saint Petersburg are Sestra, Okhta and Izhora. The largest lake is Sestroretsky Razliv in the north, followed by Razliv, Suzdal Lakes and other smaller lakes.Due to location at ca. 60 N latitude the length in Petersburg varies across seasons, ranging from 5:53 to 18:50. A period from mid-May to mid-July when twilight may last all night is called the white nights.ClimateBy climate classification Petersburg is classified as Dfb, a continental climate of the cool summer subtype. Distinct moderating influence of the Sea cyclones result in warm, humid and short summers and long, cold wet winters.The average daily temperature in July is ; maximum about  occurred during the Northern Hemisphere summer heat wave. A winter minimum of  was recorded in 1883. The average annual temperature is . The River Neva within the city limits usually freezes up in NovemberDecember and break-up occurs in April. From December to March there are 123 days average with snow cover, which reaches the average of  by February. The frost-free period in the city lasts on average for about 135 days. The city has a climate slightly warmer than its suburbs. Weather conditions are quite variable all year round.(See Historical weather records for Saint Petersburg (since 1932) and Historical weather in Saint Petersburg for further information.)Average annual precipitation varies across the city, averaging  per year and reaching maximum in late summer. Soil moisture is almost always high because of lower evapotranspiration due to the cool climate. Air humidity is 78% on average, while overcast is 165 days a year on average.dateAugust 2010ToponymyFile:St. Petersburg church.jpg|upright|left|thumb|of the Savior on BloodThe first and fairly rich chapter of the history of the local toponymy is the story of the own name of the city itself. The day of Peter I falls on June, 29 when the Orthodox Church observes the memory of Saint Apostles Peter and Paul. The consecration of the small wooden church in their names (its construction began simultaneously with the citadel) made them the heavenly patrons of the and Paul Fortress, while St. Peter at the same time became the eponym of the whole city.Explanation of Sankt- by the appreciation of Dutch culture by Peter the Great is one of common misconceptions: Saint- in Dutch is Sint.(Cf. Sant Georg am See in an article written in Dutch.) The sample which czar Peter followed sounds in the names of another European cities: Goar in Germany, Sankt Michael in Austria and some others, of which the closest to Sankt Petersburg was Michel in rival Empire (now Mikkeli in Finland). Sankt- in these toponyms is merely a Germanized form of .A 14-15-letter long name, composed of the three roots proved too cumbersome, and a lot of shortened versions appeared in habitual use. The first General Governor of the city Menshikov is maybe also the author of the first nickname of Petersburg which he called  (Petri). It took some years until the known Russian spelling of this name finally settled. In 1740s Lomonosov uses a derivative of  (Petropolis, ) in a russified form Petropol (). A combo Piterpol () also appears at this time.( .      (Do you know your city?). Leningrad, 1958, p. 58.) Anyway, eventually the usage of prefix Sankt- ceased except for the formal official documents, where a 3-letter abbreviation  (SPb) was very widely used as well.In the 1830s Pushkin translated the foreign city name of Saint Petersburg to the more Russian Petrograd in one of his poems. However, it was only on , after the war with Germany had began, did tzar Nicholas II rename the capital to Petrograd. Since the prefix Saint was omitted,() this act also changed the eponym and the patron of the city, from Peter to Peter the Great, its founder.After the Revolution, and until the city was renamed Leningrad in January 1924, the name   (Red Petrograd) was often used in newspapers and other prints.In the referendum on reversing the renaming of Leningrad on June 12, 1991, renaming it to Petrograd was not an option. Because of this only 54.86% of the voters (with a turnout of 65%) supported St.Petersburg. This change officially took effect on September 6, 1991.() Meanwhile the oblast which administrative center is also in Petersburg is still named Leningradskaya.Having passed the role of capital to Petersburg, Moscow never relinquished the title of capital, being called pervoprestolnaya (first-throned) for 200 years. A mirroring name for Petersburg in this connotation, the Northern Capital, is reintroduced today in the sense that several federal institutions were moved from Moscow to Petersburg recently. Solemn descriptive names like the city of three revolutions and the cradle of the revolution used in Soviet era reminded the pivot events of national history which occurred here. For their part, poetic names of the city, like the of the North and the Northern Palmyra emphasize town-planning and architectural features contrasting these parallels to the northern location of this megalopolis.() Petropolis is a translation of a city name to Greek, and is also a kind of descriptive name: ~ is a Greek root for stone, so the city from stone emphasizes the material which had been forcibly made obligatory for construction from the very first years of the city.(After 1991 a wave of re-namings started within the city. It affected not only toponyms of the Soviet era, but in some cases their pre-revolutionary ones (in 1993 Gogol Street which bore the name of Gogol since 1902,() was renamed to Malaya Morskaya).DemographicsSaint Petersburg is the second largest city in Russia. Per the preliminary results of the 2010 Census, the citys population is 4,848,700, or 3.39% of the total population of Russia;() up from 4,661,219 (3.21%) recorded in the 2002 census.( The 2002 census recorded twenty-two groups of more than two thousand persons each. The ethnic composition was: Russian 84.72%, Ukrainian 1.87%, Belarusians 1.17%, Jewish 0.78%, Tatar 0.76%, Armenian 0.41%, Azeri 0.36%, Georgian 0.22%, Chuvash 0.13%, Polish 0.10%, and many other smaller ethnic groups, while 7.89% of the inhabitants declined to state their ethnicity.()File:Saint Petersburg population history.svg|thumb|Population history of Saint Petersburg( .    ...  ?  Weekly 163  164, August 115, 2004.)(  ./ . ..   .. .  .2.  : , 2003. .1617)The 20th century saw hectic ups and downs in population. From 2.4 million in 1916 it had dropped to less than 740,000 by 1920 during the Russian Revolution of 1917 and Civil War. The minorities of Germans, Poles, Finns, Estonians and Latvians were almost completely transferred from Leningrad during the 1930s.(Martin, Terry (1998). The Origins of Soviet Ethnic Cleansing. Journal of Modern History 70.4, 813861.) From 1941 to the end of 1943, population dropped from 3 million to less than 600,000, as people died in battles, starved to death during the of Leningrad, or were evacuated. After the siege, some of the evacuees returned, but most influx was due to migration from other parts of the Soviet Union. The city absorbed about 3 million people in the 1950s and grew to over 5 million in the 1980s. From 1991 to 2006 the citys population decreased to the current 4.6 million, while the suburban population increased due to privatization of land and massive move to suburbs. Based on the 2010 census results the current population is over 4.8 million.( .    ...  ?  Weekly 163  164, August 115, 2004.)(Russian source: Encyclopedia of Saint Petersburg  . .  ( ).  -) The rate remains lower than the death rate; people over 65 constitute more than twenty percent of the population; and the median age is about 40 years.(Russian statistics   -   -)People in urban Saint Petersburg live mostly in apartments. Between 1918 and the 1990s, the Soviets nationalised housing and forced residents to share communal apartments (kommunalkas). With 68% living in shared flats in the 1930s, Leningrad was the city in the USSR with the largest number of kommunalkas. Resettling residents of kommunalkas is now on the way out, albeit shared apartments are still not uncommon. As new boroughs were built on the outskirts in the 1950s1980s, over half a million low income families eventually received free apartments, and about an additional hundred thousand condos were purchased. While economic and social activity is concentrated in the historic city centre, the richest part of Saint Petersburg, most people live in commuter areas. For the first half of 2007, the birth rate was 9.1 per 1000.()GovernmentFile:Sankt Petersburg-Regierungssitz Smolny.jpg|thumb|left|Institute, the seat of the governor.Saint Petersburg is a federal subject of Russia.() The political life of Saint Petersburg is regulated by the city charter adopted by the city legislature in 1998.() The superior executive body is the Petersburg City Administration, led by the governor (mayor before 1996). Saint Petersburg has a single-chamber legislature, the Saint Petersburg Legislative Assembly.According to the federal law passed in 2004, heads of federal subjects, including the governor of Saint Petersburg, are nominated by the of Russia and approved by local legislatures. If the legislature disapproves the nominee, it is dissolved. The former governor, Matviyenko, was approved according to the new system in December 2006. She was the only woman governor in the whole of Russia till her resignation on August 22, 2011. Matviyenko stood for elections as member of the Regional Council of St. Petersburg and won comprehensively with allegations of rigging and ballot stuffing by the opposition. Russian President Dmitry Medvedev has already backed her for the position of Speaker to the Federal Assembly of the Russian Federation and her election qualifies her for that job. After her resignation, Poltavchenko was appointed as the new acting governor the same day. Saint Petersburg city is currently divided into eighteen districts. Saint Petersburg is also the administrative centre of Oblast, and of the Federal District.() The Constitutional Court of Russia moved to Saint Petersburg from Moscow in May 2008.Saint Petersburg and Leningrad Oblast, being two different federal subjects, share a number of local departments of federal executive agencies and courts, such as court of arbitration, police, FSB, postal service, drug enforcement administration, penitentiary service, federal registration service, and other federal services.EconomySt.Pg.JPG|thumb|left|The Old Saint Petersburg Stock Exchange, or Bourse, houses the Central Naval MuseumSaint Petersburg is a major trade gateway, financial and industrial centre of Russia specialising in oil and gas trade, shipbuilding yards, aerospace industry, radio and electronics, software and computers; machine building, heavy machinery and transport, including tanks and other military equipment, mining, instrument manufacture, ferrous and nonferrous metallurgy (production of aluminium alloys), chemicals, pharmaceuticals, equipment, publishing and printing, food and catering, wholesale and retail, textile and apparel industries, and many other businesses. It was also home to Lessner, one of Russias two pioneering automobile manufacturers (along with Russo-Baltic), Lessner; founded by machine tool and boiler maker G. A. Lessner in 1904, with designs by Loutsky, it survived until 1910.(Georgano, G. N. Cars: Early and Vintage, 18861930. (London: Grange-Universal, 1985))10% of the worlds power turbines are made there at the LMZ, which built over two thousand turbines for power plants across the world. Major local industries are Shipyard, Shipyard, LOMO, Plant, Elektrosila, Zavody; also registered in Saint Petersburg are Sovkomflot, Fuel Company and SIBUR among other major Russian and international companies.Saint Petersburg has three large cargo seaports: Bolshoi Port Saint Petersburg, Kronstadt, and Lomonosov. International cruise liners have been served at the passenger port at Vokzal on the south-west of Island. In 2008 the first two berths were opened at the New Passenger Port on the west of the island.(Discoverthebaltic.com Discover the Baltic online guide to Baltic cruise ports) The new port is part of the citys Marine Facade development project(Mfspb.ru St Petersburg Marine Facade development project) and is due to have seven berths in operation by 2010.A complex system of riverports on both banks of the Neva river are interconnected with the system of seaports, thus making Saint Petersburg the main link between the Baltic sea and the rest of Russia through the Volga-Baltic Waterway.The Petersburg Mint (Monetny Dvor), founded in 1724, is one of the largest mints in the world, it mints Russian coins, medals and badges. Saint Petersburg is also home to the oldest and largest Russian foundry, Monumentskulptura, which made thousands of sculptures and statues that are now gracing public parks of Saint Petersburg, as well as many other cities. Monuments and bronze statues of the Czars, as well as other important historic figures and dignitaries, and other world famous monuments, such as the sculptures by Clodt von Jrgensburg, Troubetzkoy, Antokolsky, and others, were made there.In 2007 Toyota opened a Camry plant after investing 5 billion dollars in Shushary, one of the southern suburbs of Saint Petersburg. Opel, Hyundai and Nissan have signed deals with the Russian government to build their automotive plants in Saint Petersburg too. Automotive and auto-parts industry is on the rise there during the last decade.Medvedev 5 June 2009-10.jpg|right|thumb|The Saint Petersburg International Economic Forum is a major Russian investment forumSaint Petersburg is the location of a significant brewery and distillery industry. It is known as the beer capital of Russia, due to the supply and quality of local water, contributing over 30% of the domestic production of beer with its five large-scale breweries including Europes second largest brewery Baltika, Vena (both operated by BBH), Heineken Brewery, Stepan Razin (both by Heineken) and brewery (SUN-InBev).The city has a lot of local distilleries which produce a broad range of vodka brands. The oldest ones is LIVIZ (founded in 1897). Among the youngest is Standard Vodka introduced in Moscow in 1998, which opened in 2006 a new $60 million distillery in Petersburg (an area of 30,000 square meters, production rate of 22,500 bottles per hour. In 2007 this brand was exported to over 70 countries.(Russian Standard Vodka Ranked 4th Fastest Growing Premium Spirits Brand Worldwide Impact, 2007.)Saint Petersburg has the second largest construction industry in Russia, including commercial, housing and road construction.In 2006 Saint Petersburgs city budget was 179.9 billion rubles (about 6.651 billion USDollars at 2006 exchange rates),() and is planned to double by 2012. The federal subjects gross regional product as of 2005 was 667.905 billion rubles (about 23.611 billion USDollars at 2005 exchange rates), ranked 4th in Russia, after Moscow, Oblast, and Oblast,() or 145,503.3  rubles per capita (about 5,143.6 USDollars at 2005 exchange rates), ranked 12th among Russias federal subjects,() contributed mostly by wholesale and retail trade and repair services (24.7%) as well as processing industry (20.9%) and transportation and telecommunications (15.1%).()Budget revenues of the city in 2009 amounted to 294.3 billion rubles (about 10.044 billion USDollars at 2009 exchange rates), expenses  336.3 billion rubles (about 11.477 billion USDollars at 2009 exchange rates). The budget deficit amounted to about 42 billion rubles.(Data of the Government of Saint-Petersburg) (about 1.433 billion USDollars at 2009 exchange rates)CityscapeFile:SPB Izaakkathedraal.jpg|thumb|left|Isaacs CathedralSaint Petersburg has no skyscrapers and a relatively low skyline. Current regulations forbid construction of high buildings in the city centre. The  tall Petersburg TV Tower is the tallest structure in the city, while the  and Paul Cathedral is by far the highest building. However, there is a controversial project endorsed by the city authorities and known as the Ohkta Centre to build a  supertall skyscraper. In 2008 the Monuments Fund included the Saint Petersburg historic skyline on the watch list of the 100 most endangered sites due to the expected construction, which threatens to alter it drastically.()Unlike in Moscow, in Saint Petersburg the historic architecture of the city centre, mostly consisting of Baroque and neoclassical buildings of the 18th and 19th centuries, has been largely preserved; although a number of buildings were demolished after the Bolsheviks seizure of power, during the Siege of Leningrad and in recent years.  The oldest of the remaining building is a wooden house built for Peter I in 1703 on the shore of the Neva near Trinity Square. Since 1991 the Centre of Saint Petersburg and Related Groups of Monuments in Saint Petersburg and Leningrad Oblast have been listed by UNESCO as a Heritage Site.The ensemble of and Paul Fortress with the and Paul Cathedral takes a dominant position on Zayachy Island along the right bank of the River Neva. Each noon a cannon fires a blank shot from the fortress. The Petersburg Mosque, the largest mosque in Europe when opened in 1913, is situated on the right bank nearby. The of Vasilievsky Island, which splits the river into two largest armlets, the Neva and Neva, is connected to the northern bank (Island) via the Bridge and occupied by the Saint Petersburg Stock Exchange and Rostral Columns. The southern coast of Vasilyevsky Island along the Bolshaya Neva features some of the citys oldest buildings, dating from the 18th century, including the Kunstkamera, Collegia, Palace and Academy of Arts. It hosts one of two campuses of Petersburg State University.buildingOn the southern, left bank of the Neva, connected to the spit of Vasilyevsky Island via the Bridge, lie the Admiralty building, the vast Museum complex stretching along the Embankment, which includes the baroque Palace, former official residence of Russian emperors, as well as the neoclassical Palace. The Winter Palace faces Square, the citys main square with the Column.Prospekt, also situated on the left bank of the Neva, is the main avenue in the city. It starts at the Admiralty and runs eastwards next to Palace Square. Nevsky Prospekt crosses the Moika (Green Bridge), Canal (Bridge), Garden Street, the Fontanka (Bridge), meets Prospekt and proceeds to Uprising Square near the Moskovsky railway station, where it meets Prospekt and turns to the Nevsky Lavra. Passage, Church of St. Catherine, Book House (former Singer Manufacturing Company Building in the Nouveau style), Hotel Europe, Church of Saint Peter and Saint Paul, Gostiny Dvor, Russian National Library, Alexandrine Theatre behind Mikeshins statue of Catherine the Great, Kazan Cathedral, Palace, Palace and Palace are all situated along that avenue.The Alexander Nevsky Lavra, intended to house the relics of St. Alexander Nevsky, is an important centre of Christian education in Russia. It also contains the Cemetery with graves of many notable Petersburgers.On the territory between the Neva and Nevsky Prospekt the of the Savior on Blood, Mikhailovsky Palace housing the Museum, Field of Mars, St. Michaels Castle, Garden, Palace, Institute and Convent are located.Many notable landmarks are situated to the west and south of the Admiralty Building, including the Trinity Cathedral, Palace, Hotel Astoria, famous Theatre, Holland Island, Isaacs Cathedral, the largest in the city, and Senate Square, also known as Decemberists Square with the Horseman, 18th century equestrian monument to Peter the Great, which is considered among the citys most recognisable symbols.s.jpg|thumb|Kazan CathedralOther symbols of Saint Petersburg include the vane in the shape of a small ship on top of the Admiraltys golden spire and the golden angel on top of the Peter and Paul Cathedral. The Palace Bridge drawn at night is yet another symbol of the city. Every night during the navigation period from April to November, 22 bridges across the Neva and main canals are drawn to let ships pass in and out of the Baltic Sea according to a schedule.(Schedule for main drawbridges across the Neva river (Official Russian schedule): MR7.ru) It wasnt until 2004 that the first high bridge across the Neva, which doesnt need to be drawn, Obukhovsky Bridge, was opened. There are hundreds of smaller bridges in Saint Petersburg spanning across numerous canals and distributaries of the Neva, some of the most important of which are the Moika, Fontanka, Canal, Canal, Karpovka and Smolenka. Due to the intricate web of canals, Saint Petersburg is often called of the North. The rivers and canals in the city centre are lined with granite embankments. The embankments and bridges are separated from rivers and canals by granite or iron parapets.Southern suburbs of the city feature former imperial residences, including Petergof, with majestic fountain cascades and parks, Tsarskoe Selo, with the baroque Palace and the neoclassical Palace, and Pavlovsk, which contains a domed palace of Emperor Paul and one of the largest English-style parks in Europe. Some other residences situated nearby and making part of the world heritage site, including a castle and park in Gatchina, actually belong to Oblast rather than Saint Petersburg. Another notable suburb is Kronstadt with its 19th century fortifications and naval monuments, occupying the Island in the Gulf of Finland.Since around the end of the 20th century a great deal of active building and restoration works have been carried out in a number of the citys older districts.The authorities have recently been compelled to transfer the ownership of state-owned private residences in the city centre to private lessors.Many older buildings have been reconstructed to allow their use as apartments and penthouses.Some of these structures, such as the Petersburg Commodity and Stock Exchange have been recognised as town-planning errors.(accessdateAugust 5, 2009)MuseumsFile:Russian museam.JPG|thumb|left|The Museum.Saint Petersburg is home to more than two hundred museums, many of them hosted in historic buildings. The largest of the museums is the Museum, featuring interiors of the former imperial residence and a vast collection of art. The Museum is a large museum devoted to the Russian fine art specifically. The apartments of some famous Petersburgers, including Pushkin, Dostoyevsky, Rimsky-Korsakov, Chaliapin, Blok, Nabokov, Akhmatova, Zoshchenko, Brodsky, as well as some palace and park ensembles of the southern suburbs and notable architectural monuments such as St. Isaacs Cathedral, have also been turned into public museums.The Kunstkamera, with its collection established in 1714 by Peter the Great to collect curiosities from all over the world, is sometimes considered the first museum in Russia, which has evolved into the present-day Peter the Great Museum of Anthropology and Ethnography. The Ethnography Museum, which has been split from the Russian Museum, is devoted to the cultures of the people of Russia, the former Soviet Union and Russian Empire.Other notable museums include the Naval Museum hosted in the building of the former stock exchange and Zoological Museum, the Railway Museum, Museum of the Siege of Leningrad, Museum of contemporary art Erarta, Petersburg Museum of History in the and Paul Fortress and Artillery Museum, which in fact includes not only artillery items, but also a huge collection of other military equipment, uniform and decorations.ParksGrand Cascade at Peterhof.Saint Petersburg is home to numerous parks and gardens, some of the most famous of which are situated in the southern suburbs, including one of the largest gardens of Europe in Pavlovsk. Sosnovka is the largest park within the limits of the city proper, occupying 240 ha. The Garden is the oldest one, dating back to the early 18th century and designed in the regular style. It is situated on the southern bank of the Neva at the head of the Fontanka and is famous for its cast iron railing and marble sculptures.Among other notable parks are the Maritime Victory Park on Island and the Moscow Victory Park in the south, both commemorating the victory over Nazi Germany in the Second World War, as well as the Central Park of Culture and Leisure occupying Island and the Tauride Garden around the Palace. The most common trees grown in the parks are the English oak, Norway maple, green ash, silver birch, Siberian larch, blue spruce, crack willow, limes, and poplars. Important dendrological collections dating back to the 19th century are hosted by the Petersburg Botanical Garden and the Park of the Forestry Academy.TourismFile:Saint Petersburg Philharmonia - Bolshoi Zal.jpg|thumb|right|200px|The Bolshoi Zal (Grand Hall) of Petersburg PhilharmoniaSaint Petersburg has significant historical and cultural heritage and is thus a highly attractive tourist destination.The 18th and 19th century architectural ensemble of the city and its environs is preserved in virtually unchanged form. For various reasons (including large-scale destruction during World War II and construction of modern buildings during the postwar period in the largest historical centers of Europe), Saint Petersburg has now become a unique nature reserve of European architectural styles of the past three centuries. Saint Petersburgs loss of capital city status significantly helped the city in retaining many pre-revolutionary buildings, as modern architectural prestige projects tended to be built in Moscow; this largely prevented the rise of mid- to late-20th century architecture in the city and helped maintain the architectural appearance of the historic center.Saint Petersburg is inscribed on the UNESCO World Heritage list as an area with 36 historical architectural complexes, and around 4000 outstanding individual monuments of architecture, history and culture. New tourist programs and sightseeing tours have been developed for those wishing to see Saint Petersburgs cultural heritage.File:Ermit (26).jpg|thumb|upright|The Small Italian Skylight Room in the MuseumThe city has 221 museums, 2000 libraries, more than 80 theaters, 100 concert organizations, 45 galleries and exhibition halls, 62 cinemas, and around 80 other cultural establishments. Every year the city hosts around 100 festivals and various competitions of art and culture, including more than 50 international ones.Despite the economic instability of the 1990s not a single major theatre or museum has been closed in Saint Petersburg; on the contrary many new ones have opened, for example, a private museum of puppets (opened in 1999) is the third museum of its kind in Russia, where collections of more than 2000 dolls are presented, including The multinational Saint Petersburg and Pushkins Petersburg.The museum world of Saint Petersburg is incredibly diverse. The city is not only home to the world-famous Hermitage Museum and The Russian State Museum with its rich collection of Russian art, but also the palaces of Saint Petersburg and its suburbs, so-called small town museums and others like the museum of famous Russian writer Dostoyevsky; Museum of Musical Instruments, the museum of decorative arts and the museum of professional orientation. File:Magic Sankt Petersburg - Kunstkammer at White Nights (Weisse Nchte).jpg|left|thumb|The KunstkameraThe musical life of Saint Petersburg is rich and diverse, with the city now playing host to a number of annual carnivals. Ballet performances occupy a special place in the cultural life of Saint Petersburg. The Petersburg School of Ballet is deservedly named as one of the best in the world. Traditions of the Russian classical school have been passed down from generation to generation amongst outstanding educators. The art of famous and prominent Saint Petersburg dancers like Rudolf Nureyev, Natalia Makarova, Mikhail Baryshnikov was, and is, admired throughout the world. Contemporary Petersburg ballet is made up not only of traditional Russian classical school, but also ballets by those like Boris Eifmans, who expanded the scope of strict classical Russian ballet to almost unimaginable limits. Remaining faithful to the classical basis (he was a choreographer in Vaganova Academy of Dance), he combined classical ballet with the avant-garde style, and then, in turn, with acrobatics, rhythmic gymnastics, dramatic expressiveness, cinema, color, light, and finally with spoken word. With a packed cultural program and a large number of world heritage sites, as well as a developing tourist infrastructure, Saint Petersburg has started to enter into the number of the worlds leading centers of culture and tourism.TransportationFile:  (122).JPG|thumb|right|The Obukhovsky Bridge is a constituent part of the Petersburg Ring RoadSaint Petersburg is a major transport hub. The first Russian railway was built here in 1837, and since then the citys transport infrastructure has continued to develop and keep pace with the growth of the city. Petersburg has an extensive system of local roads and railway services, maintains a large public transport system that includes the Saint Petersburg tram and the Petersburg Metro, and is home to a number of riverine services that convey passengers around the city efficiently and in relative comfort.The city is connected to the rest of Russia and the wider world by a number of federal highways and national and international rail routes. International Airport serves the majority of air passengers departing from or arriving to the city.RailwaysFile:Sapsan Russia.jpg|thumb|left|The Sapsan high-speed train runs between Novgorod, Moscow and Saint PetersburgToday, the city is the final destination of a web of intercity and suburban railways, served by five different railway terminals (Baltiysky, Finlyandsky, Ladozhsky, Moskovsky, and Vitebsky),(Until 2001, the Rail Terminal served as a major station; it now is a railway museum.Reconstruction of the Warsaw Railway Station) as well as dozens of non-terminal railway stations within the federal subject. Saint Petersburg has international railway connections to Helsinki, Finland, Berlin, Germany, and all former republics of the USSR. The Helsinki railway was built in 1870, , commutes three times a day, in a journey lasting about three and a half hours with the new Allegro train.The Moscow-Saint Petersburg Railway opened in 1851, ; the commute to Moscow now requires from three and a half to nine hours.()In 2009 Railways launched a high speed service on the Moscow-Saint Petersburg route. The new train, known as Sapsan, is a deriative of the popular Velaro train; various versions of which are already in service in a number of European countries. It set records for the fastest train in Russia on May 2, 2009, travelling at 281 km/h() and on May 7, 2009, travelling at .Since December 12, 2010 Trains, a joint venture between Railways and VR (Finnish Railways), has been running Alstom Pendolino operated high-speed services between Saint Petersburgs Finlyandsky and Helsinkis Central railway stations. These services are branded as Allegro trains.File:St. Petersburg Russia Hydrofoil boat.jpg|thumb|right|Hydrofoil docking in St.Petersburg upon arrival from Palace (2008).WaterwaysThe city is also served by the passenger and cargo seaports in the Neva Bay of the of Finland, Sea, the river port higher up the Neva, and tens of smaller passenger stations on both banks of the Neva river. It is a terminus of the Volga-Baltic and White Sea-Baltic waterways.In 2004 the first high bridge that doesnt need to be drawn, a  long Obukhovsky Bridge, was opened. Meteor hydrofoils link the city centre to the coastal towns of Kronstadt, Lomonosov, Petergof, Sestroretsk, and Zelenogorsk from May through October. Throughout the city, smaller boats and water-taxis maneuver the many canals in the warmer months.The shipping company Peter Line operates two ferries which sails from Helsinki to St Petersburg and from Stockholm to St Petersburg.Roads and public transportFile:ST Petersburg Metro Kirovsky Zvod.jpg|thumb|left|The decoration of Petersburg Metro (Kirovsky Zavod Station)Saint Petersburg has an extensive city-funded network of transport (buses, trams, trolleybuses) and several hundred routes served by marshrutkas. Trams in Saint Petersburg used to be the main transport; in the 1980s, Leningrad had the largest tramway network in the world, but many tramway rail tracks were dismantled in the 2000s.Buses carry up to 3 million passengers daily, serving over 250 urban and a number of suburban bus routes. Petersburg Metro underground rapid transit system was opened in 1955; it now has five lines with 64 stations, connecting all five railway terminals, and carrying 3.4 million passengers daily. Metro stations are decorated in marble and bronze.Traffic jams are common in the city, because of high daily traffic volumes between the commuter boroughs and the city centre, intercity traffic, and at times excessive snow in winter. Five segments of the Petersburg Ring Road were opened between 2002 and 2006.Saint Petersburg is part of the important corridor linking Scandinavia to Russia and Europe. The city is a node of the international European routes E18 towards Helsinki, E20 towards Tallinn, E95 towards Pskov, Kiev and Odessa and E105 towards Petrozavodsk, Murmansk and Kirkenes (north) and towards Moscow and Kharkiv (south).airport.jpg|thumb|right|Pulkovo International Airport.Air travelSaint Petersburg is also served by Pulkovo International Airport,(Rossiya (Pulkovo): Pulkovo Aviation Enterprise) and by three smaller commercial and cargo airports in the suburbs.Pulkovo airport opened to passengers as a small aerodrome in 1931. As of 2007, the airport is the 4th busiest in Russia after Moscows Domodedovo, Sheremetyevo and Vnukovo airports. With two main terminals (one domestic, one international), Pulkovo is widely regarded as one of the larger and more modern airports in the Russian Federation. However, as it is anticipated that by 2025 Pulkovo airport will handle around 17 million passengers annually, plans have been laid out to build a new mid-field terminal extension directly to the north of Terminal 1 (domestic); it is planned to contain 18 gates. Construction began in November 2010, and is scheduled to complete in 2013.()There is a regular, 24/7, rapid-bus transit connection (marshrutka) between Pulkovo airport and the city center.EducationFile:VO Universitet 12 Kollegiy 02-03-2008.jpg|thumb|right|Petersburg State UniversityAs of 2006/2007 there were 1024 kindergartens, 716 public schools and 80 vocational schools in Saint Petersburg.() The largest of the public education institutions is Petersburg State University, enrolling approximately 32,000 undergraduate students; and the largest non-governmental education institutions is the Institute of International Economic Relations, Economics and Law. Other famous universities are Petersburg Polytechnical University, University and Saint Petersburg Military engineering-technical university. However, the public universities are all federal property and dont belong to the city.CultureMusicAmong the citys more than fifty theaters is the world-famous Mariinsky Theater (also known as the Kirov Theater in the USSR ), home to the Ballet company and opera. Leading ballet dancers, such as Nijinsky, Pavlova, Rudolph Nureyev, Baryshnikov, Ulanova and Makarova, were principal stars of the Mariinsky ballet.Shostakovich was born and brought up in Saint Petersburg, and dedicated his Seventh Symphony to the city, calling it the Leningrad Symphony. He wrote the symphony while in Leningrad during the German siege. The 7th symphony was premiered in 1942; its performance in the besieged Leningrad at the Bolshoy Philharmonic Hall under the baton of conductor Eliasberg was heard over the radio and lifted the spirits of the survivors.() In 1992 a reunion performance of the 7th Symphony by the (then) 14 survivors was played in the same hall as they done half a century ago.() The Leningrad Philharmonic Orchestra remained one of the best known symphony orchestras in the world under the leadership of conductors Mravinsky and Temirkanov.The Imperial Choral Capella was founded and modeled after the royal courts of other European capitals.Saint Petersburg has been home to the newest movements in music in the country. The first jazz band in the Soviet Union was founded here by Utyosov in the 1920s, under the patronage of Dunayevsky. The first jazz club in the Soviet Union was founded here in the 1950s, and later was named club Kvadrat. In 1956 the popular ensemble Druzhba was founded by Bronevitsky and Piekha, becoming the first popular band in the 1950s USSR. In the 1960s student rock-groups Argonavty, Kochevniki and others pioneered a series of unofficial and underground rock concerts and festivals. In 1972 Grebenshchikov founded the band Aquarium, that later grew to huge popularity. Since then Peters rock music style was formed.In the 1970s many bands came out from underground and eventually founded the Leningrad rock club, which has been providing stage to such bands as Piknik, DDT, Kino, headed by the legendary Tsoi, Igry, Mify, Zemlyane, Alisa and many other popular groups. The first Russian-style happening show mekhanika, mixing over 300 people and animals on stage, was directed by the multi-talented Kuryokhin in the 1980s.Todays Saint Petersburg boasts many notable musicians of various genres, from popular Leningrads Shnurov and Tequilajazzz, to rock veterans Shevchuk, Butusov and Boyarsky.The Nights Festival in Saint Petersburg is famous for spectacular fireworks and massive show celebrating the end of school year.FilmFile: .jpg|left|thumb|Khabensky, famous for his roles in Night Watch, Watch and Admiral, is a native of Saint PetersburgOver 250 international and Russian movies were filmed in Saint Petersburg.(International Movie Database) Well over a thousand feature films about tsars, revolution, people and stories set in Saint Petersburg were produced worldwide, but were not filmed in the city. First film studios were founded in Saint Petersburg in the 20th century, and since the 1920s Lenfilm has been the largest film studio based in Saint Petersburg. The first foreign feature movie filmed entirely in Saint Petersburg was the 1997 production of Tolstoys Anna Karenina, starring Marceau and Bean, and made by international team of British, American, French and Russian filmmakers.The cult comedy Irony of Fate() (also  ,    !) is set in Saint Petersburg and pokes fun at Soviet city planning. The 1985 film White Nights received considerable Western attention for having captured genuine Leningrad street scenes at a time when filming in the Union by Western production companies was generally unheard of. Other movies include GoldenEye (1995), in Saint Petersburg (1996), and Brother (1997). Onegin (1999) is based on the Pushkin poem and showcases many attractions. In addition, the Russian romantic comedy,  FM, showcases the cityscape significantly, almost as if it were a main character in the film.Several international festivals are held annually, such as the of Festivals, St. Petersburg, as well as the to Man International Documentary Film Festival, since its inauguration in 1988 during the White Nights.()LiteratureSaint Petersburg has a longstanding and world famous tradition in literature. Dostoyevsky called it The most abstract and intentional city in the world, emphasizing its artificiality, but it was also a symbol of modern disorder in a changing Russia. It frequently appeared to Russian writers as a menacing and inhuman mechanism. The grotesque and often nightmarish image of the city is featured in Pushkins last poems, the Petersburg stories of Gogol, the novels of Dostoyevsky, the verse of Blok and Osip Mandelshtam, and in the symbolist novel Petersburg by Andrey Bely. According to Lotman in his chapter, The Symbolism of Saint Petersburg in Universe and the Mind, these writers were inspired from symbolism from within the city itself. The effect of life in Saint Petersburg on the plight of the poor clerk in a society obsessed with hierarchy and status also became an important theme for authors such as Pushkin, Gogol, and Dostoyevsky. Another important feature of early Saint Petersburg literature is its mythical element, which incorporates legends and popular ghost stories, as the stories of Pushkin and Gogol included ghosts returning to Saint Petersburg to haunt other characters as well as other fantastical elements, creating a surreal and abstract image of Saint Petersburg.20th century writers from Saint Petersburg, such as Nabokov, Rand, Andrey Bely and Zamyatin, along with his apprentices, The Brothers, created entire new styles in literature and contributed new insights to the understanding of society through their experience in this city. Akhmatova became an important leader for Russian poetry. Her poem Requiem focuses on the tragedies of living during the time of the Stalinist terror. Another notable 20th century writer from Saint Petersburg is Brodsky, recipient of the Prize in Literature (1987). While living in the United States, his writings in English reflected on life in Saint Petersburg from the unique perspective of being both an insider and an outsider to the city in essays such as, A Guide to a Renamed City and the nostalgic In a Room and a Half.(Joseph Brodsky. Less Than One: Selected Essays, 1986)Sportsfans Petrovsky.jpg|thumb|left|FC Zenits home Petrovsky stadiumLeningrad hosted part of the football tournament during the 1980 Summer Olympics. The 1994 Games were held here.The first competition here was the 1703 rowing event initiated by Peter the Great, after the victory over the Swedish fleet. Yachting events were held by the Russian Navy since the foundation of the city. clubs:() Petersburg River Yacht Club, Yacht Club, the latter is the oldest yacht club in the world. In the winter, when the sea and lake surfaces are frozen and yachts and dinghies cannot be used, local people sail on boats.Equestrianism has been a long tradition, popular among the Tsars and aristocracy, as well as part of the military training. Several historic sports arenas were built for equestrianism since the 18th century, to maintain training all year round, such as the Zimny Stadion and Manezh among others.Chess tradition was highlighted by the 1914 international tournament, in which the title Grandmaster was first formally conferred by Russian Tsar Nicholas II to five players: Lasker, Capablanca, Alekhine, Tarrasch and Marshall, and which the Tsar had partially funded.Stadium (now demolished) was one of the largest stadia anywhere in the world, and the home to FC Zenit St. Petersburg in 19501993 and 1995. In 1951 the attendance of 110,000 set the record for the Soviet football. In 1984, 2007 and 2010 Zenit became champions of the Soviet and  Russian leagues, respectively, won the Russian Cup in 1999 and 2010, won the UEFA Cup 200708 season and the UEFA Super Cup. Zenit currently plays their home games at Stadium. The new stadium, which will host the FIFA World Cup matches, is currently in construction, replacing the Kirov stadium.CrimeKresty prison.The crime dynamic in Saint Petersburg is tightly associated with the general social situation in the country. A sharp spike in the crime level occurred at the end of the 1980s  beginning of the 1990s as a result of Perestroika-time turmoils (redistribution of property, privatization, decline of living standards, decrease of the effectiveness of militia etc.) By that time the city had fallen under the control of a number of organized criminal groups such as Gang, Malyshev Gang, Kazan Gang and ethnic criminal groups, engaged in racket, extortion, paying off government, and violent clashes with each other.(Russian Mafia Shakes Down the Country by Steven R. Van Hook, Santa Barbara News-Press, November 20, 1994)After the assassinations of City Property Committee Chairman and vice-Governor Manevich(1997), Duma deputy Starovoytova (1998), acting City Legislature Speaker Novosyolov (1999) and a number of prominent businesspeople, Saint Petersburg was dubbed Capital of Crime in the Russian press.(Trumbull, Nathaniel S. (2003) The impacts of globalization on Saint Petersburg: A secondary world city in from the cold? The Annals of Regional Science 37:533546)(Powell, Bill & Brian Whitmore. The Capital Of Crime.(Saint Petersburg, Russia). Newsweek International, May 15, 2000.) There were a number of movies filmed in Saint Petersburg about the life of crime; Peterburg: Advocat,() Brother (1997)() reinforcing its image as the Crime Capital of Russia. According to official sources the number of crimes committed by foreigners in Saint Petersburg in 2010 increased by 11.1%. Law enforcement authorities consider it is associated with an increased number of people from some CIS republics who live in Saint Petersburg illegally.(Crime preventing measures have made good results.  An official portal of the administration of St. Petersburg)  On the other hand, some media reported that in recent years there had been a notable increase in racially motivated violence, in particular towards foreign students.(Russia: Racist Attacks Plague St. Petersburg Radio Free Europe September 30, 2005) One of notable white supremacist groups Belaya Energia (White Energy, inspired by US White Power group), has reportedly been one of the gangs involved in murdering foreign university students.(Official portal of the Government of St. Petersburg provided data on significant improvement in the crime situation.( In particular, it is reported the number of crimes against tourists has decreased by more than double during 20092011.Twin towns  sister citiesSee also*of consulates in Saint Petersburg*of museums in Saint Petersburg*List of notable people from Saint Petersburg*List of Saint Petersburg sister cities*of Saint Petersburg*in Saint PetersburgReferencesBibliography*Amery, Colin, Curran & Yuri Molodkovets. St. Petersburg. London: Lincoln, 2006. ISBN 0711224927.*Bater, James H. St. Petersburg: Industrialization and Change. Montreal: McGuill-Queens University Press, 1976. ISBN 0773502661.*Berelowitch, Wladimir & Olga Medvedkova. Histoire de Saint-Ptersbourg. Paris: Fayard, 1996. ISBN 2213596018.*Brumfield, William Craft. The Origins of Modernism in Russian Architecture. Berkeley: of California Press, 1991. ISBN 0520069293.*Buckler, Julie. Mapping St. Petersburg: Imperial Text and Cityshape. Princeton: University Press, 2005 ISBN0691113491.*Clark, Katerina, Petersburg, Crucible of Revolution. Cambridge: University Press, 1995.*Cross, Anthony (ed.). St. Petersburg, 17031825. Basingstoke: Palgrave Macmillan, 2003. ISBN 1403915709.* San Pietroburgo, la capitale del nord by DAmato in Viaggio nellHansa baltica. LUnione europea e lallargamento ad Est. Greco&Greco editori, Milano, 2004. pp. 2746. ISBN 88-7980-355-7. (Travel to the Baltic Hansa. The European Union and its enlargement to the East) Book in Italian.*George, Arthur L. & Elena George. St. Petersburg: Russias Window to the Future, The First Three Centuries. Lanham: Taylor Trade Publishing, 2003. ISBN 1589790170.*Glantz, David M. The Battle for Leningrad, 19411944. Lawrence: Press of Kansas, 2002. ISBN 0700612084.*Hellberg-Hirn, Elena. Imperial Imprints: Post-Soviet St. Petersburg. Helsinki: SKS Finnish Literature Society, 2003. ISBN 9517464916.**Knopf Guide: Sat. Petersburg. New York: Knopf, 1995. ISBN 0679762027.*Eyewitness Guide: St. Petersburg.*Lincoln, W. Bruce. Sunlight at Midnight: St. Petersburg and the Rise of Modern Russia. New York: Books, 2000. ISBN 0465083234.*Orttung, Robert W. From Leningrad to St. Petersburg: Democratization in a Russian City. New York: St. Martins, 1995. ISBN 0312175612.**Ruble, Blair A. Leningrad: Shaping a Soviet City. Berkeley: of California Press, 1990. ISBN 0877723478.*Shvidkovsky, Dmitry O. & Alexander Orloff. St. Petersburg: Architecture of the Tsars. New York: Abbeville Press, 1996. ISBN 0789202174.*Volkov, Solomon. St. Petersburg: A Cultural History. New York: Free Press, 1995. ISBN 0028740521.*St. Petersburg:Architecture of the Tsars. 360 pages. Abbeville Press, 1996. ISBN 0789202174*Saint Petersburg: Museums, Palaces, and Historic Collections: A Guide to the Lesser Known Treasures of St. Petersburg. 2003. ISBN 1593730004.* Sergei V. Ivanov. Unknown Socialist Realism. The Leningrad School.  Saint Petersburg: NP-Print Edition, 2007.  448 p. ISBN 5-901724-21-6, ISBN 978-5-901724-21-7.* . .     , Leningrad, , 1981.*NotesExternal links******* * Official list of foreign partner cities and regions on the website of the city governments Committee for External Relations (in Russian)* Twin cities of Saint Petersburg (Russian Wikipedia)**Life of Saint Petersburg in photos*Saint Petersburg sights and attractions* Over 1500 pre-Revolution postcard views of Saint Petersburg*Saint Petersburg city landscapes list     list     }}PetersburgPetersburgab:-PetersburgoPetersburguPeterburqPeterburgba:--be-x-old:-Petersburgbo:Peterburgbr:Sant-PetersbourgPetersburgcv:-cs:PetrohradPetersburgPetersborgPetersburget:PeterburiPetersburgoeo:Sankt-PeterburgoPetersburguPetersburgoPetersburgPtursborgfr:Saint-Ptersbourgfy:Sint-PetersburchPheadairPheddyrPeterburgPetersburgo - -ko:hsb:PtrohrdPeterburgPeterburgPetersburgos:PtursborgPietroburgoPetersburgPetersborgkrc:-ka:-kk:-Pederburgky:-Peterburgkv:Petersburgmrj:-lbe:-la:Petropolislv:SanktpterburgaPitersbuergPeterburgasli:Sint-PetersburgpeterburgPederburghhu:SzentptervrPetersburgmn:-PeterburgPetersburgnl:Sint-Petersburgja:PietroburgoPetersburgPetersburgPtersbourgPetersborgmhr:-uz:Sankt-Peterburgkoi:PeroborghPetersborgpl:PetersburgPetersburgokbd:PeterburgPetersburgPeterburgrue:-ru:-sah:-PetersburgPetersburguPietruburguPetersburgsk:PetrohradPeterburgszl:PejtersburgPeterburg(kaupunki)PetersburgPetersburgoPitreburghett:-th:tg:-Petersburgtk:Sankt-Peterburgudm:-uk:- ug:LningradPieroburgovi:Sankt-Peterburgvo:Sankt-Peterburgfiu-vro:PeterburkPetersborkPetersburgowuu:yi:Petersburgzh-yue:Petersburgzea:Sint-PetersburgPeterborgszh:
24328694
Institution_of_Engineers_and_Shipbuilders_in_Scotland
The Institution of Engineers and Shipbuilders in Scotland (IESiS) is a professional body for engineers and shipbuilders in Scotland.FoundingThe inaugural meeting of the Institution of Engineers in Scotland was held on 1 May 1857. Office bearers were appointed and the principal objective of the new institution was set down as the encouragement and advancement of Engineering Science and Practice. It was to have a broad basis for membership, and engineers from the mining, foundry, railway, iron, shipbuilding and other industries were to be eligible. The prime movers behind the founding of the Institution were John Macquorn Rankine, Regius Professor of Civil Engineering and Mechanics at the of Glasgow, and Montgomerie Neilson, one of the major figures in establishing Glasgows locomotive-building industry. Rankine was the first President of the Institution and Neilson succeeded him in 1859. The engineer Howden, who died in 1913, was the last surviving founding member of the Institution.(Day, Lance and McNeil, Ian, Biographical Dictionary of the History of Technology, Vol. 39, London, Routledge, 1988, p. 358, at Biographical Dictionary, books.google.com, accessed 27 September 2009) The Institution was an early promoter of consciousness of industrial effects on the environment. In those early years there was a pervading atmosphere of enquiry into the applications of steam power. In 1858 the Institution was responsible for a public meeting, held in the City Chambers, to establish An Association for Promoting Safety, Economy and Absence of Smoke in the raising and use of Steam.The Shipbuilders Association had been formed in 1860 and amalgamated with the IES on 25 October 1865. The current name of the Institution was adopted in 1870. The current President, Gordon Masterton, took office on 28th September 2010. Presidents The following is a list of the presidents of the Institution since its inception:1857-59 John Macquorn Rankine, LL.D., F.R.S.E., F.R.S., Regius Professor of Civil Engineering and Mechanics, Glasgow University.1859-61 Montgomerie Neilson, Hyde Park Locomotive Works, Glasgow.1861-63 William Johnstone, Resident Engineer. Glasgow and South Western Railway. Glasgow.1863-65 James Robert Napier, Engineer and Shipbuilder. Glasgow.1865-67 James Gray Lawrie, Engineer and Shipbuilder. Glasgow.1867-69 James Morris Gale, Engineer, Glasgow Corporation Water Works.1869-70 #1 John Macquorn Rankine, LL.D., F.R.S.E., F.R.S., Regius Professor of Civil Engineering and Mechanics, Glasgow University1870-72 David Rowan, Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1872-74 Robert Duncan, Shipbuilder, Port Glasgow.1874-76 Hazelton Robson, Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1876-78 Robert Bruce Bell, Civil Engineer, Glasgow.1878-80 Robert Mansel, Shipbuilder, Glasgow.1880-82 John Lennox Kincaid Jamieson, Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1882-84 James Reid, Hyde Park Locomotive Works, Glasgow.1884-86 James Thomson, LL.D., F.R.S., Regius Professor of Civil Engineering and Mechanics, Glasgow University.1886-87 William Denny, Shipbuilder, Dumbarton.1887-89 Alexander Carnegie Kirk, LL.D., Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1889-91 Ebenezer Kemp, Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1891-93 Robert Dundas, Resident Engineer, Southern Division, Caledonian Railways, Glasgow.1893-95 John Inglis, LL.D., Engineer and Shipbuilder, Glasgow.1895-97 Sir Arrol, LL.D., M.P., Engineer and Bridge Builder, Glasgow.1897-99 George Russell, Mechanical Engineer, Motherwell.1899-01 Caird, LL.D., F.R.S.E., Shipbuilder, Greenock.1901-03 William Foults, Engineer, Glasgow Corporation Gas Works.1903-05 Sir Archibald Denny, BT., LL.D., Shipbuilder, Dumbarton.1905-07 James Gilchrist, Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1907-09 John Ward, Shipbuilder, Glasgow.1909-10 Charles Pullar Hogg, Civil Engineer, Glasgow.1910-11 Barr, LL.D., D.Sc., Regius Professor of Civil Engineering and Mechanics, Glasgow University.1911-13 Ebenezer Hall-Brown, Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1913-15 Robert Thomas Moore, D.Sc., Civil and Mining Engineer, Glasgow.1915-17 William Walker Lackie, C.B.E., Engineer and Manager, Glasgow Corporation Electricity Works.1917-19 Alexander Cleghorn, Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1919-21 Thomas Blackwood Murray, D.Sc., Automobile Engineer, Glasgow.1921-23 Harold Edgar Yarrow, C.B.E., Engineer and Shipbuilder, Glasgow.1923-25 James Howden Hume, Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1925-27 Archibald Jack Campbell, Shipbuilder, Dalmuir.1927-29 Ralph David Moore, B.Sc., Steel Founder, Glasgow.1929-31 Col. Sir James Lithgow, BT., M.C., D.L., Shipbuilder, Port Glasgow.1931-33 Archibald Gilchrist, O.B.E., Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1933-35 John Dewar Cormack, C.M.G., C.B.E., D.Sc., Regius Professor of Civil Engineering and Mechanics, Glasgow University.1935-37 Percy Archibald Hillhouse, D.Sc., Professor of Naval Architecture, Glasgow University.1937-39 Alfred Charles Gardner, F.R.S.E., Engineer, Clyde Navigation Trust, Glasgow.1939-41 Wilfrid Ayre, Shipbuilder, Burntisland.1941-43 Frederick Charles Stewart, Engineer, Glasgow.1943-45 A. Murray Stephen, M.C., B.A., Shipbuilder, Glasgow.1945-47 Allan Stevenson, C.B.E., Marine Engineer, Glasgow.1947-49 James M. McNeill, M.C., LL.D., Naval Architect, Clydebank.1949-51 Gilbert Cook, D.Sc., F.R.S., Regius Professor of Civil Engineering and Mechanics, Glasgow University.1951-52 Sir Andrew McCance, D.L., D.Sc., LL.D., F.R.S., Metallurgist, Glasgow.1952-54 Sir William Wallace, C.B.E., F.R.S.E., Mechanical Engineer, Edinburgh.1954-56 Andrew McCance Robb, D.Sc., John Elder Professor of Naval Architecture, Glasgow University.1956-57 Sir Harold E. Yarrow, BT., C.B.E., LL.D., Engineer and Shipbuilder, Glasgow.1957-59 James Small, D.Sc., PH.D., James Watt Professor of Mechanical Engineering, Glasgow University.1959-61 John Brown, B.Sc., Naval Architect, Clydebank.1961-63 Iain Maxwell Stewart, B.Sc., Engineer, Glasgow.1963-65 Adam Simpson Turnbull Thomson, D.SC, PH.D., F.R.S.E., Professor of Mechanical Engineering, Royal College of Science and Technology, Glasgow.1965-67 James Lenaghan, C.B.E., Shipbuilder, Glasgow.1967-69 William Proudfoot Walker, Naval Architect, Edinburgh.1969-71 Sir J. W. Atwell, C.B.E., M.Sc., F.R.S.E., Engineer, Glasgow.1973-73 W. M. Cormie, C.B.E., B.Sc., Civil Engineer, Glasgow.1973-75 J. Burton Davies, B.Sc., C.ENG., Naval Architect, Glasgow.1975-77 A. W. Scott, C.B.E., PH.D., B.Sc, C.ENG.1977-79 George Nicholson Geddes, C.B.E., B.Sc., F.ENG., F.R.S.E., Civil Engineer, Glasgow.1979-81 B. N. Baxter, M.Sc., PH.D., C.ENG., Naval Architect, Glasgow.1981-83 J. A. Turner, B.Sc., CENG., Mechanical Engineer, Clydebank.1983-85 A. M. M. Stephen, B.A., C.ENG.1985-87 John Rorke, C.B.E., B.Sc., PH.D., F.R.S.E., C.ENG.1987-89 T. O. Leith, O.B.E., B.Sc., C.ENG., Mechanical Engineer, Glasgow.1989-91 H. C. Simpson, B.Sc. SC.D., F.R.S.E .M.I.E.S., Professor1991-93 I.C. Broadley, B.Sc., C.ENG., F.INST.E ., FIES, Mechanical Engineer. Glasgow.1993-95 J. Neumann, C.B.E., F.ENG., FIES, Mechanical Engineer, Glasgow.1995-97 D. Faulkner, WH.Sc., R.C.N.C., PH.D., D.Sc., F.ENG., Professor of Naval Architecture, Glasgow.1997-99 Sir Robert Easton, C.B.E., DUniv., FIES, Shipbuilder, Glasgow.1999-01 Carlo Dinardo, C.ENG., FIES, Civil Engineer, Paisley.2001-01 #2 Dan Kirkwood, B.Sc.(Hons), PH.D., C.ENG., FIES, Professor of Metallurgy, Glasgow.2001-02 A. Slaven, M.A., BLITT, F.R.Hist.S., CIES, Professor of History, Glasgow2002-04 A. Slaven, M.A., BLITT, F.R.Hist.S., CIES, Professor of History, Glasgow2004-06 C. F. Gorrie, CEng, FIES2006-08 E. Chambers, B.Sc., FIES, Civil Engineer, Glasgow.2008-10 David K. Harrison, MEng, PhD, FIES, Professor of Engineering, Glasgow Caledonian University.2010-   Gordon G. T. Masterton, OBE, DTech (Hon), FREng, FRSE, FIES, Civil Engineer, Glasgow.Notes:1. John Elder Shipbuilder, Glasgow, was elected for session 1869-70 but died before taking office 2. Resigned Source: Website of the Institution of Engineers & Shipbuilders in Scotland  http://www.iesis.org/about/presidents.aspxRetrieved from http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Institute_of_Engineers_%26_Shipbuilders_in_ScotlandReferencesExternal links*Official website
24340625
Meco-Moore_Cutter_Loader
The Meco-Moore cutter loader was an early twentieth century British mining machine. It was invented by Mr M. Moore, and developed by the Mining Engineering Company (MECO) of Worcester. It was a heavy machine (120hp / 89.5 kW) and was first used in a coal mine in Lancashire, England 1934.( Dictionary of Mining, Mineral, and Related Terms By American Geological Institute p336)  The design was such that it worked along the coal seam (along a longwall panel) The machines cutter bars, the jibs as they were called, (two in the original model and three in a later verions) were designed to both shear and undercut the coal seam. The cut coal was cut onto the connected conveyor belt system which took it towards the mines entrance. It was, or was among, the first such machines to do both cutting and loading at the same time.  The machine increased both productivity and safety.(http://www.screenonline.org.uk/film/id/1223157/index.html  Michael Brooke review the 1947 film Portrait of a Miner: The National Coal Board Collection Volume 1.) See also *Shearer*power loader References fr:Haveuse
24352739
Mining_Weekly
Mining Weekly is a weekly news magazine that provides in-depth coverage of global mining projects and the personalities reshaping the mining industry.  Mining Weekly was first published in 1995 by Creamer Media an independent media publishing company based in Johannesburg, Africa.  The company was founded by Martin Creamer in 1981. On 13 March 1981, the first edition of Creamer Medias other weekly news magazine, Engineering News was published.Mining Weekly can be found on the internet at http://www.miningweekly.com and readers may choose to visit the free to air aspects of the site or readers may choose to subscribe to the sites full research service, thereby gaining access to aspects such as project tracking, research reports and links to listed mining companies and mine profiles. A mobile-phone version of the MiningWeekly.com website is available and a Mining Weekly Application is also available in the iTunes store for users of the iPhone.  The latest news and developments in the following mining sectors will be available to readers of the magazine and visitors to the website, including Base Metals, Coal, Diamonds, Ferrous Metals, Gold, Platinum, Silver and Uranium.  Key service areas and topics related to the mining industry such as Health & Safety, Legislative and Environmental aspects are reported on daily.
24375853
List_of_museums_in_Mexico
This a list of museums and galleries in Mexico.Image:Museo nacional de antropologia entrada.jpg|thumb|right|200px|Fountain inside the Nacional de AntropologaImage:Palacio de Bellas Artes.jpg|thumb|right|200px|de Bellas ArtesNacional de Arte (MUNAL)Image:DSC00621.JPG|thumb|right|200px|Nacional de Historia* Aguascalientes** Museum** Posada Museum** Descubre (IMAX screen)** Museum of Contemporary Art** State History Museum** Fauna Museum** Sport Museum** Museum of Traditional Mexican Toys * California** Cultural Center** Tijuana Wax Museum** Tijuana Trompo Museum** Museo Sol del Nio (IMAX screen)** Museo Universitario Mexicali  (has photos, fossils, etc of Baja California Norte)** History of the City of Ensenada* California Sur** Museum of Jesuit Misions** Regional Museum of Anthropology and History** Museum of Saint Ignacio paintings** Museum of Telecommunications Toms Guzmn Cant** Museum of Natural History* Campeche** Museum of the City of Campeche** Museum of San Miguel Fort** Archaeology Museum** Weapons and Navy Museum* Chiapas**Museum of Anthropology and History of Chiapas** Museum of Santo Domingo Ex Convent** Museum of Tapachula** Museum of Mayan Medicine** Museum of the city of Tuxtla Gutierrez** Archaeological Museum of Comitn** Archaeological Museum of Palenque** Ambar Museum * Chihuahua**Museum of the Mexican Revolution* Coahuila** del Desierto (Desert Museum)** de las Aves de Mxico (Mexican Bird Museum)** Arocena (Arocena Museum)* Colima** Regional Museum of the History of Colima* Durango** Regional Museum of Durango** Museo de la Ferrera* Guanajuato** Casa De Diego Rivera** Catacombs** Explora Science Center (IMAX screen)**Museum of Quixote http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id11&tablemuseo&table_id628** San Miguel de Allende Museum** Saint Paul Convent Museum** Museo Regional de Guanajuato Alhndiga de Granaditas* Guerrero** Regional Museum of Guerrero** Historic Museum of Acapulco** Guillermo Spratling Museum*Hidalgo**Archive and Museum of Mining, Pachuca** Museum of Mexican Photography** Museum** Photography Museum** Tula Archeological Museum * Jalisco** Museo Guadalajara, cancelled** Tequila and Mariachi Museum** Paleontology Museum of Guadalajara** Medicine History Museum** Huichol Art Museum** Newspaper and Graphic Arts Museum** Army and Air Force Museum** Science and Technology Museum** Ceramics Museum** Wax Museum** Museum of Guadalajara Art** Museum of Zapopan Art** Museum of the City of Guadalajara** Museo Casa Agustn Rivera.** Museo del Cuale.** Museo Arqueolgico de Ciudad Guzmn. ** Museo Ral Anguiano* City**Art Laboratory  http://www.artealameda.inba.gob.mx/**Regional Museum  Milpa Alta**and Carmen T. de Carrillo Gil Museum of Art http://www.macg.inba.gob.mx/**Museum http://www.anahuacallimuseo.org/**Collection Museum http://www.museoblaisten.com**Toy Museum http://www.toymuseummexico.com/**UAEM Casa de Cultura Tlalpan**Museum of Azcapotzalco Prncipe Tlaltecatzin - Azcapotzalco**Archeological Museum of Cuicuilco http://dti.inah.gob.mx/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id268&Itemid50**Archeological Museum of Xochimilco http://www.xochimilco.df.gob.mx/turismo/arqueologico.html**Park of Luis G. Urbina http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id482**Archeological Zone of the Templo Mayor http://aztlan.inah.gob.mx:8080/teopantli/index.html**and Air Force Museum of Mexico (Museo del Ejrcito y Fuerza Area)**Museum of Mexico http://www.museodelautomovil.com.mx/index.html**Cultural Center  Barrio Santa Martha**Caricature Museum of Mexico 99 Donceles, Centro**de la Bola Museum  http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id548**Lamm Cultural Center http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tableuniversidad&table_id715**Photography Bazaar 26 Madero **de la Imagen  http://centrodelaimagen.conaculta.gob.mx/ (art)**of San Antonio Panzacola  Barrio Santa Catarina**The Chapultepec Castle National Museum of History http://www.mnh.inah.gob.mx/**Museum http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id883**University Museum http://www.chopo.unam.mx/**of Sor Juana Ines de la Cruz  Plaza de San Jeronimo 47 Centro**El Carmen Museum http://dti.inah.gob.mx/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id138&Itemid47**Regional Museum http://dti.inah.gob.mx/index.php?Itemid50&id312&optioncom_content&taskview**Community Center http://www.visitasguiadas.df.gob.mx/visitas/culhuacan.html**Museum http://www.cuitlahuac.org/modules.php?opmodload&nameNews&fileindex**Rivera Mural Museum  http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id661**Dr. Samuel Fastlicht Museum  UNAM**Dolores Olmedo Patio Museum http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id916**Carmen Museum http://www.museodeelcarmen.org/ (art)**Museum  http://www.museodelestanquillo.com/**Hacienda El Molino Cultural Center http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablebiblioteca&table_id1198**Hacienda San Gabriel de Barrera http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id11&tablemuseo&table_id243**Templo de Santa Teresa La Antigua http://sic.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&municipio_id15&target&tablefestival&count&table_id143&l**Ex Templo San Agustin  (anthropology)**Teresa Convent Modern Art Museum  Centro**Felix de Jesus Museum  Escandon**Mayer Museum http://www.franzmayer.org.mx/ingles/**Frida Kahlo Museum (Casa Azul) http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?tablemuseo&table_id805**House  Tlalpan borough**Nuevo Museum http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id910 **Cabrera Museum of Sculpture  Coyoacan**Archive of the Nation of Mexico http://www.agn.gob.mx/ (history)**Museum of UNAM  Jaime Torres Bodet 176 Santa Maria la Ribera Cuauhtemoc**and Sciences of the Herat Museum- National Polytechnic Institute Bldg 9 **Lopez Cid Auditorium - Citlalmina**Guadalupe Baslica Museum http://www.virgendeguadalupe.org.mx/Plaza%20Mariana/plaza-mariana.htm**de San Cristbal Polaxtla Museum **de Santa Mnica Museum** Cultural Institute of Mexico (Instituto Cultural Helenico) http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tableteatro&table_id513**Social and Cultual Center  Tlapan**Museum of San Miguel de Allende http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id11&tablemuseo&table_id756**House and Museum of Alfonso Reyes http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?tablemuseo&table_id964&estado_id9&municipio_id15&l**Studio of Diego Rivera and Frida Kahlo http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?tablemuseo&table_id805**of the First Print Shop in the Americas**Museum of Economy  Tacuba Street**Torres Bodet Cultural Center http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id14&tableteatro&table_id65**Reyes Heroles Casa de Cultura Coyoacan **Luis Cuevas Museum http://www.museojoseluiscuevas.com.mx/**Jose Maria Velasco Gallery http://sic.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&municipio_id17&target&tablegaleria&count&table_id218&lesp**Center of Mexico http://www.centrolibanes.org.mx/**The Leon Trotsky Museum  http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id966**Luis Enrique Erro Planetarium http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id537**Tolsa Museum**Mexico City Museum http://www.cultura.df.gob.mx/culturama/secretaria/Recintos/MuseoCiudadMexico/indexN.html**Citys Wax Museum  http://www.museodecera.com.mx/**Hidalgo Peoples Social Center San Juan de Aragon 2nd section**Archeological Museum  Tlahuac borough**Museo de Arte Moderno  http://www.bellasartes.gob.mx/INBA/Template12/index.jsp?secc_cve133**Museum of Light (Museo de la Luz) http://www.luz.unam.mx/informacion.html**Museum of Mexican Constitutions**Museum of Mexican Medicine  Brasil 33 Centro**of Natural History (Mexico City)  http://www.sma.df.gob.mx/mhn/**Museum of the Palace of Fine Arts http://www.bellasartes.gob.mx/INBA/Template12/index.jsp?secc_cve2**Museum of Parliament Precinct- http://www.gob.mx/wb2/egobierno/egob_Museo_legislativo **Museum of Popular Art  http://www.map.df.gob.mx/**Museum of SHCP  http://www.shcp.gob.mx/**Museum in Honor of Benito Juarez  National Palace**National Anthropological Museum http://www.mna.inah.gob.mx/**Center of the Arts of Mexico http://www.cenart.gob.mx/**National Museum of Art  http://www.munal.com.mx/**Museum of Cultures- Moneda 13 Centro**Museum of Graphic Arts  Mar Arafura 8 Popotla Miguel Hidalgo**Museum of Engraving (Museo de la Estampa)- Plaza de Santa Vera Cruz**Nacional de las Intervenciones http://dti.inah.gob.mx/index.php?optioncom_content&taskview&id170&Itemid49**of Women(http://www.peru.com/noticias/portada20110309/142493/Inauguran-el-primer-Museo-de-la-Mujer-en-Ciudad-de-Mexico)**Museum of Popular Cultures Coyacan**Museum of Popular Arts and Industries  Ave Juarez 44 Centro Cuauhtemoc**Museum of Popular Culture http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id976**Museum of the Revolution http://www.cultura.df.gob.mx/culturama/secretaria/Recintos/MNR/indexN.html**History Museum of Mexico  Coyacan**Necroteca Museum  UNAM**Yoliztli Cultural Center http://www.cultura.df.gob.mx/culturama/secretaria/Recintos/CCOY/indexN.html**Palace of Autonomy Museum**of Iturbide http://www.banamex.com/esp/filiales/fomento_cultural/casas/p_iturbide.htm(art)**Palace of Mining  http://www.palaciomineria.unam.mx/**Paleontology Museum  UNAM**Childrens Museum (IMAX screen) http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id375**The Postal Museum **de la Profesa (http://www.mexicodesconocido.com.mx/la-pinacoteca-de-la-profesa-distrito-federal.html)**Flores Magon Casa de la Cultura  Ex Ejido San Pablo Tepetlapa**Solana Cultural Center http://www.imss.gob.mx/IMSS/IMSS_SITIOS/Regional/DFNorte/Derechohabientes/CSS/centro+cultural+rafael+solana.htm**Believe it or not Museum Londres St Juarez**House Museum http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/resultados_area.php?tablemuseo&targetCasa%20del%20Risco&l**The Rufino Tamayo Museum http://www.museotamayo.org/**San Angel Cultural Center San Angel**The San Carlos Museum Puente de Alvarado 50 Revolucion Cuauhtemoc**San Ildefonso Museum http://www.sanildefonso.org.mx/index.php (Art)**Siqueiros Cultural Polyforum http://www.polyforumsiqueiros.com/**Siquieros Hall of Public Art http://www.siqueiros.inba.gob.mx/**Snail Museum Gallery of Natural History http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?estado_id9&tablemuseo&table_id970**Museum http://www.soumaya.com.mx/**Spanish Cultural Center  Centro**Museum of the Federal Commission of Electricity http://www.gob.mx/wb2/egobierno/egob_Museo_legislativo**Regional Museum  Tlahuac borough**History Museum  Tlapan**UNAM Sculpture Space (Espacio Escultorico UNAM) Ciudad Universitaria**Museum of Sciences and Arts  http://www.muca.unam.mx/**Carranza Museum  (history)**Victoria Museum of Telephony  Centro**Watercolor Museum (Museo de la Acuarela)  Villa Coyoacan**(UNAM)  http://www.universum.unam.mx/  (science)* Michoacn** Museum of Popular Arts and Industries** Museo Casa de Morelos. ** Museo Regional Michoacano Dr. Nicols Len Caldern. ** Museo de Sitio de Tzintzuntzan.** Museo de la Estampa Ex Convento de Santa Mara Magdalena.* Morelos** museo del nio (IMAX Screen)** Cuauhuanauc Museum (Cortes Palace)** Museum of the City of Cuernavaca** El Castillo (Photograph Museum of the City) ** Juarez Museum devoted to President Benito Juarez** Museum of Herbal Medicine** David Alfaro Siqueiros Home and Workshop** Brady Museum (private art collection)** Museo y Centro de Documentacin Histrica Ex Convento de Tepoztln. ** Museo Regional Cuauhnhuac. Museo Regional. Acceso: 41 pesos** Museo Histrico del Oriente de Morelos Casa de Morelos. Museo Local. Acceso: 31 pesos** Museo de Sitio de Xochicalco. Sitio arqueolgico. Acceso: 51 pesos que incluye la entrada a la Zona Arqueolgica** Jardn Etnobotnico y Museo de Medicina Tradicional y Herbolaria. Museo Local. Acceso: Gratuito** Museo de Sitio de Coatetelco. Sitio arqueolgico. Acceso: 31 pesos que incluye la entrada a la Zona Arqueolgica* Nayarit** Cuatro Pueblos Museum (museum of four cultures: huicholes, coras, tepehuanos and mexicaneros)** Amado Nervo Museum ** Regional Museum of Anthropology* Len** Museo de Arte Contemporneo (MARCO)** museo del nio (IMAX screen)** Museo de Historia Mexicana** Metropolitano de Monterrey** del Palacio** del Vidrio** Museo de Historia del Noreste* Oaxaca** Museo del Ex-Convento de Santo Domingo** Museo de las Culturas de Oaxaca** Rufino Tamayo Museum (Museum of Prehispanic Art)** Museo de Arte Contemporneo de Oaxaca (Museum of Contemporary Art)** Museo de los Pintores Oaxaqueos (Museum of Oaxacan Painters)** Casa de Jurez (Museum of Mexican President Benito Jurez)** Museo Philatlica de Oaxaca (Stamp Museum)** Railway Museum of Southern Mexico**Instituto de Artes Grficas de Oaxaca**Estatal de Arte Popular de Oaxaca* Puebla** Automobile Museum** National Museum of Mexican Railroads** Museum(Prehispanic, Colonial, Modern and Contemporary Mexican Art) http://www.museoamparo.com/** Museo Poblano de Arte Virreinal* Quertaro** Regional Museum of Quertaro* Roo** Cancn Archaeological Museum** Museum of Maya Culture** Museo de la Isla de Cozumel (Cozumel Island Museum)* Luis Potos** Regional Museum of San Luis* Sinaloa** Mazatln Archaeological Museum* of Mexico** Museo de Virreinato** Museum of Fine Arts** Museum of Modern Art** Museum of Popular Cultures** Museum of Natural Sciences** Museum of Anthropology and History** Print Museum** Watercolor Museum** House of Handcrafts** Numismatics Museum (the only one in Latin America)** Mara Vasconcelos Museum** Felipe Santiago Gutirrez Museum** Luis Nishizawa Workshop Museum** Teotihuacan Museum**Manuel Gamio Museum http://sic.conaculta.gob.mx/ficha.php?tablemuseo&table_id1000* Tabasco** Planetarium Tabasco (IMAX screen)** Tabasco Institute of Culture** Natural History Museum** Museo de Sitio de Pomon.** Museo de Sitio La Venta.** Museo de Sitio de Comalcalco. ** Museo de Oxolotn. * Tamaulipas** Museo del Agrarismo. Matamoros* Tlaxcala** Regional Museum of Tlaxcala** Museo de Sitio de Xochitcatl.** Museo de Sitio de Cacaxtla.** Museo de Sitio de Ocotelulco. ** Museo de Sitio de Tizatln.* Veracruz** de Antropologa de Xalapa** Interactivo de Xalapa (IMAX screen)** del Lencero** Diego Rivera** de Esculturas** Museo Casa Xalapa (Museum of the city of Xalapa)** del Fuerte De San Juan de Ulua** Veracruz Wax Museum** Veracruz Institute of Culture** The Museum of the City of Veracruz** Museo del Recinto de la Reforma.** Museo Histrico Naval (Naval History Museum).** Casa Principal.** Museo Baluarte de Santiago.** Casa Museo Salvador Daz Mirn.** Archivo y Galera del Arte.** Museum of the Revolution.** Oil Museum ** Archaeological Museum of Crdoba** Museum of the City of Crdoba** National Museum of Fantastic Art** Museum of Veracruz Fauna** Museum of Orizaba Art** Marine Museum of Tecolutla** Museum of the State of Veracruz Art Felipe Neri** Yanga Museum; dedicated to Yanga who has the first successful slave revolt in the Americas** Museum of the Old Train Station** Museo Fotogrfico de Nanchital (Photography Museum of Nanchital)** Agustn Lara Museum** Tuxteco Museum** Jarocho Museum** Museum of Tajn (UNESCO World Heritage Site)** Museo Baluarte de Santiago ** Museo el Zapotal ** Museo de Cempoala** Museo de Sitio San Lorenzo** Museo de Sitio Tres Zapotes** Museo de Sitio de Higueras** Museo de Sitio de la Matamba** Community Museum of Atoyac** Community Museum of Coscomatepec** Community Museum of Emiliano Zapata** Community Museum of Jalcomulco** Community Museum of Jamapa** Community Museum David Ramrez Lavoignet** Community Museum of Acamaln ** Community Museum Paseo del Correo** Community Museum Serafn Olarte ** Community Museum el Jonotal** Community Museum of Tenochtitln* Yucatn** Museo de Historia Natural** Museo de Arte Contemporneo Ateneo de Yucatn (MACAY)** Museo de la Cancin Yucateca** Museo de Arte Popular** Museo de la Ciudad de Mrida** Museo de Antropologa e Historia Palacio Cantn(Anthropology and History Museum)* Zacatecas** Manuel Felguerez** Museo de Sitio de la zona arqueolgica Alta Vista  Chalchihuites ** Museo de La Quemada** Museo de Guadalupe References 
24394428
Savitri_Jindal
Education Savitri Jindal (Hindi: ) is an Indian steel baroness, the wealthiest woman in India and the worlds 56th richest person. She is the non-executive chairperson of Steel and Power Limited and Steel, and member of the Haryana Sabha, (Legislative Assembly) MLA. She also served as a Minister of Power in the of Haryana until 2010. She became the chairperson after her husband, P. Jindal, died in a helicopter crash in 2005.()She is also a member of Haryana Vidhan Sabha and MLA. Savitri Jindal became the Chair person of JSPL after the death of her Husband O.P. Jindal in 2005 by Helicopter Crash.Savitri was born on 20th March 1950 and residing at Hisar, Haryana, India. She is the Indian citizen and her Education is Diploma. She married to O.P. Jindal who founded JSPL.Savitri had 10 Children name Prithviraj Jindal, Sajjan Jindal, Ratan Jindal, Naveen Jindal and 6 others.Jindal Steel and Power Limited is the most valuable private steel producer in India. JSPL is a leading player in Steel, Power, Mining, Oil & Gas and Infrastructure. Mr. Naveen Jindal, the youngest son of the legendary late Shri. O P Jindal, drives JSPL and its group companies Jindal Power Ltd, Jindal Petroleum Ltd., Jindal Cement Ltd. and Jindal Steel Bolivia with a belief in the concept of self-sufficiency. The company produces economical and efficient steel and power through backward integration from its own captive coal and iron-ore mines and passes on the benefits to its customers.The Jindal family established Vidya Devi Jindal School, a residential school for girls in Hisar, India, in 1984. Although not marketed as such, it is widely known to cater to the wealthy through its private location and remarkable array of activities. The schools student body comprises girls from affluent business and political families of India.She is noted for being the worlds 4th richest mother, as well as for having more children than any other billionaire mother (nine).() References Savitri Jindal is the 8th Richest Woman in the World  By SiliconIndia, Monday, 26 September 2011, 17:33 IST External links* Profile at Forbes
24405322
Streamlizing_algorithms
As opposed to data stored in memory medium for access on demand, transient data originated on line streams are lost if not explicitly stored. These transient data, called streams, invalid many existing algorithms for persistent data. Paralleled with persistent data and data streams, algorithms is coined which process streams with sublinear memory cost. Among many methods of designing algorithms for data streams, streamlizing algorithms to enable algorithms to process data streams is one of possible research directions.Streaming GraphSemi-streaming GraphsWith given vertex set V, edges in edge set is shown one by one;# ......External links*University http://sites.google.com/site/webdbp2p/*University http://cse.seu.edu.cn/people/zhchong/*algorithms http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Streaming_algorithms*Stream Mining http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Data_stream_mining
24418995
Albania__Peoples_Republic_of_China_relations
AlbaniaChina relations refers to relations between Albania and Republic of China. The two countries established diplomatic relations on November 23, 1949.(Albania) History From the 1960s onwards, the Republic of Albania under Hoxha, moved an annual resolution in the General Assembly to transfer Chinas seat at the UN from the of China(although, unsurprisingly, Albania did not use that name) to the Peoples Republic of China. On October 25, 1971, Resolution 2758, sponsored by Albania, was passed by the General Assembly, withdrawing recognition of the ROC as the legitimate government of China, and recognizing the PRC as the sole legitimate government of China. It was a triumph for Albanian diplomacy.AgreementsIn 2001, the two countries signed signed three agreements covering financial, mortgage and technical aspects of constructing a new hydroelectric power facilityto be known as Hydro Centralin northern Albania. China also pledged USD126 million in credit to the project.(CER | Albania signs an agreement with China)Recent relationsAlbanian Prime Minister Berisha visited Chinese Premier Jiabao in April 2009. Wen put forth a four-point proposal to further cooperation with Albania. It urged both countries to:* increase exchanges at all levels to cement political relations by using the opportunity of the 60th anniversary of Sino-Albanian ties;* promote substantial cooperation based on equality and reciprocity and put more emphasis on information technology, energy, infrastructure, and mining exploration;* expand cooperation in the areas of culture, public health, agriculture and tourism to enrich bilateral ties;* strengthen coordination in the United Nations and other international organizations to safeguard the interests of developing nations and unity of the United Nations.(China offers four-point proposal to further relations with Albania) See also * relations of Albania* relations of the Peoples Republic of China* split References  External links 
24428641
Hornblower_&_Weeks
Hornblower & Weeks was an banking and brokerage firm founded by Henry Hornblower and W. Weeks in 1888.  At its peak in the late 1970s, Hornblower ranked eighth among member firms of the York Stock Exchange in number of retail offices, with 93 retail sales offices located in the United States and Europe. Hornblower was active in financing automobile companies in the first half of the 20th century, including Motors, Motors, and Motor Car Company.(Milestones.  TIME, Mar. 28, 1938)The firm, which by the 1970s was known as Hornblower Weeks Noyes & Trask, was acquired by Rhoades & Co. to form Rhoades, Hornblower & Co.HistoryFounding and early historyHornblower & Weeks was organized on August 7, 1888.  Henry Hornblower and W. Weeks undertook the continuation of the business of Hornblower & Page, which had been founded and managed by Hornblowers father, Edward Thomas Hornblower.  Henry Hornblower joined his fathers firm in 1879 at age 16 and had served as a clerk.  Henry Hornblower, who was born June 6, 1863 in Massachusetts came from a distinguished patrician family in Boston.  The name of Hornblower is one of the features of Boston and the old Bay State.  It is a name that has flourished through generations...The line of Hornblowers in Boston and New England has been an honorable one as far back as family prestige can be traced.(Copper Curb & Mining Outlook Vol. 9, #1, September 27, 1911, p.14-15)  Following the death of Mr. Page in the spring of 1888, Edward Hornblower, who was blind by this time, announced his retirement and his intention to dissolve the firm.(  The younger Hornblower joined together with John Weeks to begin the new firm where the old one had left off.(  The firms original office was located at 51 State Street with one clerk, James J. Phelan, who would ultimately serve as a partner of the firm until his death in 1934.(Bankers magazine, Volume 77.  1908, p.441-448)  In 1889, they bought a seat on the New York Stock Exchange for $19,000 and moved to the Merchants Bank Building on Devonshire Street. Surviving the Panic of 1893, which resulted in numerous failures of industrial corporations and financial houses, the young firm moved into larger quarters on the second floor of the Exchange Building at 53 State Street. 1900-1950By 1900, the firm had a net worth of $400,000, by 1902, $800,000, and in 1903 and 1904, founding partner John W. Weeks, consolidated the First National Bank of Boston with the National Bank of Redemption, creating the largest bank of New England.  In 1907, offices were opened in Providence and Chicago, and a Bond department was established. That same year, the firm became one of the first on Wall Street to set up a Statistical and Research Department. File:John weeks.png|thumb|left|175px|W. Weeks c.1908In 1913, Ralph Hornblower, son of the founder, Henry Hornblower, was admitted to the partnership, and W. Weeks retired upon his election to the U.S. Senate. Weeks was involved in the creation of the Reserve System in 1914 and would go on to be U.S. Secretary of War in the 1920s.After the crash of 1929, which the firm survived with small capital losses except in the syndicate department, the firm went through a period of retrenchment. By 1930, firm capital had grown to over $16 million, but would be substantially reduced during the ensuing years of the depression.   During the 1930s Hornblower made a number of acquisitions including a merger with G.M.-P. Murphy & Co., best known for its financing of major aviation companies, including American Airways, Air Lines, Boeing, and Lockheed.In 1950, Henry Hornblower,II and Ralph Hornblower, Jr., were admitted as partners to the firm.Expansion and consolidation from 1950-1977In 1953, Hornblower & Weeks merged with the firm Paul H. Davis & Co. of Chicago, which had functioned as a correspondent of the New York Hornblower office. Later that year the acquisition of the cotton brokerage business of Scatterty & Jones led to new Hornblower offices in the Southern U.S. The mergers brought the firms total to 19 offices nationwide.  Reed & Company of Worcester, Massachusetts was acquired in 1955. In the 1960s the firm opened new offices around the country with thirty offices operating from coast to coast, and memberships were held in all the major American exchanges by 1963.The firm merged with Hemphill, Noyes & Co. in 1963, changing its name to Hornblower & Weeks, Hemphill, Noyes.  Hemphill, Noyes & Co. had been founded in 1919 by Jansen Noyes and Clifford Hemphill, among others.(Business digest and investment weekly.  January 7, 1919) Jansen Noyes, Jr. was named chairman of Hornblower, Weeks, Hemphill, Noyes & Co. in 1968. Hornblower next acquired Trask & Co., changing the name once again to Hornblower, Weeks, Noyes & Trask.  At this point in time, Hornblower ranked eighth among member firms of the New York Stock Exchange in number of retail offices, with 93 retail sales offices located in the United States and Europe.Sale of HornblowerIn January 1977 Rhoades & Co. agreed to a merger with Hornblower, Weeks, Noyes & Trask to form Rhoades, Hornblower & Co.  The merger turned out to be disastrous for both firms.  The two firms incured significant costs attempting to merge their back office operations, both of which had issues prior to the merger.  By the end of 1978, less than a year after the merger, the combined firm was losing millions of dollars.  Through the 1960s and 1970s, I. Weill was acquiring brokerage firms and by 1979 was running Hayden Stone, the culmination of nearly a dozen acquisitions.  By early 1979, Hornblower, now known part of the larger Loeb, Rhoades, Hornblower & Co. was suffering and looking for a potential acquiror.  During Mothers Day Weekend 1979, Loeb and Shearson agreed to a merger to form Loeb Rhoades.  Weill was named the CEO of the combined firm and John Loeb became the firms chairman.  At the time, Shearson Loeb Rhoades was among the largest investment banking houses with $250 million of equity capital.(Loeb Capital Partners timeline)  SuccessorsFollowing the merger with Shearson, the Hornblower name was retired permanently.  Just two years later, in 1981, Weill sold the combined company to Express to form Express.Shortly after the merger with Shearson, Ralph Hornblower Jr. and Ralph (Ray) Hornblower III formed a new company, named Hornblower & Company with offices in Connecticut and Massachusetts.  Ray Hornblower was a running back for the Harvard Football team in the 1968 tie game against Yale, featured in the documentary film Beats Yale 29-29.An unrelated firm attempted to resurrect the Hornblower & Weeks name from 1998 - 2003 but was resisted by the Hornblower family.Merger historyThe following is an illustration of the companys mergers and its role in later successor firms (this is not a comprehensive list):(Salomon Smith Barney from Gambee, Robert. Wall Street. W. W. Norton & Company, 1999. p.73)2Hammill & Co.(est. 1902)                                         |label2Rhoades, Hornblower & Co.(merged 1978)                   |22                                        }}              }}           |label2Brothers Kuhn Loeb(merged 1977)           |2          }}       |label2       |2F. Hutton & Co.(est. 1904)       }}   }}References*Leonard , John W. Whos who in America, Volume 7.  1912*Whos who in finance, banking and insurance.  v. 1 - 1911*Langland, James.  The Chicago Daily News Almanac and Year Book for 1909. 1909*RALPH HORNBLOWER Jr. DIES; LEADER IN BROKERAGE CONCERN.  New York Times, March 12, 1987
24438083
Kelly_Johnson_(engineer)
Kelly Johnson (disambiguation)Kelly Johnsonaeronautical innovatorClarence Leonard Kelly Johnson (February 27, 1910  December 21, 1990) was an aircraft engineer and aeronautical innovator. As a member and first team leader of the Lockheed Works, Johnson worked for more than four decades and is said to have been an organizing genius.(Bennis, Warren and Patricia Ward Biederman. Organizing Genius: The Secrets of Creative Collaboration. Perseus Books, 1997.) He played a leading role in the design of over forty aircraft, including several that were honored with the prestigious Trophy, acquiring a reputation as one of the most talented and prolific aircraft design engineers in the history of aviation. In 2003, as part of its commemoration of the 100th anniversary of the Wright Brothers flight, Week & Space Technology ranked Johnson 8th on its list of the top 100 most important, most interesting, and most influential people in the first century of aerospace.(All-Time Top 100 Stars of Aerospace and Aviation Announced | SpaceRef. June 18 2003) Hibbard, Kellys Lockheed boss, once remarked to Rich: That damned Swede can actually see air.(Jim Wilson. Kelly Johnsons Skunk Works Created The Worlds Most Amazing Planes. Popular Mechanics, September 1999)LifeJohnson and Gary Powers in front of a U-2Kelly Johnson was born in the remote mining town of Michigan. His parents were Swedish, from the city of Malm, county of Scania. Kelly was ashamed of his familys poverty, and vowed to return one day in prominence.(.) Johnson was 13 years old when he won a prize for his first aircraft design. He worked his way through Central High School and graduated in 1928, then went to Flint Junior College, now known as Community College, and finally to the of Michigan in Ann Arbor, where he received a Masters Degree in Aeronautical Engineering.While attending grade school in Michigan, he was ridiculed for his name, Clarence. Some boys started calling him Clara. One morning while waiting in line to get into a classroom, one boy started with the normal routine of calling him Clara. Johnson tripped him so hard the boy broke a leg. The boys then decided that he wasnt a Clara after all, and started calling him Kelly. The nickname came from the popular song at the time, Kelly With the Green Neck Tie. Henceforth he was always known as Kelly Johnson.In 1937, Johnson married Althea Louise Young, who worked in Lockheeds accounting department; she died in December 1969. In May 1971, he married his secretary Mary Ellen Elberta Meade of New York; she died after a long illness on October 13, 1980, aged 38. He married Meades friend Nancy Powers Horrigan in November 1980.His autobiography, titled Kelly: More Than My Share of it All, ISBN 0-87474-491-1, was published in 1985.Johnson died at the age of 80 at St. Joseph Medical Center, after an illness that lasted for several years. He is buried at Forest Lawn Cemetery, Angeles, California.Lockheed careerImage:Kelly-Johnson Electra.jpg|right|thumb|Kelly Johnson participated in the design of the Model 10 Electra, testing a model with single vertical stabilizer of the design in the tunnel of the of Michigan.At the University of Michigan, he conducted wind tunnel tests of Lockheeds proposed twin-engined Model 10 Electra airliner. He found that the aircraft did not have adequate directional stability, but his professor felt it did and reported so to Lockheed. Upon completing his masters degree in 1933, Johnson joined the Lockheed Company as a tool designer at a salary of $83 a month. Shortly after starting at Lockheed, Johnson convinced Hall Hibbard, the chief engineer, that the Lockheed Model 10 Electra was unstable. Hibbard sent Johnson back to Michigan to conduct more tests. Johnson eventually made multiple changes to the wind tunnel model, including adding a H tail, to address the problem. Lockheed accepted Johnsons suggestions and the Model 10 went on to be a success. This brought Johnson to the attention of Lockheed management, and he was promoted to aeronautical engineer.(.)After assignments as flight test engineer, stress analyst, aerodynamicist, and weight engineer, he became chief research engineer in 1938. In 1952, he was appointed chief engineer of Lockheeds California, plant, which later became the Lockheed-California Company. In 1956 he became Vice President of Research and Development.Image:SketchJohnsonLockheedA-3.jpg|right|thumb|Design of A-3 (Mach 3 Ramjet), sketch from Johnsons notebookJohnson became Vice President of Advanced Development Projects (ADP) in 1958. The first ADP offices were nearly uninhabitable; the stench from a nearby plastic factory was so vile that one of the engineers began answering the intra-Lockheed house phone Skonk Works! Big Barnsmells Skonk Works &mdash; spelled with an o &mdash; was where Kickapoo Joy Juice was brewed in Capps comic strip Lil Abner. When the name leaked out, Lockheed ordered it changed to Skunk Works to avoid potential legal trouble over use of a copyrighted term. The term rapidly circulated throughout the aerospace community, and became a common nickname for research and development offices; however, reference to The Skunk Works means the Lockheed ADP shop. Here, the Starfighter and the secret reconnaissance planes U-2 and Blackbird were developed.Johnson led or contributed to the development of a number of aircraft. A few examples illustrate the influence of his work. In the late 1930s, Johnson helped lead the team that developed the Lightning. Eventually, almost 10,000 of these fighters were built.(.) They played a significant role in War II. In 1943, responding to  United States Army Air Forces concerns about Germanys development of high performance jet fighters, Johnson proposed to develop a jet airplane in six months. The result, the Shooting Star, was completed on time and became Americas first operational jet fighter. The need to find space to develop the P-80 also led to the creation of the facility that would be later called the Skunk Works.(.) Johnson also led the development of the Blackbird family of aircraft. Through a number of significant innovations, Johnsons team was able to create an aircraft that flew so high and fast that it could not be intercepted or shot down. No other jet airplane has matched the Blackbirds performance.(.)In 1955, at the request of the Intelligence Agency, Johnson initiated construction of the airbase at Lake, Nevada, later known as 51. This project provided a secret location for flight testing the U-2.(Rich, Ben; Janos, Leo. (1996) Skunk Works. Little, Brown & Company, ISBN 0-316-74300-3)He served on Lockheeds board of directors from 1964 to 1980, becoming a senior vice president in 1969. He officially retired from Lockheed in 1975 and was succeeded by Rich, but continued as a consultant at the Works. In June 1983, the Lockheed Rye Canyon Research and Development Center in Santa Clarita was renamed Kelly Johnson Research and Development Center, Lockheed-California Company, in honor of Johnsons 50 years of service to the company.A number of factors contributed to Johnsons extraordinary career. He was a very talented designer and engineer. For instance, he could quickly and accurately estimate design characteristics such as weight, characteristics that usually were determined through long calculations.(.) He was also ambitious and an excellent salesman, aggressively promoting ideas while also earning others trust.(.) In addition, he created teams and a work environment where creativity and productivity could flourish.(.)Aircraft contributionsWhile at Lockheed, Johnson designed the Lightning fighter, made flaps work on the Model 14 Super Electra, and played a major role in converting the type into the Air Forces Hudson on short notice in 1938. He worked on the development of the Constellation for Hughes TWA airline.Johnson contributed to the design of the following Lockheed aircraft:right|thumb|Kelly Johnson with an early variant of the U-2.* Orion 9D* Model 10 Electra/XC-35/C-36/Y1C-37* Model 12 Electra Junior* Model 14 Super Electra* Model 18 Lodestar* PV-1 Ventura/B-37* Lightning* Constellation family** L-049 Constellation*** L-149 Constellation*** C-69 Constellation*** L-649 Constellation**** L-749 Constellation***** C-121A-B Constellation***** PO-1W/WV-1 Warning Star***** L-1049 Super Constellation****** C-121C-J/R7O/R7V Constellation******* PO-2W/WV-2/WV-3/EC-121 Warning Star****** L-1649 Starliner* Shooting Star, the first successful American jet fighter;* T-33 and TV-2 trainers* Neptune* XF-90* Starfire* X-7* Starfighter* Nighthawk* Hercules* U-2* Blackbird family: A-12, YF-12, SR-71, M-21, and D-21* JetStar/C-140Kelly Johnsons 14 Rules of ManagementJohnsons famed down-to-brass-tacks management style was summed up by his motto, Be quick, be quiet, and be on time. He ran Works by the Kellys 14 Rules# The Skunk Works manager must be delegated practically complete control of his program in all aspects. He should report to a division president or higher.# Strong but small project offices must be provided both by the military and industry.# The number of people having any connection with the project must be restricted in an almost vicious manner. Use a small number of good people (10% to 25% compared to the so-called normal systems).# A very simple drawing and drawing release system with great flexibility for making changes must be provided.# There must be a minimum number of reports required, but important work must be recorded thoroughly.# There must be a monthly cost review covering not only what has been spent and committed but also projected costs to the conclusion of the program. Dont have the books 90 days late, and dont surprise the customer with sudden overruns.# The contractor must be delegated and must assume more than normal responsibility to get good vendor bids for subcontract on the project. Commercial bid procedures are very often better than military ones.# The inspection system as currently used by the Skunk Works, which has been approved by both the Air Force and Navy, meets the intent of existing military requirements and should be used on new projects. Push more basic inspection responsibility back to subcontractors and vendors. Dont duplicate so much inspection.# The contractor must be delegated the authority to test his final product in flight. He can and must test it in the initial stages. If he doesnt, he rapidly loses his competency to design other vehicles.# The specifications applying to the hardware must be agreed to well in advance of contracting. The Skunk Works practice of having a specification section stating clearly which important military specification items will not knowingly be complied with and reasons therefore is highly recommended.# Funding a program must be timely so that the contractor doesnt have to keep running to the bank to support government projects.# There must be mutual trust between the military project organization and the contractor with very close cooperation and liaison on a day-to-day basis. This cuts down misunderstanding and correspondence to an absolute minimum.# Access by outsiders to the project and its personnel must be strictly controlled by appropriate security measures.# Because only a few people will be used in engineering and most other areas, ways must be provided to reward good performance by pay not based on the number of personnel supervised.Note that Kelly had a 15th rule that he passed on by word of mouth. According to the book Skunk Works the 15th rule is: Starve before doing business with the damned Navy. They dont know what the hell they want and will drive you up a wall before they break either your heart or a more exposed part of your anatomy.Honors and awards*1932 (September) Sheehan Fellowship in Aeronautics, at the University of Michigan.*1937 Lawrence Sperry Award, Presented by the Institute of Aeronautical Sciences for Important improvements of aeronautical design of high speed commercial aircraft.*1940 The Brothers Medal, presented by  SAE for Rudder control problems on four-engined airplanes.*1956 The Sylvanus Albert Reed Award, presented by the of Aeronautical Sciences, for Design and rapid development of high performance subsonic and supersonic aircraft.*1956 Elected Aviation Man of the Year by a group of Aviation writers and editors appointed by the Airlines Activities Committee, representing 7,000 airline employees.*1958 Elected Distinguished Member of the Jet Pioneers Association of U.S.A.*1959 Co-Recipient of the Trophy as designer of the airframe of the Starfighter, sharing the honor with General Electric (J79 engine) and U.S. Air Force (Flight Records). The F-104 was designated the previous years Greatest achievement in aviation in America.*1960 The General Hap Arnold Gold Medal, presented by the of Foreign Wars for Design of the U-2 high altitude research plane.*1961 Chosen as one of 50 outstanding Americans of meritorious performance in the fields of endeavor, to be honored as a Guest of Honor to the first annual banquet of the Golden Plate. Honor was awarded by vote of the National Panel of Distinguished Americans of the of Achievement of Monterey, California.*1963 The von Karman Award, presented by the Air Force Association for Designing and directing development of the U-2, thus providing the Free World with one of its most valuable instruments in the defense of freedom.*1963 Elected an Honorary Member of the Aerospace Medical Association, in appreciation of his sincere and effective interest and activities in behalf of their work.*1964 The Medal of Freedom, presented by President Lyndon B. Johnson in ceremonies at the White House.  The highest civil honor the President can bestow, this recognizes Significant contributions to the quality of American life.  Johnson was cited for his advancement of aeronautics.*1964 The Award of Achievement, presented by the national Aviation club of Washington D.C., for Outstanding achievement in airplane design and development over many years, including such models as the Constellation, P-80, F-104, JetStar, the U-2, and climaxed by the metallurgical and performance breakthroughs of the A-11 (YF-12A).*1964 The Collier Trophy (his second), following his work on the YF-12 Interceptor, capable of flying at more than 2,000 mph.  His achievement for the previous year was called the greatest in American aviation.*1964 The von Karman Award (his second), presented by the Air force Association for his work with the A-11 (YF-12A) Interceptor.*1964 Honorary degree of Doctor of Engineering, of Michigan.*1964 Honorary degree of Doctor of Science, of Southern California.*1965 Honorary degree of Doctor of Laws, of California at Los Angeles.*1965 San Fernando Valley Engineer of the Year, so designated by the San Fernando, California, Valley Engineers Council.*1965 Elected a Member of the National Academy of Engineering.*1965 Elected a Member of the National Academy of Sciences.*1965 Selected as one of the first 20 men to be included in the International Aerospace Hall of Fame in San Diego, California.*1966 The Sylvanus Albert Reed Award (his second) given by the American Institute of Aeronautics and Astronautics In recognition of notable contributions to the aerospace sciences resulting from experimental or theoretical investigations.*1966 National Medal of Science, presented by President B. Johnson at the White House.*1966 The Thomas D. White National Defense Award, presented by the U.S. Air Force Academy in Colorado Springs, Colorado, in recognition of your great contributions to the national defense and security of the United States*1967 Elected Honorary Fellow of Institute of Aeronautics and Astronautics.*1968 Elected a Fellow of the Aeronautical Society.*1969 The General William Mitchell Memorial Award, presented by the Aviators Post #743 of the Legion.*1970 Awarded the of St. Louis Medal by the Society of Mechanical Engineers.*1970 On behalf of Lockheeds Advanced Development Projects facility, which he directed until his retirement in 1975, accepted the first annual Engineering Materials Achievements Award of the American Society for Metals.*1970 The Engineering Merit Award-Presented by the Institute for the Advancement of Engineering, Beverly Hills, California.*1970 Honored by the Force Association, Washington D.C., for design of the Lightning.*1971 Awarded the Sixth Annual Founders Medal by the Academy of Engineering (NAE) at the Statler-Hilton Hotel, Washington D.C.. in recognition of his fundamental contributions to engineering.*1972 Awarded the Silver Knight Award by the Lockheed Management Club of California at the Hollywood Palladium for his contributions to Lockheeds success.*1973 Awarded the first Clarence L. Johnson Award by The Society of Fight Test Engineers in Las Vegas, Nevada, for his contributions to aviation and flight test engineering.*1973 Civilian Kitty Hawk Memorial Award by Los Angeles Area Chamber of Commerce for his outstanding contributions in the field of aviation.*1974 Air Force Exceptional Service Award for his many outstanding contributions to the United States Air Force. Presented by the Secretary of the Air force, John McLucas.*1974 Enshrined in the Aviation Hall of Fame in Dayton, Ohio for his outstanding contributions to aviation.*1975 Awarded the Intelligence Agencys Distinguished Intelligence Medal for his work on reconnaissance systems.*1975 Awarded the Wright Brothers Memorial Trophy for his vital and enduring contributions over a period of 40 years to the design and development of military and commercial aircraft.*1978 The American Institute of Aeronautics and Astronautics presented A Salute to Kelly Johnson night.*1980 Awarded the Bernt Balchen Trophy, the highest award of the New York State Air Force Association. The trophy is presented annually to An individual of national prominence whose contribution to the field of aviation has been unique, extensive or of great significance.  It followed announcement of the A-12.*1981 Presented the Department of Defense Medal for Distinguished Public Service.  Presented by Harold Brown.*1981 Honored by the Society of Automotive Engineers (SAE) for his ability to motivate a small staff to work within a tight time frame and budget in creating revolutionary aircraft design.*1981 The U.S. Air Force creates the Kelly Johnson Blackbird Achievement Trophy to recognize the individual or group who has made the most significant contribution to the U-2, SR-71 or the TR-1 Program since the previous annual reunion.*1981 The Guggenheim Medal, For his brilliant design of a wide range of pace-setting, commercial, combat and reconnaissance aircraft, and for his innovative management techniques which developed these aircraft in record time at minimum cost.*1982 The Meritorious Service to Aviation Award from National Business Aircraft Association, recognizing design of more than 40 aircraft, including the worlds first business jet, the JetStar.*1983 The Aero Club of Southern California presented the Hughes Memorial Award for 1982 to C. L. Kelly Johnson as a leader in aviation.  The recipient must have devoted a major portion of his life to the pursuit of aviation as a science and as an art.  Engraved on the medal was the sentence:  His vision formed the concept, His courage forged the reality.*1983 The Security Medal was presented by President Reagan to Clarence L. Johnson for Exceptional meritorious service performed in a position of high responsibility and have made an outstanding contribution to the National Security of the Nation.*1984 Honorary Royal Designer for Industry (HonRDI), in recognition of achievements in aircraft design, conferred by the Royal Society for the encouragement of the Arts, Manufacturers, and Commerce, London.*2003 Listed at number eight in Weeks All-Time Top 100 Stars of Aerospace and Aviation.(Aviation Week. June 18, 2003. All-Time Top 100 Stars of Aerospace and Aviation Announced.)References* Lockheed Martin Corporation, How the Skunk Works got its name.* Lockheed Martin Corporation, P-38 Lightning.* Lockheed Martin Corporation, Kellys 14 Rules.* Lockheed Martin Corporation, The Skunk Works Today.* Lockheed Martin Corporation, Collier Trophy.* Rich, Ben; Janos, Leo. (1996) Skunk Works. Little, Brown & Company, ISBN 0-316-74300-3Memberships*Honorary fellow of the Institute of Aeronautics and Astronautics*Fellow of the Aeronautical Society*Member of the of Automotive Engineers*Member of Beta Pi engineering fraternities.*Member of Xi, the Scientific Research SocietyFurther reading* Johnson, Clarence L. Kelly, and Maggie Smith, 1985. Kelly: More Than My Share of It All. Smithsonian Institution Press, ISBN 0-87474-564-0* Johnson, Clarence L., Lockheed Aircraft Corporation. The Design of High-Speed Military Airplanes (1941). Reprinted from the Journal of Aeronautical Sciences* Rich, Ben, and Leo Janos, 1996. Skunk Works. Little, Brown & Company, ISBN 0-316-74300-3External links* Clarence Leonard (Kelly) Johnson.* Kelly Johnsons rules for Skunk Works aircraft.* Lord of the Skunk Works, from Air Force Magazine.*Clarence Johnson on Find-A-Grave.JohnsonJohnsonJohnsonJohnsonL. JohnsonJohnsonJohnson
24457748
Zasavska_statistical_region
The Central Sava statistical region () is a statistical region in Slovenia. It lies in Central Slovenia, mostly to the north of the Sava River, encompassing mostly territory that was part of the Central Sava Valley area of the traditional regions of Carniola and Styria.The largest town in the region is Trbovlje. It is the smallest of the twelve statistical regions of Slovenia, but second in terms of density. Industrial activities include mining and quarrying. It is the region in Slovenia with the highest decrease in population, partly due to natural decrease and partly to a negative migration rate. There is a relative lack of jobs and high unemployment. The region includes the following municipalities: * Hrastnik* Trbovlje* ob SaviIt has an total area of 264 km. Demographics Population: 45,547 Economy Employment structure: 45.2% services, 52% industry, 2.8% agriculture. Tourism It attracts very few tourists with only 0.2% of the total number of tourists in Slovenia. Transportation *Length of motorways: 1 km*Length of other roads: 367 km Sources * Slovenian regions in figures 2006de:Zasavskaes:Zasavska(regija)it:ZasavskaMedia (regio statistica slovena)hu:Zasavska nl:Zasavskapnb:pt:Zasavskaregijaregija()
24479204
Theodore_Hart
spouse       Frances Michael David (1842-1844)Mary Kent Bradbury (1845-death)Theodore Jonathan Hart (May 7, 1816 - May 28, 1887) was a Canadian businessman from Montreal, Canada. He was the son of Benjamin Hart and grandson of Hart.BiographyCareerTheodore Hart began his business career in his fathers firm, Benjamin Hart and Company, a Montreal insurance agency and mercantile business. After his fathers death in 1855 Theodore established a similar but separate business which was to include large land holdings and extensive corporate interests. His mercantile business consisted of a general wholesale and retail trade and a part interest in at least one ship that traded between Britain and East. Hart was one of the incorporators of the Trunk Railway in 1851 and a provisional director of the Montreal and Bytown Railway established in 1853. He also held shares in the of Montreal and the Bank. Hart was particularly active as an investor in such mining concerns as the Upper Canada Mining Company, the Echo Lake Mining Company, and the Montreal Mining Company.Hart also participated actively in and contributed generously to the life of his community. A member of the militia, he served during the 1837 rebellion and by 1846 had attained the rank of captain in the 3rd Battalion of Montreal militia. Along with his father he signed the Annexation Manifesto of 1849 and later became a political partisan of Hamilton Holton, a Liberal and the man he felt would serve the best commercial interests of the city. Hart made generous financial donations to McGill Colleges general endowment, the Montreal Protestant House of Industry and Refuge, and the General Hospital, which he served as a governor for several terms. In recognition of his philanthropy the hospital made him a life governor in 1878.Although a member of one of Montreals most prominent Jewish families and an early, active participant in the Shearith Israel congregation, Hart became estranged from his religious community in the late 1840s. The cause of his estrangement may have been his second marriage, to Mary Kent Bradbury, a Unitarian from Boston. His first marriage on January 4, 1842 to Frances Fanny Michaels David, his first cousin, ended with her death in 1844 after she had given birth to two daughters: Sarah Harline and Fanny Augusta. By his second marriage Hart had three sons and a daughter: Charles Theodore, Frederick LEstrange Levey, Robert Augustus Baldwin, and Edith Marie. Like several of his business contemporaries, including his friend Luther Holton, both Hart and his wife joined the Unitarian Church of the Messiah.Later lifeIn 1872 Hart gave up business and five years later retired to Europe for health reasons, although he visited Montreal periodically. He died of cancer on May 28, 1887 at the home of his daughter, the wife of a French prefect, in Mzires.References* 
24504737
CAP_S.A.
 homepage  www.cap.clCAP is a Chilean holding company of the  mining and steel sectors. These sectors are represented by different affiliates.	The first stage is done through Minera del Pacifico and involves the extraction and concentration of iron ore from the companies deposits in northern Chile. This production is sold as raw material between steel producers, mainly in the Asian market (China, Japan, Malaysia, Korea and Indonesia).The second stage is done through Siderurgia Huachipato and involves the use in Chile on behalf of CAP for the production of iron ore to produce flat and long steel, for the most varied industries.The third and final phase of CAPs activity, using in turn part of steel production, is the development of solutions in steel, processed by subsidiaries in Chile, for use in construction, industry and infrastructure solutions that also marketed by subsidiaries in other countries of our region. This stage of CAPs activity is through S.A. and S.A. and their respective subsidiaries.CAP is listed on the Stock Exchange in the IPSA index. References de Acero del Pacfico(entreprise)
24531487
Pampa_de_Achala
Pampa de Achala  is the name given to a vast region that lies at the heart of the de Crdoba located within Pampeanas, and located in central-northwest of Argentina.It is a rugged area with little vegetation, which is over 1,500 m and has singularities  green  biological, terrain e  watershed. The region is protected by provincial law,( http://www.secretariadeambiente.cba.gov.ar/PDF/LEGISLACIONES/%C1reas%20Protegidas,%20Bosques%20y%20Forestaci%F3n/%C1reas%20Protegidas/Decreto%20361Achala.pdf ) and that this region basin isheadof the vast majority of streams that run through the  Crdoba.  Origin of the nameThe name for the area comes from the Quechua language, and apparently refers to the original inhabitants of the region, the comechingones.There is no concrete data concerning the origin of the name, merely hypotheses. According to the dictionary of the Mayor de la Lengua Quechua(http://www.scribd.com/doc/16303906/DICCIONARIO-QUECHUA-PERU), achala means fancy dress or striking costume. Many Quechan terms contain the word achala. A similar word is achalay, meaning grooming or decorating. According to the dictionary of Dr. Gonzlez de Holgun(Andean languajes (in Spanish)), the word achala does not exist in that context, but one finds the similar words achallay and achallay ichini, which mean both to cause something and self-admiration.The word could have originated from a distortion of the original term, which was later converted into a word more agreeable to the Spanish of the area, and could refer either to the clothing historically worn by inhabitants of the region, allowing them to withstand the severity of the weather, or to the admiration the inhabitants had for this special region.Physical GeographyGeneral descriptionPampa de Achala is located in the province of Cordoba in Argentina. The northern boundary consists of the mountains of Los Gigantes, and the southern boundary of the northern portion of the Sierra de Comechingones, with the Summits of Achala located in the central area of the region. It is a rugged area, whose small plains and low slopes are responsible for its classification as plains. These slopes and plains allowed for the formation of an intricate underground water network that supplies a great number of springs. Within this region, there are numerous deep ravines with vertical walls between 600m and 800m high, many of which are more than 1,000m wide. The most important and popular ravines are the Quebrada del Condorito and the Quebrada de Yatn.These streams have nurtured microclimates that allow for the development of ecological niches, with many species (species that do not live anywhere else on the planet), worthy of study and observation. In general access to them is difficult due to the rugged terrain, often inaccessible to any vehicle (including those with all-wheel drive) and thus can only be reached on foot, by mule or by horseback..CartographyThere are many maps published and available on the Internet that detail the region.(General view of Pampa de Achala) The region appears to be a large mass of rock from north to south, crossed by a single road: National Road RN 20.Position, limits, and extensionThe region covers southern del Eje Department, the south west of Department, Alberto Department and Javier Department and the west of Department.It is difficult to differentiate the water reserve Provincial Pampa de Achala from the Pampa de Achala itself. The water reserve was purposely created to protect the Pampa. Its boundaries are set by geographical features: the northern boundary reaches the provincial route RP 28 (formerly the National Road RN 20), which surrounds the massif of Los Gigantes. The southern boundary is Champaqu, 2,790 meters high. Its eastern and western limits are set by the high altitude of 1,500 meters. In this region are the highest peaks of the province.Its size is about 65 km from north to south and 24 km from east to west, which represents an area of approximately 150,000 hectares, of which 40,000 are the del Condorito National Park.File:RutadeAchala.jpg|300px|thumb|right|Route N34 (Altas Cumbres route), also called Jorge Ral Recalde, in memory of this rally driver, native to this regionPathsTo access this region, two provincial roads: Provincial Route No. 28 (gravel), linking the towns of Tanti with Taninga (near the town of Salsacate). After traveling nearly 40 km from Tanti, and climb over 1,700 meters you reach the far north of the region, more precisely at the foot of the massif Los Gigantes. From there you can follow the same route to the town of Taninga. The second option is the provincial route RP 34 (tarmac), located about 30 km south of the former. It crosses the city of Carlos Paz, crossing the towns of Antonio de Arredondo, Icho Cruz, Sumaj, Blanca, and deposited us in the Pampa de Achala. This road is also known as de las Altas Cumbres or route Jorge Ral Recalde, in tribute to this rally racer. Continuing along the same route, it accesses the Traslasierra Valley. While these are the two most relevant options, there are regional roads and tourist access to reach specific sectors within the region. As mentioned above, except for these two alternatives, the other, in most cases are suitable only for special vehicles, and yet they can not access certain areas.bridges road was constructed and opened in 1918 linking the Valley Traslasierra with the city of Carlos Paz in the Valley.GeologyThe geological evolution of the Pampa de Achala cannot be isolated from the evolution of Sierras de Crdoba and Sierras de San Luis. The geological history of these, dating back 15 million years, with the formation of a basin which was then subjected to enormous strain as a result of horizontal pressure.Elevated basement blocks are reverse faults of approximately north-south direction, west verging, which are composed by rock and Igneous of the Neoproterozoic in the Palaeozoic. Less affected by successive orogenic cycles: the Pampean orogenies, the Proterozoic higher-Cambrian medium (Rapela et al. 1998), Famatinian, the Ordovician less than half (Aceolaza and Toselli 1976, Dalla Salda 1987) and achaliana of Devon medium to Carboniferous lower (Sims et al. 1998; Stuart-Smith et al. 1999), which would be related to successive stages of convergence and collision of land with the craton of the River Plate, along the proto-Andean margin of Gondwana (sic).(The magnetic susceptibility of the Achala Batholith (Devonian, Sierra Grande de Crdoba) and its difference with other Achalian granites. Autores varios, publicado en la Revista de la Asociacin Geolgica Argentina. v.63 n.3 Buenos Aires jul./sep. 2008) Here, there was intrusion of large igneous bodies - batholiths - ended granite, producing the rise of the emerging mountains. In the Tertiary old structures were activated and generated new ones. Along with the strain developed a significant volcanism in the western region and, finally, late in the same era and the beginning of the Quaternary, the whole region was a general uprising to build the current ranges. The tectonic forces at work in the Andean folding horizontal pressures generated from the west and due to the rigidity of the underlying material caused the existence of faults, almost all north-south and an alignment of the strings accordingly. The result was that seen at present, a mountain range with steep western slopes and eastern slopes with gentle slope, which allowed the formation of natural lakes and streams of high ecological value. These mountain ranges are represented the three types of rocks: Metamorphic, Sedimentary and Igneous or granite.All these orogenic movements, gave rise to our Pampa de Achala.Geochemically include calc-alkaline granites with alkaline s, metaaluminosos to peraluminous, are more abundant and Monzogranites granites, but also appear granodiorites, leucogranites and tonalites. Often contain mafic enclaves, dikes lamprofricos-pegmatite and aplite. By its chemical composition is located within the field of collisional or intraplate granites (Rapela et al. 1990), and have been interpreted as a product of partial melting of the crust due to changes in the thermal regime during regional uplift (Otamendi et al. 2002).Since the foundation of the Pampas Sierras was hit by a series of extensional events in the Late Paleozoic (Gondwanan cycle) and Late, the latter accompanied by a large magmatism basic effusive, and finally the orogeny Cenozoic Andico cycle, which produced the present morphology dumps blocks east, with activity until the present. The brittle tectonic Andica is represented by reverse faults among which stand out in the hills of Cordoba those high peaks, the Giants-Copina (NNO) and The Cumbrecita (NNE) (sic)(OrographyThe most common here are metamorphic rocks formed from plutonic-metamorphic basement of the  Precambrian age, composed mostly of coarse-grained metamorphic rocks (gneiss and migmatites), interrupted by large demonstrations granite (batholiths), common in the Pampa de Achala. Found primarily quartz, mica, biotite and muscovite. magnetite, fluorapatite rutile, chlorite, kaolinite and  uranium ore. The latter has generated considerable controversy regarding its acquisition, due to the high degree of pollution, which involves extraction.WeatherThe climate of the region is temperate with high thermal aptitude. The maximum temperatures are generally 30C in the summer, and the temperature does not fall below -20C during the winter (approximately the end of April to the beginning of September).As is typical of the climate of mountain regions, the weather conditions can change within minutes.HydrographyThe average precipitation for the area is 800 mm. In summer precipitation is in the form of rain, and generally in the winter it is found in the form of snow. Fog is common all year due to the humid winds from the east; the cold winds from the south are also not uncommon. An intricate network of streams, ponds, lakes and springs give this region the characteristic function as a sponge that absorbs and retains the moisture throughout the year, channeling it into the water sources which supplied much of the population of the province. It is a natural basin for precipitation, and for this reason, the provincial government declared the region as the provincial water reserve of Pampa de Achala. The area contains the headwaters of four major rivers of the province: Suqua (or First River), Xanaes (or Second River) and Ctalamochita (or Third River) flowing towards the eastern margin of the Sierras. Towards the western side of the region we find the headwaters of the Rio Mina Clavero river.BiomeThis particular eco-region, as defined by the convergence of the biogeographical provinces of Chaquea del Espinal, Pampeana and Mountain, has been influenced by many types of flora and fauna. It is regarded as an island due to its specific biogeographical characteristics and it is thus distinguished from other areas within the environment of Chaco by its altitude and the species that inhabit it.FloraGeneralSeveral phytogeographical provinces converge here: Chaquea, Andean, Patagonian and Magellanic. The confluence of these very diverse currents confers on the area a synthesis of microclimates which makes it unique, a uniqueness accentuated by the presence of endemic species, the number of which is probably greater than is presently known.SpeciesIn the ravines and on the mountain slopes are copses or small woods of tabaquillo(http://www.patrimonionatural.com/popupFotos.asp?idMAR02087) and mayten(http://www.google.com/imgres?imgurlhttp://www.maderasnobles.cl/maiten_b.jpg&imgrefurlhttp://www.maderasnobles.cl/maiten.html&h536&w300&sz80&tbnid8rolJu3EvFyHBM:&tbnh132&tbnw74&prev/images%3Fq%3Dmaiten&usg__ymrAK2BpTd7idrUxSNCFNhPEeNY&eiaWs3S4qrBYOSuAfWnYinBw&saX&oiimage_result&resnum1&ctimage&ved0CAoQ9QEwAA), called in the mountain zone quebracho, the coexistence of which is a unique biogeographical phenomenon. The tabaquillo has relatives which are distributed the length of the Andes from Venezuela to Argentina, while the mayten originates from the woodlands of south-west Argentina (the cool Andean-Patagonian woodland)( or Andean-Patagonic forest (in Spanish)). The greatest density of these woods is in the bottoms of the ravines, where they acquire a low forest physiognomy with great quantities of ferns and epiphytes. Both the grasslands and the woodlands of the pampas and of the ravines respectively are composed of plants of very diverse origins. Some, approaching from the eastern slopes of the mountainous area, are native to the Austro-Brazilian region. Other species of specifically Andean origin have in the Pampa de Achala their most southerly distribution. On the other hand, numerous species of the south of Argentina find in this region their most northerly habitat.Not only the rocky walls of the ravines but also the granite outcrops of the Pampa de Achala, at first glance sites deprived of vegetation and of fauna, represent highly diverse habitats, capable of sustaining in their cracks and fissures a flora and fauna of significant scientific interest.Below the 1,500 metre line, the tough grasslands of the high altitude are replaced by thickets in which the romerillo (alienus) predominates. The high altitude woodlands make way for the mountainous Chaqueo woodlands(), with trees of molle(Image and description of the Molle) and coco.FaunaGeneralThe characteristics of this area primarily correspond to the Andean-Patagonian region, with the typical species of the plain encountered at an altitude that limits their distribution. The geographical isolation of the area has been favourable for the region, allowing for the survival of unique fauna.  Biologists and birdwatchers from around the world travel to Pampa de Achala to observe the endemic species of the region.AmphibiansAmphibians native to the region include Achala toads (Rhinella achalensis(http://www.panoramio.com/photo/795349) and achalensis,(http://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/File:Bufo_achalensis.jpg)) and the Achalan frog (achalensis(http://www.arkive.org/cordoba-escuerzo/odontophrynus-achalensis/)).BirdsEleven subspecies and species of birds of the Passeriform order of Andean-Patagonian lineage are exclusive to this area, including:Rufous-banded miner(http://www.avespampa.com.ar/Furnariidae.htm),common miner(cunicularia contrerasi)(http://www.freebirds.com.ar/501_590/515/515_geositta_cun6copy.jpg),bar-winged cinclodes(olrogi),white-winged cinclodes(http://www.avespampa.com.ar/Remolinera_Castana1.jpg),Cordilleran canastero (modesta cordobae),Puna castanero,White-Tailed Shrike Tyrant(Angriornis montana fumosus),Cinereous Ground-Tyrant(rufivertex achalensis),plain-colored seedeater(Catamenia inornata cordobensis),Plumbeous Sierra-Finch(http://www.foto-mundosilvestre.com/details.php?image_id5616&modesearch&sessionid2a1e782a4d28f9cac518bdb37af23e62 Yal Plomizo) (also known as Yal plomizo) andAsh-breasted Sierra-Finch (http://www.avespampa.com.ar/Yal_Chico1.jpg Yal Chico) (also called Yal chico),long-tailed meadowlark (http://www.freebirds.com.ar/970.htm) Sturnella loyca obscura), which nests in the ground and in large, oddly-shaped rocks.The most inaccessible cliff walls are used as nesting sites by theBlack-chested buzzard eagle (Geranoetus melanoleucus), the falcon(http://www.educa.madrid.org/web/cp.josesaramago.rivas/pueblo/halcon.jpg)(Falco peregrinus) and the Condor(http://es.wikipedia.org/wiki/Archivo:Colca-condor-c03.jpg).The Andean condor is one of the more recognized species in the area; as of 2007, 101 Andean condors remained in the region.( In Spanish) The Vulture (papa) has also been spotted in Pampa de Achala.MammalsAmong the mammals native to the region is the Culpeo or Andean fox (Pseudalopex culpaeus)-in the region, is called red fox-, which is in danger of extinction(http://books.google.com.ar/books?idUHDWz6LkfYMC&printsecfrontcover&dqlos+que+se+van&as_brr3&rview1#PPA466,M2). They share this region with 30 other species of mammals, including the puma (Felis concolor), classified as vulnerable; the colocolo (Oncifelis colocolo); the ferret (Mustela furax); and cat (Oncifelis geoffroyi)(http://es.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oncifelis_geoffroyi).Small rodents and hare are also abundantly present in the area.  Guanacos have recently been reintroduced to the region, as they were disappearing slowly towards the early twentieth century.InsectsThe local scorpion, (Urophonius achalensis), is of particular interest. Of the numerous species of arthropod, the ant (( Hormiga colorada)) stands out on account of the size of its nests and pathways.ReptilesFile:Pristidactylus_achalensis_01.jpg|200px|thumb|rigth|Achalas green lizard. achalensis.Along the arroyos are well-watered areas (fertile plains, marshes) and reedbeds where the native coral snake Liophis anomalus () ((Culebra Listada)) feeds on the local tree frog pulchella ( or bramble-patch frogs) ((http://www.bouzada.d2g.com/Articulo.asp?Id78&Query6%20&Indice1 Ranita del Zarzal)).An endemic species is also to be found, the eye-catching green lizard of Achala, Prystidactilus achalensis.((http://www.treknature.com/gallery/South_America/Argentina/photo149706.htm))The sole venomous snake is a species of snake, dorbignyi (). ((Lystrophis dorbignyi))FishThe commonest species of fish in the water courses of the Pampa de Achala are the trout, arroyo trout (fontinalis), Astyanax fasciatus (), and (http://es.wikipedia.org/wiki/Oligosarcus In spanish). Indiscriminate fishing has caused the loss of numerous species throughout the region (and indeed the entire province). The rivers and arroyos are perpetually being re-stocked with salmon, with the intention of maintaining the ecology. Regrettably the goal can never be reached, as secret fishing is constant and difficult to control, and has caused the loss of very many species. As at September 2009, all fishing in all locations throughout the province is forbidden during the hours of darkness.Political GeographyHuman BiogeographyOriginal InhabitantsThe original inhabitants of the region were the Comechingones, the indiginous inhabitants of the plains and mountains beginning approximately 500 years ago, and who are responsible for most of the names given to the major elements of the region of the Cordoba mountains. They arrived in the region by fleeing the persecution of Spanish colonizers.In the area of pampa de olen, researchers have found evidence of an earlier culture, ayampit, which existed in the region approximately 6,000 years earlier.PopulationThe population of the region is extremely low. Access to the region is difficult, with many roads being steep, and many areas accessible only by walking or riding a mule or horse. Obtaining water is not easy, as it seeps down to the bedrock very quickly. Electricity is provided exclusively through solar power. Despite the difficulties of living in Pampa de Achela, schools exist in the region (including Namuncur, Padre Liqueno, among others) that serve as convergence points for inhabitants of the area. Some schools have to offset their academic terms due to inclement weather in the winter (consisting of temperatures regularly approaching -20C, accompanied by strong winds and snow), causing classes to be suspended until spring. The region also contains some very basic health centers.The principal activity of the region is the breeding and raising of goats, cattle, and sheep. These animals are used to sustain the inhabitants of the region through the sale of leather, and raw or woven wool. Some inhabitants also produce pottery to sell to tourists.Economic GeographyTourism and EcologySome areas (particularly Los Gigantes) have high mountain ranges are used by climbers, both amateur and professional, as well as Scout groups. During the summer, the water ways that have small sandy beaches at their banks attracts some tourists. Another popular attraction is the path of the high peaks. While the current route is relatively new (the project dates from the late 1950s), the original existed before the twentieth century and is known as a path of suspension bridges. The route was constructed along the path of a public trail, which was used by hikers and horseback riders. Its construction is due to the tireless work of the priest Jos Gabriel del Rosario Brochero, more famously known as the Cura Gaucho. Today, this road is used as one of the stages of the world rally championship, and as a tourist attraction. With the declaration of natural reserves (and national park area of the Quebrada del Condorito), it is expected that the impact of the tourism on the ecology of the region will be measured and controlled to better protect the local ecology.MiningMining in the area is limited, as it has been proven that mining is devastatingly detrimental to the areas ecology. There are a few mines in the area that were established prior to the creation of the reserve, and they operate under strict environmental controls. The most notable of the mines in the area is the uranium mine of the Los Gigantes, property of ADARSA(http://www.adarsa.org.ar/residuos_uranio.htm), which extracts and processes material for the nuclear power plants of Embalse and Atucha.LegislationThe region was declared a Provincial Water Reserve in 1999 due to the area receiving the most precipitation in the province (in the form of both rain and snow), providing most of the water resources for Cordoba and surrounding provinces.(http://www.secretariadeambiente.cba.gov.ar/fuentes/pdf/Reserva%20H%EDdrica%20Provincial%20de%20Achala.pdf)This transforms the area into the most important watershed of central Argentina.Referenced Sources* GEUNA, Silvana E., ESCOSTEGUY, Leonardo D., MIRO, Roberto et al. La susceptibilidad magntica del batolito de Achala (Devnico, Sierra Grande de Crdoba) y sus diferencias con otros granitos achalianos. Revista Asociacin Geolgica Argentina, jul./sep. 2008, vol.63, no.3, p. 380-394. ISSN 0004-4822.* Refugio de Animales Autctonos por decreto 1174/64 dentro de Decreto Ley de Caza 4046/58, art. 25.* Veda Permanente de Caza. Resoluciones Anuales en marco de Decreto Ley de Caza 4046/58.* Ley de Creacin del Parque Nacional Quebrada del Condorito 24.749/96.* Decreto de creacin de la Reserva Hdrica Provincial de Achala N 361 del de marzo de 1999.* Reserva Hdrica provincial de Achala  Secretara de ambiente  Gobierno de la provincia de Crdoba.* Parque Nacional Quebrada del Condorito - Gobierno de la Provincia de CrdobaBibliography* Dimitri, Milan J., and Parodi, Lorenzo R., 1978: Enciclopedia Argentina de Agricultura y Jardinera T1, Vol 1 y Vol 2. Buenos Aires: Editorial ACME S.A.C.I.See also* de Crdoba* Grandes* Pampeanas* del Condorito* del YatnReferencesExternal links*Fundacin Cndor*Pgina con informacin general sobre Crdoba*Fundacin para la proteccin del Ambiente*Reserva Hdrica Provincial de Pampa de Achala*Pampa de Achala, una experiencia personal*Mina Clavero*Crdoba virtual*Barrameda*Areas Protegidas de Crdoba*Quebrada del condorito*Welcome to Argentina (Pgina privada de Parques Nacionales Argentinos)*Gobierno de la Provincia de Crdoba (Parque Nacional Quebrada del Condorito)*Aves de la regin pampeana*Aves silvestres*Aves del Chaco y Corrientes*Regin Traslasierrade Achalade Achalade Achala
24551215
Marshall_hydrothermal_recovery_system
The Marshall Hydrothermal Recovery System is the first patented system designed to utilize underwater hydrothermal vents for energy, mining, and water desalination.  It was designed by Bruce C. Marshall of California.vents typically spew out superheated fluid as high as  at velocities ranging from 15 m/s. The vent openings are anywhere from a few centimeters to several meters in diameter.  The 15 m/s flow happens at depths of typically 2,300 m below sea level which is under pressure of more than 200 atmospheres. The vents are powered by the weight of seawater above forcing itself into fissures within the Earths crust which is then returned to the ocean as a continuous, superheated geyser.In one proposed embodiment of the system, the vent would be capped off and the hydrothermal fluid ducted to the sea surface through highly insulated pipes. A floating platform or ship on the surface would then extract the heat from the hydrothermal fluid and then use it for power generation. In the closed loop system embodiment, a loop of insulated pipe would go from a floating platform or ship on the surface, down to the ocean floor, next to or in the hydrothermal vent, and would return to the ship or platform. A exchanger placed within the hydrothermal fluid flow would heat working fluid which would then be directed to the surface and used for power generation. The used working fluid would then be returned to the sea floor and be reheated.Recoverable energyA 3m opening and 3 m/s flow at  would create a flow of 21,205.73 L/sec, which is equivalent to 29,298.77 MW of raw energy, calculated as the reciprocal of the amount of energy needed to raise that volume of water to that temperature. In comparison, the largest fission nuclear reactor in the U.S., the Verde Nuclear Generating Station, provides a maximum of less than 4,000 MW of power. modeling has shown the estimated producible density after generator losses to be about 1 MW/10 cm2 pipe area.Advantages Hydrothermal energy is by far the densest and most highly concentrated natural source.  Its producible energy content based on modeling is estimated to be about 3.3 x 106 more intense than raw solar radiation, and it is available 24 hours a day.  By contrast, both wind and solar suffer from low density and intermittent operation.Hydrothermal energy offers the potential of replacing existing power plants, something that other renewable sources can not promise.Deep-Sea miningWhen using the open-loop configuration, the Marshall Hydrothermal Recovery System proposes to capture the ores that are being ejected from the core of the Earth before they can settle to become veins.  Hydrothermal veins (hydrothermal vents of the geologic past) are the natural source of virtually all surface mines in the world.  The ores are known to be among the richest ever harvested, and because of the huge variety of metals and minerals in the fluid, mining promises to be as important as, or perhaps even more important than the energy that will be produced.Water desalinationIn the open-loop configuration, the Marshall Hydrothermal Recovery System allows the water component of the hydrothermal fluid to flash to steam, which can then be distilled and recovered as fresh water.  The vast majority of the energy needed is provided by nature, but additional stages of purification may be needed.Technical challengesThe depth of the hydrothermal vents along the de Fuca Ridge is about 1500m, well within reach of conventional oil rigs. But other technical challenges remain.Subsea construction is always difficult, and those who would build the first Marshall Hydrothermal Recovery System will have to solve major primary engineering challenges on a scale of those faced when building the worlds first nuclear power plant, the Nuclear Power Plant.  Materials and procedures must be utilized to deal with the highly acidic (and in some cases highly alkaline) vent fluid and extreme depth, and selecting the best method of exchanging the heat and the best working fluid will be an immediate concern.power cable is costly and has never been laid at the depths in question.  The main problem is not the depth, but the tensile strength of the cable.  The weight of such a great length of cable is sufficient to tear it in half during the laying process if it is not properly designed.The most economical means of recovering the ores from the mining products must also be determined.Economic challengesQuestions remain as to how much it would cost and whether it would be competitive with traditional methods of power generation such as nuclear.The Peace River Nuclear Power Plant planned for Alberta, Canada is projected to cost about $2800 per kW, or a total of $6.2 billion for the 2,200 MW plant.A semi-submersible oil platform for deep ocean use costs  $500 million to $1 billion. An undersea cable from de Fuca Ridge would have to be 200 miles (320 km) long, which is around the same length of the longest power cable. Unfortunately, transmission capacity for that cable is only 750 MW and it cost 550 million euros, about $800 million.  In order to reach 2,200 MW equivalent capacity, 3 of these cables would be needed, for a cost of about $2.6 billion. The total so far is estimated at about $3.6 billion. The generators and control systems are the only parts of the two systems that would be roughly equivalent in cost, likely adding another $1 billion to the pricetag.From these estimates, it appears that the cost of a hydrothermal generating plant would be about 28% less than the cost of a comparable nuclear plant, with no ongoing fuel or waste storage costs.  There are many technological hurdles that need to be overcome, but even with the engineering challenges the system faces, its potential is great because of the extreme density and constancy of hydrothermal energy, its triple revenue streams of energy, mining products, and water, and the lack of external fuel needed for its operation.External links* http://www.marshallsystem.com
24572687
Motema
For the music label, see Music. Motema is an urban diamond-mining town in District in the Eastern Province of Leone. The town is located immediately outside Koidu Town, the largest city in Kono District. Motema has a population of 30,452 and lies about 245 miles east of Freetown. The town is home to one of the largest station in Sierra Leone.The town has two secondary school with a pool, a court and soccer field.  The town also has a station run by the Leone Police Force and a major hospital. Diamond development The Town is home to many foreign diamonder employee as well as class class Sierra Leonean diamond exporter. The town has 24 hour electricity brought in by the foreign diamond exporter. Ethnicity and ReligionThe population of Motema is ethnically diverse, with no ethnic group forming the majority of the population. Islam account about 60% of the population and Christianity at about 40%. violence in the city is extremely rare.SportLike the rest of Sierra Leone, football is the most popular sport in the town of Motema. The town does not have a major football club; however, the Stars of Kono represent Motema and the rest of the Kono District in the Leone National Premier League, the top football league in the country. 
24600674
Clarke_v_Dickson
Clarke v Dickson (1858) EB & E 148 is an contract law case concerning misrepresentation. It stands as an example of the restrictive approach common law courts took to rescission for misrepresentation before the leading case of v New Sombrero Phosphate Co((1878) 3 App Cas 1218) held only substantial counter restitution was needed.FactsMr Clarke said he was induced by the three defendants statements to take shares in The Welsh Potosi Lead and Copper Mining Company, formed for working on a mine on the cost-book principle. Dividends were declared in 1854-6. Then Mr Clarke accepted fresh allotments in lieu of dividends. In 1857 the companys performance was poor and it was liquidated under the Act 1855. Then Mr Clarke discovered that the representations about its cost-book practices were false and fraudulent. He sued to recover deposits for the shares. JudgmentCrompton J held that the contract could not be rescinded, since the shares were now worth less. He said where someone wants to exercise the voidable option,Erle J and Lord Campbell CJ concurred.See also*contract law*in English law*company lawNotes
24616937
David_Huebner
David Huebner (born 1960) is the United States Ambassador to Zealand and Samoa.()  He previously was an American lawyer based in Shanghai, where he specialized in arbitration and mediation for the Angeles-based law firm, Mullin, Richter & Hampton.()()  He is licensed as an attorney in both California and York, and in the District of Columbia, and as a solicitor in England and Wales.()Early lifeHuebner was born in Mahanoy City, Pennsylvania, a small coal mining town in Schuylkill County.( )()  He attended Mahanoy Area High School and received his higher education at University, graduating summa cum laude from the Wilson School of Public and International Affairs.((  While earning his Doctor at Law School, Huebner served as editor-in-chief of the Journal on Regulation and was a member of the Yale AIDS Law Project, a student group that assisted with the publication of AIDS and the Law.(()()  From 1984 to 1985, Huebner lived in Tokyo, having been awarded a Henry Luce Fellowship to serve as an aide to Kakizawa, a member of Japans House of Representatives.(()()CareerFile:David Huebner swearing in.jpg|thumb|Huebner, accompanied by his partner Duane McWaine, sworn in as ambassador by U.S. Vice President Biden in 2009.In 1995, Huebner joined the international law firm, Brothers.  He served as its chairman and executive officer from 2003 until the firms dissolution in 2005.(()  In April 2005, Huebner was appointed to the California Law Revision Commission by Governor Schwarzenegger.(  Huebner also served as president of the Los Angeles Quality & Productivity Commission and taught courses at the of Southern California Law School.(  In September 2005, he joined Sheppard, Mullin, Richter & Hampton, and in May 2007, became the firms regional managing partner in China.()( )Huebner serves as counsel to rights organization, the & Lesbian Alliance Against Defamation (GLAAD).()( )AmbassadorshipIn October 2009, President Obama nominated Huebner as U.S. Ambassador to New Zealand and Samoa, a post held by McCormick until January 2009.((  He was confirmed by the U.S. Senate on November 20, 2009.(  Huebner, a Democrat, is the first openly gay ambassador in the Obama administration, and the third openly gay ambassador in U.S. history.((()  During his confirmation hearing before the Senate Committee on Foreign Relations, Huebner introduced his partner of 20 years, Duane McWaine, a doctor from Los Angeles.()( )See also* of the United States in Wellington* policy of the Barack Obama administration* Zealand  United States relations*  United States relationsReferencesExternal links* David Huebners biography, by the U.S. State Department* David Huebners blog, via newzealand.usembassy.gov* Embassy of the United States - New Zealand official website* Embassy of the United States - Samoa official website* Written Statement of David Huebner, testimony before the Senate Committee on Foreign Relations
24628526
Murray_Brook_Mine
 closing year  1992__NOTOC__The Murray Brook Mine is a VMS deposit in the Mining Camp (BMC) of northern Brunswick, Canada owned by Resources.() The deposit was discovered in 1955 and contains the largest gossan zone in the BMC. From 1989 to 1992 the gossan zone was processed for gold and silver. In 1992 copper rich ore was crushed and tested for leaching.()See also*massive sulfide ore depositReferencesExternal links*
24639941
Western_Australian_daylight_saving_referendum,_2009
The 2009 Western Australian daylight savings referendum was held on 16 May 2009 in the Australian state of Australia to decide if saving time should be adopted. It was the fourth such proposal which had been put to Western Australian voters and followed a three-year trial period. The referendum failed with 54.56% voting against the proposal.BackgroundVarious states and territories in Australia adopted saving time between 1968 and 1971, but Queensland, the Territory and Australia did not do so.( ) In Western Australia, three referendums were held in 1975, 1984 and 1992 on the issue, with daylight saving being rejected each time.()()On 25 October 2006, two members of the Australian Legislative Assembly, former Labor minister turned independent member DOrazio and Liberal leader Birney, introduced a private members bill for a three-year trial of daylight saving to begin in December 2006.()() The Labor government of Western Australia backed the trial and both main parties agreed to hold a free vote on the issue.( ) Farming groups quickly came out against the move,( along with the mining lobby, but the move was backed by business groups.() The bill was approved by the lower house 37-14() and then by the upper house 21-10, enabling the trial to start from the 3 December.()During 2007 there was growing opposition to daylight saving time with some in the National Party calling for people to ignore the trial.() In October 2007 the Liberal Party proposed a bill to bring the referendum forward to early 2008 because of the backlash against daylight saving,() and a petition was signed by 66,000 people supporting holding the referendum in 2008.( ) However this was not successful and the referendum was called for 16 May 2009.( )QuestionThe question voted on in the referendum was:Are you in favour of daylight saving being introduced in Western Australia by standard time in the State being advanced one hour from the last Sunday in October 2009 until the last Sunday in March 2010 and in similar fashion for each following year?()CampaignBusiness groups were among the main supporters of daylight saving time and financed the yes campaign.() The yes campaign argued that it would make dealing with businesses from the east of Australia easier during the summer as it would reduce the time difference.( They also put the case that with daylight saving time, families would be able to spend more time together outdoors after work while it was still light.()Opposition was strongest in rural areas of Western Australia with farmers arguing that it caused problems for them.( Opponents argued that daylight saving led to more deaths on the roads and that it was inconvenient for families.( ) With daylight saving they also said that electricity consumption was increased, damaging the environment.(Campaigning was intense during the week before the poll. On 11 May, the WA Farmers Federation claimed the Electoral Commission was biased as, while voters were instructed to write the words Yes or No in the box, a tick would be accepted as a yes, while a cross would be marked an invalid vote.( ) On 13 May, Kalgoorlie independent MP Bowler, who was a daylight saving supporter, pledged that if the referendum was passed, he would move a private members bill to exclude March from the period. However, supporters labelled this a stunt, as there was no guarantee the bill would pass Parliament.()()polls gave no clear indication as to the eventual result. While West Australian tipped a 53% no vote, the Sunday Times, which conducted an online poll via its PerthNow portal, tipped a 53% yes vote.()( ) The of Western Australia Barnett did not declare which way he would vote until the day of the referendum, when he said that he had voted yes, but that a no vote was the most likely outcome of the referendum.(ResultsThe referendum proposition was rejected, with 54.56% voting no, as against 45.44% who voted yes.() It was compulsory to vote at the referendum, and 1,148,851 voters, representing 85.64% of enrolled voters, turned out to cast a vote. Non-voters faced a fine of $20 to $50.()The no vote was strongest in regional and rural areas as well as the outer suburbs of Perth.() The no vote had a majority in 35 of the states 59 electorates, including all of the non-metropolitan electorates ranging from 85.36% in Wagin to 55.91% in Birneys former electorate of Kalgoorlie, but also including 18 of metropolitan Perths 42 electorates.( The yes vote achieved a majority in 24 electorates, all but two of which were in the North Metropolitan and South Metropolitan regions. The electorates of Ocean Reef (63.01%), Perth (59.96%), Joondalup (59.20%), Hillarys (58.33%) and Kingsley (56.66%) recorded the highest yes votes.(Following the fourth rejection of daylight saving time in a referendum the issue was described as being dead for a generation, with Premier Colin Barnett saying that it should not be considered for another 20 years.()ReferencesExternal links*2009 Daylight Saving Referendum Arguments*Results by district
24656530
Andrs_Aldasoro
Andrs Aldasoro Espinoza was a Mexican Mining Engineer, he was the director of several mines during the rule of Daz. He was the director of the Mines Las Dos Estrellas in Tlalpujahua in the State of Michoacn, Pursima Grande in Real del Monte in the State of Hidalgo and San Andrs de la Sierra in the state of Durango. He carried out feasibility studies for the mine La Dificultad.  It was in Real del Monte where his sons Pablo Aldasoro and Aldasoro Surez, Air Pilots members of the Early Birds of Aviation were born.thumb|right|350px|Andres Aldasoro, circa 1920.During the last stages of General Daz, he became Underminister of Promotion (Subsecretario de Fomento) whist Don Bias Escontria was the Minister. He was considered as an efficient collaborator ... who has had a brilliant career, is much esteemed in Germany, and is an expert on mining subjects, as was shown when he conducted the negotiations as to San Andres de la Sierra, Durango. (BENZIGER(1909))External links*Las Dos Estrellas Mine (English/Spanish)*Mineral del Monte webpage (spanish) Describes mines, attractions and the house where the Aldasoro family lived*Description of the study of Mine La Dificultad (Spanish)*Translation of a letter from Andres Aldasoro Under Secretary of Fomento to His Excellency Reginald Tower, His Majestys Minister at Mexico; from Mexico; 21 Feb 1910 dealing with Botanical references. (English)References: http://www.archive.org/stream/roundworld07newyiala/roundworld07newyiala_djvu.txt
24689301
Yingshouyingzi_Mining_District
Yingshouyingzi Mining District () is a district of Chengde, Hebei, China.Administrative Divisions(- )Towns:*Wangjiazhuang (), Town (), Shouwangfen (), Beimaquanzi ()References External LinksKuangminier de Yingshouyingzija:no:YingshouyingziTh Doanh Tzh:
24702146
Comaplix,_British_Columbia
Comaplix is the name of former mining town on the River in the northern Lakes region of Columbias Country in Canada.  The name of the town and an adjacent mountain and creek are derived form that of the river, which is an Okanagan word meaning point at the head of the lake.()  The location, now abandoned, is on the northeast side of Beaton Arm of Arrow Lake,() near the sites of Beaton and Camborne (also ghost towns, though Beaton remains partly inhabited today).See also*of ghost towns in British Columbia*British Columbia*of the Arrow Lakes*BayReferences
24717959
Forced_labor_of_Germans_after_World_War_II
Forced labour of Germans after World War II refers to the Allied use of German civilians and captured soldiers for forced labor in years following World War II (and in some cases much longer).The topic of using Germans as labour for reparations was first broached at the conference in 1943, where Soviet premier Stalin demanded 4,000,000 German workers.(Eugene Davidson The death and life of Germany: an account of the American occupation. p.22)Forced labour was also included in the Plan draft from September 1944, and was included in the final protocol of the conference(Eugene Davidson The death and life of Germany: an account of the American occupation. p.121 In accordance with the Yalta agreement, the Russians were using slave labor of millions of Germans and other prisoners of war and civilians) in January 1945, where it was sanctioned by UK Prime Minister Churchill and US President D. Roosevelt.  In March 1947, an estimated 4,000,000 Germans were being used as forced labour.(John Dietrich. The Morgenthau Plan: Soviet Influence on American Postwar Policy (2002) pg. 123)Eastern EuropeFile:Bundesarchiv B 145 Bild-107546, Kln-Bonn, Adenauer, Mutter eines Kriegsgefangenen.jpg|thumb|The mother of a prisoner thanks Adenauer upon his return from Moscow, September 14, 1955. Adenauer has succeeded in concluding negotiations about the release to Germany, by the end of the year, of 15,000 German civilians and prisoners of war.Soviet UnionThe largest group of forced laborers in the Soviet Union consisted of several million German prisoners of war. Several hundred thousand of these POWs had been transferred by the US to the Soviets(Dietrich pg. 124) which used them, alongside Soviet captured POWs and German civilians, as forced laborers. Most German POW survivors of the forced labor camps in the Soviet Union were released in 1953.(Time Magazine Oct. 12, 1953 Homecoming)(Time Magazine, 7 July 1952 2,500,000 Missing) The last major repatriation of Germans from the Soviet Union occurred in 1956.Estimates of German POW casualties (in both east and west and cumulative for both the war and peace-time period) range from 600,000 to 1,000,000.(stern-Serie: Besiegt, befreit, besetzt - Deutschland 1945-48 Die Schtzungen ber die Zahl der in Haft gestorbenen Mnner schwanken zwischen 600 000 und einer Million. Nach Angaben des Suchdienstes des Deutschen Roten Kreuzes ist bis heute das Schicksal von 1,3 Millionen Kriegsgefangenen ungeklrt - sie gelten offiziell als vermisst.) According to the section of the German Red Cross dealing with tracing the captives, the ultimate fate of 1,300,000 German POWs in Allied custody is still unknown; they are still officially listed as missing.(stern-Serie: Besiegt, befreit, besetzt - Deutschland 1945-48)The capture and transfer of civilian ethnic Germans to the Soviet Union began as soon as countries with a German minority began to be overrun in 1944. Large numbers of civilians were taken from countries such as Romania, Yugoslavia, and from the eastern parts of Germany itself. For example, after Christmas 1944 between 27,000 to 30,000 ethnic Germans (aged 1840) were sent to the USSR from Yugoslavia. Women made up 90% of the group. Most were sent to labor camps in the Donbass (Donez basin) where 16% of them died.(The Expulsion of German Communities from Eastern Europe at the end of the Second World War, Steffen Prauser and Arfon Rees, European University Institute, Florense. HEC No. 2004/1 p. 55)PolandMany ethnic Germans living within the Polish pre-war borders were used for years as forced labor prior to their expulsion in labor camps(Philipp Ther, Ana Siljak, Redrawing nations: ethnic cleansing in East-Central Europe, 1944-1948 p.58 (google books)) such as that run by Morel. Among these camps were Labour Camp Jaworzno, Labour Camp Potulice, ambinowice, labour camp and others.(http://www.h-net.org/reviews/showrev.cgi?path198721097755610 HNET review of An Exploration of the Inner Landscape of Experience)(These were former nazi concentration camps, that were used to imprison ethnic Germans as in Potulice: One Place different memories) The law authorising forced labour, Article 20 of the law on the exclusion of the enemy elements from society, also removed rights to Polish citizenship and all property owned.()The many camps were used during the process of the expulsions for the sake of rehabilitating Reichs- or Volksdeutsche, to decide if they could stay or go, but in reality this was a program of slave labor.(Ethnic Germans in Poland and the Czech Republic: A Comparative Evaluation p.9) Roughly 200,000 ethnic Germans died in the Polish/Soviet run concentration camps in Poland.(Others were still amongst the rest of the population, but the Polish government had made several declarations that the German population should be exploited as forced labor, instructing a minimum of 60 hours work per week with no rights for breaks. The salaries were insufficient for survival, usually 25 or 50 percent of Polish salaries.(CzechoslovakiaThe German-speaking population of the Sudetenland was, in the same case as Poland, expelled after the war. The expulsion was not indiscriminate, however, since as late as 1947, large numbers of skilled German workmen were still being detained.(Hoover, Report, German Agricultural and Food Requirements, February 26, 1947 p.4) Germans were forced to wear a white armband with the letter N, for Nemec signifying German in Czech to identify them (even German Jews had to wear it).(Bernard Wasserstein, Vanishing Diaspora: The Jews in Europe Since 1945 p.38, (googlebooks)) Czech Deputy Premier Mares has in the past, in vain, tried to arrange compensation for ethnic Germans who were forcibly resettled or used as forced labour after the war.(CZECH DEPUTY PREMIER WANTS TO ASSESS POSSIBLE COMPENSATION TO EXPELLED GERMANS RFE/RL Newsline, 03-06-20. (accessed 2010-02-02))Eastern GermanyMany Germans in what would become Germany were forced by the Communist authorities to work in German uranium mines producing the majority of the raw material of the atomic bomb project.()  Beginning in the summer of 1946 the Soviets began explorations in the Erzgebirge, and sealing off the old radium springs by September of the same year.  An initial workforce of four to five thousand was established, with another 20,000 called for by the end of the year.  The work was dangerous and stressful and the Soviets made no effort to improve them; as a result the mines became filled with forced labor conscripts and has been compared to a march and the Gulags of Kolyma.  Quotas were repeatedly set and raised, and conscription took place without regard to health or work experience - mines became staffed with office workers, craftsmen and students with no mining experience.  By 1948 workers were pulled away from factories and criminals from jails to staff the mines, as were POWs returning to Germany from the Soviet Union.  Housing lagged behind the burgeoning workers (with many regions doubling in population between 1946 and 1951), worsening already difficult conditions.  The mines were considered worse than a penal colony, but were controlled directly by Moscow and local governments were unable to help.  When an extra 60,000 workers were called for in the summer of 1947, a wave of potential workers flooded into West Germany to avoid the mines including many citizens who would otherwise prefer to live in the communist East.  Workers who began as volunteers were turned into forced labourers.  In an effort to increase the number of labourers, women were increasingly recruited to the non-segregated mines, many of whom brought or were infected with venereal diseases, and were sexually exploited by the Russian guards.  Workers who attempted to escape, conscripted or volunteer, were hunted down and returned to the mines.  Eventually Germans would become more involved in the running of the mines, forming a joint company with Russia in 1956.()Western EuropeFile:Tysk fange.png|thumb|German soldier clearing a mine near Stavanger, Norway, August 1945.BackgroundAt the Yalta conference in January 1945 the Allies agreed upon the use of German forced labor. The U.S. used over 500,000 German POWs in Germany in Labor Service Units.(Dietrich pg. 125) Great Britain used 225,000 Germans as reparations labor. In addition to the 200,000 Germans held by French forces (and 70,000 held by France in Algeria), France demanded 1,700,000 POWs for use as enforced labor.(Dietrich pg. 126) In July 1945 they were promised 1,300,000 POWs by the SHAEF. The number of actually delivered prisoners is debated, as is the number of surviving POWs eventually released by the French.(Dietrich pg. 127) Contrary to Section IV of the Hague Convention of 1907, The Laws and Customs of War on Land, the SHAEF counter insurgency manual included provisions for forced labor and hostage taking.(Perry Biddiscombe, Werwolf!: the history of the National Socialist guerrilla movement, 1944-1946, 1998. p.256)Article 75 of the Convention (1929) states that repatriation of prisoners shall be effected with the least possible delay after the conclusion of peace.FranceGeneral S. Patton commented in his diary Im also opposed to sending POWs to work as slaves in foreign lands (in particular, to France) where many will be starved to death. He also noted It is amusing to recall that we fought the revolution in defense of the rights of man and the civil war to abolish slavery and have now gone back on both principles.( On 12 October 1945 The York Herald Tribune reported that the French were starving their POWs, and compared their emaciation to that of those liberated from the concentration camp.(Dietrich pg. 129) German prisoners were for example forced to clear minefields in France and the Countries. According to S. P. MacKenzie, callous self-interest and a desire for retribution played a role in the fate of German prisoners, and he exemplifies by pointing out that sick or otherwise unfit prisoners were forcibly used for labor, and in France and the Low countries this also included work such as highly dangerous mine-clearing; by September 1945 it was estimated by the French authorities that two thousand prisoners were being maimed and killed each month in accidents(S. P. MacKenzie The Treatment of Prisoners of War in World War II The Journal of Modern History, Vol. 66, No. 3. (Sep., 1994), pp. 487-520.)(Footnote to: K. W. Bohme, Zur Geschichte der deutschen Kriegsgefangenen des Zweiten Weltkrieges, 15 vols. (Munich, 196274), 1, pt. 1:x. (n. 1 above), 13:173; ICRC (n. 12 above), p. 334.)Some of the 740,000 German prisoners transferred in 1945 by the U.S. for forced labor in France came from the Rheinwiesenlager camps, these forced laborers were already very weak, many weighing barely 50 kilos.(ZDF.de - Zwischen Tod und Liebe (accessed 2009-12-12) On a documentary by Knopp, Die Gefangenen Folge 4, ...Tausende deutsche Kriegsgefangene wurden in den Monaten nach der Kapitulation im Mai 45 nach Frankreich verschifft, wo sie unter lebensgefhrlichen Bedingungen Minen rumen oder in Bergwerken arbeiten mussten. Da man dringend Arbeiter fr den Wiederaufbau bentigte, wurden insgesamt 740.000 deutsche Kriegsgefangene von den Amerikanern an die Franzosen berstellt. Diejenigen, die aus den Rheinwiesenlagern kamen, waren krperlich geschwcht, wogen kaum 50 Kilogramm. Zeitzeugen berichten von Misshandlungen und Scheinexekutionen.)On 13 March 1947 the U.S. made an agreement with the French to the effect that roughly 450,000 German prisoners would be released, at a rate of 20,000 a month. This number included in addition to the prisoners handed over to them by the U.S. also the roughly 200,000 prisoners the French had themselves captured.(Dietrich pg. 134) In retaliation for acts of resistance French occupation forces expelled more than 25,000 civilians from their homes. Some of these civilians were subsequently forced to clear minefields in Alsace.(Perry Biddiscombe, Werwolf!: the history of the National Socialist guerrilla movement, 1944-1946, 1998. p.261)United KingdomIn 1946 the UK had more than 400,000 prisoners, many had been transferred from POW camps in the U.S. and Canada. Many of these were used as forced labour, as a form of reparations.(Noam Chomsky, Edward S. Herman, After the Cataclysm: Postwar Indochina and the Reconstruction of Imperial Ideology (1979) pp.35-37 In Britain there were some 400,000 German POWs. By Autumn 1944 they were being used for forced labour as a form of reparations. repatriation began in September 1946 and continued until the summer of 1948, over three years after the German surrender. After the war, too, the POWs spent the harsh winter of 1945-1945 in tents in violation of the 1929 Geneva Convention. The POWs referred to themselves as slave labour, with some justice. The psychological state of the POW changed from the anxiety and hope of the first half of 1946 to the depression and nihilism of 1948, according to Henry Faulk.)(Eugene Davidsson, The Trial of the Germans: An Account of the Twenty-Two Defendants Before the International Military Tribunal at Nuremberg, (1997) p.518-519 the Allies stated in 1943 their intention of using forced workers outside Germany after the war, and not only did they express the intention but they carried it out. Not only Russia made use of such labor. France was given hundreds of thousands of German prisoners of war captured by the Americans, and their physical condition became so bad that the American Army authorities themselves protested. In England and the United States, too, German prisoners of war were being put to work long after the surrender, and in Russia thousands of them worked until the mid-50s.)The two main reasons for their internment were political re-education (Park), and for non-officers employment as agricultural and other labour.()() In 1946 a fifth of all agricultural work in the UK was performed by German prisoners.(An emotional and public debate ensued in the UK, where words such as slaves, slave labour and forced labour were increasingly used in the media and in the of Commons of the United Kingdom.() In 1947 the Ministry of Agriculture argued against rapid repatriation of working German prisoners, since by then they made up 25 percent of the land workforce, and they wanted to use them also in 1948.( Faced with political difficulties in using volunteer foreign labour a compromise solution was suggested by the ministry of agriculture, German prisoners were to be allowed to remain in Britain as free men.( Following disputes about how many former prisoners of war would be permitted to remain voluntarily in Britain and whether they would first have to return briefly to Germany before being allowed to officially migrate to Britain,( by the end of 1947 about  250,000 of the prisoners of war were repatriated, and the last repatriations took place in November 1948.( About 24,000 chose to remain voluntarily in Britain.(NorwayIn Norway the last available casualty record, from August 29, 1945, shows that by that time a total of 275 German soldiers had been killed while clearing mines, while an additional 392 had been maimed. German protests that forcing POWs to clear mines was against international law, article 32 of the Geneva conventions, were rejected with the assertion that the Germans were not POWs; they were disarmed forces who had surrendered unconditionally (avvpnede styrker som hadde overgitt seg betingelseslst). Mine clearance reports received by the Allied Forces Head Quarter state: June 21, 1945; 199 dead and 163 wounded Germans; 3 Norwegians and 4 British wounded. The last registration, from August 29, 1945 lists 392 wounded and 275 dead Germans. Mine clearance was then for unknown reasons halted for close to a year before recommencing under better conditions during JuneSeptember 1946. This time many volunteered thanks to good pay, and death rates were much lower, possibly in part thanks to a deal permitting them medical treatment at Norwegian hospitals.(Jonas Tjersland, Tyske soldater brukt som mineryddere VG, 08-04-2006.)United StatesThe United States transferred prisoners for forced labor to both the UK and France (which received 740,000 from the US).For prisoners in the U.S. repatriation was also delayed for harvest reasons.(Noam Chomsky, Edward S. Herman, After the Cataclysm: Postwar Indochina and the Reconstruction of Imperial Ideology (1979) pp.35-37 In the United States, as in Britain, prisoners were used for forced labor. Truman delayed repatriation for 60 days for POWs essential for the harvest. POWs performed 20 million man-days of work on army posts and 10 million for contract employers (farm work, lumber, industry etc). some were assigned to work at the Warfare Center at the Arsenal in Maryland.)Civilians aged 14  65 in the U.S. occupation zone of Germany were also registered for compulsory labor, under threat of prison and withdrawal of ration cards.(Eugene Davidsson, The Trial of the Germans: An Account of the Twenty-Two Defendants Before the International Military Tribunal at Nuremberg, (1997) p.518 In 1946 General Clay ordered the registration in the American zone of Germany of all persons capable of work between the age of 14 to 65 for men and 15 to 50 for women. All persons incapable of work because of illness, disability, etc., must present to the labor office proof of incapacity. the labor office is empowered to direct compulsory labor when necessary. Under Allied Control Law No. 3 of February 17, 1946, German males from fourteen to sixty five and women from fifteen to fifty were subject to compulsory labor; the penalty for disobedience was imprisonment and having their ration cards taken away, a penalty that the Military Tribunal declared inhuman when it was inflicted by the Germans.)ConclusionMost captives of the Americans and the British were released by the end of 1948, and most of those in French captivity were released by the end of 1949.Compensation to German prisoners of war used as forced labor after the war is according to the office of public administration (part of Federal Ministry of the Interior) not possible to claim in Germany, the possibility was removed by the statute of limitations already on September 29, 1978.(Zwangsarbeit als MinenrumerRudi war total durchlchert, SPIEGEL (accessed 2009-12-20))Nuremberg trialsJudge H. Jackson, Chief US prosecutor in the trials in a letter discussing the potential weaknesses of the trial, in October 1945 told US President S. Truman that the Allies themselves:have done or are doing some of the very things we are prosecuting the Germans for. The French are so violating the Geneva Convention in the treatment of prisoners of war that our command is taking back prisoners sent to them. We are prosecuting plunder and our Allies are practicing it. We say aggressive war is a crime and one of our allies asserts sovereignty over the Baltic States based on no title except conquest.(David Luban, Legal Modernism, Univ of Michigan Press, 1994. ISBN 13: 9780472103805 pp. 360,361)(The Legacy of Nuremberg PBF)Under the Principles some of the crimes specified were: * ill-treatment or deportation of slave labor or for any other purpose of the civilian population of or in occupied territory;* murder or ill-treatment of prisoners of war enslavement, deportation and other inhumane acts done against any civilian population.See also*food policy in occupied Germany*plans for Germany*Remembrance, Responsibility and Future*Agreement between Israel and West GermanyReferencesFurther reading*Michael Foley, Prisoners of the British, 2009 ISBN 978-1904408499*Sullivan, Matthew Barry, Thresholds of Peace. Four hundred thousand German prisoners and the people of Britain, 1944-1948, Hamish Hamilton, London 1979External links* Ruhs, Florian: Foreign Workers in the Second World War. The Ordeal of Slovenians in Germany., in: aventinus nova Nr. 32 29.05.2011* Gollancz, Germany Revisited, London Victor Gollancz LTD, 1947* Frances Deadly Mine-Clearing Missions* Transcripts of UK War Cabinet discussions Provided by National Archives.  The meetings of May 18, 1945, and June 11, 1945 discuss the provisions made for slave labor in the Yalta protocol, and the value to be extracted from the workers.* Report on Germany by former US President Hoover, February 1947* Excerpt from Norwegian documentary on mine clearing According to narrator and text prisoners were killed by blinds when the British guards forced them to walk over cleared fields.
24732804
Charles_Sydney_Goldman
 footnotes    Charles Sydney Goldman (1868 &ndash; 7 April 1958) was a British businessman, author, and journalist who served as a of Parliament (MP) from 1910 until 1918.Born in Colony, Goldman was a uitlander who spent much of his life in the Transvaal. As a young man he built up a fortune in mining, using some of the profits to purchase an extensive estate known as Schoongezicht in the Middelburg District. During the Boer War, Goldman was a correspondent for The Standard. Initially attached to Sir Bullers relief force, he traveled with them as far as Ladysmith after which he transferred to the cavalry advancing north in order to report on their endeavors. These experiences served as the foundation for Goldmans subsequent book With General French and the Cavalry in South Africa.After the war, in an effort to gain political influence Goldman purchased the struggling weekly journal the Outlook.(Stephen Koss, The Rise and Fall of the Political Press in Britain, vol. 1:The Nineteenth Century (Chapel Hill, NC: University of North Carolina Press, 1981), p. 434) Seeking to develop it into a prominent platform for the cause of tariff reformers, he hired the journalist J. L. Garvin as its editor. Garvin quickly transformed the journal into a publication of note, yet in spite of an increase in both prominence and circulation the paper failed to turn a profit. After a series of disagreements between the two men over business matters, Goldman sold the paper to Lord Iveagh in October 1906.(Alfred M. Gollin, The Observer and J. L. Garvin, 1908-1914: A Study in a Great Editorship (Oxford: Oxford University Press, 1960), p. 14-15)Still desiring a political role, Goldman involved himself in politics directly by entering Parliament, winning a seat in the January 1910 general election as a Unionist and serving until the borough was abolished in 1918 (the name was transferred to a new county division). During the First World War, Goldman served as a major in the Cornwall Garrison Artillery. In 1919 he purchased the Nicola Ranch and Town site in Columbia which grew to some . In England Goldman lived at Trefusis House, Falmouth until about 1929, after which he moved to the Jacobean mansion at Yaverland Manor.Works* The financial, statistical, and general history of the gold & other companies of Witwatersrand, South Africa (1892)http://books.google.com/books?idrm0ZAAAAYAAJ&dqcharles+sydney+goldman+general+The+financial,+statistical,+and+general+history+of+the+gold+%26+other+companies+of+Witwatersrand,+South+Africa&printsecfrontcover&sourcebl&otsQDZ2pB5PL0&sigi0GxxQaVzKSM0pVHI5lS7hHUDl8&hlen&eiGivbSpvGAsSa8AbegtG3BQ&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum1&ved0CAoQ6AEwAA#vonepage&q&ffalse* With General French and the Cavalry in South Africa (1905)http://books.google.com/books?id_xZXAAAAMAAJ&dqcharles+sydney+goldman+general+french+cavalry&printsecfrontcover&sourcebl&otsCWaum986kR&sigZBp_yRyrt2JoMkVjTd0QWNGhCx0&hlen&eiyCrbSqTXOYrM8QaSz8W3BQ&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum1&ved0CBEQ6AEwAA#vonepage&q&ffalse* (as editor) The Empire and the century: A series of essays on imperial problems and possibilities (1905)http://books.google.com/books?id-hELAAAAYAAJ&dqcharles+sydney+goldman+empire+century&printsecfrontcover&sourcebl&otsOfVTgWT1-l&sigeQfUf-jq8PuGAOM41yl461gSPtU&hlen&eiPCvbSr_5OcTh8AbixtS3BQ&saX&oibook_result&ctresult&resnum1&ved0CBAQ6AEwAA#vonepage&q&ffalse* (as translator) Cavalry In Future Wars (1906)ReferencesFurther reading* Who was Who, 1951-1960, p. 430. External links *
24749912
Truckmusic
Truckmusic is a sub-genera of and western music.   Truckmusic is spoken word with accompaniment, instrumental, and lyrical song about trucks (i.e. commercial vehicles, not pick-up trucks), truck drivers or truckers, and the trucking industry experience. This would include, for example, references to truck stops, CB (Citizen Band) radio, geography, drugs, teamsters, roads, weather, fuel, law enforcement, loads, traffic, ICC (Interstate Commerce Commission), contraband, DOT (Department of Transportation), accidents, et al.(Stern, Jane  Trucker, A Portrait of the Last American Cowboy (1975))  In truckmusic, references to truck include the following truck types: 10 wheeler, straight truck, 18 wheeler, tractor (bobtail), semi, tractor-trailer, semi tractor trailer, big rig, and some others.Truckmusic is often confused with road music (e.g. Willie Nelson On the Road  Again, Roger Miller King of the Road),  pick-up truck music (e.g. Toby Keith Big Old Truck), and/or truck driving music. The last category would be the preferred choice of most truck drivers for eclectic listening while driving/operating all types, makes, and styles of trucks.Truckmusic is, at least partly, an oral history of trucking. A range of social and economic factors in the United States have strongly influenced the evolution of truckmusic as a sub-genera of country music. These factors include wars, civil rights struggles, the demographic shift from rural to urban areas, the feminist movement, economic recessions, changes in the railroads, and the oil embargo. Their impacts have diversified the folklore of truck songs.(Roach, Joyce Gibson Diesel Smoke & Dangerous Curves: Folklore of the Trucking Industry  Hunters and Healers (1977) pp 4553)Technological developments and changes related to both the music business and the trucking industry, however, have brought about the greatest changes to truckmusic. Variously, these include the jukebox, 33 rpm vinyl record albums, 8 track tape, cassette tape, the transistor to digital revolution, the Internet,  CB radio, all-night radio broadcasts targeting truckers, Interstate highways, and multiple truck components (sleeper cabs, air suspension, power steering, synchronized transmissions, air conditioning, air seats, and electronics).(American Truck Historical Society, )Collectively, there are more than five hundred truckmusic songs, all of which more or less originate from the oral tradition of truck folklore. Occupations, of course, have traditionally provided the raw material and inspiration for folk music in the United State (e.g. riverboat, mining, Great Lakes water commerce, lumbering, cowboy, agricultural field work and others), influenced by regional culture as well.(Danker, Frederick E.  Trucking Songs: A comparison with Traditional Occupational Song Journal of Country Music (Jan 1978) pp78-89)  Folk songs adopt, adapt, and incorporate colloquialisms, slang, and occupational terms into verbal snapshots. In truckmusic, such specialized words and terms as truck rodeo, dog house, twin screw, Georgia overdrive, saddle tanks, jake brake, binder and others borrowed from the lingo of truckers are commonly utilized.(Roach, Joyce Gibson  Hunters & Healers) CB vocabulary - which is different from truck driver lingo(Porter, Bernard H.  Truck Driver Lingo  American Speech (Apr 1942)  pp102-105) - is used by both truckers and the general public. Some of that vocabulary has evolved into popular culture and subsequently incorporated into truckmusic (e.g. hammer down, shakey town, smokey, and pedal to the metal).(Seese, Gwyneth E. (Dandalion)  Tijuana Bear in a Smokeum Up Taxi 1977)There has been a certain mystique attached to truck driving and truck drivers, especially those engaged in long distance driving.(Schroeder, Fred  A Bellyful of Coffee: The Truck Drivin Man as Folk Hero Journal of Popular Culture (Spring 1969)  pp 679687)  It is yet to be determined if the enduring image of the truck driver will achieve true folk hero status, even given the past popularity of truckmusic. The post-CB song era perception of truck drivinn country music was that it was a passing fad. At times, the trucker also has been stereotyped as a sexist, pill-poppin, burly, pinball playin, smokey dodgin, philandering, truck driving son-of-a-gun, hardly a flattering or positive image. Not surprisingly, many recording artists have not wanted to be associated with truckmusic because of such negativity, and major recording labels have considered truckmusic a novelty of little or lasting commercial value.Nevertheless, technological development and change continues to influence truckmusic and keeps it going. Just as truck drivers in the 1970s and 1980s no longer had to rely on AM radio or pre-recorded 8 track tape to listen to the music they wanted to hear by making-up their own playlists on cassette tape, today the portable computer, wireless wi-fi, and the Internet allows singer/song writers to produce and distribute their own truckmusic (Dale Watson, Sonny George, Bill Kirchen).(Johnson, Jon  Watson, George, Holiday  Country Standard Time  (Aug/Sept  2000)  pp7-9) Other artists have started their own record labels (Joey Holiday - Truck It Records; Harold Crosby - Traveler Records).HistoryAlthough there were songs with truck and truckin in song titles before 1939, the truck/truckin referred to was a dance, truck(Oxford English Dictionary)1939Ted Daffan, a Texas band leader, wrote Truck Drivers Blues1939  Cliff Brunner & His Boys record Truck Drivers Blues on Decca record label -- and his record sold 100,000 copies at a time when sales of 5,000 made for a hit country record.(From the Vaults, Decca Country Classics,  19391973 pamphlet(box set))1940  Delmore Brothers Dying Truck Driver1942  Meredith Wilson wrote My Ten Ton Baby and Me (the Truck Drivers Song) -- for World War II patriotism.  Performed on the Johnson Wax Hour radio show 15 Sept 19421947  Art Gibson Im a Truck Driving Man1952  Bob Newman Haulin Freight1952  Bill Monroe, the father of bluegrass,  Lonesome Truck Drivers Blues1952  Doye ODell  Diesel Smoke, Dangerous Curves1954  Terry Fell, writes and sings,  Truck Driving Man  --  Questionably the most covered truckmusic tune, with iconic lyrics and adaptable music (without the hard drivin beat of Six Days on the Road).1954  Wade Ray  Idaho Red1956  National Defense Interstate Highway System1956  Link Davis Trucker from Tennessee  --  about Elvis Presley being a truck driver before stardom1957  Johnny Horton  Im Coming Home1959  Duane Eddy  40 Miles of Bad Road  (an instrumental)1960  Lonnie Irving  Pinball Machine1960  Coleman M. Wilson  Radar Blues1963  Dave Dudley  Six Days on the Road  --  becomes the truckers anthem and ushers in the Golden Age (19631968) of truckmusic by double charting: No. 2 on Billboard country chart and in the Top 40 pop chart(Perry, Michael Semi Songs Road King magazine (Sept/Oct 2005))1964  v.a.  Truck Drivers Songs King recordsa compilation of all truckmusic1964  Betty Amos Eighteen Wheels a Rolling1964  Willis Brothers  Give Me 40 Acres  The Willis Bros. were stars of the starday record label, (later  the Starday label would become the biggest seller of truckmusic), performed a bluegrass style. Who should be better qualified to sing about the truck drivers of America than a group of Country musicians who travel 75,000 to150,000 miles per year making personal appearances throughout the country. The Willis Brothers stop at the truck stops to share meals, jokes, interesting experiences, road information, and weather reports with the men who drive the big rigs.  --  Vic Willis(Willis, Vic  Give Me 40 Acres  Starday  323  (record album cover))1964  Jimmy Martin Widow Maker1965  Dick Curless  A Tombstone Every Mile -- reached the country charts(Johnson, Jon All you big and burly men who roll the trucks along... trucking songs through the decades Country Standard Time (June 2000) pp7-9)1965  Red Simpson  Roll, Truck, Roll -- became a Top 40 country hit(Johnson, Jon Country Standard Time)1965  Dave Dudley  Truck Drivin Son-of-a-Gun1966  Kay Adams  Six Days Awaiting (an answer song) to Six Days on the Road1966  Kay Adams  Little Pink Mack1966  Del Reeves  Girl on the Billboard1966  Red Sovine  Giddyup Go  --  recorded his first spoken-word truck drivers song,  crossover charted.(All Music Guide to Country p440)1967  Red Sovine  Phantom 3091967  Dave Dudley  Truckers Prayer1967  Claude Gray  How Fast Them Trucks Can Go1968  Del Reeves  Looking at the World Through a Windshield1968  Dave Dudley  There Aint No Easy Run 1968  Barnett Bros.  Tragedy of Silver Bridge  --  a tragedy song(Vokes, Howard Tragedy and Disaster in Country Songs Starday SLP 258)1970  Johnny Cash  Medley of Trucking Songs  Johnny Cash TV Show1970  Charlie Douglas had the first trucking radio show directly to truckers Charlie Douglas and His Road Gang.(Walters, Kristin L. Radio Pioneers NATSO Trucker News (July 2007) pp30-31) All-night radio shows keep truckers informed, entertained, and awake. They also create a strong sense of community for those who work in the solitary field of long-distance trucking. Although trucker shows are carried on many hundreds of AM and FM stations nationwide, the best and most popular shows are those on powerful AM clear channel stations.(Truckers Jukebox Legacy records  ET46214 (cassette tape J-card))1971  Red Simpson  Im a Truck -- his biggest hit(All Music Guide to Country  p426)1972  Truckers Jamboree -- the combination of truckers and country musicians in conjunction with trucker expo.(Truckers Jamboree  Country Song Roundup (Apr 1975) pp30-31)1972  Commander Cody and His Lost Planet Airmen  Hot Licks, Cold Steel, & Trucker Favorites1972  Lester Flatt Backin into Birmingham1973  Paul Click  Smokey, Trucks, & C.B.Radios -- the first CB song(Got Yer Ears On There, Good Buddy? Country Music (Dec 1976)  pp48-56 Special CB Section)1975  C.W. McCall  Convoy  --  was the third biggest country single of that decade.(Johnson, Jon  McCall,Dudley lead convoy of 70s trucker songs Country Standard Time (July 2000) p13) Convoy is about a coast-to-coast truck convoy who use C.B. radio. Like Dave Dudleys successful Six Days on the Road, Convoy spurred an era of  CB radio themed songs.(Chuck C.W. McCall: The Convoy Rides Again  Guide to Music & Memorabilia  pp26-27)1975  Dave Dudley  Me and Ole C.B.1975  Merle Haggard Movin On1976  Cledus Maggard The White Knight1976  Craig Donaldson & Ralph Harrison  I believe Hes Gonna Drive that Rig to Glory1976  Red Sovine  Teddy Bear   (a tearjerker)1976  Rod Hart  C.B. Savage1976  Red Simpson  Truck Driver Heaven 1977  Jim & Artie Marshall  The Ballad of Fancy Gap  --  a haunting folk tune, with call and response singing of the hill country(v.a. Virginia Traditions (record BRI 004, booklet)  p20)1977  Convoy --  a Hollywood movie: followed by a soundtrack LP record album1977  Smokey and the Bandit  -- a Hollywood movie (the theme song Eastbound and Down crossover charted)1977  Jerry Reed Eastbound and Down1981  Eddie Rabbit  Drivin My Life Away1982  Dave Dudley  I Wish I Had a Nickel (written by T. Fell) -- last 45 of the Sun record label1984  Ronnie Milsap  Prisoner of the Highway1984  Alabama  Roll On1986  federally mandated CDL (Comercial Drivers License)1986  Dan Seals  Big Wheels In the Moonlight1995  The Cowslingers  Thats Truckdrivin -- retro Starday album (in  EP format)1996  Junior Brown  Semi Crazy1996  v.a.   Rig Rock Deluxe  --  a compilation album of new truckmusic songs performed by pairing old with contemporary artists.1997  Dale Watson The Trucking Sessions1998  Sonny George  Truckin Country1998  Dan Hart  Big Rig (on the Information Superhighway)1998  The Sovines  Owner Operator1998  Joey Holiday  Big Joe, The Phantom & Red Sovine2001  v.a. Truck Drivers Boogie: Big Rig Hits  vol. 1   193919692002  Leland Martin  Stone Cold Fingers2004  Steve Earl  Home to Houston  --  a contract truck driver in Iraq.2005  Bill Kirchen  King of Dieselbilly2005  Joey Holiday  Iron Pony Express  --  a different perspective of contract truck driver in Iraq2009  Dale Watson   The Truckin Session  vol 2ReferencesExternal links* virtualtruckroute.com* truckmusic.com
24764707
Carl_Safran
Carl Safran, B.Sc. MEd. Ed.D, LL.D., (19172005) was Albertas first school psychologist and began the Education system in the province.  As the Chief Superintendent of the Board of Education, he was instrumental in bringing challenged children into the school system.   He authored several key educational textbooks and culture-induced tests that are still in use throughout the world today.  Considered to be an articulate, compelling speaker, he was a guest lecturer at a variety of  notable universities.   He is survived by his widow, Mercia (ne Weitzman) and his two daughters, Jaclyn and Safran. BiographyA descendant of 13 generations of rabbis, Carl Safran was the second son of immigrant parents, Jacob and Etta Safran, who emigrated from Belarus to Calgary in 1912.Having obtained a of Science in 1941 from the School of Mines (renamed Tech of the University of Montana),  Carl Safran began his career as a mining engineer.  When World War II broke out, Carl Safran served overseas with the Canadian Army Engineering Corp.  During that time, he discovered his passion for teaching while giving physics lessons to fellow soldiers.Upon his return from the war, Carl Safran enrolled at the of Alberta, where he obtained his of Education.  Upon completion of that degree, he enrolled at the University of Colorado, where he obtained a in Education.In 1972, Carl Safran was appointed as the Chief Superintendent of the Board of Education.  He helped develop Canadas first learning centre for children with mental and physical disabilities (Christine Meikle School).   According to his widow, Mercia, her husband got a big kick out of the fact that, as a young boy, he had been kicked out of school for six weeks of truancy, yet later went on to become a leading figure in education.On the day of Carl Safrans death, the then Chief Superintendent of schools, Dr. Brendan Croskery requested that all Board of Education schools fly their Canadian flags at half mast. In his letter to the schools, Dr. Croskery referred to Carl Safran as a highly respected pioneer in the field of educating children with special learning needs. His longstanding coommitment to education earned him many honors and awards.  According to Dr. Croskery, Dr. Safran was not just a former Chief Superintendent of the Board of Education, but a man of extraordinary vision and compassion for some of the most vulnerable members of our society. Through these qualities he left an enduring legacy of excellence and hope that made him one of Albertas great heroes of education. Awards * Dr. Carl Safran Special Class School (1972), later renamed Dr. Carl Safran Centre.* Alberta Premiers Award (1976)* Honorary Doctorate, of Calgary (1978)Selected works By Carl Safran * Safran, Carl (1968)  Decision Making, Holt, Rinehart, and Winston Publishing* Safran, Carl (1969) Safran Students Interest Inventory,  Thomas Nelson & Sons, Ltd.References* * * * * * * 
24780427
Post-presidency_of_Bill_Clinton
178px|thumb|Bill Clinton in 2004Clinton was the 42nd President of the United States, serving from 1993 to 2001.  After he left office, he continued to be active in the public sphere, touring the world, writing books, and campaigning for Democrats, including his wife, Rodham Clinton. Public speaking and campaigningFile:ClintonSenate.jpg|thumb|upright|Hillary Clinton re-enacts being sworn in as a U.S. Senator by Vice President Gore as Bill and Clinton observe.At the end of his presidency, the Clintons moved to New York, in Westchester County.  Clinton opened his personal office in the Harlem section of New York City.()  In 2000, Clinton assisted his wife in her campaign for office as Senator from New York.() Clinton campaigned for a number of Democratic candidates for the Senate in the 2002 elections.()Clinton comments on contemporary politics in speaking engagements around the world.(Press release: President Bill Clinton to be keynote speaker at World Congress on IT 2002, World Information Technology and Services Alliance, Adelaide, South Australia)(Katherine Hamilton. Bill Clinton to speak at Class Day, Daily Princetonian, April 18, 2006) One notable theme is his advocacy of multilateral solutions to world problems.Clinton spoke for the fifth consecutive time at a Democratic National Convention on July 26, 2004, praising candidate Kerry. He said of President George W. Bushs depiction of Kerry, strength and wisdom are not opposing values. Despite Clintons speech, the post-convention bounce to Kerrys poll numbers was less than was hoped for.()Clinton has given dozens of paid speeches each year, mostly to corporations and philanthropic groups in North America and Europe, often earning $100,000 to $300,000 per speech.(Josh Gerstein, Clinton Eligible, Once Again, To Practice Law, New York Sun, January 17, 2006, downloaded from N.Y. Sun article.) According to his wifes Senate ethics reports, he earned more than $30 million in speaking from 2001 to 2005.() In 2007, it is estimated he amassed around $40 million from speaking.()Clinton made his first visit to new Nations Secretary-General Ki-moon in April 2007. The 45-minute meeting, called at Clintons request, touched on a host of topics, including disease, war, famine and poverty in Africa, especially in the Darfur region. The Middle East, the conflict in Iraq, and Irans nuclear standoff with the U.N. were on the agenda, as well as HIV/AIDS.(Bill Clintons Strange U.N. Visit. NewsMax.com, April 13, 2007.)He was the opening speaker at the Ontario Economic Summit held on November 13, 2007 in which he addressed people on various subjects including role in Afghanistan, environmentalism and access to healthcare.(Ontario Economic Summit, CTV.)Clinton served as one of the organizers for the Baptist Covenant alongside former President Carter and other Baptist leaders. This effort sought to bring various Baptists in America together, especially across racial lines, to discuss issues that unite them. Clinton spoke at the January 2008 celebration in Atlanta, GA. William J. Clinton Presidential Center Clinton dedicated his library, the William J. Clinton Presidential Center in Rock, Arkansas on November 18, 2004.() Under rainy skies, Clinton received praise from former presidents Carter and H. W. Bush, as well as from then-president W. Bush. He was treated to a musical rendition from Bono and The Edge from U2, who expressed their gratitude at Clintons efforts to resolve the Northern Ireland conflict during his presidency.() The library has the largest archives of any presidential library.The Clinton facility was funded to a large degree by donations from foreign governments, receiving a $10 million dollar donation from the royal family of Saudi Arabia.() Published work Clinton released a personal autobiography, My Life in 2004. The book was published by the Knopf Publishing Group at House on June 22, 2004. According to the publisher, for single day non-fiction book sales, the book set a worldwide record.(Alfred A. Knopft (2004) Bill Clintons My Life sets one day, non-fiction sales record) Later released as an audio book, total sales were in excess of 400,000 copies. As a writers fee, he received U.S. $12 million in advance.()He released, How Each of Us Can Change the World in September 2007, which became a bestseller and gandered positive reviews.() The book is about citizen activism and the role of public charity and public service in the modern world.() The audiobook version was nominated for a 2008 Award in the category of Best Spoken Word Album. William J. Clinton Foundation The William J. Clinton Foundation promotes and provides for a number of humanitarian causes. Within the foundation, the Clinton Foundation HIV and AIDS Initiative (CHAI) strives to make treatment for HIV/AIDS more affordable and to implement large-scale integrated care, treatment, and prevention programs. While in Sydney to attend a Global Business Forum, Clinton signed a memorandum of understanding on behalf of his presidential foundation with the Australian government to promote HIV/AIDS programs in the Asia-Pacific region.The Clinton Global Initiative (CGI), funded by the Clinton Foundation, was inaugurated September September 1517, 2005 in New York City to coincide with the World Summit. The focus areas of the initiative include attempts to address world problems such as global health, poverty alleviation and religious and conflict.()Clinton announced through the J. Clinton Foundation an agreement by major soft drink manufacturers to stop selling sugared sodas and juice drinks, in public primary and secondary schools within the United States,on May 3, 2005.()The foundation has received donations from a number of foreign governments, including the king of Morocco, a foundation linked to the Arab Emirates, and the governments of Kuwait and Qatar.()In 2008 newspapers reported that Mr Clinton had travelled to Kazakhstan with a Canadian mining magnate, Giustra, to meet its dictator president. Mr Giustra later won three lucrative uranium mining contracts from the government and then donated $US31 million to Mr Clintons charity.( Relations with George H. W. Bush File:Bush and Clinton.jpg|thumb|left|Clinton with former President H. W. Bush in January 2005.In the aftermath of the Asian tsunami and Katrina, Clinton established, with fellow former President George H. W. Bush, the Bush-Clinton Katrina Fund and Bush-Clinton Tsunami Fund, for which they were awarded the 2006 Liberty Medal on October 5, 2006.() They spoke together at the funeral of Yeltsin.()Then-President George W. Bush, to help the victims of the Indian Ocean earthquake, named Clinton and H. W. Bush to lead a nationwide campaign on January 3, 2005. U.N. Secretary-General Annan selected Clinton to head the Nations earthquake and tsunami relief and reconstruction effort on February 1, 2005.( )Five days later, to raise money for relief through the Freedom Corps, Clinton and Bush appeared on the Fox Bowl XXXIX pre-game show.() Thirteen days later, to see the relief efforts, they traveled to the affected areas.()File:JPII on bier.jpg|thumb|right|Clinton, along with W. Bush, Bush, H. W. Bush, Rice, and Card pay their respects to Pope Paul II before the popes funeral. Environment To create the Clinton Foundation Climate Change Initiative (CCI), the J. Clinton Foundation entered into a partnership with the Cities Climate Leadership Group on August 1, 2006, agreeing to provide resources to allow the participating cities to enter into an energy-saving product purchasing consortium and to provide technical and communications support.()Clinton criticized the Bush administration for its handling of emissions control while speaking at the Nations Climate Change Conference in Montreal on December 9, 2005. To promote initiatives concerning the environment, Clinton twice visited the of California, Los Angeles in 2006. First, to advertise the Cities Climate Leadership Group, he met with Blair, Livingstone, Villaraigosa, and Newsom on August 1, 2006. On October 13, 2006, he spoke in favor of California Proposition 87 on alternative energy, which was voted down.() Personal health On September 2, 2004, while campaigning for Kerry, Clinton had an episode of angina and was evaluated at Westchester Hospital.  It was determined he did not suffer a infarction, and he was sent home, returning the following day for angiography, which disclosed multiple vessel artery disease. He was transferred to Presbyterian Medical Center in New York City, where he underwent a successful on-pump quadruple artery bypass surgery on September 6, 2004. The medical team stated, had he not had surgery, he would have likely suffered a massive heart attack within a few months.() As a complication of his heart surgery, Clinton underwent a follow-up surgery on March 10, 2005 for a left effusion, removing scar tissue and fluid from his left chest cavity.() He has since recovered.On February 11, 2010, he was rushed to Presbyterian Hospital in New York City after complaining of chest pains, and had two stents implanted in his heart.()()()() 2008 Presidential election In the course of the 2008 Democratic presidential primary campaign, Clinton vigorously advocated on behalf of his wife, Clinton, leading some observers and party members to question the appropriateness of his role in view of his status as a former president.() Some felt that Clinton was overshadowing his wife in the campaign,()()() with her presidential rival Obama complaining that he sometimes did not know which Clinton he was running against.() At a MSNBC debate, Republican primary candidate Romney said that he cant imagine Bill Clinton left with nothing to do in the White House, suggesting that Clinton would be a co-president and try and help manage the economy and help manage the world affairs.(Romney on McCain, the Clintons, Posted: Saturday, January 26, 2008 3:19 PM by Mark Murray)File:Bill Clinton @ Hillary Rally.jpg|thumb|left|Clinton speaking at a rally for his wife at College.Top Democratic Party officials, including Congressman Emanuel, chairman of the Democratic Congressional Campaign Committee, asked Clinton to tone down his attacks on Obama following the bitterly contested Nevada caucus, suggesting that Clinton could be damaging his own political capital and global stature.() Some commentators even accused the former president of playing the race card against Obama, who is half-black, by suggesting he would understand if South Carolinas African Americans naturally would vote for the black candidate, but rejected suggestions that America was not ready for a black President.()()() Many felt that by alienating black voters who had once overwhelmingly supported the Clintons, Clinton had tarnished his legacy as the so-called first black president.()() In particular, Rep. Clyburn (D-SC) suggested that Clintons vocal attacks on Obama could damage the former Presidents legacy.()Following his wifes disappointing defeat in South Carolina, Clinton again made headlines when he appeared to undermine and racialize Obamas victory by comparing it to Jacksons failed 1984 bid for the Presidency.() Some observers suggested that the controversial comments fueled Sen. Kennedys decision to endorse Sen. Obama for the Presidency.() Clinton attracted further controversy with a series of attacks against Obama that many independents and former Clinton supporters felt to be unfair.(()( )() While some believed the attacks might eventually pay off,() others felt they would damage Hillary Clintons presidential prospects and alienate Democratic voters in the general election.((() Bill Clinton defended his role in the campaign in Carolina, disputing claims he made race a campaign issue.() According to some reports, the accusations of racism hurt him personally, as blacks had long been Clintons most loyal supporters.()()File:Bill Clinton DNC 2008.jpg|thumb|right|Clinton speaks during the third night of the Democratic National Convention in Denver, Colorado.During the primary campaign, his wifes aides criticized Clintons freelancing and deemed his office uncooperative at one point, they complained, his people would not allow one of her people to ride on his plane to campaign stops. His aides, on the other hand, stewed over what they saw as her peoples disregard for the advice of one of this generations great political minds and bristled at surrendering control of his schedule. On the night of the Pennsylvania primary, Clinton grew playfully competitive with his wife over who had done more events or had had more impact. Governor Rendell showed Clinton the county-by-county returns, while she was superstitious and rarely watched election night coverage. According to Rendell, The president wanted to know exactly what the returns were in the places he had been and Hillary hadnt been. He kept showing Hillary, and she would laugh.((Due to Clintons prominent role in his wifes presidential run and his criticism of Obama, many perceived an enduring distance between the two. Clinton was asked later if he thought presidential nominee Obama was qualified to be president. He replied that the Constitution sets qualifications. When pressed as to whether Obama was ready to be president, Clinton replied, You could argue that no one is ready to be president.() Such remarks lead to apprehension that the party would be split to the detriment of Obamas election. Fears were allayed August 27, 2008 when Clinton enthusiastically endorsed Obama at the 2008 National Convention, saying that all his experience as president assures him that Obama is ready to lead.() Trip to North Korea Clinton made an unannounced trip to Korea, a country with which the United States does not have diplomatic relations, on August 4, 2009.() Clinton arrived in Pyongyang in order to negotiate the release of U.S. citizens Lee and Ling, who were imprisoned by North Korean forces for illegally entering the country from China while filming a documentary and given a 12-year sentence.() His visit to North Korea is the second such trip by a former U.S. president, the other occurring when Carter visited in 1994.( After meeting with North Korean leader Jong-il, Kim issued a special pardon for the two journalists.() On the morning of August 5, the journalists were released from custody and flew home to the United States with Clinton.()2010 Haiti earthquakeIn 2009, Clinton was named Nations Special Envoy to Haiti.() On January 16, 2010, in response to the Haiti earthquake, U.S. President Barack Obama announced that  Clinton and W. Bush will coordinate efforts to raise funds for Haitis recovery.(Presidents Clinton, Bush lead effort to raise funds for Haiti, CNN (January 16, 2010). Retrieved on January 16, 2010.)Sestak controversyIn late May 2010, the Obama Administration reported that Clinton had acted as an envoy from the White House to Pennsylvania Democratic Senate Primary candidate Sestak in order to offer him an unpaid advisory job in exchange for dropping out of the race against Specter.SoccerClinton visited the World Cup in South Africa, and was an avid booster of the American team.  He was also one of the proponents of the States 2018 and 2022 World Cup bids.  Clinton had been president when the U.S. hosted the World Cup and Womens World Cup.References
24801851
List_of_The_Middle_episodes
The Middle is a primetime American comedy series created by DeAnn Heline and Eileen Heisler for the ABC network. The Middle stars Heaton and Flynn as Frankie and Mike Heck, a used-car saleswoman and the manager of a small mining firm respectively, who struggle to raise their children in the fictional middle-class town of Orson, Indiana. Their three children include underachieving, slow-witted Axl (McDermott), cluelessly unpopular daughter Sue (Sher) and frustrated, eccentric child-genius Brick (Shaffer). The Hecks find themselves embroiled in somewhat unusual events as they attempt to navigate their day-to-day lives. The series was met with a positive reception from critics when it premiered on September 30, 2009, with a score of 70 on the aggregated reviews website Metacritic., a total of 52 episodes of The Middle have aired. Series overview  Episode list  Season 1 (20092010) {| classwikitable width100%|-stylecolor:black;! stylebackground:#FFB077;| ! stylebackground:#FFB077;| #! stylebackground:#FFB077;| Title! stylebackground:#FFB077;| Directed by! stylebackground:#FFB077;| Written by! stylebackground:#FFB077;| U.S. viewers(million)! stylebackground:#FFB077;| Original air date! stylebackground:#FFB077;| ProductioncodeLineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077LineColorFFB077|} Season 2 (20102011) {| classwikitable width100%|-! stylebackground-color: #f9f100; | ! stylebackground-color: #f9f100; | #! stylebackground-color: #f9f100; | Title! stylebackground-color: #f9f100; | Directed by! stylebackground-color: #f9f100; | Written by! stylebackground-color: #f9f100; | U.S. viewers(million)! stylebackground-color: #f9f100; | Original air date! stylebackground-color: #f9f100; | ProductioncodeLineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100LineColorf9f100|} Season 3 (20112012) {| classwikitable width100%|-! stylebackground-color: #77C6FF; | ! stylebackground-color: #77C6FF; | #! stylebackground-color: #77C6FF; | Title! stylebackground-color: #77C6FF; | Directed by! stylebackground-color: #77C6FF; | Written by! stylebackground-color: #77C6FF; | U.S. viewers(million)! stylebackground-color: #77C6FF; | Original air date! stylebackground-color: #77C6FF; | ProductioncodeLineColor77C6FFLineColor77C6FFLineColor77C6FFLineColor77C6FFLineColor77C6FFLineColor77C6FF|} References  External links ***de The Middlevan afleveringen van The Middlede episdios de The Middle
24813796
Sun_scoop
A Sun scoop  or sunscoop is a refueling technique for starships seen in science fiction. While it is theoretically plausible, most science fiction is concerned with stars as places to be explored, rather than as refueling stops.MethodIt involves a literal scooping, in which a ship draws plasma directly from the outer surface of a star to use as fuel. Doing so would be extremely dangerous and only used in emergency situations.In fiction* Bradburys 1953 short story The Golden Apples of the Sun.()* In the final novel of F. Hamiltons Nights Dawn trilogy, an alien race, inhabiting massive cities orbiting a giant, uses ships equipped with electromagnetic ramscoops as an alternative to planetary mining.()* 42, a 2007 episode of Who* Light, an episode of Universe( Screenshot of Destiny extending scoops.)References
24839344
Economic_history_of_the_Russian_Federation
Historical backgroundFor about 60 years, the Russian economy and that of the rest of the Union operated on the basis of a planned economy, with a state control over virtually all means of production and over investment, production, and consumption decisions throughout the economy. policy was made according to directives from the Communist Party, which controlled all aspects of economic activity. Since the collapse of Communism in the early 1990s, Russia has experienced difficulties in making the transition from a centrally planned economy to a market based economy. Much of the structure of the Soviet economy that operated until 1987 originated under the leadership of Stalin, with only incidental modifications made between 1953 and 1987. Five-year plan and annual plans were the chief mechanisms the Soviet government used to translate economic policies into programs. According to those policies, the State Planning Committee (Gosudarstvennyy planovyy komitet&mdash;Gosplan) formulated countrywide output targets for stipulated planning periods. planning bodies then refined these targets for economic units such as state industrial enterprises and state farms (sovkhozy; sing., sovkhoz) and collective farms (kolkhozy; sing., kolkhoz), each of which had its own specific output plan. Central planning operated on the assumption that if each unit met or exceeded its plan, then demand and supply would balance.The governments role was to ensure that the plans were fulfilled. Responsibility for production flowed from the top down. At the national level, some seventy government ministries and state committees, each responsible for a production sector or subsector, supervised the economic production activities of units within their areas of responsibility. Regional ministerial bodies reported to the national-level ministries and controlled economic units in their respective geographical areas.thumb|300px|Map of the electric grid during the Soviet era.The plans incorporated output targets for raw materials and intermediate goods as well as final goods and services. In theory, but not in practice, the central planning system ensured a balance among the sectors throughout the economy. Under central planning, the state performed the allocation functions that prices perform in a market system. In the Soviet economy, prices were an accounting mechanism only. The government established prices for all goods and services based on the role of the product in the plan and on other noneconomic criteria. This pricing system produced anomalies. For example, the price of bread, a traditional staple of the Russian diet, was below the cost of the wheat used to produce it. In some cases, farmers fed their livestock bread rather than grain because bread cost less. In another example, rental fees for apartments were set very low to achieve social equity, yet housing was in extremely short supply. Soviet industries obtained raw materials such as oil, natural gas, and coal at prices below world market levels, encouraging waste.The central planning system allowed Soviet leaders to marshal resources quickly in times of crisis, such as the Nazi invasion, and to reindustrialize the country during the postwar period. The rapid development of its defence and industrial base after the war permitted the Soviet Union to become a superpower.The attempts and failures of reformers during the era of perestroika (restructuring) in the regime of Gorbachev (198591) attested to the complexity of the challenge.Transition to Market EconomyAfter 1991, under the leadership of Yeltsin, the country made a significant turn toward developing a market economy by implanting basic tenets such as market-determined prices. Two fundamental and interdependent goals &mdash; macroeconomic stabilization and economic restructuring &mdash; the transition from central planning to a market-based economy. The former entailed implementing fiscal and monetary policies that promote economic growth in an environment of stable prices and exchange rates. The latter required establishing the commercial, and institutional entities &mdash; banks, private property, and commercial legal codes&mdash; that permit the economy to operate efficiently. Opening domestic markets to foreign trade and investment, thus linking the economy with the rest of the world, was an important aid in reaching these goals.  The Gorbachev regime failed to address these fundamental goals. At the time of the Soviet Unions demise, the Yeltsin government of the Russian Republic had begun to attack the problems of macroeconomic stabilization and economic restructuring. By mid-1996, the results were mixed.Since collapse of the Soviet Union in 1991, Russia has tried to develop a economy and achieve consistent economic growth. In October 1991, Yeltsin announced that Russia would proceed with radical, market-oriented reform along the lines of shock therapy, as recommended by the United States and IMF.() However, this policy resulted in economic collapse, with millions being plunged into poverty and corruption and crime spreading rapidly.() Hyperinflation resulted from the removal of Soviet price controls and again following the Russian financial crisis. Assuming the role as the continuing legal personality of the Soviet Union, Russia took up the responsibility for settling the USSRs debts, even though its population made up just half of the population of the USSR at the time of its dissolution.() The Russian GDP contracted an estimated 40% between 1991 and 1998, despite the countrys wealth of natural resources, its well-educated population, and its diverse - although increasingly dilapidated - industrial base. Such a figure may be misleading, however, since much of the Soviet Unions GDP was  military spending and the production of goods for which there was little demand. The discontinuation of much of that wasteful spending created the false impression of larger than actual economic contraction.(Schliefer, Andrei; Treisman, Daniel, October 2003 A Normal Country - Harvard Institute of Economic Research Retrieved on February 25, 2009)Critical elements such as privatization of state enterprises and extensive foreign investment were rushed into place in the first few years of the post-Soviet period. But other fundamental parts of the economic infrastructure, such as banking and authoritative, comprehensive commercial laws, were absent or only partly in place by 1996. Although by the mid-1990s a return to Soviet-era central planning seemed unlikely, the configuration of the post-transition economy remained unpredictable.Monetary and fiscal policiesIn January 1992, the government clamped down on money and credit creation at the same time that it lifted price controls. However, beginning in February, the Central Bank, headed by Viktor Gerashchenko, loosened the reins on the money supply. In the second and third quarters of 1992, the money supply had increased at especially sharp rates of 34% and 30%, respectively. By the end of 1992, the Russian money supply had increased by eighteen times.  This led directly to high inflation and to a deterioration in the exchange rate of the ruble.The sharp increase in the money supply was influenced by large foreign currency deposits that state-run enterprises and individuals had built up, and by the depreciation of the ruble. Enterprises drew on these deposits to pay wages and other expenses after the Government had tightened restrictions on monetary emissions. Commercial banks monetized enterprise debts by drawing down accounts in foreign banks and drawing on privileged access to accounts in the Central Bank.InflationIn 1992, the first year of economic reform, retail prices in Russia increased by 2,520%. A major cause of the increase was the deregulation of most of the prices in January 1992, a step that prompted an average price increase of 245% in that month alone. By 1993 the annual rate had declined to 240%, still a very high figure. In 1994 the inflation rate had improved to 224%.Trends in annual inflation rates mask variations in monthly rates, however. In 1994, for example, the government managed to reduce monthly rates from 21% in January to 4% in August, but rates climbed once again, to 16.4% by December and 18% by January 1995. Instability in Russian monetary policy caused the variations. After tightening the flow of money early in 1994, the Government loosened its restrictions in response to demands for credits by agriculture, industries in the Far North, and some favored large enterprises. In 1995 the pattern was avoided more successfully by maintaining the tight monetary policy adopted early in the year and by passing a relatively stringent budget. Thus, the monthly inflation rate held virtually steady below 5% in the last quarter of the year. For the first half of 1996, the inflation rate was 16.5%. However, experts noted that control of inflation was aided substantially by the failure to pay wages to workers in state enterprises, a policy that kept prices low by depressing demand. (Russians abroad)Exchange ratesAn important symptom of Russian macroeconomic instability has been severe fluctuations in the exchange rate of the ruble. From July 1992, when the ruble first could be legally exchanged for United States dollars, to October 1995, the rate of exchange between the ruble and the dollar declined from 144 rubles per US$1 to around 5,000 per US$1. Prior to July 1992, the rubles rate was set artificially at a highly overvalued level. But rapid changes in the nominal rate (the rate that does not account for inflation) reflected the overall macroeconomic instability. The most drastic example of such fluctuation was the Black Tuesday (1994) 27% reduction in the rubles value.In July 1995, the Central Bank announced its intention to maintain the ruble within a band of 4,300 to 4,900 per US$1 through October 1995, but it later extended the period to June 1996. The announcement reflected strengthened fiscal and monetary policies and the buildup of reserves with which the government could defend the ruble. By the end of October 1995, the ruble had stabilized and actually appreciated in inflation-adjusted terms. It remained stable during the first half of 1996. In May 1996, a crawling band exchange rate was introduced to allow the ruble to depreciate gradually through the end of 1996, beginning between 5,000 and 5,600 per US $1 and ending between 5,500 and 6,100.Another sign of currency stabilization was the announcement that effective June 1996, the ruble would become fully convertible on a current-account basis. This meant that Russian citizens and foreigners would be able to convert rubles to other currencies for trade transactions.PrivatizationWhen once all enterprises belonged to the state and were supposed to be equally owned amongst all citizens, they fell into the hands of a few, who became immensely rich. Stocks of the state-owned enterprises were issued, and these new publicly traded companies were quickly handed to the members of Nomenklatura or known criminal bosses. For example, the director of a factory during the Soviet regime would often become the owner of the same enterprise. During the same period, violent criminal groups often took over state enterprises, clearing the way by assassinations or extortion. Corruption of government officials became an everyday rule of life. Under the governments cover, outrageous financial manipulations were performed that enriched the narrow group of individuals at key positions of the business and government mafia. Many took billions in cash and assets outside of the country in an enormous flight.() The largest state enterprises were controversially privatized by President Boris Yeltsin to insiders() for far less than they were worth.( Many Russians consider these infamous oligarchs to be thieves.() Through their immense wealth, the oligarchs wielded significant political influence.1991-1992Government efforts to take over the credit expansion also proved ephemeral in the early years of the transition. Domestic credit increased about nine times between the end of 1991 and 1992. The credit expansion was caused in part by the buildup of interenterprise arrears and the RCBs subsequent financing of those arrears. The Government restricted financing to state enterprises after it lifted controls on prices in January 1992, but enterprises faced cash shortages because the decontrol of prices cut demand for their products. Instead of curtailing production, most firms chose to build up inventories. To support continued production under these circumstances, enterprises relied on loans from other enterprises. By mid-1992, when the amount of unpaid interenterprise loans had reached 3.2 trillion rubles (about US$20 billion), the government froze interenterprise debts. Shortly thereafter, the government provided 181 billion rubles (about US$1.1 billion) in credits to enterprises that were still holding debt.The government also failed to constrain its own expenditures in this period, partially under the influence of the post-Soviet Soviet of Russia, which encouraged the Soviet-style financing of favored industries. By the end of 1992, the Russian budget deficit was 20% of GDP, much higher than the 5% projected under the economic program and stipulated under the Monetary Fund (IMF) conditions for international funding. This budget deficit was financed largely by expanding the money supply. These monetary and fiscal policies were a factor along with price liberalization in an inflation rate of over 2,000% in 1992.In late 1992, deteriorating economic conditions and a sharp conflict with the parliament led Yeltsin to dismiss neoliberal reform advocate Gaidar as prime minister. Gaidars successor was Chernomyrdin, a former head of the State Natural Gas Company (Gazprom), who was considered less favorable to neoliberal reform.1993Chernomyrdin formed a new government with Fedorov, an economic reformer, as deputy prime minister and finance minister. Fedorov considered macroeconomic stabilization a primary goal of Russian economic policy. In January 1993, Fedorov announced a so-called anticrisis program to control inflation through tight monetary and fiscal policies. Under the program, the government would control money and credit emissions by requiring the RCB to increase interest rates on credits by issuing government bonds, by partially financing budget deficits, and by starting to close inefficient state enterprises. Budget deficits were to be brought under control by limiting wage increases for state enterprises, by establishing quarterly budget deficit targets, and by providing a more efficient social safety net for the unemployed and pensioners.The printing of money and domestic credit expansion moderated somewhat in 1993. In a public confrontation with the parliament, Yeltsin won a referendum on his economic reform policies that may have given the reformers some political clout to curb state expenditures. In May 1993, the Ministry of Finance and the Central Bank agreed to macroeconomic measures, such as reducing subsidies and increasing revenues, to stabilize the economy. The Central Bank was to raise the discount lending rate to reflect inflation. Based on positive early results from this policy, the IMF extended the first payment of US$1.5 billion to Russia from a special Systemic Transformation Facility (STF) the following July.Fedorovs anticrisis program and the Governments accord with the Central Bank had some effect. In the first three quarters of 1993, the Central Bank held money expansion to a monthly rate of 19%. It also substantially moderated the expansion of credits during that period. The 1993 annual inflation rate was around 1,000%, a sharp improvement over 1992, but still very high. The improvement figures were exaggerated, however, because state expenditures had been delayed from the last quarter of 1993 to the first quarter of 1994. State enterprise arrears, for example, had built up in 1993 to about 15 trillion rubles (about US$13 billion, according to the mid-1993 exchange rate).1994In June 1994, Chernomyrdin presented a set of moderate reforms calculated to accommodate the more conservative elements of the Government and parliament while placating reformers and Western creditors. The prime minister pledged to move ahead with restructuring the economy and pursuing fiscal and monetary policies conducive to macroeconomic stabilization. But stabilization was undermined by the Central Bank, which issued credits to enterprises at subsidized rates, and by strong pressure from industrial and agricultural lobbies seeking additional credits.  By October 1994, inflation, which had been reduced by tighter fiscal and monetary policies early in 1994, began to soar once again to dangerous levels. On 11 October, a day that became known as Black Tuesday, the value of the ruble on interbank exchange markets plunged by 27%. Although experts presented a number of theories to explain the drop, including the existence of a conspiracy, the loosening of credit and monetary controls clearly was a significant cause of declining confidence in the Russian economy and its currency.In late 1994, Yeltsin reasserted his commitment to macroeconomic stabilization by firing Gerashchenko, head of the Central Bank, and nominating Paramonova as his replacement. Although reformers in the Russian government and the IMF and other Western supporters greeted the appointment with skepticism, Paramonova was able to implement a tight monetary policy that ended cheap credits and restrained interest rates (although the money supply fluctuated in 1995). Furthermore, the parliament passed restrictions on the use of monetary policy to finance the state debt, and the Ministry of Finance began to issue government bonds at market rates to finance the deficits.The government also began to address the interenterprise debt that had been feeding inflation. The 1995 budget draft, which was proposed in September 1994, included a commitment to reducing inflation and the budget deficit to levels acceptable to the IMF, with the aim of qualifying for additional international funding. In this budget proposal, the Chernomyrdin government sent a signal that it no longer would tolerate soft credits and loose budget constraints, and that stabilization must be a top government priority.According to official Russian data, in 1994 the national gross domestic product (GDP) was 604 trillion rubles (about US$207 billion according to the 1994 exchange rate), or about 4% of the United States GDP for that year. But this figure underestimates the size of the Russian economy. Adjusted by a purchasing-power parity formula to account for the lower cost of living in Russia, the 1994 Russian GDP was about US$678 billion, making the Russian economy approximately 10% of the United States economy. In 1994 the adjusted Russian GDP was US$4,573 per capita, approximately 19% of that of the United States.1995During most of 1995, the government maintained its commitment to tight fiscal constraints, and budget deficits remained within prescribed parameters. However, in 1995 pressures mounted to increase government spending to alleviate wage arrearages, which were becoming a chronic problem within state enterprises, and to improve the increasingly tattered social safety net. In fact, in 1995 and 1996 the states failure to pay many such obligations (as well as the wages of most state workers) was a major factor in keeping Russias budget deficit at a moderate level. Conditions changed by the second half of 1995. The members of the Duma (beginning in 1994, the lower house of the Federal Assembly, Russias parliament) faced elections in December, and Yeltsin faced dim prospects in his 1996 presidential reelection bid. Therefore, political conditions caused both Duma deputies and the president to make promises to increase spending.In addition, late in 1995 Yeltsin dismissed Chubais, one of the last economic reform advocates remaining in a top Government position, as deputy prime minister in charge of economic policy. In place of Chubais, Yeltsin named Vladimir Kadannikov, a former automobile plant manager whose views were antireform. This move raised concerns in Russia and the West about Yeltsins commitment to economic reform. Another casualty of the political atmosphere was RCB chairman Paramonova, whose nomination had remained a source of controversy between the State Duma and the Government. In November 1995, Yeltsin was forced to replace her with Sergey Dubinin, a Chernomyrdin protg who continued the tight-money policy that Paramonova had established.1996As of mid-1996, four and one-half years after the launching of Russias post-Soviet economic reform, experts found the results promising but mixed. The Russian economy has passed through a long and wrenching depression. Official Russian economic statistics indicate that from 1990 to the end of 1995, Russian GDP declined by roughly 50%, far greater than the decline that the United States experienced during the Depression. (However, alternative estimates by Western neoliberal pro-disregulation analysts described a much less severe decline, taking into account the upward bias of Soviet-era economic data and the downward bias of post-Soviet data. E.g. IMF estimates: http://www.imf.org/external/pubs/ft/weo/2006/01/data/dbcoutm.cfm?SD1992&ED1999&R11&R21&CS3&SS2&OSC&DD0&OUT1&C922&SNGDPRPC-NGDPPC-NGDPDPC-PPPPC&CMP0&x41&y9) Much of the decline in production has occurred in the military-industrial complex and other heavy industries that benefited most from the economic priorities of Soviet planners but have much less robust demand in a free market.But other major sectors such as agriculture, energy, and light industry also suffered from the transition. To enable these sectors to function in a market system, inefficient enterprises had to be closed and workers laid off, with resulting declines in output and consumption. Analysts had expected that Russias GDP would begin to rise in 1996, but data for the first six months of the year showed a continuing decline, and some Russian experts predicted a new phase of economic crisis in the second half of the year.The pain of the restructuring has been assuaged somewhat by the emergence of a new private sector. Western experts believe that Russian data overstate the dimensions of Russias economic collapse by failing to reflect a large portion of the countrys private-sector activity. The Russian services sector, especially retail sales, is playing an increasingly vital role in the economy, accounting for nearly half of GDP in 1995. The services sectors activities have not been adequately measured. Data on sector performance are skewed by the underreporting or nonreporting of output that Russias tax laws encourage. According to Western analysts, by the end of 1995 more than half of GDP and more than 60% of the labor force were based in the private sector.An important but unconventional service in Russias economy is shuttle trading &mdash; the transport and sale of consumer goods by individual entrepreneurs, of whom 5 to 10 million were estimated to be active in 1996. Traders buy goods in foreign countries such as China, Turkey, and the United Arab Emirates and in Russian cities, then sell them on the domestic market where demand is highest. Yevgeniy Yasin, minister of economics, estimated that in 1995 some US$11 billion worth of goods entered Russia in this way. Shuttle traders have been vital in maintaining the standard of living of Russians who cannot afford consumer goods on the conventional market. However, domestic industries such as textiles suffer from this infusion of competing merchandise, whose movement is unmonitored, untaxed, and often mafia-controlled.The geographical distribution of Russias wealth has been skewed at least as severely as it was in Soviet times. By the mid-1990s, economic power was being concentrated in Moscow at an even faster rate than the federal government was losing political power in the rest of the country. In Moscow an economic oligarchy, composed of politicians, banks, businesspeople, security forces, and city agencies, controlled a huge percentage of Russias financial assets under the rule of Moscows energetic and popular mayor, Luzhkov. Unfortunately, organized crime also has played a strong role in the growth of the city. Opposed by a weak police force, Moscows rate of protection rackets, contract murders, kickbacks, and bribes &mdash; all intimately connected with the economic infrastructure &mdash; has remained among the highest in Russia. Most businesses have not been able to function without paying for some form of mafia protection, informally called a krysha (the Russian word for roof).Luzhkov, who has close ties to all legitimate power centers in the city, has overseen the construction of sports stadiums, shopping malls, monuments to Moscows history, and the ornate Christ the Savior Cathedral. In 1994 Yeltsin gave Luzhkov full control over all state property in Moscow. In the first half of 1996, the city privatized state enterprises at the rate of US$1 billion per year, a faster rate than the entire national privatization process in the same period. Under Luzhkovs leadership, the city government also acquired full or major interests in a wide variety of enterprises &mdash; from banking, hotels, and construction to bakeries and beauty salons. Such ownership has allowed Luzhkovs planners to manipulate resources efficiently and with little or no competition. Meanwhile, Moscow also became the center of foreign investment in Russia, often to the exclusion of other regions. For example, the McDonalds fast-food chain, which began operations in Moscow in 1990, enjoyed immediate success but expanded only in Moscow. The concentration of Russias banking industry in Moscow gave the city a huge advantage in competing for foreign commercial activity.In mid-1996 the national government appeared to have achieved some degree of macroeconomic stability. However, longer-term stability depends on the ability of policy makers to withstand the inflationary pressures of demands for state subsidies and easier credits for failing enterprises and other special interests. (Chubais estimated that spending promises made during Yeltsins campaign amounted to US$250 per voter, which if actually spent would approximately double the national budget deficit; most of Yeltsins pledges seemingly were forgotten shortly after his reelection.)By 1996 the structure of Russian economic output had shifted far enough that it more closely resembled that of a developed market economy than the distorted Soviet central-planning model. With the decline in demand for defense industry goods, overall production has shifted from heavy industry to consumer production. However, in the mid-1990s the low quality of most domestically produced consumer goods continued to limit enterprises profits and therefore their ability to modernize production operations. On the other side of the vicious circle, reliance on an outmoded production system guaranteed that product quality would remain low and uncompetitive.Most prices were left to the market, although local and regional governments control the prices of some staples. Energy prices remain controlled, but the Government has been shifting these prices upward to close the gap with world market prices.A 1996 government report quantified so-called shadow economy which yields no taxes or government statistics as accounting for about 51% of the economy and 40% of its cash turnover.1997-1998By the end of 1997, Russia had achieved some progress. Inflation had been brought under control, the ruble was stabilized, and an ambitious privatization program had transferred thousands of enterprises to private ownership. Some important market-oriented laws had also been passed, including a commercial code governing business relations and the establishment of an arbitration court for resolving economic disputes.But in 1998 difficulties in implementing fiscal reforms aimed at raising government revenues and a dependence on short-term borrowing to finance budget deficits led to a serious financial crisis in 1998, contributing to a sharp decline in Russias earnings from oil exports and resulting in an exodus of foreign investors. The government allowed the ruble to fall precipitously and stopped payment on $40 billion in ruble bonds. right|thumb|300px|Russian public debt1999In 1999, output increased for only the second time since 1991, by an officially estimated 6.4%, regaining 4.6% drop of 1998. This increase was achieved despite a year of potential turmoil that included the tenure of three premiers and culminated in the New Years Eve resignation of President Boris Yeltsin. Of great help was the tripling of international oil prices in the second half of 1999, raising the export surplus to $29 billion.On the negative side, inflation rose to an average 85% in 1998, compared with a 11% average in 1997 and a hoped-for 36% average in 1999. Ordinary persons found their wages falling by roughly 30% and their pensions by 45%. The Putin government has given high priority to supplementing low incomes by paying down wage and pension arrears.2000-2007thumb|350px|Russian economy since fall of the Soviet Union.Russia posted gross domestic product growth of 6.4% in 1999, 10% in 2000, 5.1% in 2001, 4.7% in 2002, 7.3% in 2003, 7.2% in 2004, 6.4% in 2005, 8.2% in 2006 and 8.5% in 2007(Russias GDP growth reached 8.5% in 2007 - statistics service Novosti Retrieved on March 19, 2008) with industrial sector posting high growth figures as well.Image:Moscow-City 30.03.2008 08.jpg|right|thumb|300px|New construction in International Business Centrehttp://www.gks.ruUnder the presidency of Putin Russias economy saw the nominal Domestic Product (GDP) double, climbing from 22nd to 11th largest in the world. The economy made real gains of an average 7% per year (2000: 10%, 2001: 5.1%, 2002: 4.7%, 2003: 7.3%, 2004: 7.2%, 2005: 6.4%, 2006: 8.2%, 2007: 8.5%, 2008: 5.6%), making it the 6th largest economy in the world in GDP(PPP). In 2007, Russias GDP exceeded that of 1990, meaning it has overcome the devastating consequences of the Soviet era, 1998 financial crisis, and preceding recession in the 1990s.(  On a per capita basis, Russian GDP was US$11,339 per individual in 2008, making Russians 57th richest on both a purchasing power and nominal basis.During Putins eight years in office, industry grew by 75%, investments increased by 125%,( and agricultural production and construction increased as well. Real incomes more than doubled and the average salary increased eightfold from $80 to $640.(Russians weigh an enigma with Putins protg MSNBC Retrieved on May 3, 2008)(Medvedev is new Russian president Jazeera Retrieved on May 7, 2008)(Putins Economy  Eight Years On Russia Profile, Retrieved on April 23, 2008) The volume of consumer credit between 20002006 increased 45 times,(  .     )(      ) and during that same time period, the middle class grew from 8 million to 55 million, an increase of 7 times. The number of people living below the poverty line also decreased from 30% in 2000 to 14% in 2008.(Russias economy under Vladimir Putin: achievements and failures Novosti Retrieved on May 1, 2008)( -    )(CIA - The World Factbook - Russia) Inflation remained a problem however, as the government failed to contain the growth of prices. Between 19992007 inflation was kept at the forecast ceiling only twice, and in 2007 the inflation exceeded that of 2006, continuing an upward trend at the beginning of 2008.( In the June 2002 Summit, leaders of the eight nations signed a statement agreeing to explore cancellation of some of Russias old Soviet debt to use the savings for safeguarding materials in Russia that could be used by terrorists. Under the proposed deal, $10 billion would come from the United States and $10 billion from other G-8 countries over 10 years.In 2003, the debt has risen to $19 billion due to higher Ministry of Finance and Eurobond payments. However, $1 billion of this has been prepaid, and some of the private sector debt may already have been repurchased. Russia continued to explore debt swap/exchange opportunities.On January 1, 2004, the fund of the Russian Federation was established by the of Russia as a part of the federal budget to balance it if price falls. Now the Stabilization fund of the Russian Federation is being modernized. The Stabilization Fund was be divided into two parts on February 1, 2008. The first part is a reserve fund equal to 10 percent of GDP (10% of GDP equals to about $200 billion now), and is invested in a similar way as the Stabilization Fund. The second part is turned into National Prosperity Fund of Russian Federation. The National Prosperity Fund is to be invested into more risky instruments, including the shares of foreign companies. The Russian economy remained commodity-driven despite its growth. Payments from the fuel and energy sector in the form of customs duties and taxes accounted for nearly half of the federal budgets revenues. The large majority of Russias exports was made up by raw materials and fertilizers,( although exports as a whole accounted for only 8.7% of the GDP in 2007, compared to 20% in 2000.(Rosstat Confirms Record GDP Growth Kommersant Retrieved on May 5, 2008) There was also a growing gap between rich and poor in Russia. Between 20002007 the incomes of the rich grew from approximately 14 times to 17 times larger than the incomes of the poor. The income differentiation ratio shows that the 10% of Russias rich live increasingly better than the 10% of the poor, amongst whom are mostly pensioners and unskilled workers in depressive regions. (See: Coefficient)Russia has been experiencing a boom in capital investment since the beginning of 2007. investment showed record growth in June, rising 27.2 percent over June of last year in real terms (adjusted for price changes), to 579.8 billion rubles, with construction industry leading the way. That is a rise of 58 percent in nominal terms and a better showing than in China. Modern Russia has never before seen such a growth rate. The rate of investment in Russia rose 22.3 percent in the first half of 2007 compared to the same period the year before. The increase during that period in 2005 was only 11 percent. The statistics significantly exceed both the conservative prognoses of the of Economic Development and Trade and less conservative independent analyses. According to Interfax, the consensus among analysts at the end of last month 15.3-percent growth compared to last year.()As of 2007 real GDP increased by the highest percentage since the fall of the Soviet Union at 8.1%, the ruble remains stable, inflation has been moderate, and investment began to increase again. In 2007 the Bank declared that the Russian economy had achieved unprecedented macroeconomic stability.(Russia attracts investors despite its image News Retrieved on March 2008) Russia is making progress in meeting its foreign debts obligations. During 2000-01, Russia not only met its external debt services but also made large advance repayments of principal on IMF loans but also built up Central Bank reserves with budget, trade, and current account surpluses. The FY 2002 Russian Government budget assumes payment of roughly $14 billion in official debt service payments falling due. Large current account surpluses have brought a rapid appreciation of the ruble over the past several years. This has meant that Russia has given back much of the terms-of-trade advantage that it gained when the ruble fell by 60% during the debt crisis. Oil and gas dominate Russian exports, so Russia remains highly dependent upon the price of energy. Loan and deposit rates at or below the inflation rate inhibit the growth of the banking system and make the allocation of capital and risk much less efficient than it would be otherwise.By the end of first decade of 21st century, the ECB reported that the country has caught a new strain of disease.(Mining accounts for most of the economic growth(pdf))2008-present Arms sales have increased to the point where Russia is second (with 0.6 the amount of US arms sale) in the world in sale of weapons, the IT industry has recorded a record year of growth concentrating on high end niches like design and microelectronics, while leaving the lesser end work to India and China; Russia is now the worlds third biggest destination for outsourcing software behind India and China. The space launch industry is now the worlds second largest behind the European 5 and nuclear power plant companies are going from strength to strength, selling plants to China and India, and recently signed a joint venture with Toshiba to develop cutting edge power plants. The civilian aerospace industry has developed the Sukhoi Superjet, as well as the upcoming MS 21 project to compete with Boeing and Airbus.The recent global economic downturn has resulted in three major shocks to Russias long-term economic growth, though.  Oil prices dropped from $140 per barrel to $40 per barrel, a decrease in access to financing with an increase in sovereign and corporate bond spreads, and the reversal of capital flows from $80 billion of in-flows to $130 billion of out-flows have all served to crush fledging Russian economic growth.  In January 2009, industrial production was down almost 16% year to year, fixed capital investment was down 15.5% year to year, and GDP had shrunk 9% year to year.(Russia in the Global Storm. http://www.carnegieendowment.org/events/?faeventDetail&id1326. April 21, 2009.) However, in the second quarter the GDP rose by 7.5 percent on a quarterly basis indicating the beginning of economic recovery.See also*of largest projects in the Russian economyReferencesExternal links*The Reformers in Russia in the 1990s*The Gross Domestic Product (GDP) of Russia 1994-2000 
24858016
Smith_McKay
Smith McKay (1817 &ndash; December 8, 1889) was a prospector, merchant and political figure in Newfoundland. He represented Twillingate-Fogo in the and Labrador House of Assembly from 1869 to 1874 and from 1882 to 1889.He was born in Nova Scotia and came to Newfoundland in 1844, becoming a partner in a fishery supply and export business. McKay also was captain of a sealing ship and commanded a schooner which brought back oil from whales. He was a partner in the Union Copper Mine, the first significant mining operation in the colony, with James Fox Bennett. McKay was manager for the mine and also was involved in other mining ventures. In 1869, he married Susan Lock. He served as chairman of the Board of Works from 1883 to 1889. McKay died in office in St. Johns in 1889. References * External links * 
24877305
Golden_Fleece_Tunnel_(California)
The Golden Fleece Tunnel, is a mining site in the Westville gold mining district in County, California.() () The mine is located 2 miles northeast of the former mining town California, north to the Foresthill Divide Road. It has a  tunnel and was operated successfully by the Fleece Mining and Milling Company (New York).() (House documents, otherwise publ. as Executive documents: 13th congress, 2d session-49th congress, 1st session, United States congressional serial set, 1832, p. 128.) The mine is no longer in operation. Other nearby mines are the Hogsback Tunnel and the Union Tunnel.Other Golden Fleece mines include:* Fleece Mine (Colorado).* Golden Fleece Mine, Bernardino County, California, near Essex, is a mining site with several tunnels and a central mill, not in production anymore . References 
24890860
Jack_Conroy
Jack Conroy (December 5, 1898 to February 28, 1990) a leftist American writer,(Jack Conroy. Encyclopdia Britannica. 2009. Encyclopdia Britannica Online. 29 Oct. 2009, ) also known as a Worker-Writer,(AP, . Jack Conroy, Novelist, 91. New York Times 02 Mar 1990, ) and was best known for his contributions to literature, fiction and nonfiction about the life of American workers during the early decades of the 20th century.(Inventory of the Jack Conroy Papers. The Newberry Library Chicago. 2003. The Newberry Library, Web. 29 Oct 2009. )BackgroundHe was born John Wesley Conroy to Irish immigrants on December 5, 1898 in the mining camp of Monkey Nest near Missouri.((Jack Conroy. Moberly Area Community College. Moberly Area Community College, Web. 29 Oct 2009. ) A Depression-era novelist, Conroy drew upon his childhood growing up in a mining camp ( and elements of this can be seen in his novels, Disinherited ( and A World to Win.(Conroy, Jack. World To Win. Intro by Douglas Wixson. Chicago: U of Illinois P, 2000.)Though he did not complete a formal education, he worked at various jobs including: railroad shop apprentice (and eventual foreman), recording secretary for the of Railway Carmen of America union office, an auto factory worker, and construction.( While he worked, he wrote and it is said that in 1934, when soaring temperatures had burned up crops and blistered city streets, Conroy moved his kitchen table outdoors beneath a shade tree where he created his second novel, A World to Win.(From 1931 to 1941 Conroy edited successively the magazines Rebel Poet, The Anvil, and The New Anvil. He included works by Caldwell, Hughes, and Carlos Williams, among others.( Conroy later edited, with Johnson, a collection of these pieces, Writers in Revolt: The Anvil Anthology (1973).( In 1938 Conroy came to Chicago, on Algrens suggestions, to work on the Illinois Writers Project.( Along with recording folktales and industrial folklore, Conroy was assigned to the black history portion of the IWP, and collaborated with Bontemps, producing the pioneering black studies works They Seek A City (1945) and Anyplace But Here (1965), both about African-American migration from the South to the North.( Conroy and Bontemps also collaborated on several successful juvenile books based on folktales, including The Fast Sooner Hound (1942) and Slappy Hooper, The Wonderful Sign Painter (1946).(In 1965, Conroy moved from Chicago back to Missouri, where he lived until his death in 1990. He continued to write into his 80s, publishing The Weed King and Other Stories in 1985.( Over the course of his career, Conroy was also a teacher and lecturer, and a mentor to younger radical writers.( Known as The Sage of Moberly,( Conroy also wrote under the pseudonyms of Tim Brennan and John Norcross.( He died February 28, 1990 in Moberly, MO.(((LegacyThe difficulty scholars have had in finding theoretical studies about the worker-writer in America signifies how ground-breaking Jack Conroys work was with introducing the worker-writer in literature.(Wixson, Douglas. Worker-Writer in America: Jack Conroy and the Tradition of Midwestern Literary Radicalism, 1898-1990. Chicago: U of Illinois P, 1994. Print.) Conroys first novel, Disinherited, confused critics because it was a narrative that challenged traditional views of the novel and did not seem to align with what was considered influential literature at the time.(Abrams, Alan. Author found his inspiration in Toledos Willys plant. Toledo Blade 06 Mar 1994: E-4. Online. ) Most critics felt that there should be a definite line drawn between the world of the middle-class literate, and the world of the worker.(Although Conroy first achieved national attention when Mencken discovered his work and published Conroys sketches and stories in American Mercury magazine,( recognition of Conroys work was all but abandoned between the 1930s and 1960s. Awareness of Conroys work disappeared for a variety of reasons, including the difficulty Conroy had in simultaneously establishing himself as a writer and staying loyal to his identity as a worker. Although Conroy longed for literary success, he decided not to abandon his worker identity, and so he worked for 23 years as an editor of an encyclopedia sold through Sears stores and as a book reviewer for the Sun and the Daily Defender.( It wasnt until the 1960s that Conroy was recognized by a new generation as a writer who knew very well the life of the worker, and as an influential writer of that worker identity.(Conroy is now remembered not only as the worker-writer, but as a teacher, lecturer, and mentor to younger radical writers. Until Jack Conroy, the worker had hardly been mentioned in American literature. Best-seller lists suggest that people would rather read about lives of the wealthy, but Jack Conroys legacy as a worker-writer has introduced to American literature one writers desire in educating readers to prefer crude vigor to polished urbanity.( Along with his work with rather unique literary themes, Conroy has won various awards and recognition, including (:*Fellowship, 1935*Literary Times Award, State of Illinois, 1967*Society of Midland Authors James L. Dow Award for Anyplace But Here, 1967*Rabinowitz grant to write his autobiography*Missouri Literary Association, Literary Award, 1969*Honorary of Humane Letters, University of Missouri at Kansas City, 1975*Endowment for the Arts, Artists grant (1978)*Twain Award, Society for the Midwestern Literature, 1980*Recognition by the Missouri Senate, 1984*City of Moberly, Jack Conroy Day, May 22, 1985*Society of Midland Authors Award for Lifetime Achievement, 1986*Lifetime Membership, Folklore Society*A True Friend of Working People, Central Missouri Labor Council, AFL-CIO and all the working men and women of Mid-MissouriMajor works*Edited Unrest (19291931) with Ralph Cheyney*Edited The Rebel Poet (19311932)*Disinherited (1933) reflects Conroys own life ( as it tells the story of a work-seeking coal miners son during the Great Depression.(*A World to Win (1935) is a proletariat novel that follows two brothers as they seek their own definitions of worldly success during the Great Depression.*Founded The Anvil (1935) was a literary magazine that published authors such as Richard Wright, LeSueur, Caldwell, T. Farrell, Algren, and Derleth. The magazines slogan was We Prefer Crude Vigor to Polished Banality.  After being taken over by Communist officials and merged with the Partisan Review, it was later republished as The New Anvil.(Jack Conroy and the Anvils--Original, New, and North Country. KickTime. The KickTime Management, Web. 29 Oct 2009. )*Edited The New Anvil (19381942) with Algren was created in attempt to revive the working class magazine, The Anvil. Contributing writers included Yerby, Shapiro, Hughes, and Carlos Williams.(*The Fast Sooner Hound (1942), a childrens book co-authored with Bontemps, is the first of three that paints a picture of African-American migration and settlement.(*They Seek A City (1945) is the second of the childrens book series written with Arna Bontemps ( on the northern migration of African-Americans, both pre- and post-Civil War.(They Seek A City. Bookfever.com. 7 Sep 2009. Bookfever.com, Web. 29 Oct 2009. )*Slappy Hooper, The Wonderful Sign Painter (1946) was written with Arna Bontemps based on one of Conroys folktales.(*Midland Humor: A Harvest of Fun and Folklore (1947)*Senior editor for The New Standard Encyclopedia (1947)*Sam Patch, The High, Wide and Handsome Jumper (1951) with Arna Bontemps*Anyplace But Here (1966) is a republished version of They Seek A City written with Arna Bontemps. This expanded version adds chapters on Garvey, the Black Muslims, X, and other racial issues.(Anyplace But Here. University of Missouri Press. U of Missouri P, Web. 29 Oct 2009. )*Edited Writers in Revolt: The Anvil Anthology (1973) with Curt Johnson*The Weed King and Other Stories (1985) is a collection of tales reflecting Conroys life and personality.(ReferencesExternal links* Jack Conroy Papers at Newberry Library
24905379
Industry_and_the_Eglinton_Castle_estate
thumb|290px|Eglinton castle circa 1870, with deer grazing in the foregroundThe Eglinton Castle estate was situated at Irvine, on the outskirts of Kilwinning, Ayrshire, Scotland (map reference NS 3227 42200) in the former district of Cunninghame. Castle, was once home to the Montgomeries, Earls of Eglinton and chiefs of the Montgomery. Country Park now occupies part of the site.A dense network of mineral railway lines existed in the 19th and 20th centuries; the trackbed now being used as cycle paths in several places. A very complex set of collieries, coal pits, tile works, fire-clay works and workers villages are evident from records such as OS maps. Little now remains of the buildings and railway lines, apart from at Lady Ha Colliery, but irregular depressions in the ground, embankments, cuttings, coal bings and abandoned bridges all bear witness to what was at one time a very active coalfield with associated industries and infrastructure.Coal miningThe coal seamsMcMichael records that nine coal seams underlie the Parish of Kilwinning, their names and dimensions from top to bottom being : Five-quarter coal, ; parrot coal, ; turf coal, ; wee coal, No.1, ; lady ha coal, ; ell coal, ; stone coal, ; wee coal No.2, ; and main coal, .(McMichael, Page 171)Early coal exploration in the areaApart from direct involvement in the provision of coal from their own estates the earls provided loans to others, such as to Robert Cunninghame of Auchenharvie who developed extensive coal mining operations in the Barony of Stevenston. The results were variable, however the Earls did obtain some new lands, rents, tolls and other benefits.(Hughson, Page 9)The earliest form of coal mining was at what was called adits or in Scotland, ingaun ees (ingoing eyes), in which exposed coal was mined through the coal seam itself. These were typically in places such as valleys where erosion had exposed the coal veins.(A Short History of the Scottish Coal-Mining Industry. Page 36)At first in the 16th century, peat, charcoal or timber were the preferred fuels and only when they were in short supply was coal actively sought. The Eglinton Estate papers record details of tenants petitioning for coal to be provided, however the cost involved and the farmers lack of ability to pay often made such mining uneconomic. In the 17th century dwindling supplies of other fuels and demand from developing towns in Ireland led to coal mining becoming economically viable and sometimes highly remunerative.(Hughson, Page 4)The Doura pits had been worked at the time of Mary Queen of Scots (15421587), when they had supplied coal to the of Holyrood and Castle. It was later abandoned on being flooded.(Service, page 117.) This is not as unlikely as it seems because the mining methods of the time had exhausted the known accessible coal stocks and that their existed an exhorbitant dearth and scantness of fewale within the Realme.(Hall, Page 29) In the 18th century and before, Dowra (sic), was a household word in the district due to the excellent quality of the coal it produced.(Dobie, Page 131)Coal workings and wastes at Monkridding near Kilwinning were recorded by Pont in 1608, extending between 50 and , associated with the limestone.(Dobie, Pages 332333)In the 1660s coal mining activities intensified on the Eglinton estates, partly to supply the needs of the Irish who had none.(Whatley, Page 54) Coal heughs were shallow pits and in 1686 they had been sunk at Doura and Armsheugh, the coal being taken down to Irvine via the Steps or via Stanecastle.(Strawhorn, Page 58)The Earls demanded extremely high rents for their coal mines and they did not work the Fergushill pits as they were required for the use of the House of Eglinton. This policy may have been to conserve their coal supplies and it resulted in high prices and a shortage.Charles Sherriff was sub-factor to the 10th Earl between 175961 and coal manager during the 1760s.(Whatley, Page 82) At Fergushill Provost William McTaggart paid 2000 Scots for twenty coal hewers in the 18th century.(Whatley, Page 58)In 1771 the Earl had a pit and feued an avenue from the Circle at the Mains down to the river from Irvine Burgh. He had permission to build roads, waggonways, breastworks, and coal rees on the river side.(Strawhorn, Page 76)In 1808 William Aiton recorded coal mining at Eglinton, Doura, and Sourlie.(Aiton, Page 47)John Smith in 1895 records the remains of an old lade , which supplied water to drive a wheel wherewith the old coal-pits used to be drained.(Smith, Page 61) This was an early example of the use of water-gins (water-wheels) to help drain mines.(A Short History of the Scottish Coal-Mining Industry. Page 44)The Eglinton Colliery was the main centre for the earls coal operations in the 18th century, however it was flooded when miners broke into old waste at Fergushill in 1747; Millburn Colliery was also operated at this time. 28 hewers were employed at the time. Agents worked Redburn and Fergushill until these were laid up in 1790.(Duckham, Page 157)In 1872 the 14th Earl, Archibald William, took in 9,500 a year from mineral royalties, around 900,000 in modern terms (2009);(Measuring Worth. Accessed : 2009-12-12) he collected an additional 37,000 a year from rents, worth around 2,500,000 in 2009.((Kilwining Past & Present, Section 4.4)Coal pitsMany of the small pits were mined and formed by the pit method which had a vertical shaft, followed by the horizontal removal of coal and finally an infilling with material from another bell pit. Eventually these partly back-filled pits collapsed and formed dry or more usually flooded bell shaped pits; this method ofmining was only possible where coal was close to the surface. The term pit continued to be used for more complex mining sites and generally referred to each shaft.(A Short History of the Scottish Coal-Mining Industry. Page 37)The 10th Earl had sunk bell pits in Kyleshill Street in Saltcoats in 1759-60. The wives and daughters had carried out the coal hewed by the men up ladders on their backs.(Graham, Page 30) A local poet had written:A Dr. Duguid was the doctor for the Doura pit in the 18th century and recorded that when the flooded pit was drained, William Ralston, the ganger, found the old workmens tools and their bones at the coal face. In the 18th century another disaster took place at Doura after heavy frosts had loosened the pit soil and the pit supports gave way. Pate Brogildy from the Redboiler survived, however he later had his arm ripped off at the shoulder blade by the fly-wheel of the pit steam engine. He survived as the twisting motion of the amputation had sealed the arteries. Willie Forgisal (Fergushill?) of Torranyard had his leg amputated above the knee. James Jamphrey from Corsehill was killed instantly.(Service, pages 138139.)A William Forgisal (Fergushill) of Torranyard was a miner at the Doura Pit in the 18th-century. He lost his leg in a mining accident, as had his father. Williams wife was a tough sort, her comment being on seeing him so encumbered, was that the Forgisals would need a small plantation of their own to keep them in crutches.(Service (1887), Page 140.)The Statistical Account records that the coals at Doura were ell and stone-coals. Easter Doura mine employed 12 - 16 colliers and was owned by Lord Lisle and was leased by him for 140 per annum in the 18th century.John and George Taylor, sons of a lawyer, are recorded as having held leases for coal mines at Bartonholm and Doura in the early 19th century.(Whatley, Page 73)The Corsehillmuir pits were located near Corsehillhead and Five roads; a number of other pits were located nearby and at Buckreddan, off the Bannoch road. Moncur pit was rail served and located near Mid Moncur farm. Numerous coal pits were present in the Doura, Benslie, Auchenwinsey and Sourlie areas.Coal pits were located ar Redburn near Redburn House and at Dykehead near the confluence of the Garnock and the Lugton Water. These pits were joined to the rail network via the line at Dirrans.Eglinton CollieriesThe 1856 OS map shows 28 pits in the vicinity of Irvine, but only 12 by 1874.File:Moncur Pits 4 & 5.JPG|Moncur no 4 & 5 pit bingFile:Holm pit no 23, North Millburn.JPG|Fergushill no 23, The Holm pit bingFile:Fergushill 28 pit bing.JPG|Fergushill no 28 pit bingImage:ECP colliery tunnel.JPG|A brick lined culvert at Fergushill no 28 collieryA colliery is a coal mine together with its physical plant and outbuildings. It differs from a pit in the degree of complexity and sophistication; by inference the term is used for coal mines established from the time of the industrial revolution onwards.Eglinton No.10 was also known as Corsehillhead; Knoxs; Lady Gardener ; and Pyetbog. It produced Ladyha, Ell and Wee coal, being abandoned in 1900.(Mines Department, Page 37) Fergushills nos 29 and 30 (named Montgomeryfield after a miner who died at the mine) were near Sourlie Hill roundabout; Fergushills nos 28 & 26 (Sourlie), the Happy Home were near the Draught Burn and closed on 15 July 1921 (the bings survive). Fergushill 28s railway culvert for the Draught Burn survives; the burn has however changed course. 100 men were employed here; Fergushill no 22, the Diamond, was at Chapelholms (the bings survive), abandoned 1889;(Mines Department, Page 39) Fergushill 23, also called the Happy Home, was near no 22;(Scottish National Archive. GD1/905/78.) Shipmill no 3 was near Sourlie, opened in the mid 1930s and closed on 13 October 1945;( Fergushill no 17, Rover, was near Chapelholms Wood (bings survive), abandoned 1921;(Mines Department, Page 38) Fergushill (Holm) no 23 was near North Millburn farm (the bings survive).Moncur no 4 & no 5 were near Eglinton Kennels (bings survive), abandoned 1919; Ladyha no 1 was at the Bannoch Road; Ladyha no 2 was at Lady Ha (substantial remains); and Eglinton no 1, Lady Sophia (name after the 14th Earls eldest daughter, opened in 1883 & closed 1930(), was near the hospital; Redburn closed in 1930.( Eglinton colliery and Ladyha no 1 were situated near Buckreddan, just off the Bannoch Road. Redstone colliery was located near Kenneths castle towards Bridgend. A colliery was present at Bartonholm, closed by Bairds in 1928; Bogside closed in 1929.(Kilwinning Past & Present, Section 7.4) Other collieries were at Stobbs, Monkridden, and Seven Acres (Snacres).(The Diamond pit (Fergushill no 22) explains the modern name Diamond Bridge which is given to Chapelholms bridge and the name Diamond Lodge which may have been the now demolished Chapel cottage.(Montgomeries of Eglinton, page 107.) Black Diamond was a favourite horse of one of the Earls.The Statistical Account records that the coals at Doura were main and stone-coals. Laigh Fergus-hill (sic) mine was owned by Mr McDowal and was leased by him for 100 per annum in the 18th century. Eglinton Colliery was flooded for some years after miners broke into an old waste at Fergushill in November 1747. The early mines were laid up in the 1790s.(Duckham, Page 157.)Ladyha No 2 collierythumb|230px|Ladyha Pit no 2 colliery in 1910Key to plan; 1 - Downcast shaft & winding engine house; 2 - upcast shaft and winding engine/cum pump house; 3 - engineers and blacksmiths shops; 4 - winch house; 5 - store; 6 - office; 7 - boiler house and chimney; 8 - screening house; 9 - fan/compressor house; 10 - wagon traverser; 11 - underground band haulage.Ladyha No 2 pit was sunk in 1885 to a depth of  and closed in May 1934, having struggled since its main customer, the Eglinton Iron Company, closed in 1928. A fairly substantial brick-lined tunnel still survives which once carried a standard gauge railway line unobtrusively to Ladyha colliery, out of the Earls sight and the smoke kept away from the kitchen gardens greenhouses and plants.(Sharp, page 36.) Other such cosmetic tunnels exist at Alloway and near Culzean Castle.(Clinton, page 38.) The tunnel was used during World War II as a bomb shelter and storage area for furniture; it remains in good condition.Views of the old Ladyha colliery and tunnelImage:Ladyha Colliery Ruins.JPG|Ladyha colliery ruins. The colliery closed in 1934File:Ladyha No.2 waggon traverser.JPG|Remains of the waggon traverserFile:Ladyha Ha band haulage structure.JPG|Remains of the underground band haulage systemImage:Eglinton tunnel ladyha portal.JPG|Looking out towards the site of the old collieryImage:Eglinton tunnel ladyha portal gates.JPG|Looking towards the tunnel entrance from the site of Ladyha Colliery. The other end of the tunnel is visible.Image:Aglinton tunnel roof.JPG|Detail of the bricks lining the tunnelImage:Eglinton railway tunnel.JPG|The 19th-century tunnel entrance on the standard gauge branchline to Ladyha collieryLongford Misk, Snodgrass Misk and Bartonholm coal workingsA plan of these coal workings was produced in 1841 shows the extensive infrastructure of Snodgrass Misk colliery in particular, with numerous tunnels running under the Water of Garnock, leaks recorded and several coal loading places. Snodgrass pit itself was served in addition by a short canal.( Longford Misk had a less complex layout, however an apparent waggonway is shown leading to a coal loading point on the river.( On Bartonholm at this time were located a mining village and the pits of William, John, and New or Gorge.(Peck, 1841)Opencast miningthumb|265px|The Sourlie OpenCast coal mineAn opencast mine was established by Irvine Development Corporation (IDC) and the National Coal Board/British Coal at Sourlie in the 1983. Linnbed, Parrot, Turf and Wee coals were mined; stoops from the Hutch Longwall method of coal extraction within old collieries were exposed during excavations.(Prince, Page 15) All the suitable coals had been removed by 1986 and reclamation completed by 1987. The Draught Burn was diverted to accommodate this and the surviving Settling pond or lagoon comes from the project.(Prince, Page 31)Reclamation involved the creation of a feature on the restored Sourlie Hill, now known as confusingly as Cairnmount (the original Cairnmount is located a short distance to the north-east), as part of the landscaping of the mine site, the large boulders for this project were found during the works. These standing stones are seen by many as genuine ancient megaliths. A large landscape bowl was also created.(Prince, Pages 32) The categories of coal extracted were Five Quarter, Linnbed, Parrot, Turf and Wee,( totalling 255,028 Tonnes with 5.6 million metres cubed of material excavated in total.(Prince, Page 27)Upon the closure of Sourlie opencast, coal mining on the Eglinton Estate had finally ceased after nearly five centuries.Several sub-fossil antlers of Reindeer (29,900 years old) and also bones of the Rhinoceros Coelondonta antiquitatis, (50-100,000 years old) were found at Sourlie. Both of these species was hunted by early humans, who may have caused their extinction.(Jardine, pages 288295.)(Prince, Page 34)Sourlie viewsImage:Eglinton settling pond.JPG|The settling pond / lagoonFile:Montgomerie Park development.JPG|Looking from Cairnmount across the old opencast site with the bowl in the foregroundFile:Site of old Sourlie opencast.JPG|The old opencast site looking towards the Montgomery Park housing schemeFile:Cairnmount stones at Sourlie.JPG|The standing stones feature at Cairnmount (Sourlie Hill)Mine disastersDeaths and injuriesMining is a very hazardous, if not the most hazardous occupation; deaths and severe injuries were an inevitable part of the job as indicated by the following selection from the records:-At Bartonholm no 3 in 1871 four were killed when fire damp was ignited - William Graham age 55, Charles McDonald age 56, Thomas McQuade age 45, and Samuel Holmes age 29. In 1874 at Eglinton Colliery an oversmen, James Lawson, aged 59, was killed when he fell down the shaft. In December 1874 a 16 year old collier, Alexander Cupples, was killed at Bartonholm when the roof and sides of the tunnel collapsed. On 19 July 1883, at Redburn Pit, James Shearer 18 years of age, was very seriously injured when he accidentally fell off his horse and was run over by several of the hutches he was pulling. On 15 May 1908 Thomas Kirkwood, aged 24, was killed while at work in Sourlie pit; he was buried beneath a fall from the roof, and suffocated. On 3 May 1911 at Redburn No 1, Andrew Blackley was killed by a fall from the roof. On 27 March 1913 at Lady Sophia pit, Robert MGrevey, 39 years of age, was instantaneously killed while at the Lady Sophia pit, when he was struck by a fall of coal and killed instantly. On 11 November 1920 Henry Coulter, died as the result of injuries caused by a breakaway of hutches which took place in Lady Ha pit. Besides other injuries, his back was broken, and he died on the way to the Infirmary. A miner named Daniel Wales was instantaneously killed by a fall of stones in Lady Ha Pit on 20 September 1921. On 19 April 1927 a miner named Alexander Duncan, was accidentally killed while at work in the Lady Ha Pit. Alexander was engaged along with his brother in clearing away a fall when he was crushed by two large stones which came away from the roof.()An incident at the Fergushill No 22, Diamond pitOn 7 August 1913 an explosion occurred at this pit, which belonged to Messrs A. Finnie & Sons. Two miners named Andrew Allardyce and Hugh Galone, were at work in a section of the pit by themselves when the accident occurred. A miner named Hugh Montgomery, who was working in another part of the pit some hundreds of yards distant, became conscious of a vibration, and at first thought that something had gone wrong in No 23 pit, which connects with No 22. On further inquiry, however, he had reason to believe that the explosion had taken place in the workings occupied by the two men named, and this was confirmed by two pony drivers, who emerged from the direction of the occurrence.The condition of the air was such that the area could not be reached. Later, in travelling along the air course, the rescuers came across Hugh Galone, who had crawled from the danger zone to the pit bottom, a distance of about 300 yards. Hugh was in a semi-conscious condition, and was unable to tell anything of the accident. At the surface it was found that he had sustained serious burning injuries besides shock, and he was taken to Kilmarnock Infirmary for treatment. The remains of Allardyce were recovered later.(The Garnock and the Kilwinning mine flooding disaster of 1833On June 20, 1833 the surface of the Garnock was seen to be ruffled and it was discovered that a section of the river bed had collapsed into mineworkings beneath.(Strawhorn, Map C10) The river was now flowing into miles of mineworkings of the Snodgrass, Bartonholm and Longford collieries. Attempts were made to block the breach with clay, whin, straw, etc to no avail. The miners had been safely brought to the surface and were able to witness the sight of the river standing dry for nearly a mile downstream, with fish jumping about in all directions. The tide brought in sufficient water to complete the flooding of the workings and the river level returned to normal.(The weight of the floodwater was so great that the compressed air broke through the ground in numerous places and many acres of ground were observed to bubble up like a pan of boiling water. In some places rents and cavities appeared measuring four or five feet in diameter, and from these came a roaring sound described as being like steam escaping from a safety valve. For about five hours great volumes of water and sand were thrown up into the air like fountains and the mining villages of Bartonholm, Snodgrass, Longford and Nethermains were flooded.(The Eglinton IronworksArchibald William, the 13th of Eglinton purchased all the lands concerned with the inundation by the Garnock and through the simple expedient of cutting a short canal at Bogend, across the loop of the river involved, he bypassed the breach and once the river course had been drained and sealed off he was able in 1853( to have the flooded mineworkings pumped out. The breach lay on the sea side of the loop close to Bogend on the Snodgrass Holm side.(Brotchie, Page 13.) The Earl leased the mines to Bairds of Gartsherrie and the Eglinton Iron Works were born.(MacDonald) In 1855, after condsiderable investigation, the company introduced the Longwall method of mining, producing more coal more cheaply, however although owning a number of mines, they mainly purchased their coal from other mine owners.(Bairds of Gartsherrie reached agreement with Archibald William, 13th Earl of Eglinton, on land costs and mineral royalties and by midsummer 1845 work on the Eglinton Ironworks was well underway at Stobbs farm between Irvine and Kilwinning.( The 1866 ironworks colliers strike led to unemployed Cornish tin miners being employed. Eglinton ironworks village 1850 to 1930s. The Eglinton Iron Company had at one point covered 28 hectares / 70 acres with eight furnaces and a 100,000 ton iron production per year.(John Jack was the first manager and the well known Ayrshire antiquary, geologist and natural historian, John Smith (18461930) was manager for Messrs W. Baird at the ironworks from 1870 to 1890, moving here from Lugar.(Calder, Page 7) The works closed in 1924. Only the Blacklands Community Centre remains as the old Bairds miners library and recreation hall; even the slag heap has been removed to build the Hunterston Deep Water terminal.((Slag hill at Eglinton Ironworks. Accessed : 2009-11-19)Industrial relationsUsually the Earls left industral relations to employees, however Lady Susanna, wife of the 9th Earl, was involved in the general supervision of miners on the estate as shown by her correspondence and the fact that she intervened in the 1749 - 50 labour unrest.( A new grieve at the Earls Millburn pit reduced the hewing rates and the hewers complained that they were like severest slaves and had to work 14 hours a day, six days a week to make a living. They also claimed that at the end of the working day they were so exhausted that they struggled to even exit the pit.(Whatley, Page 86)(Duckham, Page 268)Susanna summoned the miners to Castle to try and sort things out, as a result of which several of the miners signed a disclamation which they later tried to repudiate. The lawyer who dealt with the case stated that it is probable a Lady of great Beauty of Address might prevail with some of the old Coalziers to sign any paper.(Duckham, Page 290)The Eglinton miners in the 1749 dispute appear to have acted peaceably, causing no damage to pit-headgear, pumps, etc. Despite their good behaviour they were accused of being so many mutinous and unruly Coaliers who had ... without any just Cause or Colour deserted their Masters work. The employers also warned the courts of the dire consequences of leniency.(Duckham, Page 305)In 1799 the Fergushill barony became the property of the 12th Earl of Eglinton and Winton, and the Fergushill miners were sold with the land, a normal practice for the time. The workers owned their bodies, however the Earl owned their labour and quiting their work was regarded as theft. This arose from an infamous labour Act of 1606.(Service (1887), Page 191)(A Short History of the Scottish Coal-Mining Industry. Page 55)The Earl of Eglinton claimed to have given up a valuable colliery in 1766 due to the loss of profits caused by miners demands and labour practices.(Whatley, Pages 86 and 87)The bondage under which the miners (and Salters) worked was not removed until acts of Parliament in 1775 & 1799. By 1882 it was illegal for boys and girls below the age of ten to work in the mines.(Kilwinning Past & Present, Page 7.4)TransportationInternalWithin the early mine tunnel or roads, coal was loaded into hutches which were dragged on skids, sometimes on wooden plank-ways, however at the earls colliery near Redburn small unsaleable coal was packed to form a smooth surface, a cheaper alternative to the use of wood.(Duckham, Page 102)ExternalRoadsCoal was at first carried on pack animals in panniers as the roads before the late 18th century were not suitable for wheeled vehicles. As a result of this, canals, waggonways and railways were developed.(A Short History of the Scottish Coal-Mining Industry. Page 49)File:Drukken Steps, Irvine, Burns Walk.jpg|200px|thumb|left|The Steps with an event run by the Irvine Burns Club(Strawhorn, Page 191)One route for coal transport from Armsheugh and Doura was via the Steps, stepping stones on the course of the 1774 Toll Road, which ran from the west end of Irvine through Eglinton to Kilwinning via Milnburn or Millburn;(McLure, page 53.) crossing the Red burn near Knadgerhill.(Irvine Herald.) and running passed The Higgins cottage,( (now demolished).In 1805 the Earl obtained permission to turpike the road that ran through the Eglinton estate to the village of Saltcoats and its harbour. He used his own workforce to maintain the road and his expenses were covered by levying toll charges at the toll barriers he constructed. The transport of Cunninghame coal was a major and disputed source of income.(Hughson, Pages 24 & 25)CanalsIn the 1840s a short canal carried coal from the colliery at Snodgrass to the Garnock and beyond.(( The Montgomeries were intent on creating a major harbour at Ardrossan and they intended to make it the principal port for Glasgow by building a canal link to Glasgow; the Paisley and Johnstone Canal. Construction from the Glasgow end began in 1807 and the first boat, the passenger boat, The Countess of Eglinton, was launched in 1810; completion to Glasgows Port Eglinton from Paisley was achieved in 1811, but the section to Ardrossan was never built.(Robertson.)WaggonwaysAs early as 1725 a waggonway was planned and possibly built from a Fergushill coal pit to Irvine Harbour.(Whatley, Page 56)thumb|200px|The 19th-century waggonway bridge (foreground) over the Lugton Water near Fergushill farm. The two bridges were known as the Elbo and chael, Elbow and child.(Ness.)left|thumb|upright|The course of the waggonway from Millburn drive looking towards Kilwinning.The Ardrossan and Johnstone Railway opened as a waggonway between Ardrossan and the Dirrens at Kilwinning in 1831.(Lewin, pages 1718) It was initially built to the gauge of  and was worked by horses.(Whishaw) It had a passenger services worked by a carriages, which held 24 passengers; 16 inside and 8 outside.( The railway was built by the Paisley and Johnstone Canal company. It commenced on the west side of Ardrossan harbour. The  long Doura branch left the main line near Stevenston and crossed under the Paisley, Kilmarnock and Ayr Railway to reach the Doura coal pit.((Whishaw)The  North Fergus Hill branch left the Doura branch at South Fergushill, just after the Lugton Water crossing to reach the Fergus Hill coal pit.(( Crossing gates were located at Dirrans, Corsehill, Saughtrees and Fergushill. Clonbeith siding was located near the Fergushill gates.( The Fergushill drive entrance into the Eglinton Estate passed Chapelholm Woods was carried over the railway by a bridge; this has since been demolished.(National Archives of Scotland. RHP/34800/1-3.)thumb|200px|An old loading dock at the Benslie coup, on the closed and lifted Doura waggonway branchImage:Wagonway.jpg|thumb|200px|A typical wagonway, the Eaton GangwayIn 1833 Sir James Cunningham extended the Doura branch to his extensive coal and fireclay workings at Perceton. Up until the 1850s this line was worked using horse haulage. Each wagon carried about one ton of coal. The Doura branch was private until 1839 when the Ardrossan Railway Company came into being.(In 1836 60,000 tons of coal were carried to Ardrossan on the waggonway from the Earls Kilwinning pits.(Whatley, Page 61) Between 28 July 1834 and September 1835 over 21,000 people had been carried on the railway using the regular passenger service. By the late 1830s the annual figure was around 30,000.A rare waggon-way bridge for the original 1.37 metres / 4 ft 6 in horse drawn railway (later relaid as standard gauge)(Anstruther, Page 14) still survives near South Fergushill farm on the B 785 Fergushill Road (see photograph), this being part of a  long line that ran from the Doura pit to Ardrossan.(Millburn waggonway buildingOpposite the old South Millburn farm is a ruined cottage with unusual architectural features. The gable ends both held rectangular windows with an elongated vertical axis, not set centrally, but offset towards the front of the building which itself faces South Millburn. These would have given a clear view to anyone within the building of any activity to the sides of the building.The old Survey maps indicate that this building sat just behind and parallel to the horse drawn waggonway, opened in 1831 to the Dirrans, which ran up to Doura by 1834, ending at the coal pit. Later the building had the Perceton / Sourlie freight Branch of the and South Western Railway located on its other side. This building may have been a waggonway crossing keepers cottage, controlling rail traffic crossing the Eglinton Castle estates Millburn Drive and the main road.( Fees may have been collected and waggon traffic recorded as well as other waggonway related tasks.The method and architecture of the build shows that it was constructed by or for the Earl of Eglinton to be in keeping with other buildings on the estate. It was built with re-cycled stone (See gallery); as were many of the estate structures, the stone mainly coming from the old Kilwinning Abbey site. Well made recycled stone is mixed with poorly worked stone and bricks.Details of the Millburn waggonway cottage - 2007 Image:Millburn drive house gable at far end detail.JPG|Gable end detail - facing towards BenslieImage:Millburn cottage window.JPG|The highly unusual elongated window in the Auchenwinsey facing endImage:Millburn cottage detail.JPG|Detail of the high quality stonework on window facing towards Country ParkImage:Millburn house reused abbey stone.JPG|Re-used stones in the gable end wall1830s waggonway railImage:Waggonway Rail.JPG|150px|right|thumb|A flat bottomed and  long section of Vignole rail from the 1834 and Johnstone RailwayA section of the light weight 1831 waggonway track survived at Millburn near Benslie and was recovered in 2009 for restoration and study.This Vignole type section track has a large surface of contact with the sleeper and is therefore a flat-bottomed rail rather than double-headed, bull-headed, etc.(Ransom, pages 223224.) It is  long, typical of early rail lengths and has no holes for fishplates as these were not invented until after 1839; special joint-chairs were used at that time to hold the ends in place. The fishplate, originally without bolt holes, was invented by Bridges Adams(Ransom, page 224.) in May 1842 and used from 1849.No holed stone blocks have yet been found and it is likely that the wrought iron rails were spiked to wooden sleepers which had an extra strip of wood along them allowing the horses hooves to gain a good grip. The rail height is much less than a typical modern rail as it was not designed to carry the weight of a locomotive.(Essery, page 9.) The rail dimensions are  high;  wide at the bottom (the foot);  wide at the top (the head). The central web is much shorter than that found on conventional rails.Railwaysthumb|180px|left|A section of old railway trackbed at Corsehillhead looking towards the Bannoch RoadThe Doura branch was private until 1839 when the Ardrossan Railway Company came into being. The re-laying of track with a heavier rail and the gauge conversion from  to 4 ft 8 in was all carried out in a period of one week in 1840. The landowners had paid for the extension and the line had its gradients and curves altered to allow for locomotive working.( In 1840 the line was connected with the Paisley, Kilmarnock and Ayr Railway at Kilwinning station; and in 1854 both lines merged with the new and South Western Railway.The first railway locomotives was Firefly, built by Barr and McNab of Paisley, followed in 1846 by two 2:2:2 types, Tam OShanter and Soutar Johnnie.(In 1845 Messrs. Taylor and Kenneth leased the earls Moncur pits and agreed to transport three quarters of their coal via the railway and the port of Ardrossan.(Graham, Page 38)Every colliery was linked by mineral lines to the main rail network and trackbeds, embankments, cuttings, bridges, etc are still evident in many places around Sourlie, Fergushill, Benslie, Auchenwinsey, Dirrens, etc.Harbours and shippingIn the early 18th century the 9th Earl had contracts with a number of local shipmasters.(Whatley, Page 93) The 12th Earl constructed Ardrossan Harbour for the Irish coal traffic.((Whatley, Pages 7374)thumb|The New Town Trail runs through the park, partly along old railway routes The Ardrossan harbour project was officially started on 31 July 1806. The navigation of the Clyde above the Cumbraes was difficult and up river of Port Glasgow, open only to small craft. In 1815, with over 100,000 having already been spent, and the contractors, Telford and Rennie pressing for 300,000 more, the works ceased. They were not restarted until 1833, after the death of the 12th Earl. The 13th Earl completed the harbour on a greatly reduced scale, the total cost amounting to 200,000. The completed harbour had two tidal basins of 6 and , and a wet-dock of .()The Earls owned the north part of Saltcoats harbour, the Cunninghame family owning the rest. Saltcoats was a very busy harbour in the 18th century and problems with silting, together with legal conflicts made the 12th Earl decided on developing his harbour and town of Ardrossan instead.(Hughson, Page 32)Other industries and miscellaneous infrastructureIn the Chapelholms wood the 1938 map marks a ram and cistern in a bend of the Lugton Water close to one of the old Fergushill collieries. Hydraulic rams harnesses the flow or current force of water to pump a portion of the water being used to power the pump to a point higher than where the water originally started. Rams were often used in remote locations, since it requires no outside source of power other than the kinetic energy of falling water.thumb|left|200px|The old mill weir on the Lugton Water at FergushillAs stated, a fairly substantial brick-lined tunnel still survives which once carried a standard gauge railway line unobtrusively to Lady ha colliery, out of the Earls sight and the smoke kept away from the kitchen gardens greenhouses and plants.The 1850s OS map shows a forge and a smithy at Buckreddan off the Bannoch Road.The placename Red Boiler near Fergushill marked the site where steam boilers from the collieries were scoured out and then reused.Steam boilers are marked on OS maps at a number of the collieries, such as Redstone.A water powered sawmill and also coke ovens were located at the Dirrens.Roys 1747 map shows a Lugton Mill near the junction of the Lugton Water and the River Garnock.In 1814 a flour mill was located at Fergushill, on the Eglinton Castle side of the Lugton Water upstream of the bridge; a millers house was situated on the other side of the river. The building of the waggonway and bridge seems to have resulted in the demolition of this house.(Scottish National Archive. RHP 2038.) Miners and workers rows or villagesMiners rows were built at Bartonholm, Corsehill, Snodgrass, Blacklands, Sourlie, Dirrans, Longford, Annick Lodge, Nethermains, Shipmill, Fergushill, Doura and Benslie.(Kilwinning Past & Present, Section 7.5) Douglas records the Eglinton Iron Works village as having 1,014 occupants in 1874.(Douglas, Page 16)A number of colliers, hewers or miners rows existed close to the various collieries and the ironworkers had a village at the Blacklands and at Byrehill near Kilwinning from 1850 to the 1930s. The village had a double row of forty-two apartment houses, a cross row of fifteen similar houses, and a single row of sixty single apartment houses. Another row, called the Brick Row, had thirty-four houses in it. One store was provided.(thumb|left|upright|The Lugton Water from the Lugton Bridge at Fergushill, near to the old Waggonway bridge.In 1874 Dobie records that a miners village called Fergushill existed with a population of 531.(Dobie, Page 150) Groome refers to the colliers village as having been established in around 1835.(Groome, Page 574)Fergushill miners village, was owned by Messrs. Finnie & Son. It was composed of 7 rows of cottages. There were ten thatched cottages. In 1913 63 persons lived here. One room, measuring  by , held thirteen persons. The rows had names like Wellington and Burn. At one time there were 78 houses in the village, with a population of 363.(Fergushill Miners Rows) It was demolished and nothing now remains at the site, other than North Fergushill farm.Benslies miners rows, the Benslie Square, were made up of 57 stone built miners houses, like Fergushill, owned by A. Finnie and Son. Coalmasters. In 1913 the village was said to be 67 years old.(Benslie Miners Rows) The population was 318 in 1881.(Groome, page 148) At first the houses only existed at the Square and then later the village was extended towards the road which runs up passed the church. A number of coal pits were in the area as shown by the first edition OS map, one pit being close to the Millburn Cottage opposite South Millburn. In 1937 most of the miners rows were demolished and the miners were moved to the Dirrans.(Ness, page 15.)Colliers rows are marked on OS maps at Corsehill, where the Eglinton Colliery school was also located.ClayworksFergushill tileworksand sole field drain.JPG|thumb|150px|Typical mug and sole drain (Scotland, 18th century) from South Auchenmade mossThese tileworks was built in 1831 at North Fergushill farm and consisted of a moulding room, kiln and drying stores. The tileworks were in a field just to the east of an unclassified road between North Fergushill farm and the old Dalry to Kilmarnock railway line. The first manager of the Tilework appears to be a Hugh Bunton or Buntine. Bunton probably lived at the adjacent Tilework Cottage. From September 1836 to the end of 1837 the Eglinton Estate purchased between 5,000 and 10,000 tiles per month for use on its farms.(AYRSHIRE NOTES, Pages 2124.)The fate of the tileworks is revealed in the memoranda from George Johnston, the Earl of Eglintons factor, to the Earls Commissioner, Mr Gairdner. By the end of 1852 demand for tiles had fallen considerably, production however was not reduced. George Johnston noted there were 480,000 unsold tiles stored at Fergushill and there was no room for the next years stock. The 1855 OS map notes the tilework is disused. The old clay pit site is now a large pond, and Tilework Cottage is a privately owned house.((Ayrshire Notes)Eglinton Fireclay worksThe OS map for the mid 18th century shows a clay mill, fireclay works and kilns at Buckreddan on the Bannoch Road. clay is used in the manufacture of fire bricks. The clay is resistant to high temperatures and is suitable for lining furnaces, as fire brick, and manufacture of utensils used in the metalworking industries. Fireclay was also worked at Perceton.(BrickworksA brickworks was located near Stobbs, close to the Eglinton Ironworks.(Eglinton Archive)Chlorine worksThe OS map shows a Chlorine works located near the old loop of the River Garnock in the Redburn area.SaltpansThe Earls owned part of Saltcoats harbour and kept saltpans there,(Hughson, Page 24) fueled by the abundant local supplies of coal brought to the harbour along the turnpike which the Earl had built. The salt was relatively expensive, but was in demand during the Wars when imports were being prevented and were used in the manufacture of cheese, butter and salted bacon.(Hughson, Pages 3334)The Wilson canning factorythumb|200px|Adams Block, once stables, coach house, estate offices and factorythumb|left|200px|Inside the old factory courtyardThe Wilson family purchased the old offices, castle ruins, and other land from Robert Howie and Sons and the Eglinton factory was opened on 12 September 1958 by the Earl of Eglinton and Winton.(Contact, Page 3) Clement Wilsons food processing plant closed in the 1980s. The factory buildings were demolished in 2009, however the old stables were renovated and sold as private accommodation.Industrial interests elsewhereWoolIn 1662 the earl was given the rights to the manual labour of all the vagrants and temporarily unemployed in Renfrewshire, Ayrshire and Galloway. These individuals were taken to the Citadel of Ayr where he had a wool factory. The parishes had to support the labourers while they were there and the earl only had to provide food and clothing. The earls rights lasted for 15 years for the vagrants and five years for the unemployed. The business was not a success as it disappears from the records after a relatively short period of time.(Lauchland, Page 27)BrewingLady Susanna Montgomery, wife of the 9th Earl of Eglinton, was very industrious and even established a brewery inside the walls of Cromwells old fort at Ayr to increase her income. It seems to have been successful.(Robertson, Page 103.)(Cousins, Page 53)Silk and cotton weavingAlexander, 10th Earl, developed the old toun of Eaglesham into a planned village. It was Archibald, 11th Earl of Eglinton, who largely saw Alexanders plans through to completion due to Alexanders early demise. The new village with two ranges of houses built around the Orry or village green, an area of common land about one-third of a mile long, divided up by the Linn or Kirkton Burn. 999 year leases were offered on condition that a house was built within five years, otherwise a fine of five pounds was imposed.The Earl gave permission for tenants to quarry stone, were given sand and were allowed to use the Linn Burn for washing and the green for bleaching. With these encouragemenst weaving became the main industry until a cotton mill was built on the Orry in 1791. The New Statistical Account records the presence of 63 silk-looms at work in Eaglesham in 1790; this soon reduced to 33; and was quickly replaced by the weaving of cotton goods in association with Glasgow and Paisley manufacturers.()Selinas treethumb|150px|Selinas tree, a Sycamore or Scots Plane, off Fergushill RoadSelina Higgins was born in Glasgow, with parents from Burslem in England, and she lived in the Five Roads area, married to a Mr. John Bannerman, a miner who worked at Ladyha Colliery in the 1930s. Selina had a severe stroke and it became a habit for her to walk to Selinas tree, the furthest distance she could manage; they both passed away within a few months of each other in 1949 and left a daughter, Helen (Nellie) Bannerman, who married Frank Gardner from Kingscavel, Linlithgow.The tree in 2009 was still healthy and the name has become part of the local history of the area.(Haro, Francisco (2010) & Hoey, Anne (2008), relatives of Selena & John.) It has also attracted speculative legends suggesting lovers trysts, etc. In 2010 Selinas Tree (Latitude 55.654333 and Longitude -4.675326)(Flash Earth Retrieved : 2010-12-29) was added to the Woodland Trusts Ancient and notable trees website.References;Notes;Sources# Aiton, William (1811). General View of The Agriculture of the County of Ayr; observations on the means of its improvement; drawn up for the consideration of the Board of Agriculture, and Internal Improvements, with Beautiful Engravings. Glasgow.# Anstruther, Ian (1963). The Knight and the Umbrella: An Account of the Eglinton Tournament, 1839. London : Geoffrey Bles Ltd.# Ayrshire Notes 32, 2006, ISSN 14743531.# Brotchie, Alan W., Some Early Ayrshire Railways. SouWest Journal. No. 38.# Calder, Jenni et al. (1995). John Smith of Dalry. Ayr Arch & Nat Hist Soc No. 16. ISBN 0-9502698-8-3.# Carragher, P. C. (1909). Saltcoats: Old and New.# Contact. House Magazine of the Wilson Organisation. Autumn 1958.# Cousins, M. B. L. Elizabeth. Montgomeries of Eglinton. Ayr Division. Strathclyde Department of Education.# Dobie, James (1876). Ponts Cunninghame topographized 16041608 with continuations and illustrative notices (1876). Pub. John Tweed.# Douglas, William Scott (1874). In Ayrshire. A Descriptive Picture of the County of Ayr. Kilmarnock : McKie & Drennan. Reprint. ISBN 978-1-40971-645-7.# Duckham, Baron Frederick (1970). A History of the Scottish Coal Industry - Volume 1: 17001815. A Social and Industrial History. Newton Abbot : David & Charles. ISBN 0715348868# Eglinton Archives, Eglinton Country Park.# Essery, Bob (2007). Railway Signalling and Track Plans. Hersham : Ian Allan. ISBN (10) .# Graham, Eric J. (1997). Robert Reid Cunninghame of Seabank House. Ayr Arch & Nat Hist Soc. No. 19.# Groome, Francis H. (1903). Ordnance Gazetteer of Scotland. London : Caxton.# Hall, Derek (2006). Scottish Monastic Landscapes. Stroud: Tempus. ISBN 0-7524-4012-8.# Hughson, Irene (1996). The Auchenharvie Colliery - an early history. Ochiltree : Stenlake Publishing. ISBN 1-872074-58-8.# Jardine, W. G., Dickson, J. H., et al. (1988) A late Middle Devensian Interstadial site at Sourlie, near Irvine, Strathclyde. Scott. J. Geol. 24, (3).# Kilwinning Past & Present (1990). Kilwinning & District Preservation Society.# Lauchland, John (2000). A History of Kilbirnie Auld Kirk. Pub. The Friends of the Auld Kirk Heritage Group.# Lewin, Henry Grote (1925). Early British Railways. A short history of their origin & development 18011844. London: The Locomotive Publishing Co Ltd. OCLC 11064369.# MacDonald, A. M. (1968) Some notes on a Kilwinning mining disaster. Inquirer.# McClure, David (1994). Tolls and Tacksmen. Ayr Arch & Nat Hist Soc. Ayrshire Monograph No. 13.# McMichael, George (c. 18811890). Notes on the Way Through Ayrshire and the Land of Burn, Wallace, Henry the Minstrel, and Covenant Martyrs. Hugh Henry : Ayr.# Mines Department (1931). Catalogue of Plans of Abandoned Mines. London : HMSO.# National Coal Board, Scottish Division. A Short History of the Scottish Coal-Mining Industry. (1958).# Ness, J. A. (196970), Landmarks of Kilwynnyng. Privately produced.# Peck, W (1841). Reduced Plan of Longford Misk Colliery. Great George Street, Edinburgh.# Prince, E. & McIntyre, G. (1990). The Sourlie Saga - Sourlie Opencast and Reclamation Scheme. Mun. Engr. 7.# Ransom, P. J. G. (1990). The Victorian Railway and How it Evolved. London : Heinemann. ISBN 0-434-98083-8.# Robertson, William (1908). Ayrshire: Its History and Historic Families. Glasgow : Grimsay Press. ISBN 1-84530-026-2. V.2.# Service, John (Editor) (1887). The Life & Recollections of Doctor Duguid of Kilwinning. Pub. Young J. Pentland.# Service, John (1913), The Memorables of Robin Cummell Paisley : Alexander Gardner.# Smith, John (1895) Prehistoric Man In Ayrshire. London : Elliot Stock.# Strawhorn, John (1985). The History of Irvine. Edinburgh : John Donald. ISBN 0-85976-140-1.# Whatley, C. A. (1983). The Finest Place for a Lasting Colliery. Ayr. Arch. & Nat. Hist. Soc.# Whishaw, Francis 1842 (Reprinted and republished 1969). The Railways of Great Britain and Ireland practically described and illustrated, 2nd, Newton Abbott: David & Charles (1842 edition - London: John Weale). ISBN 0-7153-4786-1.External links* Eglinton Foundry - 1955. Accessed : 2009-11-19* Maps at the National Library of Scotland.* 1860 OS Maps.* General Roys Military Survey of Scotland 1747 - 52.
24917253
Eduardo_rculo
 signature_alt Eduardo rculo (21 September 1938  31 March 2003), was a Spanish Basque artist who also worked in other art movements, including Expressionism and Neo-Cubism.() Both painter and sculptor, he is notable for his portrayals of luggage, the gentlemans hat, and the female bottom.() With El Equipo Crnica (Chronicle Team), formed by the artists Valds and Rafael Solbes, rculo is considered one of the drivers of pop art in Spain.(Early yearsBorn in Santurtzi, in Spains Basque Country, rculo had at least two siblings, brothers Jose Maria rculo and Maria del Mar rculo.() The family moved to the mining village of Langreo, Asturias in 1941 because of the hardships imposed on them after the Civil War.() With a childhood marked by famine, he joined the Instituto de Enseanza Media in 1948. His interest in drawing began here after rculo discovered the art of de Toulouse-Lautrec, van Gogh. and Modigliani in picture books. At the age of 14, he dropped out of school to convalesce for several months from hepatitis and tuberculosis. During this time, he began to paint. When he was well enough, he started working in the mining company Carbones de La Nueva,  where his father worked as a clerk.(rculos first solo exhibition occurred in 1957 in Felguera.( In the same year, he became a cartoonist, drawing gangster comics illustrations in Oviedo.  The following year, he received a grant from the Langreo City Council to study at MadridsCrculo de Bellas Artes and at the Escuela Nacional de Artes Grficas. Here, his spiky realism was characterized by lots of clenched fists and Guernica-style Picassoism. His drawings of factories have been described as social painting or social expressionism.( rculos early black and white drawings were influenced by Goya.( In 1958, he went to Paris and studied at the Acadmie de la Grande Chaumiere.CareerReturning in 1959 to Oviedo, he opened a studio with the artist Zuco with whom he made the mosaic tile for ALSA. Military service took rculo to Tenerife in 1960 where he became acquainted with the surrealist artist Westerdahl.  Here he painted the only abstract work of his career. In 1962, he returned to Paris and painted in the style of figurative expressionism.  Four years later, he went to Ibiza. In 1967, in Stockholm, he first encountered the American pop art of Warhol, Lichtenstein, and Rauschenberg which he described as un flechazo (love at first sight). He drew inspiration from this by incorporating vibrant color into his pieces. In the 1970s, while traveling to Portugal, Morocco and Ibiza, rculo began his many works featuring the female nude.  Referred to as rculos Period Erotica,( he emphasied el culo (the backside).  Culis monumentalibus (2001), a provocative and massive sculpture measuring  in height, is located in Oviedos square, and caused great controversy when it was installed.((rculos first bronze sculpture was created in 1984, and others soon followed, such as Homenaje a Santiago Roldn (Tribute to James Roldan,  1993, Barcelonas Olympic Village), El regreso de Williams B. Arrensberg (The return of Williams B. Arrensberg, 1993, Oviedo), and Exaltacin de la manzana (Exaltation of the apple, 1996, Villaviciosa). However, his best-known bronze sculpture is El Viajero (The Traveller, 1992). Depicting bags, cases, a coat, hat and an umbrella, it is located in Atocha railway station, giving an opportunity for passengers to stand or sit on the sculpture. Returning to Cubism, he painted lifes of bottles, cases, and fruit in the manner of Gris.In his later years, he painted geishas using eastern iconography, both as romantic escapism and as a sexual icon. He participated in the First Biennial of Art in the City of Oviedo and, in 1986, was honored at the Painting Contest of Luarca. His last individual exhibitions were held at the Fundacin Marcelino Botin of Santander and in the gallery Teresa Square, in Valladolid (2000). In addition to Spain, his works were displayed at expositions, collections and biennials in Germany, France, Cuba, Iran, and the United States.Personal lifeThe marriage to his first wife, Annie Chanvallon, was dissolved. He married secondly Victoria Hidalgo. He had one son, Yoann.(rculo died of a attack in 2003 at the Madrid home of Salvador Dal, and was buried at the Iglesia de San Juan el Real in Oviedo.()Honorsimage:Pinacoteca.jpg|thumb|right|Eduardo rculo in La Felguera.thumb|right|El regreso de Williams B. Arrensberg (The return of Williams B. Arrensberg). Oviedo.* rculo was to have received Spains highest artistic honor, the Gold Medal in Fine Arts, in the summer of 2003.()* The Eduardo rculo, an center and municipal art gallery, is located in La Felguera.* Plaza Eduardo rculo, located in Oviedo, opened June 2003.  It was designed by the architect Cesar Fernandez Cuevas.()Displayed worksHis works are on display at:* Biblioteca Nacional, Madrid* Bullfighting Museum, Madrid* City of Oviedo* Coleccion de Arte Contemporaneo de AENA, Madrid* Drawing Museum Castillo de Larre Huesca* Galieria Nazionale dArte Moderna, Rome* International Museum of Contemporary Art in Lanzarote* International Museum of the Resistance Salvador Allende, Chile* Museo de Bellas Artes de Asturias, Oviedo* Museo Municipal, Madrid* Museo Nacional Centro de Arte Reina Sofia, Madrid* Museum of Contemporary Art ACA, Tenerife* Museum of Contemporary Art in Villafames, Castellon* Museum of Contemporary Art in Bogota, Colombia* Museum of Contemporary Spanish Engravings, Marbella* National Museum of Bangladesh, Dhaka* Sculpture Museum, Alcala de Henares, MadridReferencesrculorculoUrkulo
24932989
Data_Analysis_Techniques_for_Fraud_Detection
Fraud is a million dollar business and it is increasing every year. The PwC global economic crime survey of 2009 suggests that close to 30% of companies worldwide reported fallen victim to fraud in the past year()Fraud involves one or more persons who intentionally act secretly to deprive another of something of value, for their own benefit. Fraud is as old as humanity itself and can take an unlimited variety of different forms. However, in recent years, the development of new technologies has also provided further ways in which criminals may commit fraud (Bolton and Hand 2002). In addition to that, business reengineering, reorganization or downsizing may weaken or eliminate control, while new information systems may present additional opportunities to commit fraud.Detecting FraudTraditional ways of data analysis have been in use since long time as a method of detecting fraud. They require complex and time-consuming investigations that deal with different domains of knowledge like financial, economics, business practices and law. Fraud often consists of many instances or incidents involving repeated transgressions using the same method. Fraud instances can be similar in content and appearance but usually are not identical (Palshikar 2002).The first industries to use data analysis techniques to prevent fraud were the telephony companies, the insurance companies and the banks (Decker 1998). One early example of successful implementation of data analysis techniques in the banking industry is the Falcon fraud assessment system, which is based on a neural network shell (Brachman et al. 1996).Retail industries also suffer from fraud at POS. Some supermarkets have started to make use of digitized closed-circuit television (CCTV) together with POS data of most susceptible transactions to fraud (Weir 2001).Internet transactions have recently raised big concerns. Kerr (2002) shown that internet transaction fraud is 12 times higher than in-store fraud.Fraud that involves cell phones, insurance claims, tax return claims, credit card transactions etc represent significant problems for governments and businesses, but yet detecting and preventing fraud is not a simple task. Fraud is an adaptive crime, so it needs special methods of intelligent data analysis to detect and prevent it. These methods exists in the areas of Knowledge Discovery in Databases (KDD), Data Mining, Machine Learning and Statistics. They offer applicable and successful solutions in different areas of fraud crimes.Techniques used for fraud detection fall into two primary classes: statistical techniques and artificial intelligence (Palshikar 2002). Examples of statistical data analysis techniques are:*Data preprocessing techniques for detection, validation, error correction, and filling up of missing or incorrect data.*Calculation of various statistical parameters such as averages, quantiles, performance metrics, probability distributions, and so on. For example, the averages may include average length of call, average number of calls per month and average delays in bill payment.*Models and probability distributions of various business activities either in terms of various parameters or probability distributions.*Computing user profiles.*Time-series analysis of time-dependent data.*Clustering and classification to find patterns and associations among groups of data.*Matching algorithms to detect anomalies in the behavior of transactions or users as compared to previously known models and profiles. Techniques are also needed to eliminate false alarms, estimate risks, and predict future of current transactions or users.Some forensic accountants (accountant) specialize in forensic analytics which is the procurement and analysis of electronic data to reconstruct, detect, or otherwise support a claim of financial fraud.  The main steps in forensic analytics are (a) data collection, (b) data preparation, (c) data analysis, and (d) reporting.  For example, forensic analytics may be used to review an employees card activity to assess whether any of the purchases were diverted or divertible for personal use.  Forensic analytics might be used to review the invoicing activity for a vendor to identify fictitious vendors, and these techniques might also be used by a franchisor to detect fraudulent or erroneous sales reports by the franchisee in a franchising environment().Fraud management is a knowledge-intensive activity. The main AI techniques used for fraud management include:*Data mining to classify, cluster, and segment the data and automatically find associations and rules in the data that may signify interesting patterns, including those related to fraud.*Expert systems to encode expertise for detecting fraud in the form of rules.*Pattern recognition to detect approximate classes, clusters, or patterns of suspicious behavior either automatically (unsupervised) or to match given inputs.*Machine learning techniques to automatically identify characteristics of fraud.*Neural networks that can learn suspicious patterns from samples and used later to detect them.Other techniques such as link analysis, Bayesian networks, decision theory, land sequence matching are also used for fraud detection (Palshikar 2002).Machine Learning and Data MiningEarly data analysis techniques were oriented toward extracting quantitative and statistical data characteristics. These techniques facilitate useful data interpretations and can help to get better insights into the processes behind the data. Although the traditional data analysis techniques can indirectly lead us to knowledge, it is still created by human analysts (Michalski et al. 1998).To go beyond, a data analysis system has to be equipped with a substantial amount of background knowledge, and be able to perform reasoning tasks involving that knowledge and the data provided (Michalski et al. 1998). In effort to meet this goal, researchers have turned to ideas from the machine learning field. This is a natural source of ideas, since the machine learning task can be described as turning background knowledge and examples (input) into knowledge (output).If data mining results in discovering meaningful patterns, data turns into information. Information or patterns that are novel, valid and potentially useful are not merely information, but knowledge. One speaks of discovering knowledge, before hidden in the huge amount of data, but now revealed.Supervised and Unsupervised LearningThe machine learning and artificial intelligence solutions may be classified into two categories: supervised and unsupervised learning. In supervised learning, samples of both fraudulent and non-fraudulent records are used. This means that all the records available are labelled as fraudulent or non-fraudulent. After building a model using these training data, new cases can be classified as fraudulent or legal (Jans et al.).Furthermore, this method is only able to detect frauds of a type which has previously occurred. In contrast, unsupervised methods dont make use of labelled records. These methods seek for accounts, customers, suppliers, etc. that behave unusual in order to output suspicion scores, rules or visual anomalies, depending on the method (Bolton and Hand 2002).Whether supervised or unsupervised methods are used, note that the output gives us only an indication of fraud likelihood. No stand alone statistical analysis can assure that a particular object is a fraudulent one. It can only indicate that this object is more likely to be fraudulent than other objects (Jans et al.).Some Research Contributions Supervised Methods The field of neural networks has been extensively explored as a supervised method. Jans et al. mention the studies of Barson, Field, Davey, McAskie, and Frank (Barson et al.) and Green and Choi (1997) all use neural network technology for detecting respectively fraud in mobile phone networks (Barson et al.) and financial statement fraud. Lin et al. (2003)  apply a fuzzy neural net, also in the domain of fraudulent financial reporting. Both Brause et al. (1999) and Estevez et al. (2006) use a combination of neural nets and rules.Bayesian learning neural network is implemented for credit card fraud detection by Maes et al. (2002) for telecommunications fraud by Ezawa and Norton (1996) and for auto claim fraud detection by Viaene et al. (2005). In the same field as Viaene et al. (2005), insurance fraud, Major and Riedinger (2002) presented a tool for the detection of medical insurance fraud. They proposed a hybrid knowledge/statistical-based system, where expert knowledge is integrated with statistical power.Another example of combining different techniques can be found in Fawcett and Provost (1997). A series of data mining techniques for the purpose of detecting cellular clone fraud is used. Specifically, a rule-learning program to uncover indicators of fraudulent behaviour from a large database of customer transactions is implemented.Fawcett and Provost (1999) the Activity Monitoring is introduced as a separate problem class within data mining with a unique framework.Stolfo et al. and Lee et al. delivered some interesting work on intrusion detection. They provided a framework, MADAM ID, for Mining Audit Data for Automated  models for Intrusion Detection. Next to this, the results of the JAM project are discussed.Cahill et al. (2000) design a fraud signature, based on data of fraudulent calls, to detect telecommunications fraud. For scoring a call for fraud its probability under the account signature is compared to its probability under a fraud signature. The fraud signature is updated sequentially, enabling event-driven fraud detection.Link analysis comprehends a different approach. It relates known fraudsters to other individuals, using record linkage and social network methods (Wasserman and Faust 1998). Cortes et al. (2002) proposed a solution to fraud detection in this field (Phua, 2005).Unsupervised MethodsSome important studies with unsupervised learning with respect to fraud detection should be mentioned. For example, Bolton and Hand use Peer Group Analysis and Break Point Analysis applied on spending bevaviour in credit card accounts. Peer Group Analysis detects individual objects that begin to behave in a way different from objects to which they had previously been similar. Another tool Bolton and Hand develop for behavioural fraud detection is Break Point Analysis. Unlike Peer Group Analysis, Break Point Analysis operates on the account level. A break point is an observation where anomalous behaviour for a particular account is detected. Both the tools are applied on spending behaviour in credit card accounts.Also Murad and Pinkas (1999) focus on behavioural changes for the purpose of fraud detection and present three-level-profiling. As the Break Point Analysis from Bolton and Hand, the three-level-profiling method operates at the account level and it points any significant deviation from an accounts normal behaviour as a potential fraud. In order to do this, normal profiles are created based on data without fraudulent records (semi supervised). To test the method, the three-level-profiling is applied in the area of telecommunication fraud. In the same field, also Burge and Shawe-Taylor (2001) use behaviour profiling for the purpose of fraud detection. However, using a recurrent neural network for prototyping calling behaviour, unsupervised learning is applied.Cox et al. (1997) combines human pattern recognition skills with automated data algorithms. In their work, information is presented visually by domain-specific interfaces, combining human pattern recognition skills with automated data algorythms (Jans et al.).See also* Fraud* practices* mining* networks* intelligence* Patterns* Clustering* Statistics* Labelling* Decision trees* analysisReferencesBolton, R. & Hand, D. (2002). Statistical Fraud Detection: A Review (With Discussion). Statistical Science 17(3): 235-255.Bolton, R. & Hand, D. (2001). Unsupervised Profiling Methods for Fraud Detection. Credit Scoring and Credit Control VII.Behaviour Mining for Fraud Detection Xu, Jianyun, Sung, Andrew H,  Liu, Qingzhong, Journal of Research and Practice in Information Technology. Vol. 39, no. 1, pp. 318. Feb. 2007Burge, P. & Shawe-Taylor, J. (2001). An Unsupervised Neural, Network Approach to Profiling the Behaviour of Mobile Phone, Users for Use in Fraud Detection. Journal of Parallel and Distributed Computing 61: 915-925.Chan, P., Fan, W., Prodromidis, A. & Stolfo, S. (1999). Distributed Data Mining in Credit Card Fraud Detection. IEEE, Intelligent Systems 14: 67-74.Cortes, C. & Pregibon, D. (2001). Signature-Based Methods for Data Streams. Data Mining and Knowledge Discovery 5: 167-182.Cox, K., Eick, S. & Wills, G. (1997). Visual Data Mining: Recognising Telephone Calling Fraud. Data Mining and Knowledge Discovery 1: 225-231.Cox, E. (1995). A Fuzzy System for Detecting Anomalous Behaviors in Healthcare Provider Claims. In Goonatilake, S. & Treleaven, P. (eds.) Intelligent Systems for Finance and Business, 111-134. John Wiley and Sons Ltd.Estevez, P., C. Held, and C. Perez (2006). Subscription fraud prevention in telecommunications using fuzzy rules and neural networks. Expert Systems with Applications 31, 337-344.Fan, W., Miller, M., Stolfo, S., Lee, W. & Chan, P. (2001). Using Artificial Anomalies to Detect Unknown and Known Network Intrusions. Proc. of ICDM01, 123-248.Fawcett, T. (1997). AI Approaches to Fraud Detection and Risk Management: Papers from the 1997 AAAI Workshop. Technical Report WS-97-07. AAAI Press.Fawcett, T. & Provost, F. (1999). Activity monitoring: Noticing Interesting Changes in Behavior. Proc. of SIGKDD99, 53-62.G.K. Palshikar, The Hidden Truth - Frauds and Their Control: A Critical Application for Business Intelligence, Intelligent Enterprise, vol. 5, no. 9, 28-May-2002, pp. 4651.Green, B. & Choi, J. (1997). Assessing the Risk of Management Fraud through Neural Network Technology. Auditing 16(1): 14-28.Michalski, R. S., I. Bratko, and M. Kubat (1998). Machine Learning and Data Mining - Methods and Applications. John Wiley & Sons Ltd.Murad, U. & Pinkas, G. (1999). Unsupervised Profiling for Identifying Superimposed Fraud. Proc. of PKDD99.Phua, C., Lee, V., Smith-Miles, K. and Gayler, R. (2005). A Comprehensive Survey of Data Mining-based Fraud Detection Research. Clayton School of Information Technology, Monash University.Rosset, S., Murad, U., Neumann, E., Idan, Y. & Pinkas, G. (1999). Discovery of Fraud Rules for Telecommunications - Challenges and Solutions. Proc. of SIGKDD99, 409-413.PricewaterhouseCoopers Global economic crime survey 2007 finds athttp://www.pwc.com/crimesurveyMarane, A., (2011) Utilizing Visual Analysis for Fraud Detection, Understanding Link Analysis, http://linkanalysisnow.com/2011/09/leveraging-visual-analytics-for.html
24950679
Hanskhnenburg
The Hanskhnenburg is a hut () in the mountains. It is located at a height of  above sea level in fields known as Auf dem Acker, or simply Acker, in the middle of the National Park and has its own observation tower. Its name comes from the legendary Hanskhnenburg Crag (Hanskhnenburg Klippe) 300 metres to the northwest, which was visited on 14 August 1784 by Wolfgang von Goethe. Opposite the tower are the Hanskhnenburg Rocks (Hanskhnenburg Felsen) that are relatively small by comparison with the Klippe. A bronze plaque was mounted on these rocks in 1999 to commemorate Goethes visit. In front of the Hanskhnenburg Rocks a monument was erected in 1924 to Leo Schlageter. It has since fallen over and is rather weathered. History At the end of the 19th century the Osterode branch of the Club built the first wooden tower and a managed refuge hut on the thickly wooded Acker crest; the hut being opened in 1889. The tower proved unable to cope with the weather conditions and, by 1912, had become so damaged that it had to be torn down. One year later the Hanover branch began the construction of a stone tower on the same spot; it was completed in 1914.The World War brought tourism to a standstill and the hut which was being managed as an inn, was closed, not least because it was a long way from any other settlements. In 1922 the guest house opened again until the World War broke out. In 1947, the hut, which had meanwhile become quite dilapidated, re-opened, but had to be closed again in 1957 when the hut and tower were placed out of bounds by the police due to their condition. In 1958 it had been refurbished sufficiently to enable the ban to be lifted again. but the fundamental overhaul that was really required was not carried out. In 1971 the damage to the Hanskhnenburg was once again so serious, that the structure was closed again. After emergency repairs the tower and hut re-opened in 1972.The Harz Club did not have the necessary means to restore the structure and transferred ownership in 1974 to the district of Osterode, which took on the conversion and upgrade of the Hanskhnenburg. In 1975 this was completed at a cost of  500,000 DM and the operation of the hut started up again. In 1976 a  long skiing trail, the Ackerloipe, was completed and, as a result, the Hanskhnenburg became a popular stop for langlauf skiers.Since the 1960s the forest on the Acker crest has steadily retreated. At one time the hut was hidden in thick forest, today it is visible from a long way off. The tower offers a good all-round view over the mountains of the Harz. It is also the only spot from where the two former centres of the Harz mining industry, Clausthal and Andreasberg, can be seen at the same time. Walking trails The Hanskhnenburg may be reached from all directions on numerous walking trails. There are longer walks from Osterode via the town forest (Stadtwald) and crest path (Kammweg) or along the Sse Reservoir. From Herzberg a path climbs from Lonau through the valleys of the Groer Lonau (metalled road) and the Sieber. The height difference is markedly less on the route from Riefensbeek-Kamschlacken to the hut. The easiest way to get to the hut, however, is from Stieglitzecke on the Harz High Road. Here there is a large car park and a bus stop. From the Stieglitzecke there are two routes to the Hanskhnenburg. The path on the eastern side is a wide walking track with only one steep section shortly before the hut. Considerably better views, especially in the morning, are offered by the path on the west side of the Acker. This path is however very hard going and rather boggy because the rain gutters have not been replaced for some time.The tower is only accessible when the restaurant is open.The Hahnskhnenburg is included in the system of checkpoints within the Wandernadel, a popular network of walking trails. External links * Short description of the hut and the legends about the cragde:Hanskhnenburg
24975414
Duisburg_Inner_Harbour
thumb|upright1.7|Duisburg Inner Harbor around 1900thumb|upright1.7|Warehouses of the K&uuml;ppersm&uuml;hle and Werhahnm&uuml;hlethumb|upright1.7|Museum K&uuml;ppersm&uuml;hle in the Inner HarborImage:Drachenbootregatta.jpg|thumb|upright1.7|Boat-Regatta during the  Inner Harbor Festival 2005thumb|upright1.7|Plan of the DevelopmentThe  Innenhafen (Inner Harbor) in Duisburg, encompassing an area of  89ha., was for over a hundred years, during the high point of the Revolution,  the central harbor and trading point of the town. Since the mid-60s, the importance of the harbour declined  and it lay in a disused condition for 20 years, before plans for renovation were drawn up. This former industrial area been fundamentally transformed, a process which started as a part of the  International Building Exhibition Emscher Park (IBA) which ran from 1989 until 1999.The basis for this model of development in the  Ruhr district was delivered in  1994 by the British architect Norman Foster. Since then, the Inner Harbor has transformed itself into a district combining employment, housing, culture and water-based leisure activities. Today, the Inner Harbour is both an  industrial monument and a main point on the  der Industriekultur. History Where today you observe the Inner Harbor, flowed many centuries ago the Rhine. Up until the 5th century, it formed in this locality the boundary with the Roman Empire.During the Middle Ages, situated on the present-day location of the Rathaus, there was a Frankish regal court positioned directly on the banks of the Rhine. On the same spot were to be found the old Duisburg town church, the Salvatorkirche, the market hall and the city walls.Sometime around the year 1000  according to recent research  the Rhine shifted its course westwards. Duisburg found itself  no longer lying directly on the Rhine; however,  for about another 400 years it did remain connected to the river by a navigable dead arm of the Rhine. Subsequently, this previously important trading town declined into an small agricultural settlement. It was only in the 19th century that an initiative to resurrect the connection to the Rhine proved successful. Initially, the Outer Harbor was dug from the Rhine in the west as far as the contemporary Marientor Bridge, to which an eastern extension was later built, the Inner Harbor. Early on, the timber industry established itself on the harbor,  mining.interest being a major customer for their products  Then, as modern production methods were able to reduce their space requirements, grain mills established themselves in several locations, along with their warehouses for storage. They conferred on the Inner Harbor the nickname bread basket of the Ruhr district, supplying the rapidly growing population in the district.After the decline of the grain mills in the 1960s, the Inner Harbor lost its economic significance and was characterized primarily by warehousing.  Nevertheless, the district still continued to block off access to the water from the city itself. The first steps in giving the inner harbour a new face were taken at the end of the 80s with the opening up of  city walls and the construction of a new living quarter on Corputiusplatz.Within the framework of the IBA Emscher Park, which renovated the industrial areas of the Ruhr in an exemplary fashion, a design for the  transformation of the entire Inner Harbour was launched. The water was to be re-incorporated into the city, it was to be made freely accessible and produce an enhanced quality of living  and attract investors. Space for employment  especially in the service sector  for living, culture and leisure were to be integrated into the overall plan. In this sense, the industrial and historic symbols of the harbor were to be quite consciously retained. The Inner Harbor today Highlights of the newly-renovated quarter of the Inner Harbor are the  K&uuml;ppersm&uuml;hle converted to an arts museum by & de Meuron, the Werhahnmhle, which following the departure of the Childrens Museum  ATLANTIS  is being used as a  Legoland Discovery Center,  the Cultural- and City History Museum,  the Garden of Remembrance laid out by  Karavan  as well as the  Synagoge of the  Jewish District of Duisburg-M&uuml;lheim/Ruhr-Oberhausen, designed by the architect Hecker.Additionally, on the far side of the Garden a  marina has been built complete with  a Buckelbr&uuml;cke (Buckle bridge - for pedestrians). It is intended to extend the marina into the adjacent Holzhafen.A lively dining-scene has also developed. In addition to more than 15 restaurants und clubs, there are also owner-run bars and franchises. Progression of Developments  After a previous project had run into problems revolving around the awarding of the contract,   2008 should see an investor beginning the construction of  Eurogate, a semi-elliptical multi-functional building with up to 10 floors and a floor area of  about 35.000 m2. The design for this building, by Foster, follows the curvature of the Holzhafen. Works for reclamation of land on the bank hit the news when a crane overturned and burnt-out.For the western part of the Inner Harbor, which borders directly onto the Altstadt, Foster has come up with a new plan, under contract from the City Council, which foresees a transformation similar to that which has been carried out in the eastern section  and which is itself still ongoing: A further area for new building lies at the extreme Eastern end, near to the Kppersmhle, which itself has plans for extension, following the need for more space due to the fusion of the Grothe und Strher collections. At the back of the office building on the Northern bank, a park is envisaged. In order to coordinate the ideas of the planners with respect to both the Inner Harbor and the City Center, the area of responsibility of the Innenhafen-Entwicklungsgesellschaft (Inner Harbor Development Society) now also includes the  management of the renovation of the entire city center.As from 2010 the  Land Archive of  NRW will be based in the Upper Harbor. Up until now it has been based in Dsseldorf (Main Archive) and Brhl (Br&uuml;hl). In December 2007 the Austrian architects Ortner und Ortner received the commission for converting a listed storage building from the 30s. Views  Pictures  Image:Duisburg_Innenhafen_Garten_der_Erinnerung.jpg|Garden of Remembrance Image:Duisburg Jewish Community Center-Zvi Hecker.jpg|District Center of the  Jewish District Duisburg-Mlheim/Ruhr-Oberhausen, in the Garden of Remembrance Image:Duisburg stadtmaueramhafen.jpg|Section of the historic city walls. City walls adjacent to the Altstadtpark in the Inner Harbor Image:Duisburg - Schwanentorbr&uuml;cke 1.jpg|Schwanentorbr&uuml;cke: a moving bridge; to the left of it, the RWSG-warehouse, which will be extended and used for the Land Archive. Panorama File:Duisburg Innenhafen Ludwigturm.jpg|thumb|center|790px|View of the Marina (left hand) and the  Five Boats office complex, designed by the British architect  Grimshaw. On the right hand you can see the Holzhafen, which will be encircled by a projected hotel complex could Eurogate. The free space shown in the photograph to the left of  Grimshaws boat building does not actually exist any more (used for the Hitachi Power Office). External links * Information Anchor Point Duisburg Inner Harbour on the Industrial Heritage Trail in the Ruhr Area (englich)* Innenhafen Duisburg Portal (german)* Innenhafen Duisburg (german)* Fosters Plan for the inner city incl. inner harbor (german/english)DuisburgDuisburg
24983146
Institute_for_System_Programming
The Institute for System Programming (ISP) of the Academy of Sciences (RAS)  () was founded on January 25, 1994, on the base of the departments of System Programming and Numerical Software of the Institute for Cybernetics Problems of the RAS. ISP RAS belongs to the Division of Mathematical Sciences of the RAS.R and D groups; Compiler Technologies Department : The department is specialized in applying compiler approach to different computer science fields, as well as modern optimizing compiler development and design. The first compiler projects started in early 80s. The recent research activity of the team is concentrated on parallel programming and engineering.; Computing Systems Architecture Department : The main directions of the department research activities have been connected with effective implementation of network architectures and hardware platforms for local and global networks.; Information Systems Department : The main activities of the department: multi-user fully functional relational DBMS, CORBA-based technology for distributed information systems, XML-based technology for heterogeneous data integration, native database Sedna, text mining and retrieval.; Software Development Tools Department : The main direction is creation of tools supporting formal specification and languages and easing the development process.; Software Engineering Department : The spectrum of the scientific research of the department covers a broad range of Software Engineering, including analysis of programs and their models, verification and validation, standardization issues including development of open software standards, various aspects of development, maintenance and evolution of software together with methods of education and deployment of advanced technologies.; System Programming Department : Research activities of the department lie in the area of program static analysis, excavation of architecture using program code and visualization of software architecture model, modelling of architecture and code generation using software model.; Theoretical Computer Science Department : The members of the department are specialists in different branches of mathematics and theoretical computer science: combinatorics, complexity of computations, probabilistic methods, logic, formal methods of program analysis, logical programming, mathematical cryptography.Councils; Academic council : The main task of the council is coordination of research and scientific programs aimed on prioritization of new important directions.; Dissertation council : Being a part of the Institute Dissertation council D.002.087.01 considers applications for scientific degrees of candidate and doctor of physical and mathematical, and technical sciences according to qualification standard 05.13.11 Mathematical and program support for computers, their complexes, and networks.Centers;Verification Center of the Operating System Linux : The mission of the Center is to propagate the Linux platform by ensuring its high reliability and compatibility through the use of open standards and advanced testing and verification technologies.;Center of competence in parallel and distributed computing : The goal of the center is in significant increase of the usage of parallel and distributed computations in the areas of educational, research, and production activities of Russian organizations.External links* Institute for System Programming* Company Profile at Linux Foundation  
24990951
Great_Hippocampus_Question
The Great Hippocampus Question was a 19th century scientific controversy about the anatomy of apes and human uniqueness. The dispute between Henry Huxley and Owen became central to the scientific debate on evolution that followed Darwins publication of the Origin of Species. The name comes from the title of a satire the Reverend Kingsley wrote about the arguments, which in modified form appeared as the great hippopotamus test in Kingsleys book for children, Water-Babies, A Fairy Tale for a Land Baby. Together with other humorous skits on the topic, this helped to spread and popularise Darwins ideas on evolution.File:Hippocampus.gif|thumb|right|alta transparent skull shows the two curved tubes of the hippocampus|Animation showing the location of the hippocampus on either side in the lower central area of the brain.BackgroundIn 1836 Darwin returned from the Beagle voyage with fossil collections which the anatomist Owen described, contributing to the of Darwins theory of selection. Darwin outlined his theory in an Essay of 1844, and discussed transmutation with his friend Dalton Hooker. He did not tell Owen, who as the up-and-coming English Cuvier held the conventional belief that every species was uniquely created perfectly adapted. Owens brilliance and political skills made him a leading figure in the scientific establishment, developing ideas of divine archetypes produced by vague secondary laws similar to a form of evolution, while emphasising the differences separating man from ape.()() At the end of 1844 of the Natural History of Creation brought wide public interest in of species and the idea that humans were descended from apes, and after a slow initial response, strong condemnation from the scientific establishment.(Darwin discussed his interest in transmutation with friends including Lyell, and Hooker eventually read Darwins Essay in 1847. When Henry Huxley savagely reviewed the latest edition of Vestiges in 1854, Darwin wrote to him, making friends while cautiously admitting to being almost as unorthodox about species.() Huxley had become increasingly irritated by Owens condescension and manipulation, and having gained a teaching position at the school of mining, began openly attacking Owens work.()Hippocampus minorIn 1564 a prominent feature on the floor of the ventricles of the brain was named the hippocampus by Aranzi as its curved shape on each side supposedly reminded him of a seahorse, the Hippocampus (apart from a spell after Mayer mistakenly used the term hippopotamus in 1779, and was followed by others until 1829). At that same time a ridge on the occipital horn was named the avis, but in 1786 this was renamed the hippocampus minor, with the hippocampus being called the hippocampus major.()cut away and labelled to show its internal parts|The hippocampus minor is a small fold on the occipital horn towards the back of the brain (to the right) to the rear of the hippocampus major which forms a curved ridge on each side of the lower central area.Owen presented several papers on the anatomical differences between apes and humans, arguing that they had been created separately and stressing the impossibility of apes being transmuted into men.() In 1857 he went even further, presenting an authoritative paper to the Society of London on his anatomical studies of primate brains and asserting that humans were not merely a distinct biological order of primates, as had been accepted by great anatomists such as Linnaeus and Cuvier, but a separate sub-class of mammalia, distinct from all the other primates and mammals generally. Owen supported his argument with a figure by himself of a South American monkey, a figure of a negros brain by Tiedemann, and of a chimpanzees brain by Schroeder van der Kolk and Vrolik.() While Owen conceded the all-pervading similitude of structureevery tooth, every bone, strictly homologous which made it difficult for anatomists to determine the difference between man and ape, he based his new classification on three characteristics which to him distinguished mankinds highest form of brain, the most important being his claim that only the brain has a hippocampus minor. To Owen in 1857, this feature together with the extent to which the posterior lobe projected beyond the cerebellum and the presence of the posterior horn were how man fulfills his destiny as the supreme master of this earth and of the lower creation.() Darwin commented, Owens is a grand Paper; but I cannot swallow Man making a division as distinct from a Chimpanzee, as an ornithorhynchus from a Horse: I wonder what a Chimpanzee wd. say to this?.() Owen repeated the paper as the Lecture at the of Cambridge on 10 May 1859 when he was the first to be given an honorary degree by the university.(()To Henry Huxley the claim about the hippocampus minor appeared to be a significant blunder by Owen, and Huxley began systematically dissecting the brains of monkeys, determined that before I have done with that mendacious humbug I will nail him out, like a kite to a barn door, an example to all evil doers. He did not discuss this in public at this stage,()() but continued to attack Owens other ideas, aiming to undermine Owens status. At his 17 June 1858 Institution Lecture On the Theory of the Vertebrate Skull, Huxley directly challenged Owens central idea of archetypes shown by homology, with Owen in the audience. Huxleys aim was to overcome the domination of science by wealthy clergymen led by Owen, in order to create a professional salaried scientific civil service and make science secular. Under Darwins influence he took up transmutation as a way of dividing science from theology, and in January 1859 argued that it is as respectable to be modified monkey as modified dirt.()()Owen and Huxley debate human and ape brain structureHuxley was among the friends rallying round the publication of Darwins the Origin of Species, and was sharpening his beak and claws to disembowel the curs who will bark and yelp.()() Kingsley was sent a review copy, and told Darwin that he had long since, from watching the crossing of domesticated animals and plants, learnt to disbelieve the dogma of the permanence of species.() Darwin was delighted that this celebrated author and divine had gradually learnt to see that it is just as noble a conception of the Deity to believe that He created a few original forms capable of self-development into other and needful forms, as to believe that He required a fresh act of creation to supply the voids caused by the action of His laws.() While reviews were by custom anonymous, their authors were usually known. Huxleys reviews of On the Origin of Species irritated Owen, whose own anonymous review in April praised himself and his own axiom of the continuous operation of the ordained becoming of living things, took offence at the way the creationist position had been depicted, and complained that his own pre-eminence had been ignored.() Owen bitterly attacked Huxley, Hooker and Darwin, but also signalled acceptance of a kind of evolution as a teleological plan in a continuous ordained becoming, with new species appearing by natural birth.() The dispute between Huxley and Owen over human uniqueness began in public at the Oxford evolution debate, during a meeting of the British Association for the Advancement of Science in Oxford on Thursday 28 June 1860. After Daubenys paper On the Final Causes of the Sexuality of Plants with Particular Reference to Mr. Darwins Work, the chairman asked Huxley for comments, but he declined as he thought the public venue inappropriate. Owen then spoke of facts which would enable the public to come to some conclusions ... of the truth of Mr. Darwins theory, reportedly arguing that the brain of the gorilla was more different from that of man than from that of the lowest primate particularly because only man had a posterior lobe, a posterior horn, and a hippocampus minor. In response, Huxley flatly but politely denied altogether that the difference between the brain of the gorilla and man was so great in a direct and unqualified contradiction of Owen, citing previous studies as well as promising to provide detailed support for his position.(()() Anguish over the death of his son of fever in September 1860 pushed Huxley to the brink, from which Kingsley rescued him by a series of letters. Huxley put his fury over the death into composing a paper which violently assaulted Owens ideas and professional reputation. It was published in January 1861 in the first issue of Huxleys relaunched History Review magazine, and presented citations, quotations and letters from leading anatomists to attack Owens three claims, aiming to prove him guilty of wilful and deliberate falsehood by citing Owen himself, and (with less clear cut justification) the anatomists whose illustrations Owen had used in the 1857 paper. While readily agreeing that the human brain differed from that of apes in size, proportions and complexity of convolutions, Huxley played the significance of these features down, and argued that to a lesser extent these also differed between the highest and lowest human races.(() Darwin congratulated Huxley on this smasher against the canting humbug Owen.() From February to May Huxley delivered a very popular series of sixpenny lectures for working men at the School of Mines where he taught, on The Relation of Man to the Rest of the Animal Kingdom. He told his wife that My working men stick by me wonderfully, the house being fuller than ever last night. By next Friday evening they will all be convinced that they are monkeys.(()Gorillas became the topic of the day with the return of the explorer du Chaillu. Owen arranged for him to speak and display his collections on stage at a spectacular Geographical Society meeting on 25 February, and followed this by giving a lecture at the Institution on 19 March on the brains of The Gorilla and the Negro, asserting that the dispute was one of interpretation rather than fact,() and hedging his previous claim by stating that humans alone had a hippocampus minor as defined in human anatomy. This lecture was published in the Atnenum on 23 March with unlabelled and inaccurate illustrations, and Huxleys response in the next issue a week later, Man and the Apes, ridiculed Owens use of these illustrations and failure to mention the findings of anatomists that the three structures were present in animals. In the following weeks issue Owens letter blamed the Artist for the illustrations, but claimed that the argument was correct and referred the reader to his 1858 paper.(()() In the Atnenum of 13 April Huxley responded to this repetition of the claim by writing that Life is too short to occupy oneself with the slaying of the slain more than once.()Each Saturday, Darwin read the latest ripostes in the Atnenum. Owen tried to smear Huxley by portraying him as an advocate of mans origins from a transmuted ape, and one of his contributions was titled Ape-Origin of Man as Tested by the Brain. This backfired, as Huxley had already delighted Darwin by speculating on pithecoid man (ape-like man), and was glad of the invitation to publicly turn the anatomy of brain structure into a question of human ancestry. Darwin egged him on from Down, writing Oh Lord what a thorn you must be in the poor dear mans side.(() Huxley told Darwins friend Dalton Hooker, Owen occupied an entirely untenable position ... The fact is he made a prodigious blunder in commencing the attack, and now his only chance is to be silent and let people forget the exposure. I do not believe that in the whole history of science there is a case of any man of reputation getting himself into such a contemptible position. He will be the laughing-stock of all the continental anatomists.((Public interest and satireThis very public slanging match attracted wide attention, and humorists were quick to take up the opportunity for satire. Punch featured the issue several times that year, notably on 18 May 1861 when a cartoon under the heading Monkeyana showed a standing gorilla with a sign parodying Josiah Wedgwoods anti-slavery slogan Am I Not A Man And A Brother?. This was accompanied by a satirical poem by Gorilla at the zoo asking to be told if he was A man in apes shape, An anthropoid ape, Or monkey deprived of his tail?, and noting:()(It then recounts Huxleys ripostes, and: Gorilla (Sir Philip Egerton), Monkeyana.() The poem was actually by the eminent palaeontologist Sir Philip Egerton who, as a trustee of the Royal College of Surgeons and the Museum, acted as Owens patron. When a delighted Huxley found out who the author of the piece was, he thought it speaks volumes for Owens perfect success in damning himself.(In the second issue of Huxleys Natural History Review, an article by Rolleston on the orangutan brain showed the features that Owen claimed apes lacked, and when Owen responded in a letter to the Annals and Magazine of Natural History that the issue was a matter of definition rather than fact, Huxley made a public dissection of a monkey that had died at the zoo, to support his case. In the following issue John Marshall provided detailed measurements making the same point about the chimpanzee, as well as explaining how a chimpanzees brain could be distorted by not being properly preserved and removed from the skull, so that it would look like the one in Owens illustration.((The Great Hippocampus QuestionThe debate continued in 1862. A detailed paper by Henry Flower in the prestigious journal, the Transactions of the Royal Society, reviewed the earlier literature and presented his own studies based on having dissected sixteen species of primates, including prosimians, monkeys and an orangutan. Having stated at the outset that he had no opinion on transmutation or the origin of humans, he refuted Owens three claims, and went further, stating that in relation to the mass of the brain, the hippocampus minor was proportionately largest in the marmoset, and proportionately smallest in mankind. The paper used terms recently coined by Huxley, and Flower was one of his close colleagues. Huxley presented more evidence against Owen in his History Review. The Dutch anatomists Schroeder van der Kolk and Vrolik found that Owen had repeatedly used their 1849 illustration of a chimpanzees brain to support his arguments, and to prevent the public from being misled they dissected the brain of an orangutan that had died in the Amsterdam zoo, reporting at a meeting of the Netherlands Academy of Arts and Sciences that the three features Owen claimed were unique to humans were present in this ape. They admitted that their earlier illustration was incorrect due to the way they had removed the brain for inspection, and suggested that Owen had become lost and fell into a trap in debating against Darwin. Huxley reprinted the report, in French, in his Review. His confrontations with Owen went on.()File:Lord Dundreary.jpg|thumb|right|altHead and shoulders portrait of a foppish Victorian gentleman wearing a monocle, with longish hair parted in the middle and curly at each side, exaggerated long bushy sideburns and a handlebar moustache. He wears a jacket with very wide lapels, an upright collar and wide tie tucked into his double breasted waistcoat.|Dundreary, as featured in the play American Cousin noted for its association with the Lincoln assassination in 1865.At the 1862 British Association meeting in Cambridge that year, Owen presented two papers opposing Darwin: one claimed that the adaptations of the Aye-aye disproved evolution, and the second paper reiterated Owens claims about human brains being unique, as well as discussing the question of whether apes have toes or thumbs. Huxley said Owen appeared to be lying & shuffling, and Huxleys allies presented successive attacks on Owen. This was the first British Association annual meeting attended by Kingsley, and during the meeting he produced a privately printed satirical skit on the argument, a little squib for circulation among his friends written in the style of the then popular stage character Dundreary, a good natured but brainless aristocrat known for huge bushy sideburns and for mangling proverbs or sayings in Dundrearyisms. The skit was titled Speech of Lord Dundreary in Section D, on Friday Last, On the Great Hippocampus Question.() Charles Kingsley, Speech of Lord Dundreary in Section D, on Friday Last, On the Great Hippocampus Question.()The British Medical Journal asked, Is it not high time that the annual passage of barbed words between Professor Owen and Professor Huxley, on the cerebral distinction between men and monkeys, should cease? ... Continued on its present footing, it becomes a hindrance and an injury to science, a joke for the populace, and a scandal to the scientific world. The London Review took up the joke, describing the confrontation of Owen with Huxley and his supporters Rolleston and Flower dramatically: Animation increased, decorous reticence was at an end, and all parties enjoyed the scene except the disputants. Surely apes were never before so honoured, as to be the theme of the warmest discussion in one of the two principal university towns in England. Strange sight was this, that three or four most accomplished anatomists were contending against each other like so many gorillas, and either reducing man to a monkey, or elevating the monkey to the man!() In October the Times and Gazette reported Owens presentation with full detail of the responses by Huxley, Rolleston and Flower, as well as Owens rebuttal. The dispute continued in the next two issues of the magazine.(The great hippopotamus testImage:Water-babies 2.jpg|thumb|300px|altThe faces and shoulders of two men looking closely at a child sitting inside a cloth stoppered large glass vessel on a high table, who looks back towards them.|Richard Owen and Thomas Henry Huxley inspect a water baby in a large carboy, in Sambournes 1881 illustrationAt about the same time as he was attending the Cambridge British Association meeting in 1862, instalments of Charles Kingsleys story for children Water-Babies, A Fairy Tale for a Land Baby were being published in Magazine as a serial. Kingsley incorporated material modified from his skit about Dundrearys speech On the Great Hippocampus Question, as well as other references to the protagonists, the British Association, and notable scientists of the day. When the protagonist Tom is turned into a water-baby by the fairies, the question is raised that if there were water-babies, surely someone would have caught one and put it into spirits, or into the Illustrated News, or perhaps cut it into two halves, poor dear little thing, and sent one to Professor Owen, and one to Professor Huxley, to see what they would each say about it.() As for the suggestion that a water-baby is contrary to nature;Keeping up an even-handed treatment, Kingsley introduced as a character in the story Professor Ptthmllnsprts (Put-them-all-in-spirits) as an amalgam of Owen and Huxley, satirising each in turn. Like the very possessive Owen, the Professor was very good to all the world as long as it was good to him. Only one fault he had, which cock-robins have likewise, as you may see if you look out of the nursery windowthat, when any one else found a curious worm, he would hop round them, and peck them, and set up his tail, and bristle up his feathers, just as a cock-robin would; and declare that he found the worm first; and that it was his worm; and, if not, that then it was not a worm at all. Like Huxley, the professor had not the least notion of allowing that things were true, merely because people thought them beautiful. ... The professor, indeed, went further, and held that no man was forced to believe anything to be true, but what he could see, hear, taste, or handle. A paragraph on the great hippopotamus test opens with the Professor, like Huxley, declaring that apes had hippopotamus majors in their brains just as men have, but then like Owen presenting the argument that If you have a hippopotamus major in your brain, you are no ape.(Charles Kingsley, The Water Babies.()Then, presented with the awkward question, But why are there not water-babies?, the Professor in Huxleys characteristic voice answered quite sharply: Because there aint.(The Water-Babies was published in book form in 1863, and in the same year an even more satirical short play was published anonymously by Pycroft.( In A Report of a Sad Case Recently Tried before the Lord Mayor, Owen versus Huxley... the Great Bone Case, the vulgarity of the behaviour of Owen and Huxley is parodied as them being taken to court for brawlingin the streets and disturbing the peace. In court, they shout terms such as posterior cornu and hippocampus minor. In giving evidence, Huxley states Well, as I was saying, Owen and me is in the same trade; and we both cuts up monkeys, and I finds something in the brains of them. Hallo! says I, heres a hippocampus. No, there aint says Owen. Look here says I. I cant see it he says and he sets to werriting and haggling about it, and goes and tells everybody, as what I finds aint there, and what he finds is.()Mans Place in NatureFile:Huxley - Mans Place in Nature.jpg|left|300px|thumb|altSide views of skeletons standing facing to the right, and labelled from left to right as gibbon, orang, chimpanzee, gorilla and man. Photographically reduced from Diagrams of the natural size (except that of the Gibbon, which was twice as large as nature), drawn by Mr. Waterhouse Hawkins from specimens in the Museum of the Royal College of Surgeons. The gibbon is upright, the orangutan and chimp are crouched, the gorilla partly crouched and the man stands upright.|Huxleys book on Place in Nature used illustrations to show that humans and apes had the same basic anatomy.()Huxley expanded his lectures for working men into a book titled Evidence as to Mans Place in Nature, published in 1863. His intention was expressed in a letter to Lyell which referred to the Monkeyana poem of 1861: I do not think you will find room to complain of any want of distinctness in my definition of Owens position touching the Hippocampus question. I mean to give the whole history of the business in a note, so that the paraphrase of Sir Ph. Egertons line To which Huxley replies that Owen he lies, shall be unmistakable.() Darwin exclaimed, Hurrah the monkey book has come.() A central part of the book provides a step by step explanation suitable for newcomers to anatomy of how the brains of apes and humans are fundamentally similar, with particular reference to both having a posterior lobe, a posterior horn, and a hippocampus minor. The chapter concludes that this close similarity between apes and mankind proves that the original definition by Linnaeus of the biological Order of Primates was correct to include both, and mentions that an explanation of humans originating from apes is provided by Darwins theory. The book also includes six pages of small print giving a succinct History of the Controversy respecting the Cerebral Structure of Man and the Apes describing how Owen had suppressed and denied what Huxley had now shown to be the truth regarding the hippocampus minor, posterior horn, and posterior lobe, describing this as reflecting on Owens personal veracity. Reviewers regarded the book as a polemic against Owen, and a majority of them sided with Huxley.(Image:Lyell Structure Of Brain.png|thumb|right|altside views of two brains|Lyells book included an illustration showing the distorted image of a chimpanzee brain used by Owen, and a correct view by another anatomist showing the projection of the lobe at the rear which Owen said was not present in apes.Sir Charles Lyells authoritative Evidences of the Antiquity of Man was also published in 1863, and included a detailed review of the hippocampus question which gave solid and unambiguous support to Huxleys arguments. In an attempt to refute Lyells judgement, Owen again defended his classification scheme, introducing a new claim that the hippocampus minor was virtually absent in an idiot. Then in 1866 Owens book On the Anatomy of Vertebrates presented accurate brain illustrations. In a long footnote, Owen cited himself and the earlier literature to admit at last that in apes all the homologous parts of the human cerebral organ exist. However, he still believed that this did not invalidate his classification of man in a separate subclass. He now claimed that the structures concerned  the posterior lobe, the posterior horn, and the hippocampus minor  were in apes only under modified form and low grades of development. He accused Huxley and his allies of making puerile, ridiculous and disgraceful attacks on his scheme of classification.()The publicity surrounding the affair tarnished Owens reputation.() While Owens aim of finding an objective way of defining the uniqueness of humanity and distinguishing their brain anatomy in a qualitative way, not just a quantitative way, may be found laudable, his obstinacy in refusing to admit his errors in trying to find that difference led to his fall from the pinnacle of British science.( Huxley gained influence, and his Club of like minded scientists used the journal Nature to promote evolution and naturalism, shaping much of late Victorian science.() Even many of his supporters, including Lyell and Russel Wallace, thought that though humans shared a common ancestor with apes, the higher mental faculties could not have evolved through a purely material process. Darwin published his own explanation in 1871 in the of Man.()Modern relevanceIn a talk about biological systematics (classification) and cladistics given at the Museum of Natural History in 1981, the paleontologist Colin Patterson discussed an argument put in a paper by Mayr that humans could be distinguished from apes by the presence of area in the brain. Patterson commented that this reminded him of The Great Hippocampus Question as recorded in fiction by Kingsley, and as in fact being a controversy between Huxley and Owen that eventually as usual, Huxley won.()()NotesReferences***********Further reading (subscription required)de:Hippocampus-Debatte
25011430
Georgian_society_in_Jane_Austens_novels
III.jpg|thumb|upright1.0|  Portrait of George III (17381820), whose reign included all of Jane Austens life. By Sir William Beechey.Georgian society in Jane Austens novels is the ever-present background of her work, the world in which all her characters are set. Entirely situated during the reign of George III, the novels of Jane Austen describe their everyday lives, their joys and sorrows, as well as their loves, and provide in the process an irreplaceable insight into the period.Jane Austens novels deal with such varied subjects as the historical context, the social hierarchies of the time, the role and status of the clergy, gender roles, marriage, or the pastimes of well-off families. Without even the reader noticing, many details are broached, whether of daily life, of forgotten legal aspects, or of surprising customs, thus bringing life and authenticity to the English society of this period.Nevertheless, the point of view from which Jane Austen describes England is that of a woman of the English gentry (albeit from its lower fringes), belonging to a reasonably well-off family, well connected and remarkably well educated for the time, and living in a very small village of rural England around the late 1790s or early 19th century. Thus, some essential aspects of the era are virtually absent from her novelvons, such as the Revolutionary War and the loss of the Colonies, the Revolution, the beginning of the Revolution and the birth of the Empire. Indeed, rather than a depiction of the history of English society at large, Jane Austens novels provide an understanding of everyday life in rural England at the turn of the 19th century. Georgian society All of Jane Austens novels are set against the background of daily life in English Georgian society at the turn of the 19th century. As the name indicates, the Georgian period covers the successive reigns of kings George I, George II, III, and IV.() That of William IV is also sometimes included.This was a period of considerable progress, and was the precursor to the era which followed. During Jane Austens own life, Britain suffered first the loss of its American colonies, then anxiety about the Revolution, after which it confronted and finally overcame the Empire, and finally laid the foundations of the Empire.From the social point of view, a new social order emerged at this time with the beginnings of industrialisation. This was followed in the early years of the 19th century by serious social unrest (such as the revolt of the Luddites) caused by the economic changes it gave rise to and the anxieties that accompanied it.(Williams, Gwydion M. (2000). Adam Smith: Wealth Without Nations. Athol Books)The Arts also flourished at this time, with tremendous output in all fields. In architecture Adam, John Nash and Wyatt were active, and the neo-gothic style emerged. In painting Gainsborough and Joshua Reynolds were the great names, and new painters such as M. W. Turner and Constable were gaining recognition.In literature too there were a host of famous writers such as Johnson and Richardson, and poets such as Coleridge, Wordsworth, Bysshe Shelley, Keats and Byron. It was a time of progress in education for women, leading to the proliferation of novels written and read by women, women writers who included Jane Austen herself, and also predecessors such as Burney, Radcliffe and Edgeworth.(Corman, Brian (2008). Women novelists before Jane Austen. University of Toronto Press)Finally, the Georgian period was a time of moral questioning and debate. The beginnings of feminism appeared at this time with Wollstonecraft and her groundbreaking work Vindication of the Rights of Woman. Growing concern about slavery was another major development, which soon led to the of the slave trade (1807), and ultimately to the abolition of slavery in the British Empire in 1833. Perspective File:Jane Austen coloured version.jpg|thumb| Austen, from a drawing by sister Cassandra.Austens purpose never was to write historical or social novels, nor to provide a balanced and objective picture of late 18th century England. Her storiesconsidered as comic, because of their happy endings(A. Walton Litz, 1965, p. 142.) all take place in the society she knew, that of a small rural gentry family, rather well-off though without fortune, around the 19th century. As she wrote in one of her letters to niece Anna Austen: three or four families in a Country Village is the little bit (two Inches wide) of Ivory on which I work.(Ronald Carter, John McRae,  The Routledge history of literature in English, Routledge, 2001, p. 213)Consequently, some aspects of Georgian society, despite their importance, are ignored, or, at most, hinted at, in Austens novels: thus, the loss of the Colonies, as the Declaration of Independence took place when she was barely one year old, as well as the war with the former colonies itself and the ensuing Treaty of Paris in 1783, when she was eight, do not have any part in her novels.Similarly, the French Revolution does not find its way into her work, except as regards her cousin Eliza and her French husband, guillotined in 1794.Even the birth of the Empire is largely absent from her world. However, the owners of Park have a planation in the Caribbean, and the Austens had a connection with India, since that is where Eliza and her mother, Philadelphia Hancock, had arrived from around 1786. Indeed, the Austens were warm supporters of Hastings, Philadelphias long time friend (and possibly Elizas father),(Warren Hastings was one of the first admirers of and Prejudice (see David Cecil, 2009, p. 35).) when he was sued for serious misdemeanour in India(David Cecil, 2009, p. 35) before being cleared in April 1795.Though the Revolution had started in England as early as the 1750s, it is not apparent in the way she lived as well as in her novels.(In her last novel, Sanditon, however, which remained unfinished because of her death, there appear some definitely modern aspects, in connection with the speculation in this fast developing seaside resort) Life in the small rural village of Steventon, Hampshire, where the family rectory was, kept her quite far from this new world. Besides, she belonged to the local gentry, in a reasonably well-off family whose head was the village parson, nurtured by the reading of Samuel Johnsons works;(David Cecil, 2009, p. 23) as such, a Tory at heart, she lived in unison with her position in society.(David Cecil, 2009, p. 16)But her point of view was that of a woman of her times: clever and perceptive, very well read, she lived however in a society organized by men for men; this meant for a woman considerable difficulties to become financially independent through her own trade, and the fact that social status as well as economic security had to be expected from marriage;(Irene Collins, 1994, p. 160-161; Oliver MacDonagh, 1991, pp. 6675) these themes are consequently ubiquitous in her novels. Historical context  George III File:That-accounts-for-it-1799-caricature-Isaac-Cruikshank.jpg|thumb|upright1.3| Various era types, during the reign of III. By Isaac Cruikshank (1799).File:Jamesgillraycartoon.jpg|thumb|right|upright1.3| Promisd Horrors of the French Invasion : the Revolution unleashed all kinds of fantasies in the British imagination (caricature by Gillray, en 1796).The reign of IIIif one includes in it the Regency period that took place during his final illness  encompasses all of Jane Austens life, and even beyond, as it started in 1760, just before her parents married in 1764, and ended up in 1820, after the death of Austen in 1817 and the posthumous publication of her two novels, Persuasion and Abbey in 1818.(Deirdre Le Faye, 2003, p. 7) French Revolution It is through her cousin de Feuillide, married to a French aristocrat, that Jane Austen first heard of the Revolution and of its violence. Eliza stayed in England in 1786 and 1787, and made several trips between France and England from 1788 to 1792. In January 1791, Eliza was in Margate, and was hoping that her husband, who had just joined a royalist group in Turin, could come back to her in June. After a brief stay in England during the winter of 1791, he then returned to France, as he wanted to come to the assistance of a friend, the Marquise de Marbeuf, accused of conspiring against the Republic. Unfortunately, he was unmasked while trying to suborn a witness, and duly arrested and guillotined.(Warren Roberts, 1995, p. 11.)The memory of Eliza de Feuillide can be seen in several of Austens Juvenilia, such as and Freindship (sic)dedicated, as it was, to Madame la Comtesse de Feuillideor Henry and Eliza.As the same time, the French Revolution led in England to the Controversy, involving such thinkers as Wollstonecraft and her groundbreaking book Vindication of the Rights of Woman, Godwin, Paine and Priestley. Austen, as the staunch Tory supporter she had always been, was herself in favour of the family as bringing stability in the midst of the turmoils of the times.( Napoleonic Wars The Wars are the series of wars that took place in Europe while Napoleon was Frances head of state. They are the continuation of the wars that arose as a result of the Revolution in 1789, saw France briefly dominate most of Europe, and continued until the final defeat of Napoleon in 1815. These were wars on a formerly  unprecedented scale, largely as a result of mass conscription, and Britain remained at war with France throughout the period of 1803 to 1815, only two years before Austen died. Two Jane Austens brothers, Frank and Charles, made their careers in the Navy.This period of warfare accounts for the importance of the military in the novels, where some of the protagonists are officers, and the presence of officers at social functions is frequently a factor in the social life of a neighbourhood. Hence in and Sensibility Mariannes suitor is Colonel Brandon, the dastardly Wickham in and Prejudice is an officer in the militia, and the youngest Bennet girls are obsessed with the officers at the nearby training camp in Meryton. In Park, Fanny Prices brother is a midshipman in the Royal Navy, and in Abbey, Frederick Tilney is an army officer and his father a retired general. Persuasions Frederick Wentworth is a naval officer whose career takes him from poverty to success and wealth. Social and economic ranks  Income spread File:Young Nelson.jpg|thumb| A young and promising captain of the Navy in 1781, Nelson.By Francis Rigaud.The income spread seen in Jane Austens novels allows us to better determine the social status of her different characters. Except in the case of heiresses, where we talk about the total fortune, these revenues are always annual.In any case, it is easy to calculate the income corresponding to a given fortune, since money invested in government funds pays 5% a year (or only 4% in the case of a small investment). Thus Caroline Bingleys fortune of 20 000 pounds (and Prejudice) guarantees her an income of 1000 pounds a year, already a large sum which guarantees her a competence, that is, everything that can be considered necessary to lead a pleasant life, including a carriage.(Edward Copeland, Juliet McMaster, 1997, p. 134)Jane Austens novels depict a whole income hierarchy which implies very different lifestyles.One hundred pounds a year: in Jane Austens novels, this is a very low income, that of a poor curate, for example, or of a civil servant working in a government office, or again of a small shopkeeper. However, it is rather satisfactory compared with that of an farm labourer which can be as little as twenty-five pounds a year(Twenty-five pounds a year is also the yearly income about which Wollstonecraft wrote to her sister for a governesss position, which would provide food and shelter, though nothing beyond. See also Janet M. Todd, 2005, p. 320.) including extra work at harvest time.(Janet M. Todd, 2005, p. 320) With 100 pounds a year, the best one can expect is to have a maid of all work, as Mrs. Jennings points out to Edward Ferrars and Lucy Steele (and Sensibility) when they seem to be about to get married with only this level of income.(Edward Copeland, Juliet McMaster, 1997, p. 135)Two hundred pounds: this is the income of Jane Austens parents four years after their marriage in 1764; even though it is double what they had at the beginning of their married life, it is barely adequate due to the birth of their children. Three hundred pounds would better meet their needs, even though that is the income of which Colonel Brandon says to Edward Ferrars that it is a nice sum for a single man, but insufficient to permit him to marry.(Four, or better, five hundred pounds: this is the level above which one can lead the life befitting a member of the gentry. It is the income enjoyed by Mrs. Dashwood, which permits her to give her daughters a decent existence, with two maids and a serving man, but neither carriage nor horses.Seven hundred to a thousand pounds a year make a carriage possible: when George Austen, Janes father, reaches an income of 700 pounds he buys himself one, even though he realises that it is a pleasure that is slightly too expensive.(Edward Copeland, Juliet McMaster, 1997, p. 136)Two thousand pounds a year might seem a very comfortable sum, even for a gentleman. It is, for example, Colonel Brandons income in Sense and Sensibility. But it is also the income of Mr. Bennet, who, with a wife and five daughters, has difficulty living well on this sum. It is, however, true that his abilities in household management are very poor.(Four thousand pounds and above are the level above which even a gentleman ceases to need to do too much counting.( It is the income enjoyed by Henry Crawford, Mr. Rushworth (Park), Bingley, and Mr. Darcy (and Prejudice) who actually has 10,000 pounds a year.( At this level of income, one has a manor house or even a country estate, a carriage and everything that goes with it, and also no doubt a house in London  in order to be able to make a comfortable stay in the capital.But these incomes, large as they are, are exceeded by the real-life 100,000 pounds a year at the disposal of the owner of House, the Duke of Devonshire.(Deirdre Le Faye, 2003, p. 129)(To these 100,0000 pounds per annumcorresponding to the income from his Devonshire estatemust be added profits from his mining interests in Derbyshire, as well as rents from property in London. See Deirdre Le Faye, 2003, p. 129.)The fact remains, however, that Jane Austens universe is a privileged world which conceals the harshness of the living conditions of the vast majority of the rural population, a population which is impoverished, uneducated and brutal. Thus common amusements include the omnipresent dog and cock fighting. In the spirit of the times, this brutality is considered by many politicians as being necessary to get the British people accustomed to the sight of blood, and to forge the true British bulldog character.(, p. 574) Gentry Jane Austens novels are set in the social context of the gentry, to which Jane Austen herself belonged. Some of her heroines have no fortune (and Prejudice, Park), others on the other hand are very well off (Emma), but the social class remains the same.The gentlemanThe concept of gentleman in England is more flexible than that of nobleman in France. A gentleman is distinguished by his personal qualities as much as by his status as a member of the landed gentry. He does not need to be of noble lineage, like his French counterpart the gentilhomme, or to have a noble name. As the successor to the franklin, the free landed proprietor, who occupied the lowest rank of the nobility in the Middle Ages, the simple gentleman therefore comes after the Esquire (title derived from Squire, the chief landed proprietor in a district), who in turn is inferior, in ascending order of precedence, to the Knight, the Baronet, the Baron,  the Viscount, the Earl, the Marquess, and finally to the Duke. Only the titles of Baron or higher belong to the peerage, to which simple knights or baronets do not therefore belong.It is the gentleman of the Georgian period who is the precursor to the gentleman of the Victorian period in that he establishes a code of conduct based on the three Rs: Restraint, Refinement and Religion. During the reign of George III, the British begin, by their reserve and emotional control, to distinguish themselves from the peoples of southern Europe who are of a more hot-headed temperament. The literature of the 19th century does nevertheless privilege emotion, often to the point of pathos, as in Dickens.Country houses and parks, and their ownersFile:Chatsworth House 032.jpg|thumb|upright1.2|House,(Indeed, Chatsworth House appears as Pemberley in the 2005 film Pride and Prejudice, directed by Wright, and starring Knightley. Jane Austen had very probably visited Chatsworth in 1811, when revising Pride and Prejudice, during a stay in Derbyshire in an inn a few miles from Chatsworth House (The selected essays of Donald Greene, p. 303). However, as there is no direct reference to Chatsworth House in the novel, whereas there is a specific description of Pemberley, it may be assumed that Pemberley is partly an imagined place, as are Longbourn or Meriton.) often believed to be Pemberley House,(, ff. 301) and seat of the of Devonshire.The differences in income and fortune reflected in Jane Austens novels are considerable. In real Georgian society, the Duke of Devonshire maintains a household of 180 people in his magnificent country house, House. Just to feed that number of people, five cattle and fifteen sheep are slaughtered each week. In return for this wealth, it is customary for the proprietor to use his huge kitchens to have thick soups prepared and distributed to the most needy villagers during the winter, when bad weather sets in and fuel becomes scarce.In Great Britain, the 18th century is a period of considerable wealth generation; the nobility therefore live in sumptuous country houses, among them Blenheim, House, Howard, and of course Chatsworth, all of which are comparable with the royal familys most beautiful homes. The style of the great houses and manors constructed at the beginning of the century is almost always Palladian, with the great architect William Kent. This strict Palladian style becomes freer with Robert Adam. It is possible to imagine that Rosings Park, Lady Catherine de Bourghs house, and Mansfield Park, both of which Jane Austen describes as modern, belong to the style of houses constructed by Robert Adam.File:Chatsworth Cascade.jpg|thumb|upright0.9|left| View of Chatsworth House from the top of the Cascade. The park of Chatsworth House had been redesigned by Brown.During the same period, rich owners devote a lot of time and money to beautifying the grounds surrounding their house, and to making the approaches and the views from the windows more impressive. The famous English landscape artist Capability Brown is in fact active during the Georgian period; his nickname is based on his favourite declaration that certain grounds offered a great capability of improvement. The beauty of English estates at this time also becomes a symbol of national identity when in 1780 Horace Walpole contrasts their natural style, an expression of freedom, with the geometrical layout of French gardens, which according to him bears witness to the authoritarianism of Frances political rgime.We find this preoccupation with landscaping aesthetics reflected in Mansfield Park, during the long discussion where Mr. Rushworth speaks of his ambition to improve the grounds of his Sotherton house and the views it offers.Following Capability Brown but going even further, Repton softens the transition between the houses themselves and their surroundings, where Brown had simply extended lawns right up to the house. This too is in reaction against French-style gardens. It is Repton who at Adlestrop in Gloucestershire, where Jane Austens cousins the Leighs live, remodels the vast grounds of House in order to combine them with the garden of the adjoining vicarage, and diverts a watercourse to compose a lovely landscape which can be admired equally well from the manor house and from the vicarage.The memory of the beauty of English parks is a constant in Jane Austens novels, and she associates it with the poems of Cowper, the poet of the English countryside. And in perfect keeping with the aesthetic principles promoted by Thomas Whately in his Observations on Modern Gardening in 1770, the description of the grounds of the houses she depicts is as important as that of the house itself, for the beauty of the place consists of the harmonious and natural union of the two:House was a large, handsome, stone building, standing well on rising ground, and backed by a ridge of high woody hills  and in front, a stream of some natural importance, was swelled into greater, but without any artificial appearance. Its banks were neither formal, nor falsely adorned. Elizabeth was delighted. She had never seen a place for which nature had done more, or where natural beauty had been so little counteracted by an awkward taste. Pride and Prejudice Clergy  The clergy in Jane Austens novels The clergy occupy an essential place in Jane Austens work, even more than the Royal Navy, because Jane Austens father himself was a clergyman, as were her brother James, and briefly her brother Henry. The moral principles taught by her father are found in the moral precepts sprinkled throughout the novels.The position of clergyman at the time was a special one from several points of view. Firstly, becoming a clergyman was a profession like any other. Any well educated, well-spoken man of sound morals could enter it, and no particular religious vocation was called for. And as Mary Crawford points out in Mansfield Park, the living attached to the post of vicar guaranteed a good income for work that was not onerous. Moreover, thanks to the living, a clergyman was in a position to start a family earlier than a naval officer, who might have to wait for years before raising enough money to do so.Nor do clergymen in the novels benefit from any special consideration on the part of the author. On the contrary, they are frequently depicted in a very unflattering light, although there are others who are shown as more sympathetic and admirable characters.Mr. Elton, in Emma, demonstrates an excessive social ambition in proposing to the eponymous Emma Woodhouse, and once he is married later in the novel, he and his wife Augusta patronise the villagers and disgust Emma with their pretentiousness.In and Prejudice, Mr. Collins is an example of what a clergyman ought not to be. He is obsequious towards the powerful, arrogant towards the weak, sententious and narrow-minded. In spite of his faults, however, he seems to be more involved in his job than an Edward Ferrars or a Henry Tilney.Henry Tilney, in fact, in Abbey, is absent from his parish half the time and takes holidays in Bath, so that in spite of his intellectual and moral qualities, he bears witness to the lack of commitment of certain clergymen towards their flock.As for Edward Ferrars in and Sensibility, he does give evidence of a more definite vocation when he insists that he has always preferred the Church as his profession, even though his family consider a career in the army or the Royal Navy more appropriate, or the law more worthy of a gentleman.Edmund Bertram alone, in Park, shows an unshakeable vocation that all Mary Crawfords charm and seductiveness never succeed in weakening. Try as she may, incessantly praising the superior merits and prestige of a military career, the solidity of his principles and his deep conviction prevent him from doubting. Revenues of the clergyman The income of a clergyman varied a great deal depending on the living assigned to him. A small, poor, rural parish like Steventon might be worth only about 100 a year, while a good parish could be worth nearly 1 000. The allocation of the living, and therefore of the benefits attached to it, was in the hands of the local of the manor. (This right was called the right of advowson). The two components of the living were the tithe and the glebe of which the incumbent was the beneficiary.The titheThe tithe in theory guaranteed the clergyman one tenth of the product of all the cultivated land in the parish; it constituted a sort of tax which had existed in England since the 9th century, with the clergyman himself as the tax-collector.Legally,  however,  the beneficiary of the tithe was not the clergyman (who might find that only part was allocated to him), but the rector. Thus when Colonel Brandon in and Sensibility informs Edward Ferrars that Delaford is a rectory, he is also informing him that if he were awarded the parish, he would receive the whole of the corresponding tithe. Jane Austens father was himself rector of Steventon.Once collected, the revenue had to be managed,  since in a poor rural economy the tithe was often paid in kind. This led to a clergymans needing to have the use of a tithe barn in which to store what he had collected. He also had to negotiate with his parishioners in order to get all that he was owed. The parishioners did not always react well to his role as tax collector, which took up a large part of a clergymans time, so much so that Mr Collins, at the Bingleys ball (and Prejudice), lists it as the first of his duties, ahead even of writing sermons, which comes in second place. The patron of the living also of course had an interest in increasing the revenue raised by the incumbent since this raised the value of the charge he could sell or bestow.The  curate or rectors protector is a major personage in the region, as for example are Lady Catherine de Bourgh, Mr Collins patron in and Prejudice and Colonel Brandon in and Sensibility. Moreover, this patron may want to reserve a living  for a younger son, as does Sir Thomas Bertram with respect to Edmund in Park, or General Tilney in favour of henry in Abbey.The glebeThe glebe was a parcel of land donated to the church, often in the distant past, whose produce was designated for the incumbent of the corresponding parish. This necessarily made the clergyman into a farmer, a job which therefore took up a large part of his time. Thus Parson Trulliber, in Fieldings 1742 novel Andrews, spends six days out of seven on his farming activities, and Parson Adams, when he visits him at home, finds him with an apron on and a pail in his hand, just come from serving his hogs. Even when it didnt go that far, this necessary farm work further reduced the time actually spent on religious tasks as such. Womens occupations  Education In Jane Austens time, girls boarding schools already existed, even if for the aristocracy a governess was the normal choice for the education of the girls in the family.Thus in Emma, young Harriet Smith, whose origins are very modest, is placed in Mrs. Goddards boarding school to receive a minimal education. On the other hand, Emma Woodhouse, daughter of a good family with a fine fortune, has her own governess, Miss Taylor. And Lady Catherine de Bourgh (and Prejudice) is scandalised to learn that the five Bennet girls, who belong to the minor gentry, have not benefited from the services of a governess.Jane Austen herself, whose family was no better off than the Bennets, got her education essentially through contact with her father and brothers, and through making good use of her fathers well-stocked library. Womens employment Slow progress in the education of girls needs to be seen in relation to the absence of suitable employment for women from good families, except, in fact, for a job as a governess or schoolmistress. The very idea that a woman might have a profession, with the attendant status and financial independence, was virtually inconceivable. As Mary Wollstonecraft wrote in 1792 in her famous A Vindication of the Rights of Woman:How many women thus waste away the prey of discontent, who might have practiced as physicians, regulated a farm, managed a shop, and stood erect, supported by their own industry, instead of hanging their heads?This state of affairs was well-known to Jane Austen, since being unmarried herself, she was seeking through the sale of her novels to contribute to earning her own living by her work. Her writing perfectly reflects her situation, even though she did not rebel against it directly, in that she almost never depicts women involved in anything other than domestic activities, except for those who teach either as a governess or at a boarding school. The situation of Jane Fairfax in Emma is the best illustration of this: of very humble origin, but intelligent, cultured, close to the ideal of the accomplished woman (she sings and plays the piano perfectly), her only prospect for the future is a post as governess in the home of people much inferior to her in terms of talent.Lady Bertram (Park), whose faults Jane Austen makes fun of, offers a perfect example of the ideal fashionable at the time of the elegant, leisured lady so strongly denounced by Mary Wollstonecraft. Legal rights File:Mary Wollstonecraft Tate portrait.jpg|thumb|left| A portrait of Wollstonecraft, author of Vindication of the Rights of Woman.By John Opie, Gallery.The situation of women appearing in Jane Austens novels shows at times their inferior status, on a legal as well as a financial level.Thus, according to Blackstone, in his Commentaries on the Laws of England (Oxford, 1765), man and woman become, by marriage, one and the same person : as long as the marriage lasts, the womans legal existence is viewed as suspended, and all her actions are done under her husbands cover (becoming herself a feme-covert). The rights and duties of the spouses derived from this principle. Thus, a man could not donate any piece of property, nor enter into any agreement with her, as her separate legal existence would be required for such deeds. On the other hand, he could bequeath property to his wife by will, since his wifes coverture would cease with his death. A woman who had been wrongedeither herself or through her propertycould not sue whoever had wronged her without the agreement and legal involvement of her husband. Conversely, no one could sue a married woman except through prosecuting her husband.( Jane Austen, Kristin Flieger Samuelian, Emma, Broadview Press, 2004, p. 437)File:Caroline Norton by Frank Stone.jpg|thumb| A portrait of Norton, who became a feminist writer after her dramatic experience of the English laws of the times.This lack of any legal existence for married women was at the heart of the long and sensational divorce case that opposed, starting in the 1830s, Norton and her brutal, drunkard husband.(Barbara Caine, English feminism, 1780-1980, Oxford University Press, 1997, pp. 6670) Indeed, after years of conjugal misery, she finally left her husband, who retained total custody of her children; of top of which she came to realize that all her earnings as an author belonged to him (since he legally represented her), while at the same time he did not pay her the allowance he had agreed to. In spite of this much-publicized case, it was only in 1882 that, through the Married Womens Property Act, the legal rights of married women became equal to those of unmarried women (called feme sole) in that they gained the right to retain full control of their own property.(Richard L. Abel, Philip S C Lewis, Lawyers in Society, Beard Books, 1989, p. 201) Marriage In an England where propriety was essential, the opportunities for young people of both sexes to meet and be able to talk privately were rare. It was balls, rare as they were, with the attraction of music and the exercise afforded by dancing, that made social relationships possible. Even though the physical contact permitted by the country dance or later the quadrille were very limited, the possibility of having a regular partner who reserved several dances during the ball was an indispensable prelude to an engagement.For a girl to be allowed to go to a ball, however, her parents had to consider her old enough to come out. Her first steps in the world thus marked a stage in her life, the stage when she could hope to get engaged and be married.Thus we see Mary Crawford, in Park, expressing great interest in the question of whether or not Fanny Price is out. She is puzzled because, she explains to Edmund Bertram, Fanny dined at the parsonage one evening with the rest of you, which seemed like being out; and yet she says so little, that I can hardly suppose she is.(Jane Austen, (2008, first published in 1814) Mansfield Park, chapter 5, p39-41)It was a question that had to be considered when there were several girls in the same family, since allowing the younger girls to come out when the eldest was not yet married was to risk the younger sisters attracting a suitor that she might have wished for, putting her in danger of remaining an old maid.It was thus natural only to allow the younger sisters to come out once the elder were married. The fact that this is not the case with the Bennets earns Elizabeth a raised eyebrow during the interrogation she undergoes at the hands of Lady Catherine de Bourgh in and Prejudice.  All the more so since the married woman takes precedence over her single sisters, as Lydia, the youngest of the Bennet girls, doesnt fail impertinently to remind Miss Bennet (Jane, the eldest daughter) after her wedding.The role of the ball as a prelude to marriage was so marked that married couples frequently refrained from going onto the dance floor themselves. Thus, Mr. Elton, just married, declares to Mrs. Weston during a ball: I feel myself rather an old married man. My dancing days are over. Role The accomplished womanAn accomplished woman, who draws the admiration of men by her accomplishments, has to master so many things that, as Elizabeth Bennet says to Mr Darcy, I rather wonder now at your knowing any.AccomplishmentsThe list of accomplishments is indeed long, as can be seen in and Prejudice, in the discussion Mr Darcy, Mr Bingley, Miss Bingley and Elizabeth Bennet have on the subject.If Mr Bingleys requirements are initially limited (paint tables, cover screens, net purses), Mr Darcy and Miss Bingley are agreed in demanding some much more serious talents, such as a thorough knowledge of music, singing, drawing, dancing, and the modern languages, as well as a certain something in her air and manner of walking, the tone of her voice, her address and expressions. To these,  Mr Darcy  adds the improvement of her mind by extensive reading.PurposeJane Austens novels offer several answers to the question of the purpose of these accomplishments. If some of them, embroidery for example, are useful from a domestic point of view, others have hardly any practical use at all. This is the case for a knowledge of French, an essential accomplishment at the time, even though England and France are at war. The goal therefore appears to be to honour her (future) husband by acquiring knowledge, a deportment and manners worthy of a lady.But another aspect often appears: it is on women that the pleasures of social life depend. At a time when the opportunities to hear music are rare and expensive, a musical woman can charm guests with a few piano pieces, sing as Emma Woodhouse and Jane Fairfax do at the party at the Coles (Emma), or provide the necessary accompaniment for an impromptu dance. In the same way, in the absence of photography, the possibility of recording a beloved face depends on womens talents in drawing or watercolour painting. This can be seen when Emma makes a portrait of Harriet Smith at the request of Mr. Elton, and in the fact that the only known portrait of Jane Austen herself is one drawn by her sister Cassandra.Other rolesAn essential role of women in the Georgian period is to have children. This is a major role, reflected in the growth of Englands population at this time, a role with which Jane Austen is well acquainted since she herself has no fewer than thirteen nieces and eleven nephews. It is also a difficult role, and dangerous at this time, since three of her sisters-in-law die in childbirth. This aspect however finds little place in Jane Austens novels. Other than and Prejudice, in which Mrs Bennet struggles to marry off her five daughters, the families portrayed in her novels have few children compared with the reality at the time. It is true that Jane Austens great novels are all situated before marriage, and that is what is really at stake.Married women and young girls are also very active in corresponding with those close to them, and this constitutes almost the only source of information on members of the family living in other parts of the country. Daily life  Womens fashions File:Marie Antoinette in Muslin dress.jpg|thumb|upright1.0|  Antoinette in muslin dress and wide-brimmed hat. By Vige Le Brun (1783).File:Muslin-Dresses-Gillray.jpeg|thumb|upright1.0| Fashionablebut inflammablethe robe anglaise resorted to muslin for lightness and volume. Hand coloured etching, by Gillray (1802).By the 1780s, hairstyles with the hair piled high and decorated with ostrich feathers were falling out of fashion and being replaced by a style consisting of long curls hanging loose, that could occasionally be powdered for greater formality. It is this new fashion that makes it possible for Willoughby to cut a lock of Mariannes hair in and Sensibility.(Deirdre Le Faye, 2003, p. 96)As at the French court, where Antoinette was setting the fashion for a pastoral style of clothing, women were wearing broad-brimmed hats decorated with ribbons. This is what de Feuillide,  Jane Austens cousin who is familiar with the receptions at Versailles, explains to Phylly Walter, another cousin, when she inquires after the latest fashions in France.(Janet M. Todd, 2005, p. 237) This same Eliza complains in turn about the stiff fashions still being worn at the of St. Jamess where, she says, she had to stand for two hours on end wearing a pannier dress whose weight was not negligible.( At the same time as dresses with hoop skirts were becoming unfashionable, heavy brocade and embroidered silk fabrics too were disappearing, replaced by muslin dresses worn with petticoats to give them volume. This volume, and the vaporous appearance it gave these muslin dresses, were considered to give women a more natural silhouette. This natural fashion soon also became much more revealing, to an extent bordering on scandalous, as Eliza de Feuillide gleefully noted during a stay in Bath in 1798.For it it was Bath, and still more London, that was the fashion leader.When Jane Austens characters talk about buying a dress, it means in fact that they are going to buy the necessary fabric, which they will then give to a specialised dressmaker who will make a dress to their specifications, based on the latest fashion in the capital. This is the case for Harriet Smith (in Emma) when she wants to obtain a pattern-gown (a dress from a pattern), to be made of the muslin she has just bought. Patterns for dresses in the latest London fashion were found in all the womens fashion newspapers, and based on these, the customer could explain to the dressmaker the particular adjustments she wanted made.() Homes The homes in which Jane Austens novels are set are all situated in the southern half of England, and with the sole exception of Park, in counties and towns she knew personally.  It is characteristic of Jane Austens period that all sorts of houses exist there side by side, houses of very different origins, periods and status, and that the characters in her novels are sensitive to these differences. This diversity is the reflection of the successive strata of the English habitat.Jane Austens heroines thus occupy cottages (Barton Cottage in and Sensibility), abbeys converted into vast residences (Abbey, or Donwell in Emma), Parks (mansions surrounded by a vast park, like Mansfield Park in the novel of the same name, or Rosings Park in and Prejudice),  or Courts (another type of mansion, in theory approached via a vast courtyard, like Sotherton Court in Mansfield Park, Halls (manors, like Uppercross Hall in Persuasion, and finally simple houses, like Longbourne House, the home of the Bennet family in and Prejudice.  This is why Catherine Morland is so delighted when she discovers Northanger Abbey, thinking With all the chances against her of house, hall, place, park, court, and cottage, Northanger turned up an abbey.The mansions referred to above can have so many works of art worth seeing that some of them receive visitors who come simply as tourists. In Jane Austens novels, however, this is the case of only two of them, Pemberley and Sotherton Court, since even Mansfield Park does not possess an art collection fit to interest a tourist.The layout of these traditional grand residences is not necessarily very rational: Sotherton Court, as well as Northanger Abbey, are laid out en suite, that is, each room opens into the next. On the other hand, much more modest but modern homes, like for example Longbourn in Pride and Prejudice, are organised in a way that is much better suited to their use: the public rooms where visitors or guests are received, dining room, drawing room etc., are located on the ground floor, while the private rooms such as bedrooms are upstairs.InteriorsIn Jane Austens England, interiors are very varied, both as a function of the wealth of the home, of course, and also as a function of its age. The walls are often papered, paper having been a less expensive substitute for the tapestries of noble homes since the 16th century. But it is not until the 18th century that manufacturing processes become capable of producing wallpaper whose appearance can satisfy people of quality. At the same time, some very fine wallpapers are being imported from China by the India Company. Wallpaper is thus the indoor decoration typical of the well-off, and we see for example Edward Ferrars and Elinor, as soon as are they married and installed at Delaford, start looking for some to suit them. As for the impressive Gothic Northanger Abbey, Catherine Morland is very disappointed to find wallpaper on the walls of her room, which she was expecting to be much less prosaic.In fine houses in the 18th century, however, the fashion is for wainscoting, with only the upper part of the wall papered. Paint, more expensive than wallpaper, is also preferred in sumptuous residences such as Rosings Park or Mansfield Park, since it permits contrasting colours, sometimes highlighted with gilding.As for the floor, it is left bare if it consists of beautiful tile or paving; in the 18th century this is the case too for handsome parquet floors, which may be set off by a small rug placed in the centre of the room. At the same time, progress in the textile industry now makes it possible for companies in towns such as Kidderminster to produce carpets to cover the entire floor in the reception rooms.The windows that let light into the rooms can be very different, going from leaded glass to modern sash windows, a style imported from France. When Catherine Morland arrives at Northanger Abbey,  she is devastated to find that the reception rooms have been modernised, and that the gothic frames hold only large panes of glass allowing the light to flood in: To be sure   the form of them was Gothic ...  but every pane was so large,so clear, so light! ... To an imagination which had hoped for the smallest divisions, and the heaviest stone-work, for painted glass, dirt and cobwebs, the difference was very distressing. Meals and food In Jane Austens time meals are eaten late. Breakfast, in fact, is never eaten before ten oclock, leaving time for various activities before this first meal: Edward Ferrars (and Sensibility) walks to the village of Barton to inspect his horses, and Edmund Bertram (Park)  has a long conversation with Fanny Price, then a tense discussion with his brother Tom, and only afterwards does he go to breakfast.After breakfast, there is no regular meal before dinner, which is never taken before three oclock in the afternoon. It is however appropriate to offer light refreshments (cold meats, cakes and fruit in season) when a visitor arrives between these two meals.After dinner, tea is taken at about six or seven oclock in the evening,  actually a high tea including a light meal. It is not until still later, about nine oclock, that people sit down for the last meal of the day, supper.But these times, late as they are, are the ones in use at the beginning of the 18th century. Towards the end of the century, times get even later. It is, moreover, good form to eat late, and Jane Austens characters affirm, if not their actual social status, at least their concerns about it, by eating later still. At Barton Cottage, in fact, the home of Marianne and Elinors mother Mrs. Dashwood (and Sensibility), dinner is eaten at about four oclock in the afternoon, as it is at Hartfield, the home of Emma Woodhouses father. General Tilney, on the other hand,  in Abbey, dines at six oclock, while the rich and snobbish Caroline Bingley does not dine until half past six, and her supper is not until about midnight.At table, during a sit-down meal as opposed to light refreshments, the guests are offered two or three courses served  la franaise as it is called, that is, with all the dishes on the table at the same time, with each guest helping him or herself only to what they want. These dishes, which can number from five to about twenty per course, include soup, large pieces of meat or fish served whole, poultry, vegetables, seasonal game, sauces and condiments, cakes, etc. When the first course is finished, the table is cleared and the second course brought in, with just as many dishes, sweet as well as savoury. Finally, after the second course, comes dessert, including pastries, fruit in season, ices, and dessert wines.Such a large number of dishes  and the wealthier the home the more of them there are  require the housekeeping to be of a very high standard, and cost a considerable amount of money. This abundance makes the miserly Mrs Norris (Park) jealous, but she consoles herself with the conviction of its being impossible among so many dishes but that some must be cold. Similarly Frank Churchill and Emma Woodhouse (Emma), seated beside each other at the time of the meal at the Coles house, have to interrupt the lively conversation they are engaged in in order to share in the awkwardness of a rather long interval between the courses. Country life  Carriages Average speed for carriages of this time was seven miles an hour. When general Tilney left Bath for Northanger, his handsome, highly-fed four horses performed the journey of thirty miles at a sober pace, broken into two stages with a two hours rest in between.(Deirdre Le Faye, 2003, p. 54-58) Even then, roads could be in poor state, as remarked by Mrs. Norris, between Mansfield and Sotherton, (Mansfield Park)( or even snowy. Visiting  Writing letters  See also * Austen* era* RegencyNotes(References Bibliography ; Jane Austens novels :* isbn9781603037280* isbn* isbn9781606208182* isbn9781603037273* isbn* isbn9781606208205* isbn97801431025; Major reference books :* Nicolson, Nigel. The World of Jane Austen. London: Weidenfeld and Nicolson, 1991.* Todd, Janet, ed. Jane Austen in Context. Cambridge: Cambridge University Press, 2005.* Deirdre Le Faye, Jane Austen: The World of Her Novels, 2003.* Sales, Roger. Jane Austen and Representations of Regency England. London: Routledge, 1994.* Hart, Roger. English Life in the Eighteenth Century. London: Wayland, 1970.; More specific aspects :* Giffin, Michael. Jane Austen and Religion: Salvation and Society in Georgian England. New York: Palgrave Macmillan, 2002.* Batey, Mavis. Jane Austen and the English Landscape. London: Barn Elsm, 1996.*Piggott, Patrick. The Innocent Diversion, Music in the Life and Writings of Jane Austen. London: Douglas Cleverdon, 1979.* Selwyn, David. Jane Austen and Leisure. London: Hambledon Press, 1999.* Byrde, Penelope. Jane Austen Fashion. Ludlow: Excellent Press, 1999.* Neill, Edmund. The Politics of Jane Austen. London: Macmillan, 1999.* Mooneyham, Laura G. Romance, Language and Education in Jane Austens Novels. New York: St. Martins Press, 1988.de lAngleterre georgienne chez Jane Austen
25025440
Richard_Cartwright_Austin
Richard Cartwright Austin (born 1934 in Cleveland, Ohio) is an American writer and environmental theologian.Gaining ExperienceEarly lifeBorn in Cleveland, Ohio, in 1934, Austin was raised in Washington, DC in a politically active family. He received a Bachelor of Arts from College in 1956, a Master of Divinity from Union Theological Seminary in 1959, and a Doctor of the Science of Theology from Francisco Theological Seminary in 1975.(http://www.creeksidepress.com/biography.html Dick Austins biography at Creekside Press.)Pastor and TeacherAustin served a five-church Presbyterian parish in a rural mining area of Pennsylvania, then served as Associate Pastor of the Georgetown Presbyterian Church in Washington DC. In 1966 he was appointed Director of the West Virginia Mountain Project, his denominations largest Appalachian mission, in the Big Coal River Valley of West Virginia. From 1975 until his retirement in 1999, Austin had a special ministry in Environmental Theology with the Presbyterian Church. His base was a mountain farm in southwestern Virginia, near Dungannon.In the 1970s and 1980s, Austin spoke to Protestant, Catholic, Evangelical and Eastern Orthodox groups across the United States, and trained young ministers in environmental awareness through the ecumenical Appalachian Ministries Educational Resource Center in Berea, Kentucky. For this work Austin was honored in 1999 by Wilson College with a Doctor of Humane Letters degree.(AdvocatingAustin based his early books on his experiences among Appalachian people advocating against strip mining for coal. Gore wrote about Austins experiences in in the Balance:Austin led a campaign to abolish strip mining in West Virginia in 1971, then co-chaired the national coalition Citizens to Abolish Strip Mining that lobbied U.S. Congress to pass anti-strip-mining legislation.( President Jimmy Carter signed the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act in 1977.From 1977 to 1982, Austin turned his attention to a more local issue. Electric Power planned to build the nations largest pumped-storage hydroelectric facility at Brumley Gap in southwestern Virginia.  Austin led the Coalition of American Electric Consumers that forced American Electric Power to withdraw their plans.(FamilyAustin is married to Anne Leibig, a Gestalt Psychotherapist. He has three sons from a previous marriage, and six grandchildren.(Writing careerEnvironmental TheologyBetween 1987 and 1990, Austins four-book series, Environmental Theology, was published by John Knox Press and Creekside Press. Baptized into Wilderness explores the spirituality of John Muir. Beauty of the Lord draws from American theologian Jonathan Edwards to propose an understanding of beauty that is relational rather than aesthetic, and that strengthens our experiences of God with experiences of nature. Hope for the Land explores Biblical texts that affirm human responsibility to liberate land from oppression. Reclaiming America proposes land reform, civil rights for natural life, and new approaches to agriculture.(http://www.creeksidepress.com Creekside Press.)Author Chris Bolgiano summarized Austins philosophy in Living in the Appalachian Forest:Moral ImaginationAustins second series, Moral Imagination in Industrial Culture, draws upon his family history to explore Christian responses to the challenges of industrialization during the past two centuries.  Books in the series include Building Utopia: Erecting Russias First Modern City,(Building Utopia: Erecting Russias First Modern City. Kent State University Press.) East of Cleveland,(East of Cleveland. Creekside Press.) Dreams and Depression,(Dreams and Depression. Creekside Press.) and The Measure of All Things.(The Measure of All Things. Creekside Press)  In addition Austin edited two other books as part of the series: Letters from the Pacific, a Combat Chaplain in World War II(Stroup, Russell Cartwright. Letters from the Pacific, A Combat Chaplain in World War II. University of Missouri Press.) and Give God a Flower.(Stroup, Cranston. Give God a Flower. Creekside Press.) References  External links * Creekside Press
25038018
Monarch_(software)
Monarch is a desktop mining tool used to extract data from human readable report files, such as text, PDF, XPS and HTML. The first version of Monarch was released in 1991. The latest release is version 11(http://www.datawatch.com/_about/news_events/news_110712_Datawatch_Releases_Monarch_11.php). The program is developed by Math Strategies and the software is published by Datawatch Corporation. Over 500,000 copies of Monarch have been licenced(http://www.mathstrategies.com/), and the software is in use in over 40,000 organisations.(http://www.datawatch.com/_about/news_events/news_110712_Datawatch_Releases_Monarch_11.php)Monarch allows users to re-use information from existing computer reports, such as text, PDF and HTML files. Monarch can also import data from OLE DB/ODBC data sources, spreadsheets and desktop databases.  Users define models that describe the layout of data in the report file, and the software parses the data into a tabular format. The parsed data can be further enhanced with links to external data sources, filters, sorts, calculated fields and summaries. The data can be exported to a variety of formats, primarily spreadsheets.  References  External links * Datawatch Web Site * Monarch User Forums * Math Strategies 
25061204
District_of_Brankovi
The District of Brankovi () or Vuks land () was one of the short lived semi-independent states that emerged from the collapse of the Empire in 1371, following the death of the last Emperor Uro the Weak (1346-1371). The founder and only ruler of this realm was Brankovi, the son of sebastokrator Mladenovi who governed Ohrid under the Mighty (1331-1346). Through Vuks marriage with the Mara, the daughter of Lazar, he was given substantial lands to govern in Kosovo. The Realm of Brankovi was located in the largest part of todays Kosovo. Vuk also got areas of Raka (including the old Serbian capital Ras) and lands in Polimlje in present day northern Montenegro. After the death of I Bali, Vuk captured his cities of Prizren and Pe and the area of Metohija(John VA Fine, The Late Mediaeval Balkans,p.389). The most important cities in Vuks Realm were Pritina, Prizren, Pe, Skopje and Ras, as well as the rich mining settlements of Trepa, Janjevo, Gluhavica and others.(M. irkovi, Vuk Toi, The Serbs,Wiley-Blackwell, 2004,p.79) Reference 
25079964
Hans_Lipps
fields             and ExistentialismHans Lipps (* 22 November 1889 in Pirna/Saxony;  10 September 1941 near Dudino, Russia) was a German phenomenological and existentialist philosopher.Biographical SketchFollowing his highschool graduation in Dresden in 1909, Lipps began studying history, architecture, aesthetics and philosophy at the Ludwig Maximilian University of Munich. In 1910-1911 while doing his military service in Dresden he continued his philosophical studies at Dresdens University of Technology. In the spring of 1911 he moved to Gttingen to study with Husserl. Together with Theodor Conrad and his wife, Conrad-Martius, as well as Ingarden and Fritz Kaufmann, Lipps belonged to the famous Philosophical Society of Gttingen that gathered around Husserl and Reinach. This society also included Stein, who described the young Lipps as follows: He was very tall, slender but strong; his handsome, expressive face was fresh like a childs and his big round eyes were earnest  questioning like a childs eyes. He usually uttered his opinion in a short but definitive statement.(Edith Stein, Werke VII: Aus dem Leben einer jdischen Familie, ed. by L. Gelber and Romaeus Leuven (Louvain: Nauwelaerts, 1965), p. 178.) Lipps also studied biology. In the winter of 1912 he completed a doctorate with a dissertation entitled About structural changes of plants in a modified medium, after which he began to study medicine. Between 1914 and 1918 he served in War I as an assistant army physician. After the war he continued his interrupted studies in Gttingen and Freiburg i. Br. and completed his formal medical degree. In 1919 he received his license to practice medicine, and in 1920 he published a Ph.D. dissertation in medicine addressing ... the effect of certain colchicine derivatives.In 1921 he completed his habilitation (qualification for professorship) under the mathematician Courant, whom he had met through Edith Stein, with a dissertation entitled Investigations into the philosophy of mathematics. Lipps had close personal links with the philosophers Josef Knig, Plessner, and Misch. During the academic year 1923/24 he and Misch conducted a seminar on the theory of signification (hermeneutics). In 1928 Lipps substituted for the professor of philosophy at the of Marburg. Having declined a professorship at the of Santiago de Chile, he accepted in 1936 the position of Ordinarius (chair professor) of philosophy at the of Frankfurt am Main. Throughout his academic career, Lipps continued occasionally to practice medicine, substituting alternatively for army physicians and country doctors. During the term breaks 1921/1922 and again 1930/1931, when he was already teaching as a professor, he served for extensive periods as a doctor in the navy, traveling to all continents except for Australia. At the beginning of War II in September 1939 he was drafted to the military and served as an army doctor in France and Russia. He lost his life in a battle at Shabero/Ochwat on 10 September 1941 and was buried in the nearby cemetery of Dudino.(See: Eberhard Av-Lallemant, Daten zu Leben und Werk von Hans Lipps, in: Dilthey-Jahrbuch fr Philosophie und Geschichte der Geisteswissenschaften 6 (1989), pp. 13-21 15.)Philosophy as responsible self-acceptance According to Lipps, human existence is grounded in the interpretation of reality. Asking about what something is refers to and fundamentally involves the human being, in relation to whom everything primarily is.Husserl, too, demands a reversion. Yet his return is not directed towards the concrete human being but instead to a transcendental ego through which the concrete human being is to be constituted in the first place. Heidegger substituted Husserls intentional analysis of transcendental consciousness with the existential analytic of Dasein, as it has been expounded in und Zeit in terms of a fundamental ontology.Like Heidegger, Lipps inquires about the Sein of the concrete human being. While Heidegger interprets this Sein as a phenomenon in the sense of something which-shows-itself, Lipps begins from the question: Inwiefern wird in der mannigfachen Bedeutung des Seienden gerade die Verfassung meiner Existenz Erfahrung? (To what extent does the manifold signification of Seiendes lead to the experience of the constitution of my existence?) (Die menschliche Natur, p. 47.) With this question, Lipps moves closer to Husserls method of transcendental inquiry (transzendentale Leitfden). Unlike Husserl, however, Lipps is neither concerned with the constitution of Seiendes, nor  as Heidegger is  with the question about the Sein des Seienden. From Lippss point of view, Sein cannot be disentangled from the concretization of its essence (was). His focus is on the manifold meanings of being (sein): the is in statements such as is blue, is a lion, is iron, is rain, is a speech, is greed, etc. denotes different things and differs in its respective meaning. From this Lipps concludes: Es gibt keine universelle Ontologie. (There is no universal ontology.) (Untersuchungen zur Phnomenologie der Erkenntnis, part II, Aussage und Urteil p. 13. Since Lipps writes this shortly after reading Sein und Zeit, as he mentions in the preface of volume II, one must assume that he is deliberately commenting on Heidegger.)So what exactly is the subject matter of Hans Lippss philosophy? Does his thought move on a trajectory from the essence of things (das Was der Dinge) via language (Sprache) to the human being (Mensch), as his three major treatises might suggest? Lipps states: Die Weise, in der der Philosophierende existiert, sich vor sich selbst bringt in der Bewegtheit seiner Einstellung - aber kein Gegenstand - bestimmt die Philosophie. (Philosophy is determined not by the object but by the mode in which the philosophizing subject exists and how it relates to itself in the movement of its perception) ((Die menschliche Natur, p. 56. See also Untersuchungen zu einer hermeneutischen Logik, pp. 21-22, note 1.)) Philosophy is neither defined by a specific subject matter, nor a clearly delineated field of investigation; it cannot be compartmentalized into disciplines or taken into possession. Philosophy describes a direction and a point of view one cannot assume deliberately as it consists in an attitude that develops in direct opposition to my natural inclination. Philosophy does not intend to lay new grounds; rather it occurs als verantwortliche bernahme schon geschehener Grundlegung (as a responsible adoption of an already existing groundwork).(Untersuchungen zu einer hermeneutischen Logik, p. 62. See also Die menschliche Natur, p. 56. Lippss term Grundlegung is rendered here in parallel to English translations of Kants Grundlegung zur Metaphysik der Sitten.) In philosophy I become conscious of myself.Philosophy traces back to, and brings to awareness, what has been present before without being conscious of itself (an ihm selber in seiner Vorgngigkeit unbewut (Untersuchungen zu einer hermeneutischen Logik, S. 60.)). Thus I seek to become aware of myself in my origins, and consequently attain an original relationship to reality, not by disposing of prior decisions - which would be impossible - but by accepting myself in these prior decisions. Such a philosophy is not geared toward enlightenment but toward a responsible appropriation of myself in my origins, toward a responsible performance of my existence, toward existing properly. In this regard philosophy specifically is existential philosophy.The term of reference of philosophy is reality (Wirklichkeit), to which I have always already reached out and within which I have gained pre-predicative understanding of myself as well as of reality. It is in this relationship that reality becomes real and that the human being realizes itself. The reality of myself as well as of other people is directed toward the reality of things, which refers back to the former. It is only in such proportionality that anything exists at all. It is ultimately for this reason that everything that is real and to the extent that it is real refers back to my own and other peoples (practical and theoretical) ability by which human existence is realized. Such relationship is therefore an indicator of existential possibilities: a piece of iron, the color blue, vision, cognition, embarrassment, etc.Philosophy unveils human existence as the center of reality - in analogy to the interpretation of a text. For Lipps, philosophy is therefore a hermeneutics of reality directed at human existence for the purpose of enabling the latter to its own realization. As Lipps understands it, hermeneutics necessarily implies a fundamentally retroactive dimension.Philosophy qua hermeneutics of reality is tied up with language, through which alone reality  both in terms of objects or things as well as of human beings - is being revealed. It is therefore the foremost task of philosophical inquiry to take up and follow the hints toward meaning and signification embodied in word and speech. And it must clarify those hints and explicate the pre-predicative mode of understanding they represent as grounded in the logos. This leads to the problem of the openness of the meaning of words.In open contrast to Husserls theory of the Ideal unities of significance Lipps emphasized the open indifference of many utterances whose meaning changes according to the change of speech situation. This resembles Wittgensteins conception of games (a similarity seen for the first time by Gottfried Bruer). A further similarity exists exists between Wittgensteins concepts with blurred edges (Investigations   71) and the envisageing conceptions (Untersuchungen zu einer hermeneutischen Logik. S.92.) which in both cases are illustrated by the word Spiel. There is, however, no trace of any influence on either side.WorksHans Lipps: Werke in five volumes. Frankfurt a. Main: Vittorio Klostermann Verlag, 1976-1977.* Volume I: Untersuchungen zur Phnomenologie der Erkenntnis. Part 1: Das Ding und seine Eigenschaften  (1927); Part 2: Aussage und Urteil  (1928). ISBN 978-3-465-01137-8* Volume II: Untersuchungen zu einer hermeneutischen Logik (1938). ISBN 978-3-465-01147-7* Volume III: Die menschliche Natur (1941). ISBN 978-3-465-01221-4* Volume IV: Die Verbindlichkeit der Sprache. Aufstze und Vortrge (1929 bis 1941), Frhe Schriften (1921 bis 1927), Bemerkungen. ISBN 978-3-465-01222-1* Volume V: Die Wirklichkeit des Menschen. Aufstze und Vortrge (1932 bis 1939), Frhe Schriften (1921 und 1924), Fragmentarisches. ISBN 978-3-465-01223-8Georg Gadamer writes in the preface to the edition of Lippss works:In our days, Lippss work should once again find its time. Mining in the quarry of language undertaken in England in the wake of Wittgenstein, Austin, and Searle has not only a predecessor, but an excellent counterpart in Hans Lipps. In questioning language, Lipps gains almost inexhaustible anwers. Among phenomenologists, Lippss standing in unrivaled in his aural sensitivity for language and this perception of gesture.Secondary sources* Friedrich Bollnow, Studien zur Hermeneutik. Volume II: Zur hermeneutischen Logik von Georg Misch und Hans Lipps. Freiburg / Mnchen: Alber, 1983. ISBN 3-495-47513-3* Friedrich Bollnow, Hans Lipps: Ein Beitrag zur philosophischen Lage der Gegenwart, in Bltter fr Deutsche Philosophie.16 (1941/3), p. 293-323 1* Gottfried Bruer: Wege in die Sprache. Wittgenstein und Hans Lipps,  in: Bildung und Erziehung 1963, S.131-140.* Alfred W. E. Hbner, Existenz und Sprache. berlegungen zur hermeneutischen Sprachauffassung von Martin Heidegger und Hans Lipps. Berlin: Duncker und Humblot, 2001. ISBN 3-428-10286-X* Frithjof Rodi Beitrge zum 100. Geburtstag von Hans Lipps am 22. November 1989: 4 Beitrge zur Biographie, 4 Beitrge zur Philosophie von Hans Lipps, Texte und Dokumente, in Dilthey-Jahrbuch fr Philosophie und Geschichte der Geisteswissenschaften 6 (1989), ed. together with O. F. Bollnow, U. Dierse, K. Grnder, R. Makkreel, O. Pggeler and H.-M- Sass. Gttingen: Vandenhoek & Ruprecht, 1989.* Guy van Kerckhoven, In Verlegenheit geraten. Die Befangenheit des Menschen als anthropologischer Leitfaden in Hans Lipps Die menschliche Natur, in Revista de Filosofia 26 (2001), pp. 5584.* Gerhard Rogler, Die hermeneutische Logik von Hans Lipps und die Begrndbarkeit wissenschaftlicher Erkenntnis. Wrzburg: Ergon, 1998. ISBN 3-932004-74-4* Wolfgang von der Weppen, Die existentielle Situation und die Rede. Untersuchungen zu Logik und Sprache in der existentiellen Hermeneutik von Hans Lipps. Wrzburg: Knigshausen und Neumann, 1984. ISBN 3-88479-160-5* Meinolf Wewel, Die Konstitution des transzendenten Etwas im Vollzug des Sehens. Eine Untersuchung im Anschlu an die Philosophie von Hans Lipps und in Auseinandersetzung mit Edmund Husserls Lehre vom intentionalen Bewutseinskorrelat. Dsseldorf 1968. ISBN 3-495-47528-1 - GoogleReferencesLippsLipps
25093903
CO2_Australia
CO2 Australia Limited (CO2 Australia) is Australias largest provider of dedicated carbon sink plantings, established and managed for intended registration under formal reduction schemes. It is the main operating entity of CO2 Group Limited (CO2 Group), which is a public company listed on the Stock Exchange (ASX).Dedicated forest sink plantings build a Carbon Bank for the future, allowing organisations to meet emissions management or environmental obligations. CO2 Australia manages over 12,500 hectares of carbon plantings across South Wales, Victoria and Australia.A fully accredited provider of carbon permits, CO2 Australia became the first reforestation company to be accredited under the Greenhouse Gas Abatement Scheme (GGAS) in 2004. CO2 Australia is a provider for organisations seeking to manage their greenhouse gas emissions profile, including under the Federal Governments Pollution Reduction Scheme (CPRS). Credits under this scheme are fully auditable. CO2 Australia works closely with the farming community across the Australian wheatbelt to integrate the mallee environmental plantings into existing farming and grazing systems(Courtney, Pip (Reporter). Landline production. Australia: ABC News http://www.abc.net.au/landline/content/2008/s2729887.htm). For a property to be considered suitable for use by CO2 Australia is must comply with the Protocol, cleared of forest prior to 31 December 1989. Eligible forestry includes freehold land that receives a minimum of 350 millimeters average rainfall per annum that also provides over 50 hectares for mallee plantings. CO2 Australia Carbon Sequestration Program sequestration (Kapambwe, M; Keenan, R: Biodiversity Outcomes from Carbon Biosequestration. Department of Forest & Ecosystem Science, Melbourne School of Land & Environment: The University of Melbourne, Australia, 2009) is the process whereby trees absorb dioxide in the roots, trunk, branches, twigs, bark and leaves as they grow and release oxygen back into the atmosphere. CO2 Australia makes arrangements to protect the trees for at least 100 years.The CO2 Australia Carbon Sequestration Program improves biodiversity and reduces the risk of soil erosion and salinity. The program involves establishing long-term (great than 100 years) plantings of mallee eucalyptus for the purpose of generating carbon permits, at a commercial scale. CO2 Australia has conducted extensive research and development on the performance of the native (habit) eucalypt trees used in carbon plantings. The mallees are long lived, drought tolerant, can survive intense fires and develops an extensive root system, allowing for a large, protected, underground carbon store. Through selective breeding, CO2 Australia has produced high performing seed lines, developed to have rapid rates of growth and sequestration. Company Background In 2004, CO2 became the first reforestation company to be accredited under the New South Wales Greenhouse Gas Abatement Scheme (GGAS). From 2004 to 2005, CO2 Australia became a supplier of carbon credits for Energy and Energy, and established forest carbon sinks for Energy in Australia.  CO2 Australia entered a joint venture with Bank Limited to establish and manage a forest carbon sink in 2006. During the same year, CO2 was engaged by the Victorian Department of Sustainability and Environment to undertake plantings. CO2 Group also became the first Australian Associate Member and a listed Offset Provider under the Climate Exchange (CCX). CCX operates North Americas only cap and trade system for all six greenhouse gases, with global affiliates and projects worldwide.In 2007, CO2 Australia became the first reforestation company to become an accredited abatement provider under the Australian Governments Greenhouse Friendly program. In the following year, CO2 Australia announced projects for INPEX/Total Browse JV, Mining Corporation and Curl. CO2 Australia also has contracts to establish and manage forest carbon sinks on behalf of Airways, Energy, the of Sydney, EDS Australia and the Day Out. In 2010 CO2 Australia will again sponsor the worlds longest running and most prestigious surfing contest, the Curl Pro, for their Bells Beach event http://www.ripcurl.com.au/?aboutbells. CO2 Group Limited CO2 Group Limited is a public company listed on the Stock Exchange (ASX). The company specialises in the commercialisation of business opportunities within the environmental services sector. The formation of CO2 Australia, a Socially Responsible Investment Company, is CO2 Groups first major initiative.Footnotes References *neutrality*Garnaut, Ross (2008). Garnaut Climate Change Review. Cambridge University Press. http://www.garnautreview.org.au/CA25734E0016A131/pages/home Retrieved 2009-11-19. *Allayannis, George S., Co2 AustraliaThe Case for Carbon Credits. Darden Case No. UVA-F-1585. Available at SSRN http://ssrn.com/abstract1419271 *Ernst & Young, 2009 Entrepreneur of the Year Award: Andrew Grant, CO2 Group http://eoy.ey.com.au/www/595/1001127/displayarticle/1002052.html Retrieved 2009-12-7.  *Carbon Expo (2009), Carbon Expo Australasia 2009 - CO2 Australia http://www.youtube.com/watch?vYqg5jydgL3s Retrieved 2009-12-7. *Carbon Offset Guide Australia. CO2 Australia http://www.carbonoffsetguide.com.au/providers/CO2+Australia Retrieved 2009-12-7. *Kapambwe, M; Keenan, R (2009). Biodiversity Outcomes from Carbon Biosequestration. Department of Forest & Ecosystem Science, Melbourne School of Land & Environment: The University of Melbourne, Australia. http://www.dse.vic.gov.au/CA256F310024B628/0/761E59489BC57A9ACA2576810079C4D4/$File/Biosequestration+and+Biodiversity.pdf *Sky Business News (7 April 2010). CO2 Australia CEO Andrew Grant Interview on Sky Business News http://www.youtube.com/watch?vTORdGkJ5RMw&featureplayer_embedded   External links * CO2 Australia* CO2 Group Limited
25111688
Buenaventura_(Mining_company)
 homepage  www.buenaventura.com.Buenaventura (BVL: BVN / ) is the largest owner of rights in Peru among precious metals companies. The Company is engaged in the mining, processing, development and exploration of gold, silver, coal, lead, molybdenum and zinc via wholly owned mines, as well as through its participation in joint exploration projects.Buenaventura operates seven mines  in Peru and has controlling interests in another mining company (Brocal) as well as minority interests in several other mining companies, including a significant ownership interest in Yanacocha (43.65%), via a partnership with Newmont Mining, one of the most important gold mining companies in the world, and Cerro Verde (18.50%), an important Peruvian copper producer located in the southern Peru.The company has been listed on the Stock Exchange since 1971 and on York Stock Exchange since 1996. References (Unternehmen)(entreprise)
25124947
Pioneer,_Nevada
 accessdate  November 16, 2009)| lat_d  37| lat_m 00| lat_s  19| lat_NS  N| long_d  116| long_m  47| long_s 02| long_EW  W|coordinates_note  (| coordinates_type | area  | area_round  | population  ~2,500| population_date  1908| population_note  | population_density | established  | established_type  | mayor  | timezone   Pacific (PST)| utc_offset          -8| timezone_DST  PDT (UTC-7)| code  | free  | map1  Nevada Locator Map.PNG| map1_size                    225| map1_caption   Location of Pioneer in Nevada| map1_locator  Nevada| map  | map_background  | map_caption  | map_locator  | commons  | statistics  | website  | footnotes  }}Pioneer is a town in Nye County, in the U.S. state of Nevada. Beginning as a mining camp near the Mayflower and other gold mines in northern Hills, it became a formal town in 1908 and flourished briefly until fire destroyed much of its business district in 1909 and litigation delayed mining. Population peaked at an estimated 2,500 in 1908, and the community survived at least through the closing of the Pioneer post office in 1931. Mining continued near the town site through 1941. Few remnants of Pioneer structures survived through the end of the 20th century.GeographyPioneer is on the north side of the Bullfrog Hills along Pioneer Road, a gravel road off Route 95. It is about  north of Beatty,  northeast of the ghost towns of Rhyolite and Bullfrog, and  northwest of Las Vegas. Desert springs in or near the Oasis Valley of the River are  east of Pioneer. Donovan Mountain in the Bullfrog Hills rises to  above sea level near Sarcobatus Flat slightly west of the ghost town, and the northeastern corner of Valley National Park is about  further west.()()HistoryPioneer developed from a primitive mining camp near the Mayflower, Pioneer, and other gold mines on the north side of the Bullfrog Hills. These mines were part of the Bullfrog Mining District, which included mines on the south side of the hills in places like Rhyolite and Bullfrog. Industrialist M. Schwab, who invested heavily in the Montgomery-Shoshone Mine near Rhyolite, also invested in the Mayflower in 1906. A Pioneer town-site company was formed in 1908 and began grading roads and selling lots. In that year, a daily stagecoach began making runs between Pioneer and the mining town of Springdale, about  to the northeast along the Bullfrog Goldfield Railroad. Another daily stagecoach linked Pioneer and Rhyolite in 1909 along a road constructed for the purpose.() As the mines near Rhyolite declined late in the decade, some miners and businesses moved to Pioneer and in some cases took their buildings with them. A group of investors from Rhyolite and Tonopah bought the Montgomery Hotel in Beatty and moved it to Pioneer in February 1909, re-naming it the Holland House, the grandest building Pioneer would ever have.(Patera, p. 15) Later that spring, Pioneers population had grown to an estimated 2,500 occupying an estimated 300 buildings.(Patera, pp. 15&ndash;16, citing Pioneer townsite agent J.W. Conlisk and an article in the Rhyolite Bullfrog Miner) They included the towns post office, which the federal government approved in March 1909.( In addition to the stagecoach, early automobiles ferried people back and forth between Pioneer and the Vegas and Tonopah Railroad station in Rhyolite.Water was available by the barrel from Springdale and Crystal Springs,  to the southeast. For about five months in 1909, the town had two weekly newspapers, the Pioneer Topics and the Pioneer Press.(  Businesses in Pioneer included a drug store, a doctors office, a barber shop, eating establishments, a liquor store, saloons, a meat market, a store, a bank, and houses, in addition to the Holland House. Just after the town reached its peak of development in March and April 1909,( a May 9 fire destroyed much of the business district,(Patera, pp. 19&ndash;20)  and, although the town continued to prosper for a while, the excitement would never be the same.(Patera, p.20)The town rebuilt the business district and opened a school enrolling 44 students in mid-1909.(Patera, pp. 25&ndash;28) Several mines with steady payrolls sustained Pioneer through the end of the year, but litigation slowed work at the Mayflower and other nearby mines, and the towns growth ceased. Fall enrollment at the school dropped to 24,( and residents held a Hard Times Dance at the Holland Hotel at the beginning of 1910.(Patera, pp. 55&ndash;57) Disputes about mine ownership led to further litigation, and the failure of the First National Bank of Rhyolite hampered investments in Pioneer. Stores began to close, and in August 1910, the Holland Hotel was sold to pay delinquent taxes.( A shrinking population lived in or near Pioneer for many years, and the post office stayed open through early 1931.( Mining, continuing in the area through the 1930s, was suspended in 1941, and did not resume on a large scale after War II.( As of 2004, little remained of Pioneer aside from quite a bit of debris, levelled building sites, a few boards, and perhaps some foundations(Patera, p. 57) and, nearby, remnants of the Mayflower headframe and ore bin.References
25131786
Polsterberg_Pumphouse
The Polsterberg Pumphouse () is a station above the Ditch in the Harz in Germany which is used today as a forest restaurant.As part of the Harz Water Regale it was built in the 18th century and was used to lift the water needed in Clausthal for the industry from the Dyke Ditch (Dammgraben) to the level of the highest pond, the Hirschler Pond. Aside from this water hoist, the Dyke Ditch supplied, and still supplies, water over ditches and tunnels to the Hausherzberg Ponds and the Lower Peacock Pond (Unterer Pfauenteich) (see also Peacock Pond). The problem was however, that, as it happened, the most productive silver mines in the Harz mining region, the Caroline Pit and the Dorothea Pit, were high up in the mountains and could only be supplied with water power from the Hirschler Pond.The motive force for the wooden piston pumps was won in the Polster valley below by two wheels. The headrace for these water wheels was brought via the Heller Valley Ditch (Hellertal Graben) from the Heller valley and from the  Fortune Pond over its Bottom Ditch (Grundgraben), but frictional losses and poor efficiencies meant that a considerable amount of headrace water was required in order to lift just a few litres of water from the Dyke Ditch. These wheels transferred their output power over 260 and 560 m long rods made of wood to the pumping station on the Polsterberg hill. In the pumping station the water from the Dyke Ditch was pumped 8 m higher and fed into drinking troughs from which it was then further transported via the Hutthal Ditch and Widerwaage to the Hirschler Pond, or via the Jgersbleek Tunnel and Ditch. The Polsterberg Pumphouse also acted as living accommodation for the master pumper and the ditch keepers, as well as a bar (Schankstube).At the beginning of the 20th century the wooden structures were replaced by electrically-drive pumps; the original can still be seen in the pumphouse by the ditch. Today the building is listed. It is purely run as a restaurant and is a popular destination for walkers from Altenau and Clausthal-Zellerfeld. Like the nearby Dam House it lies on the Harz High Road, the B 242.See also: *Valley Wheel House*Harz Water Regale External links * Information about the Polsterberg Pumphouse Hubhaus
25155005
Automatic_lubrication_system
An Automatic Lubrication System (ALS), often referred to as a Centralized Lubrication System, generally comprises a controller or timer, a pump and reservoir, metering valves and fittings and supply and lines.  It typically delivers a controlled amount of lubricant (either grease or oil) to multiple, specific locations on a machine while the machine is operating, at specific times from a central location.  __TOC__ Reason for an Automatic Lubrication System Whether the equipment is stationary, such as in a facility or mobile such as trucks, mining or equipment, applying lubricant is often most effective when it is dispensed in small, measured amounts over short, frequent time intervals.  However, time and human resource constraints or sometimes the physical location or type of machine often makes this approach to lubrication impossible.  As a result, production cycles, machine availability, and manpower availability dictate the intervals at which machinery is lubricated which is not optimal for the point requiring lubrication.  Auto lube systems are installed on machinery to address this problem. Benefits of an Automatic Lubrication System Auto lube systems have many advantages over traditional methods of manual lubrication:# All critical components are lubricated, regardless of location or ease of access # Lubrication occurs while the machinery is in operation causing the lubricant to be equally distributed within the bearing and increasing the machines availability. # Proper lubrication of critical components ensures safe operation of the machinery.# Less wear on the components means extended component life, fewer breakdowns, reduced downtime, reduced costs and reduced maintenance costs# Measured lubrication amounts means no wasted lubricant# Safety - no climbing around machinery or inaccessible areas (gases, exhaust, confined spaces, etc.)# Lower energy consumption due to less friction# Increased overall productivity resulting from increase in machine availability and reduction in downtime due to breakdowns or general maintenance Five Main Components of an Automatic Lubrication System Regardless of the manufacturer or type of system, all automatic lubrication systems share 5 main components:(Mohawk College of Applied Arts and Technology: Reasons for Lube Systems; MATLLUB04. January 2007, FLO Components Ltd.)# Controller/Timer  what activates the system# Pump & Reservoir  stores and provides the lubricant to the system# Supply Line  line that connects the pump to the metering valves or injectors. The lubricant is pumped through this.# Metering Valves/Injectors component that measures/dispenses the lubricant to the application points.# Feed lines - line that connects the metering valves or injectors to the application points. The lubricant is pumped through this. Different Types of Automatic Lubrication Systems There are several different types of automatic lubrication systems including:* Single Line Parallel systems* Dual Line Parallel systems* Single Point Automatics* Single Line Progressive systems (or Series Progressive)* Single Line Resistance* Oil Mist and Air-Oil systems* Oil re-circulating * Chain lube systemsThe 3 most commonly used Automatic Lubrication System types are:* Single Line Parallel, * Dual Line Parallel and * Single Line Progressive.( Single Line Progressive thumb|250px|altSingle Single Line Progressive Automatic Lubrication System|Single Line Progressive Automatic Lubrication SystemA single line progressive system uses lubricant flow to cycle individual metering valves and valve assemblies.  The valves consist of dispensing pistons moving back and forth in a specific bore.  Each piston depends on flow from the previous piston to shift and displace lubricant.  If one piston doesnt shift, none of the following pistons will shift.  Valve output is not adjustable.  Operation begins when the controller/timer sends a signal to the pump to start the lube event. The pump then feeds lubricant into the supply line which connects to the primary metering valve, for either a preprogrammed amount of time or number of times as monitored through a designated piston cycle switch.  Lubricant is fed to the multiple lubrication points one after another via secondary progressive metering valves sized for each series of lubrication points, and then directly to each point via the feed lines.(Industrial Corporation: Quicklub Centralized & Automated Lubrication Systems. April 2007.) Single Line Parallel thumb|250px|altSingle Line Parallel Automatic Lubrication System|Single Line Parallel Automatic Lubrication SystemThe first single-line parallel system for industry was introduced in 1937 by Lincoln Engineering (now known as Lincoln Industrial) in the U.S.A.  A single line parallel system can service a single machine, different zones on a single machine or even several separate machines and is ideal when the volume of lubricant varies for each point. In this type of system, a central station automatically delivers lubricant through a single supply line to multiple branches of injectors.  Each injector serves a single lubrication point, operates independently and may be individually adjusted to deliver the desired amount of lubricant.(Industrial Corporation: Centro-Matic Automated Lubrication Systems. December 2007.)Operation begins when the controller/timer sends a signal to the pump starting the lube cycle.  The pump begins pumping lubricant to build up pressure in the supply line connecting the pump to the injectors.  Once the required pressure is reached, the lube injectors dispense a predetermined amount of lubricant to the lubrication points via feed lines.(Paul Conley, Lincoln Industrial Corporation and Raj Shah, Koehler Instrument Company: Ventmeter Aids Selection of Grease for Centralized Lubrication Systems. In: Machinery Lubrication Magazine. January 2004)Once the entire system reaches the required pressure, a pressure switch sends a signal to the controller indicating that grease has cycled through to all the distribution points.  The pump shuts off.  Pressure is vented out of the system and grease in the line is redirected back to the pump reservoir, until the normal system pressure level is restored.( Dual Line Parallel thumb|250px|altDual Line Parallel Automatic Lubrication System|Dual Line Parallel Automatic Lubrication SystemA dual line parallel system is similar to the single line parallel system in that it uses hydraulic pressure to cycle adjustable valves to dispense measured shots of lubricant.  It has 2 main supply lines which are alternatively used as pressure / vent lines.  The advantage of a two-line system is that it can handle hundreds of lubrication points from a single pump station over several thousand feet using significantly smaller tubing or pipe. Operation begins when the controller/timer sends a signal to the pump to start the lubrication cycle.  The pump begins pumping lubricant to build up pressure in the first (the pressure) supply line while simultaneously venting the second (vent) return line.  Once the required pressure is reached, a predetermined amount of lubricant is dispensed by the metering devices to half of the lubrication points via feed lines.  Once the pressure switch monitoring main supply line pressure indicates a preset pressure in the line has been reached, the system is hydraulically closed.  The controller shuts off the pump and signals a changeover valve to redirect lubricant to the second main supply line.(Steve Cartwright; LubriSource Inc. Product Guide - Centralized Lubrication Systems. In: Machinery Lubrication Magazine. July 2002)The next time the controller activates the system, the second main line now becomes the pressure line while the first line becomes the vent line. The second line is pressurized and the entire process is repeated lubricating the remaining lube points.( See also *Tribology*Lincoln Engineering References (Groeneveld External links * FLO COMPONENTS LTD.de:Schmiersystemfr:Lubrificationja:
25165288
Luossajrvi
 reference          Luossajrvi is a small  lake in Kiruna in northern Sweden beside Luossavaara. The mining company LKAB has gradually emptied the southern part of the lake in 2007-8 to allow mining of iron ore in the peat bog.(Dewatering of the southern part of Lake Luossajrvi, Kiruna, LKAB) These drained areas today consist of mostly marshes.Environmental problemsThe remaining portion of the lake has a  chemical composition which shows the influence of mining activities. The lake has high concentrations of sulphate and nitrite. The high sulfate concentrations indicate extensive weathering processes of mainly carbonate and sulphorous materials. FishingFishing is practised on, and every winter ice fishing contests are held out on the ice. The name Luossajrvi derives from the rich number of trout that were in the lake.  The original stocks consisted of perch, trout and pike, but these are now depleted to the point that now only perch naturally remain. The playground for the natural brown trout populations has disappeared due to the mining. However, other fish species have now been planted into the lake, including whitefish, grayling, char, trout and splake.References *Kiruna, 100-rsboken ISBN 91-630-9371-5nl:Luossajrvino:Luossajrvisv:Luossajrvi
25175899
6th_Operations_Group
The 6th Operations Group (6 OG) is the operational flying component of the Air Mobility Wing, stationed at Air Force Base, Florida.The mission of the 6 OG is the planning and executing global aerial refueling, combatant commander airlift, and specialized missions for US and allied combat and support aircraft. The group extends US global power and global reach through employment of a mix of KC-135R and C-37 aircraft.The 6th Operations Group is a successor organization of the 6th Group (Composite), one of the 15 original combat air groups formed by the Army before World War II. During World War II, the 6th Bombardment Group (Very Heavy), was a Superfortress group assigned to Air Force flying bombardment operations against Japan. Its aircraft were identified by a R inside a Circle painted on the tail.Units* 6th Operations Support: Provides airfield operations management, air traffic control, weather services, intelligence support, combat tactics development and training, mission development, and manage aircrew training support operations. Manage flight records and KC-135R simulator training.* Air Refueling Squadron: Operates the KC-135R Stratotanker. The KC-135R is a long-range tanker aircraft capable of refueling a variety of other aircraft in mid-air, anywhere in the world and under any weather condition. MacDill KC-135s have supported US military operations all over the world including refueling coalition aircraft during the war in Bosnia.* Airlift Squadron: Operates three C-37A aircraft utilizing highly experienced crews to provide global airlift on special assignment missions directly supporting the Combatant Commanders of U.S Central Command, U.S. Southern Command, U.S. Special Operations Command, U.S. Northern Command, U.S. Transportation Command, U.S. Joint Forces Command, and U.S. Strategic Command.* Air Refueling Squadron: Operates the KC-135R Stratotanker. The KC-135R is a long-range tanker aircraft capable of refueling a variety of other aircraft in mid-air, anywhere in the world and under any weather condition. Active duty associate unit with the 916th Air Refueling Wing at Seymour Johnson AFB, North Carolina.History: For additional history and lineage, see Air Mobility WingOriginsThe 6th Operations Groups origins begin on 30 September 1919 as the United States Army Panama Canal Department 3d Observation Group, being stationed at Field in the Canal Zone. The unit was a command and control organization of numerous miscellaneous light observation squadrons established by the Air Service to provide protection for the Panama Canal area.In 1921 the group was redesignated the 6th Group (Observation) and in 1922, the 6th Group (Composite). The 6th flew such aircraft at the Curtiss R-4, DeHavilland 4-B, SE-5A, MG-3A, Piper L-4, P-12B and B-10 and Douglas B-18 Bolo aircraft.Throughout the 1920s and 1930 the group participated in maneuvers, flying patrol missions, photographing the canal area, staging aerial reviews and making good-will flights to Central and South America. In 1933, the group became part of the larger Composite Wing, which provided a central command and control organization for the Air Service units. In 1937, as the mission of the 6th moved toward bombardment, the War Department renamed it the 6th Bombardment Group. They continued to operate in the Canal Zone under the VI Bomber Command of the Air Force at Rio Hato AB, Albrook Field and Howard Field.()World War IIIn 1941 it was assigned to the new Bomber Command() of Air Force with an antisubmarine mission on both the Caribbean and Pacific approaches to the Panama Canal. By 1943, the antisubmarine mission was taken over by the States Navy, and the group was disbanded in November 1943.(On 19 April 1944, the 6th Bombardment Group was reactivated at Army Air Field, Texas, being formed as a Superfortress Very Heavy bombardment Group. The reactivated group was initially assigned four newly-constituted bomb squadrons, the 24th, 39th, 40th and 41st as its operational components.Due to a shortage of B-29s, the group was equipped with former Bomber Command Flying Fortresses previously used for training heavy bomber replacement personnel. In May shortages in aircraft and equipment led to the 41st Bomb Squadron being inactivated, with its personnel being consolidated into other group squadrons and the 6th becoming a three squadron group (the 41st would be reactivated a month later as part of the Bombardment Group, but was inactivated a second time, finally being deployed into combat with the Bombardment Group). The 6th was eventually equipped with newly-manufactured B-29 Superfortresses at Island Army Airfield, Nebraska during the summer of 1944.In November the group was deployed to the Theater of Operations (PTO), being assigned to the Bomber Command Bombardment Wing, being stationed at Field, Tinian, The group entered combat by flying navigational escort for a major attack force bound for Jima. The 6th then began engaging in very long range bombardment missions over the Home Islands, striking Tokyo and other major Japanese cities and facilities during daylight high-altitude bombing raids, with crippling, non-stop incendiary raids which destroyed lines of communication, supply, and numerous kamikaze bases.On 25 May 1945, the 6th flew a low-altitude night mission through alerted enemy defenses to drop incendiary bombs on Tokyo, for which they received their first Unit Citation. In addition to incendiary raids, the 6th also participated in mining operations. By mining harbors in Japan and Korea in July 1945, the group contributed to the blockade of the Japanese Empire earning their second Distinguished Unit Citation. The 6ths final World War II mission came on 14 August 1945, with the dropping of 500-pound general purpose bombs on the Marifu railroad yards at Iwakuni.Postwar eraWith the war over, the 6th dropped food and supplies to Allied prisoners of war and took part in show-of-force flights over Japan. The unit remained on Tinian until February 1946 during which time the group largely demobilized as part of the Sunset Project, with some aircraft being sent reclamation on Tinian; others being returned to the United States for storage at aircraft depots in the southwest. By Christmas, the group fleet was reduced to 30 or less planes Many of the remaining veterans signed for any conditions of travel to get home, arriving three weeks later in Oakland, California, where troop trains scattered them for points of discharge close to their homes.The unit moved to Field in the Philippines where it was reassigned to the postwar Far East Air Forces Air Division. At Clark its remaining aircraft and personnel were consolidated into other units. It was again reassigned in June 1947 to Air Base, Okinawa as a paper unit where it was inactivated in 1948.In January 1951, the group was activated as the operational component of the new 6th Bombardment Wing at AFB, Mexico as part of Air Commands Air Force. However all of the groups B-29 Superfortress were attached directly to the Wing organization, with the group having only one officer and one airman officially assigned to group headquarters. It was inactivated in June 1952 as part of the implementation of the postwar Tri-Deputate organization as all operational flying squadrons were assigned directly to the 6th Bombardment Wing.Current eraActivated on 1 October 1996 with an air refueling mission as part of the Objective Wing structure of the 6th Air Refueling Wing.Elements deployed to Southwest Asia in July 1998 to refuel aircraft engaged in no-fly operations over northern Iraq. After January 2001, the group also provided airlift for the commanders of U.S. Central Command and U.S. Special Operations Command. It also refueled fighters providing security over the southeastern United States as part of homeland security after terrorist attacks against the United States in September 2001. Since 2001, personnel and aircraft deployed around the world to fulfill air refueling and aeromedical missions.The 6th has twice won the Mobility Rodeo Best Air Mobility Wing Award; in 2000 and 2005.HeraldryThe groups emblem, approved in 1924, reflects its Canal Zone origins with a ship sailing through the Cut and an airplane flying overhead.Lineage* Established as 3d Observation Group, and organized, on 30 September 1919: Redesignated: 6th Group (Observation) on 14 March 1921: Redesignated: 6th Group (Composite) in June 1922: Redesignated: 6th Composite Group on 25 January 1923: Redesignated: 6th Bombardment Group on 1 September 1937: Redesignated: 6th Bombardment Group (Medium) on 6 December 1939: Redesignated: 6th Bombardment Group (Heavy) on 12 December 1940: Disestablished on 1 November 1943. Reestablished, and consolidated (29 June 1944) with the 6th Bombardment Group, Very Heavy, which was established on 28 March 1944: Activated on 1 April 1944: Inactivated on 18 October 1948* Redesignated 6th Bombardment Group, Medium on 20 December 1950: Activated on 2 January 1951: Inactivated on 16 June 1952* Redesignated: 6th Strategic Group on 31 July 1985 (Remained inactive)* Redesignated: 6th Operations Group on 1 July 1996: Activated on 1 October 1996.Assignments* Panama Canal Department, 30 September 1919* 19th Composite Wing (later, 19 Wing; 19 Bombardment Wing), 25 January 1933* Bomber Command, 25 October 1941  1 November 1943* Air Force, 1 April 1944* Bombardment Wing, 23 April 1944: Attached to Bombardment Operational Training Wing (Very Heavy), c. 19 May18 November 1944* Air Division, 1 June 1947  18 October 1948* Bombardment Wing, 2 January 1951  16 June 1952* 6th Air Refueling (later, 6th Air Mobility) Wing, since 1 October 1996Components* Bombardment Squadron: 1 February 1940  1 November 1943()* Reconnaissance Squadron: 24 October 1919  24 March 1920 (detached entire period)* Air Refueling Squadron: 10 April1 August 1951 (detached entire period)* 7 Aero (later, 7 Observation; 7 Reconnaissance; 397 Bombardment): assigned 30 September 1919  1 February 1940, attached 1 February 1940  25 February 1942, assigned 25 February 1942  1 November 1943()* Bombardment Squadron: 1 April 1944  18 October 1948; 2 January 195116 June 1952 (detached 2 January 1951  16 June 1952)* 24 Aero (later, 24 Pursuit): assigned 27 May 1922  8 May 1929, attached 8 May 1929  1 December 1932* Bombardment Squadron: 27 May 1922  12 May 1943()* Bombardment Squadron: 12 May1 November 1943()* Bombardment Squadron: 1 April 1944  18 October 1948; 2 January 195116 June 1952 (detached 2 January 1951  16 June 1952)* Bombardment Squadron: 1 April 1944  18 October 1948; 2 January 195116 June 1952 (detached 2 January 1951  16 June 1952)* Bombardment Squadron: 1 April10 May 1944* 44th Observation Squadron: 1 April 1931  1 September 1937* Bombardment Squadron: 1 February 1940  9 August 1942; 12 May1 November 1943()* 78th Pursuit Squadron: attached 1 April 1931  1 December 1932* Air Refueling Squadron: since 1 October 1996* Airlift Squadron: since 1 January 2001* Bombardment Squadron: 9 August 1942  12 May 1943* Air Refueling Squadron: since 12 April 2008Stations* Field, Canal Zone, 30 September 1919* Hato AB, Panama, 9 December 1941* Field, Canal Zone, 14 January 1943* Field, Canal Zone, October1 November 1943* Army Air Field, Texas, 1 April 1944* Island Army Airfield, Nebraska, 19 May18 November 1944* North Field, Tinian, 28 December 1944* Field, Philippines, c. February 1946* AB, Okinawa, 1 June 1947  18 October 1948* AFB, Mexico, 2 January 1951  16 June 1952* AFB, Florida, since 1 October 1996Aircraft* During 19171919 period, included JN-4, R-3 (R-9), and R-4* During 19191931 period, included JN-4, DH-4, HS2L, OA-1, O-2, NBS-1, P-12, SE-5, MB-3, and PW-9.* During 19281932 period, included LB-5, LB-6, and LB-7* During 19301936 period, included OA-4. O-19 19301937* B-3 19311936* B-6 19361937* B-10, 19361939* Bolo, 19381943* Liberator, 19421943* Liberator, 19421943* A-17A, 19421943* Grasshopper, 1943* B/RB-17 Flying Fortress, 19411943; 19431944* Superfortress, 19441947* Stratotanker, since 1996* EC-135, 19972003* T-43 Bobcat, 19972001* Gulfstream V, since 2001References* Maurer, Maurer (1983). Air Force Combat Units Of World War II. Maxwell AFB, Alabama: Office of Air Force History. ISBN 0-89201-092-4.* 6th Operations Group FactsheetExternal links* World War II 6th Bombardment Group* History of the 6th by Kingdon R. King Hawes, Ltc. USAF (Ret.)list 
25188292
Impaqt
IMPAQT is a privately held Engine Marketing agency. Headquartered in Pittsburgh, IMPAQT was founded as an outgrowth of 3W Interactive in 1999 when the need for organizations to increase visibility within engines was emerging12.On March 29, 2011, Merkle Inc., the nations largest  independent customer relationship marketing agency, acquired IMPAQT to mark the first combination of CRM and Search Marketing among existing competitors.HistoryIMPAQT was founded by Richard Hagerty in 1999 as one of the first organizations to enter the Search Engine Marketing sphere. In 2000, IMPAQT developed the Search Position ScoreTM to benchmark, track, and report clients keyword visibility across search engines and against competitors.IMPAQT developed a collaborative extranet to share data with clients in 2001. IMPAQT was the first Search Engine Marketing agency to offer this capability. This extranet laid the foundation for IMPAQTs ExstoNetTM. The ExstoNet currently provides a dashboard to condense and simplify the data streams involved in Search Marketing.IMPAQT was the first SEM firm to develop a collaborative Extranet to share and deliver campaign result data with their clients, in 2001. IMPAQT also developed a database to support the beginning of geographic and targeting in campaign strategy planning and tracking.In 2002, IMPAQT developed the ExstoNet, a campaign decision support system that provided an in-house system for campaign management, to replace the Extranet created in 2001. IMPAQT developed BidWise, a fully customizable Paid Search Management system, in 2003. They also developed KeyWise, the first keyword selection tool to utilize Bayesian Analysis and advanced pattern matching formulas.In 2004, IMPAQT began using advanced Intelligence and Business Performance tools to better address the predictive analysis and data mining needs of  clients, redesigned campaign management processes, and began implementing a full Sigma management system in its client service and development areas.IMPAQT launched its Search Education Services offering for clients and Agency partners in 2006. Forrester Research also included IMPAQT in their Forrester Wave Search Marketing Agencies Q4 2006 evaluation.IMPAQT hosted its first Search Marketing Training event in 2007. Also, IMPAQT moved to its current office space in Greentree, PA.In 2008, IMPAQT beta tested and launched several of its products: Adaptive Bidding, Search Target Rating Points (TRP), Brand Attachment Value (BAV), Media Mix Modeling, and Audience Identification and Measurement (AIM).  In 2009, Research included IMPAQT in its Forrester WaveTM  U.S. Search Marketing Agencies, Q1 2009. IMPAQT was cited as a Strong Performer.16 against eight agencies. In the Q1 2011 Forrester Wave, U.S. Search Marketing Agencies, IMPAQT was cited as a Leader.OperationsSpecializing in the growing digital marketing mediums of search engine marketing (per click) and engine optimization (SEO), IMPAQT is classified as the third largest advertising agency/firm in Pittsburgh123.  IMPAQT utilizes proprietary software that assist in its management of 1.2 million keywords for its 58% enterprise level client base4568.  IMPAQT focuses heavily in research, specifically the areas of analytics and forecasting, allowing clients educated predictions as to where they should best allocate their marketing dollars for optimal on investment1114.  By limiting its focus on search related products and services, the company is considered one of the top 10 search marketing agencies in the US and has doubled its annual growth rate over the last three years457.The majority of IMPAQTs work falls in the following vertical industries: Insurance, Retail, Financial, Pharmaceutical, Education, Travel, B2B and Consumer Packaged Goods48.  Its business is split between small and medium businesses and enterprise, 42% and 58% respectively, with 41% of those clients combining both search and search services5. Among IMPAQTs key clients are Best Western, CIGNA, DSW, GNC, GSK, IBM, General Mills, JPMorgan Chase, Mercedes-Benz, Office Depot, State Farm, and UPMC. Since establishment, IMPAQT has managed more than 500 campaigns. 16Products & OfferingsIMPAQT offers a wide array of Search Engine Marketing services: 17PPC Campaign Management  IMPAQT specializes in the management of large and complex sets of keywords and helps their clients understand the online customer and searcher preferences and styles, as it relates to paid search. SEO Campaign Management  IMPAQT helps clients optimize their sites for improved visibility in natural search results and provides regular reports on their organic visibility and competitiveness.Search Education  IMPAQT provides classroom-based and online training for the creation and management of PPC campaigns, as well as implementing SEO best practices.Social Media  IMPAQT conducts social media auditing to determine a clients presence in the social media sphere and recommends strategies and tactics to build and maintain a positive brand reputation.Consulting and Auditing  IMPAQT offers a multitude of consulting and auditing services, including SEM Capabilities Auditing, Infrastructure Consulting and Planning, Business Process Design and Documentation, Best Practices Documentation, Staff Training, HR Recruitment and Guidance and Seasonal/Holiday Planning. We also provide Social Media, Domain, Usability, Analytics, SEO, Retail, Paid Search and Globalization ConsultingGlobal SEM  IMPAQT manages multilingual PPC and SEO campaigns in almost any market in the world.IMPAQT has also developed a number of proprietary technologies and products to manage PPC and SEO efforts:	ExstoNet  Developed in 2002 as a collaborative extranet to provide clients better access to their data and function as a support system911.	KeyWise - The first keyword selection tool to utilize probability analysis and advanced pattern matching formulas1013.	BidWise  Keyword bid management tool used to control and monitor bids on multiple paid search campaigns from a single interface1112.	Adaptive Bidding  A predictive modeling and forecasting tool that makes optimization decisions about bid levels1310.	Brand Attachment Value (BAV)  A website traffic tracking and measurement tool1310.	B-LINQ  A media management tool that launches paid search ads directly from breaking news5.		Media Mix Modeling - An analytical integration of external media effects on paid search performance5.	Search Position Score (SPS)  A way to measure the visibility of a companys site through a scoring system29.	Search Management Ad-hoc Reporting Tool (SMART) - A reporting tool that creates advanced, customized paid search campaign reports, allowing for greater control over data15.	Target Rating Points (TRP) - Identifies search segments and enables users to conduct a smarter search campaign1310.	TRAQ  A management tool to track the details and deadlines of search marketing1310.References1.	http://live.psu.edu/story/382392.	http://www.post-gazette.com/businessnews/20030206risk0206p5.asp3.	http://www.bizjournals.com/bookoflists/pittsburgh/4.	http://adage.com/datacenter/article?article_id132046#325.	http://www.forrester.com/Research/Document/Excerpt/0,7211,44487,00.html6.	http://www.pghtech.org/member-successes/growth-companies/detail.aspx?CaseStudyIMPAQT7.	http://www.inc.com/inc5000/2007/company-profile.html?id2007133108.	http://hoovers.com/impaqt/--ID__124080--/free-co-profile.xhtml9.	http://www.sbnonline.com/Local/Article/15539/79/0/Richard_Hagerty.aspx?Category11910.	http://www.impaqt.com/company/history.cfm11.	http://www.dmnews.com/Impaqt-Offers-Search-Tools/article/85852/12.	http://www.emetrics.org/2007/washingtondc/speakers.php13.	http://investing.businessweek.com/research/stocks/private/snapshot.asp?privcapId816052514.	http://www.pghtech.org/news-and-publications/teq/article.aspx?Article174515.	http://www.dmnews.com/Impaqt-launches-new-paid-search-reporting-tool/article/137629/16.     http://www.forrester.com/rb/Research/wave%26trade%3B_us_search_marketing_agencies%2C_q1_2009/q/id/44487/t/2 17.     http://www.impaqt.com/solutions/See AlsoEngine Marketing Engine OptimizationSearch MarketingPer ClickAdvertisingMarketingExternal linksIMPAQT home page IMPAQT Facebook page IMPAQT Twitter feed Merkle Inc. home page 
25200772
Silver_Reef,_Utah
 website                 Silver Reef is a town in Washington County, Utah, United States, about  northeast of St. George and  west of Leeds. Silver Reef was established after John Kemple, a prospector from Nevada, discovered a vein of silver in a sandstone formation in 1866. At first, geologists were uncertain about Kemples find because silver is not usually found in sandstone. In 1875, two bankers from Lake City sent William Barbee to the site to stake mining claims. He staked 21 claims, resulting in an influx of miners, who came to work Barbees claims and to stake their own. To accommodate the miners, Barbee established a town called Bonanza City. Property values in Bonanza City were high, so several miners settled on a ridge north of Bonanza City and named their settlement Rockpile. When the silver mines in nearby Pioche closed, businessmen came to Rockpile. Soon after, the town was renamed Silver Reef, after the nearby sandstone formations in which the silver was located, which gave the appearance of an ocean reef.By 1879, about 2,000 people were living in Silver Reef. The town had a mile-long Main Street with many businesses, among them a Wells Fargo office, the Rice Building, and the Cosmopolitan Restaurant. Despite being adjacent to many Mormon settlements, Silver Reef never had a house for Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints, only a Catholic Church. In 1879, a fire destroyed several businesses, but the residents rebuilt the businesses that had been destroyed and continued mining operations. The mines began to close for various reasons in 1884, and many people left Silver Reef as a result. The last mine closed in 1891. By 1901, most of the buildings in Silver Reef had been sent to Leeds or sold to be used as scrap material.In 1916, mining operations in Silver Reef resumed under the direction of Alex Colbath, who organized the areas mines into the Silver Reef Consolidated Mining Company. These mines were purchased by the Smelting and Refining Company (ASARCO) in 1928, but the company did minimal work as a result of the Great Depression. The Western Gold & Uranium Corporation purchased Silver Reefs mines in 1948, and in 1951, they began mining uranium in the area. These operations did not last long either, and the Western Gold & Uranium Corporation sold their mines to the 5M Corporation in 1979. Today, the Wells Fargo office, the Cosmopolitan Restaurant, the Rice Building, and numerous foundations and walls remain in the town site, while a few dozen homes have been constructed in the area.Geology and geographyThe sandstone formations from which Silver Reef gets its name were formed when geologic pressures forced a long, longitudinally aligned section of Sandstone to buckle and stand up on its side, giving it the appearance of an ocean reef. Over long periods of time silver ore, sediments, and vegetation were carried in water run-off from the Formation to the White, Buckeye, and East reefs. The ore settled as deposits and the vegetation became petrified. The Silver Reef Mining Districts geologic resources consist mainly of silver deposits, with smaller deposits of copper, gold, lead, and uranium oxide. oxide deposits in the soil rocks cause a red coloration, and dinosaur tracks from the early Jurassic period have been found in the area.Silver Reef is located at , close to the the western border of the Plateau. It is about  northeast of St. George and  west of Leeds. National Forest, Leeds Creek, the White Reef, and the Valley Mountain Wilderness lie directly west of Silver Reef. The Pine Valley Mountain Wilderness contains several different plant species, including sage steppe, mountain brush, pine, coniferous trees, and pine. 15 and Toquerville are  and  east of Silver Reef, respectively. Pintura is  north of Silver Reef, and Creek State Park, the ghost town of Harrisburg, the Buckeye Reef, and Red Cliffs Recreation Area are south of Silver Reef. The average elevation of Red Cliffs Recreation Area is between  and .ClimateSilver Reef is located in one of the driest and hottest parts of the state of Utah; summer temperatures can often rise above . Temperatures of  or above can occur during the winter, but nighttime winter temperatures can occasionally drop below . Silver Reef receives about  of precipitation annually. It is not unusual to see an inch or more of snow in the winter. On average, July is the warmest month, when the average temperature is , and December is the coldest, when the average temperature is . The highest recorded temperature was , in July 2001, and the lowest recorded temperature was , in January 1963. date  August 2010Demographics footnote  Source: Population History of Western U.S. Cities and TownsSilver Reef was first settled in 1875, and by the Census of 1880, 1,046 people were living in Silver Reef. A local census taken in 1884 showed that 1,500 people were living in Silver Reef. By 1890, after most of the mines had been closed, the population had dropped to 177, and by 1900, only lessees of the mines were living in Silver Reef. In 1916, Alex Colbath organized the Silver Reef Consolidated Mining Company. Several miners moved to Silver Reef to work for Colbath, who lived in the town with his wife, Mayme, until the 1950s. After the Colbaths departure, Silver Reef was completely abandoned. In the 1960s, plans were made to subdivide Silver Reef, and by 1980 this had been accomplished. At the time of the Census of 1990, fifty people lived in Silver Reef.HistoryThe Silver Reef area was first inhabited by Anasazi Native Americans between about 200 AD and 1300 AD. The Anasazi were nomads who followed the migration of the animals they hunted, which were typically deer, mountain sheep, elk, and jackrabbits. They were also farmers and gardeners, growing corn, wheat, rye, and barley. Many were potters, and pottery can be found in abandoned villages. The Anasazi usually constructed temporary dwellings out of sticks and leaves, often using bark for the roofs. Occasionally they built more permanent dwellings out of rocks, usually along the side of a mountain, often large enough to accommodate several families. Storage pits were often placed behind the rock dwellings. Settlements were typically small due to a limited amount of food. A group of Anasazi lived in what is now the Red Cliffs Anasazi Site in Red Cliffs Recreation Area.Silver was discovered in the area in the 1860s. Although the circumstances behind the discovery of silver at Silver Reef are uncertain, a commonly accepted story is that a prospector named John Kemple had come to the area in 1866 from Montana. Needing a place to rest, he stayed with Orson B. Adams in the settlement of Harrisburg. While in the area, Kemple decided to do some prospecting, and soon located a vein of silver a few hundred yards southwest of Orson B. Adamss home. He did not find enough ore to remain in the area, so he left for Nevada. Five years later, in 1871, Kemple returned to the Silver Reef area, staked a few mining claims, and organized them under the Union Mining District. For reasons unknown, the Union Mining District was abandoned, but in 1874, Kemple returned with a group of miners, reorganized the claims under the Harrisburg Mining District, and began developing a mine. Kemple later became discouraged with his claims and sold them.According to a less accepted story, a man known as Metalliferous Murphy, an assayer from Pioche, Nevada, who was known for finding ore in everything given to him, was brought a piece of a grindstone made of sandstone from the Silver Reef area by miners in Pioche. After performing tests on the sample, Murphy stated that it contained over $200 silver per ton. After some investigation, Murphy discovered that the samples had come from the area that was to become Silver Reef. There is no record of Murphy ever staking a claim, but he did attract the attention of miners. Silver was later confirmed to be in the area.When geologists and other miners heard of Kemples discovery, they discredited it on the grounds that silver could not be found in sandstone. When brought an actual sample from the area, the Institution called it an interesting fake. In 1875, news of the silver discovery reached the Walker brothers, well-known bankers from Lake City. They hired William T. Barbee, who had previously staked mining claims in Ophir, to stake claims on their behalf. He staked 21 claims and published an article on the claims in Salt Lake Tribune. In the article, Barbee mentioned that the area had an abundance of rich silver mines. This set off an almost immediate rush, and by late 1875, Barbee had established a town called Bonanza City. Several businessmen then came into the area, inflating property values. Many miners and businessmen looking for inexpensive land set up a city north of Bonanza City and called it Rockpile. When the mines in nearby Pioche were closed in November 1875, many of the miners and business owners who had worked there came into the area of Rockpile in what is known as the Pioche Silver Stampede, and the name of the settlement was changed to Silver Reef. As construction of the St. George LDS Temple ended in mid-1877, labor opportunities for the workers became available in Silver Reef. Pine Valley Mills and Mount Trumbull in the Strip supplied most of the lumber used to construct the buildings. During its first year, Silver Reef did not have a smelter; as a result, the silver ore mined in Silver Reef was taken to Pioche and Salt Lake City for smelting.Immediately following the initial silver rush, a town site was platted and the town was built. The first permanent business building established in Silver Reef was a store at the intersection of the roads from Buckeye, White, and East Reef. By 1878, the towns business district consisted of a hotel, boarding houses, nine stores, six saloons, five restaurants, a bank, two dance halls, a newspaper called The Silver Echo (which later became the Silver Reef Miner), and eight dry goods stores. Two cemeteries, one Catholic and one Protestant, were located south of Silver Reefs business district. Most of the businesses in Silver Reef were situated along a mile-long Main Street. The mining district consisted of 37 mines and five mills: the Christy Mill, the Stormont Mill, the Barbee & Walker Mill, the Leeds Mill, and the Buckeye Mill. Although it was surrounded by Mormon settlements, the town never had a Mormon meeting house. A Catholic Church was the only church located within the town. After the Transcontinental Railroad was completed in 1869, many of the Chinese workers who had been hired to build it had nowhere to go. Some returned to China, but others remained in Utah. A group of 250 of these workers set up a Chinatown in a level area just south of Silver Reef. Silver Reefs Chinatown had a Chinese mayor and several businesses, and most of the Chinamen continued to practice their Chinese customs. By 1879, Silver Reefs population had reached 2,000 residents, and the town also had a horse race track, a brewery, and a brass band. Shooting matches among members of the Silver Reef Rifle Club and sometimes residents of nearby towns took place on the horse race track.Although most of the residents of Silver Reef were not Mormon, they had good relations with residents of the nearby Mormon settlements. A lot of the cotton and other agricultural items produced in the area were transported by wagon to Silver Reef. Many of the towns buildings were constructed by Mormon labor workers. Reverend Scanlan was invited to say Mass in the George Tabernacle of the Church of Jesus Christ of Latter-day Saints before the Catholic Church in Silver Reef was constructed. To assist Scanlan, the Mormon choir learned Latin chants. When politics were involved, however, these good relations were forgotten. The Mormons were members of the Peoples Party, and the Gentiles in Silver Reef were members of the Liberal Party. As Silver Reef grew, the townspeople wanted to change the seat of Washington County from St. George to Silver Reef. This alarmed the members of the Peoples Party, the main figures in the territorial legislature. The legislature moved the county line eastward in 1882; this maintained the Peoples Party majority in Washington County by transferring such Mormon farming communities as Grafton, Rockville, and Springdale from Kane County to Washington County.Although it had good relations with other towns, Silver Reef still had the usual mining camp problem of labor disputes between wage laborers and mine owners. After a major dispute with the Stormont Mining Company, the Silver Reef Miners Union was formed to help ensure that the daily wages of the miners did not fall too low. Gambling, prostitution, and shootouts were also commonplace. One shootout involved Town Marshal Johnny Diamond and mine guard Jack Truby. Tensions between Diamond and Truby formed during a mine dispute, in which the Kinner mine was temporarily shut down. Truby was hired by Colonel Enos Wall, foreman and owner of the Kinner, to guard the mine until told otherwise. Diamond went to the Kinner mine to serve the closure warrant, and upon arriving, he asked Truby if he could go into the mine. Truby refused to allow Diamond into the mine, and told Diamond to leave the property immediately. Diamond complied, but tension had formed between the two men.The gunfight started during court proceedings in the back room of a saloon. Diamond was present, and when he saw Truby enter the room with his hat on, he told him to remove his hat. Truby refused, and told Diamond to give him the order outside of the saloon. Once outside, Diamond and Truby began arguing about the matter. When Diamond asked for Trubys gun, Truby responded by shooting at Diamond. A short gunfight ensued, resulting in the deaths of both men. An inquest held on both men in the saloon found that the bodies each contained bullet wounds from the .41 caliber revolvers that were used, and powder burns caused by the proximity of the shootout. Truby also had .45 caliber bullet wounds in his back, indicating that somebody else had shot at him during the shootout.Another shootout occurred between Henry Clark and Sykes Griffen on December 1, 1878, at Cassidys Silver Reef Saloon. Although it is not known exactly what happened, it is believed that Griffen, a faro dealer at the saloon, and Clark, a regular patron, had previously argued over gambling matters. The shooting began when Griffen argued with Clark about a bet they had made. After arguing for several minutes, Griffen pulled a pistol on Clark and shot him. Several witnesses said that Clark pulled a pistol on Griffen and shot him, while other witnesses said that after Clark was shot, other patrons in the saloon, including Clarks father, beat and shot Griffen.DeclineOn May 30, 1879, a fire destroyed several businesses along Main Street. It was discovered under a restaurant and soon spread to several other businesses. Soon after its discovery, hundreds of Silver Reefs residents took buckets to nearby Creek for water. They also put wet blankets on the business buildings adjacent to the fire to stop it from spreading. Despite these efforts the fire soon spread to the Harrison House Hotel, one of the towns most prominent buildings. The fire spread to several other businesses before it was finally extinguished. Salt Lake Tribune reported that Silver Reef had been Chicagoed, and that a state of panic was felt even after the fire had been extinguished.Silver Reefs residents rebuilt the businesses that had been destroyed, but the town soon began to decline. In 1881, the Stormont Mining Company had to decrease wages from $4 per day to $3.50 per day for financial reasons. They did not, however, decrease the wages of miners working in the Savage mine, who continued to receive $4 per day. In response to the decrease in wages, the Silver Reef Miners Union was formed, with Matthew OLoughlin as president. As word of a potential strike spread, the Stormont Mining Company discharged those of its miners who were part of the Miners Union in February 1881. In response, the miners escorted the companys superintendent, Washington Allen, out of Silver Reef. Allen immediately went to the Second District Court in Beaver and filed a lawsuit against the miners. Before the Miners Union went to court, they held a meeting in which the members decided to shut down the Savage mine. They walked through Silver Reef in rows of two, and, upon arriving at the Savage mine, OLoughlin and nine other men went into the hoisting works and ordered the engineer on duty to shut down the pumps that kept water from the table out of the mine. After he shut the pumps down, the group of ten went into the Savage mine and ordered everyone out of the mine.A few days after the Miners Union shut down the Savage mine, the sheriff of St. George, accompanied by a posse of 30 men, arrested 25 members of the Miners Union, including Matthew OLoughlin. As Silver Reefs jail was too small to hold all 25 of the prisoners, most of them were jailed in the Rice Building, located south of the Wells Fargo office. The Rice Building could not hold all of the prisoners, so a line was drawn around the building, and anyone who crossed the line was threatened with shooting. The Miners Union members were transferred to Beaver, where they were tried for riot, conspiracy, and false imprisonment. Thirteen of the members were sentenced to imprisonment; three were bailed out, while ten were sent to the Utah Territorial Penitentiary. Matthew OLoughlin was sentenced to twenty days in prison and was charged a $75 fine.A few years after the strike, the worlds silver market dropped, causing the foreclosure of many of the mines. To compensate for the drop in prices, the mines stockholders reduced the wages of the miners. Instead of striking again, the miners accepted this. In addition, the miners inadvertently dug below the table, and the mine shafts began filling with water faster than it could be pumped out. By 1884, most of the mines were idle or closed; the last mine was officially closed in 1891, although lessees of the mines continued to operate them past 1891. Many merchants went bankrupt and left town. The Silver Reef mines produced about $8 million worth of silver ore. Between 1891 and 1901, another $250,000 worth of silver ore was mined. Several people attempted to restart mining operations in 1898, 1909, 1916, and 1950, but none of these attempts were successful. After Silver Reefs mines were closed, many of the buildings were purchased for their lumber and building stone. One buyer dismantled the building he bought and discovered $10,000 in gold coins. News of the find spread quickly, and most of the buildings in Silver Reef were demolished in hopes of discovering more gold; however, nobody else found any.The Silver Reef Consolidated Mining Company, which owned most of the areas mines, was organized in 1916 by Alex Colbath. In 1928, Smelting and Refining Company (ASARCO) purchased its mines, and in 1929 they sank a three-compartment shaft on the White Reef. This new mine was connected with the flooded Savage mine, and the water was pumped out. Minimal work was done after that, however, as there was not enough ore to keep the operation profitable during the Great Depression. Ownership of the mines was then passed back to Alex Colbath, but in 1948 the Western Gold and Uranium Corporation purchased the claims from Colbath, and in 1951 they mined the sandstone for uranium oxide deposits. The first shipment of uranium oxide came from the Anns Pride mine. In total, they shipped  of uranium oxide out of the region. These claims were bought in 1979 by the 5M Corporation, but they did not operate in Silver Reef for long.Tourism and popular cultureFollowing the closure of the districts mines, the Wells Fargo office was used as a residence by Alex and Mayme Colbath until the 1950s. It was placed on the National Register of Historic Places on March 11, 1971, and currently serves as an art gallery and a museum. A fire in the Rice Building caused it to burn down, but it was restored in 1991. The Cosmopolitan Restaurant was reconstructed to appear as it did in the 19th century, and it served cuisine until it was closed in 2010. There are many remnants of houses and other buildings, and there are also markers indicating where some buildings once stood, such as the Elk Horn Saloon. Some of the area has been preserved for its history.Behind the Wells Fargo office is a powder house which currently contains models of the town, the towns major mills, and its Catholic church. The Catholic and Protestant cemeteries were restored by the Leeds Lion Club in 1998 and can be visited. Several other original buildings remain, including the Clancy Market, McCormick Store, the two-story Harrison House Hotel, and some of the mining buildings. Main Street, once a mile long, is now only a few hundred yards long and is surrounded by private homes.Besides exploring the ghost town, visitors can explore the red rock country surrounding Silver Reef. Backpacking, camping, fishing, mountain biking, birdwatching, and hunting are among the activities available. Visitors to Red Cliffs Recreation Area, located south of Silver Reef, can picnic in a designated area with cottonwood trees. A half-mile hiking trail leads to the Red Cliffs Anasazi Site, the remains of an Anasazi habitation. The  Red Reef Trail leads to the Cottonwood Wilderness Study Area. Dinosaur footprints that date back to the early Jurassic period can be found in the area, and the Orson Adams House in nearby Harrisburg allows visitors to study the pioneer history of Washington County.Silver Reef has made an appearance in American films since the late 1960s. The area was scouted by corporate executives from Twentieth-Century Fox for use in the 1969 film Cassidy and the Sundance Kid. The area serves as a backdrop in the 1979 film Electric Horseman. Silver Reef was featured in the 1998 documentary Treasure House: The Utah Mining Story.See also* of ghost towns in Utah* mining in the United StatesReferences; Works cited* * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * * ; Online references*  ref    * *  ref    *  ref    *  ref    *  ref    *  ref    * *  accessdate  2011-09-17 **  ref    *  ref    *  ref    *  ref    *  ref    *  ref    *  ref    *  ref    Further reading* * * External links* Silver Reef at Washington County Historical Society* Silver Reef at GhostTownGallery.com* Silver Reef at GhostTowns.com* Silver Reef at LegendsofAmerica.com* Historical Silver Reef, Utah!Reef (Utah)
25207932
Asbury_Harpending
Asbury Harpending (18391923), an adventurer and financier in California, Mexico and York City. Born in Kentucky, at the age of fifteen he was sent to college but within the year he ran away to join the filibuster of General William Walker, to Nicaragua but his party was intercepted by American officials.  Escaping the authorities he made his way home.  His father decided to give him money and send him to California.  He made his early fortune mining in California and in Mexico prior to the Civil War.( Asbury Harpending, The Great Diamond Hoax and Other Stirring Incidents In the Life of Asbury Harpending, Edited By James H. Wilkins, The James H. Barry Co., San Francisco, 1913.)   In 1861, he joined in a conspiracy to seize Francisco and create a Pacific Republic in California and Oregon, but it failed due to the loyalty and precautions of Colonel (Brevet General) Sidney Johnston.  Later in 1863, after traveling secretly to Richmond, Harpending  obtained a of marque and returned to join with other California members of the of the Golden Circle in San Francisco  to outfit the schooner J. M. Chapman,( DANFS Online; Dictionary of American Naval Fighting Ships  Page 584, APPENDIX II. ANNEX I, PRIVATEERS COMMISSIONED BY THE CONFEDERATE STATES GOVERNMENT) as a privateer in Francisco Bay.  Their object was to raid commerce on the Pacific coast to capture and carry gold and silver shipments back to support the Confederacy.  Their attempt was detected and they were seized on the night of their intended departure by the USS Cyane, revenue officers and San Francisco police. The conspirators were tried and found guilty of treason. Asbury Harpending, and the other leaders were each sentenced to ten years in prison  confined at Alcatraz.  A few months later President Lincoln issued an amnesty proclamation granting full pardon to all political prisoners upon the condition that they take and keep the oath of allegiance. Harpending was given his freedom in February 1864.( California Military Museum; The Pacific Squadron of 1861-1866, The following article is taken from Aurora Hunts book, The Army of the Pacific; Its operations in California, Texas, Arizona, New Mexico, Utah, Nevada, Oregon, Washington, plains region, Mexico, etc. 1860-1866, under the chapter The Pacific Squadron of 1861-1866. pp.305-310)( John Boessenecker, Badge and Buckshot: Lawlessness in Old California, Univerciy of Oklahoma Press, 1997. pg. 135-136)After the war, he was involved in mining, real estate and railroads.  After he was involved in the hoax of 1872, he sold out in California and retired to Kentucky.  However, after a few years, he moved to York City and became involved in investment and speculation on Street.  In 1913, Harpending published his biography, The Great Diamond Hoax and Other Stirring Episodes in the Life of Asbury Harpending - An Epic of Early California.(Harpending, The Great Diamond Hoax...)He died in 1923. References
25223253
Sidney_Black_Hills_Stage_Road
The Sidney Black Hills Stage Road or Route was a trail connecting Nebraska, Sidney Barracks, and the Pacific Railroad with Robinson, Cloud Agency, Tail Agency, Custer City, Dakota Territory, and Deadwood, Dakota Territory between 1876 and 1887, when it was replacedIt competed with the Cheyenne Black Hills Stage Route to supply the gold mining fields of the Hills prior to the construction of the Line railroad in Northern Nebraska in 1887, which linked the Black Hills by rail to the rest of the world.The trail went north from Sidney past Courthouse and Jail Rocks to present-day Nebraska where it crossed the Platte River via the Bridge to present-day Nebraska, Red Willow, Running Water (on the River), Red Cloud Agency, and eventually on two separate branches; one to Deadwood and one via Four Mile to Custer City.References*http://www.nebraskahistory.org/publish/markers/texts/sidney_black_hills_trail.htm*http://cdrh.unl.edu/diggingin/trailsummaries/di.sum.0005.html
25234995
Metal_production_in_Ukraine
Metal production, in particular iron and steel industry, is the dominant heavy industry in Ukraine. Ukraine is the worlds eighth largest producer and third largest exporter of iron and steel (2007).(Oxford Business Group 2007, p. 100.) Ukrainian iron and steel industry accounts for around 2% of worldwide crude steel output,(Global Crude Steel Production in 2009 down 8% on the same 2008 period. Iron and Steel Statistics Bureau (London).) 5% to 6% of the national domestic product and 34% of Ukrainian export revenue (2007 data).(Levine et al., p. 44.1) In 2007 it employed 420,000 people  10% of industrial labor and 2% of the total workforce.( It has the highest, by a wide margin, comparative advantage of all branches of the Ukrainian economy.(RCE38.5 in 2006 (OECD 2007, p. 108, table 3.1)) The industry peaked at 42.8 million tonnes in 2007(Levine et al., p. 44.2) but has been gravely affected by the crisis of 20072010 and declined to 29.8 million tonnes in 2009.(Ukraine possesses substantial natural reserves of ore. Ore mining exceeds the demands of domestic steel mills, but export potential is weakened by high extraction costs.( Thr Ukrainian iron and steel industry is concentrated in central (Dnipropetrovsk, Rih, Nikopol), southern (Zaporizhia) and eastern (Basin, Mariupol) regions of Ukraine. There are 14 iron ore mining companies, 15 iron and steel mills, and three ferroalloy plants.( Most of iron and steel is produced by large mills with annual capacity of between 4 and 7 million tonnes.( As of 2006, 44.6% of Ukrainian steel was produced in obsolescent hearth furnaces;(Levine et al., p. 44.3) modernization of plant and coping with rising energy costs are the main challenges to the future of Ukrainian steel. The Ukrainian steel industry has been privatized since the 1990s but the coal mines are still owned by the government and experience chronic financial problems.(Levine et al., p. 44.4.)Ukraine is also a significant producer of manganese, manganese ore and manganese ferroalloys and has 75% of the ore reserves of the former CIS.( The aluminium industry concentrates in Mykolaiv and Zaporizhia but is limited by energy availability and costs.( Ukrainian production of uranium in the Oblast provides only 30% of domestic demand.( History Copper AgeMetal production in Ukraine developed along the same lines as that of it near neighbours. The Age and Age boundary was unclear as most peoples retained Stone Age tools and used them alongside Copper Age tools.The Trypilian culture began in East Ukraine and existed from 5400 to 2000 BC. It is named after a site in the Kiev (Kyiv) region near Trypilia uncovered by Vikentiy Khvoyka in 1898. In the West of Ukraine the Stog culture (4500-3500 BC) was the main influence along with the culture (2800-2200 BC) and it is during these times that we see the earliest examples of copper technology in the form of fishing hooks and other implements around 2500 BC.Bronze AgeIron AgeDuring the Iron Age there were several influences on metallurgy: the Dacians, Cimmerians, Scythians, Sarmatians, among other nomadic peoples. The Scythian Kingdom existed here from 750 BC to 250 BC.Ancient periodThe ancient Greek colonies founded in the 6th century BC on the north-eastern shore of the Black Sea, the colonies of Tyras, Olbia, Hermonassa, continued as Roman and Byzantine cities until the 6th century AD.Middle Ages4th century to 15th centuryEarly Modern16th to 18th century19th and 20th centuries Natural resources Ukraine possesses worlds largest reserves of commercial-grade ore - 30 billion tonnes of ore or around one-fifth of the global total.(MCS-2010, p. 79. The global total does not include the bulk of American reserve base which is of too low grade to be commercially viable.) Adjusting for pure iron content the Ukrainian reserves (9 billion tonnes of iron, 11.6% of the global total) are the worlds third largest after Russia and Australia.( Iron ore mining is concentrated in Kryvyi Rih Ore Basin and 80% of it is controlled by the Ukrrudprom.( mining companies are capable of extracting 90 million tonnes annually whilst underground mining contributes another 18.5 million.( Actual ore extraction, according to the States Geological Survey, peaked in 2007 at 77.9 million tonnes of ore (42.8 million tonnes of pure iron content).(Ukrainian reserves of hard coals are concentrated in the Basin. More than two hundred coal mines of Donbass account for 90% of Ukrainian coal output; the balance comes from 18 mines in Oblast and Oblast.( Metallurgical-grade coals account for 54% of national coal reserves.( In the 2000s the mix of Ukrainian coal output shifted in favor of energy coals and the steel mills compensated for the deficit of metallurgical coals with imports of coke from Russia (7 million tonnes in 2007) and other countries.( Coal mining in Donbass is in continuous financial distress: the majority of coal mines, owned by the government, operate at a loss and require regular financial aid.( Labor productivity in the Ukrainian coal industry is three to eight times lower than in Russia, Central Europe and the United States.(Economically viable manganese reserves in Ukraine are estimated at 140 million tons, or one-quarter of worlds reserves (2010 data).(MCS-2010, p. 99. South African reserves stand close at 130 million tonnes.) They are spread over the Nikopol manganese basin which spans across Dnipropetrovsk, Kherson and the Zaporizhia regions on both sides of the River.(Margantsevye rudy Ukrainy (  ) (in Russian).) There are also three lesser manganese ore provinces which are not used commercially  Kerch, Burshtyn and Haivoron.( Total reserve base of 520 million tons stands at 10% of the global reserve base which is dominated by African resources (2008 data).(MCS-2008, p. 105.)Ukrainian underground uranium and thorium mines are located in the Oblast and are depleted by 50 to 60%.( Their output, refined at the VostGOK plant in Vody, meets only around 30% of national demand (2007 data).( Ukraine has developed an ambitious program to expand uranium mining and production starting with the development of the Novokonstantinovskoye field.(Levine et al., pp. 44.4-44.5.)Ukraine also possesses substantial reserves of scandium (as a byproduct of iron ore processing),(MCS-2010, p. 141.) titanium (as both ilmenite and rutile),(MCS-2010, p. 173.) zirconium(MCS-2010, p. 187.) and mercury.(MCS-2010, p. 101.) Mercury mining and processing by the Nikitovka Mines in Horlivka ceased in 1991 and the mine equipment has been partially converted for lamp recycling. Emission of mercury from burning high-mercury Horlivka coals remains an environmental hazard.(Mercury Exposure in Ukraine. United States Geological Service. Note: Article uses Russian toponyms, i.e. Gorlovka for Ukrainian Horlivka.) Iron and steel industry In 2000-2007 ferrous metallurgy expanded owing to a global rise in demand and prices. In 2007 crude steel production peaked at 42.8 million tonnes. 78% of it was exportedmostly to Italy, Russia and Turkey.(Oxford Business Group 2008, p. 117.) Primary iron and secondary steel production is dominated by seven large steel mills with an annual capacity of 4 to 7 million tonnes. The industry has seen a pattern of consolidation into vertically-integrated companies and their ownership changes with continuing and acquisitions. Key players are ArcelorMittal, Evraz, the Union of Donbas, Group, Group and the Holdings (Metinvest).( Non-ferrous metalsUkrainian manganese industry is controlled by Group.( Primary manganese smelting concentrates in the towns of Marhanets and Ordzhonikidze. Secondary manufacturing of ferroalloys and silicomanganese is spread between Ferroalloy Plant, controlled by Interros, and lesser plants in Zaporizhia, Stakhanov, Kostyantynivka, Kramatorsk controlled by Privat.(( Total production of ferroalloys in 2007 reached 2 million tonnes.(Ukrainian aluminium industry consists of an alumina refining plant in Mykolaiv and the ZALK smelting plant in Zaporizhia, which is controlled by RUSAL.( Annual capacity is estimated in excess of 1 million tonnes of refined alumina. Only a fraction of it is processed domestically,( with a fairly constant production of 0.11 million tonnes of primary aluminium (20032007),( or 0.3% of global output.(2007: 114 of 36,900 thousand tonnes. MCS-2010, p. 17.) Development and the very existence of aluminium smelting depends on securing sources of affordable energy.( In 2007 ZALK coped with a 24% increase in electricity prices; in 2008 it faced a 45% price increase and shut down some of its electrolytic smelters.(ZALK ostanavlivaet proizvodstvo (    ) Korrespondent.net based on Kommersant Ukraine publications. November 4, 2008 (in Russian).)NotesReferences* Emerson, Michael (2006). The prospect of deep free trade between the European Union and Ukraine. Brussels: for European Policy Studies. ISBN 9290796235.* Harris, James R. (1999). The Great Urals: regionalism and the evolution of the Soviet system. Cornell University Press. ISBN 0801434785.* Levine, R. M.; Brininstool, M.; Wallace, G. L. (2010). The Mineral Industry of Ukraine, in: 2007 Mineral Yearbook (advance release). United States Geological Survey.* McKay, John P. (1970). Pioneers for profit; foreign entrepreneurship and Russian industrialization, 1885-1913. University of Chicago Press. ISBN 0226559904.* OECD (2007). OECD Economic Surveys: Ukraine 2007. OECD Publishing. ISBN 9264037535.* Oxford Business Group (2007). The Report: Emerging Ukraine 2007. Oxford Business Group. ISBN 1902339681.* Oxford Business Group (2008). The Report Ukraine 2008. Oxford Business Group. ISBN 1902339037.* Rudnytsky, Stepan (1918). Ukraine, the Land and Its People: An Introduction to Its Geography. New York City. 2009 reprint: Bibliobazaar LLC, ISBN 1113488344.* Seigelbaum, Lewis and Walkowitz, Daniel (1995). Workers of the Donbass speak: survival and identity in the new Ukraine, 1989. SUNY Press. ISBN 0791424855.* Subbotin, A. (2005). Radioactive dust pollution around the dumps of the uranium deposit, in: Proceedings of the International Workshop in Geoenvironment and Geotechnics (GEOENV 2005): 1214 September 2005, Milos Conference Center, George Eliopoulos, Milos Greece. Heliotopos Conferences. ISBN 9608815371.* Swain, Adam (2007). Re-constructing the post-Soviet industrial region: the Donbas in transition. Routledge. ISBN 0415322286.* USGS (2010). Mineral Commodity Summaries 2010 (MCS-2010). United States Geological Survey. ISBN 9781411326668.* USGS (2008). Mineral Commodity Summaries 2008 (MCS-2008). United States Geological Survey. ISBN 9781411320765.  
25249006
Mariano_Abarca
Mariano Abarca Roblero (1958-2009) was a community activist known and admired for leading opposition against mining by the Company Exploration in his community of Chicomuselo in the state of Chiapas in Southern Mexico. He was a member of the Mexicana de Afectados por la Minera (REMA). He was killed on November 27, 2009 and leaves behind his wife and four children.AssassinationMariano Abarca was assassinated on the night of November 27, 2009 in Chicomuselo in front of his house. Abarca was shot in the head and chest by a man on a motorcycle.() who was a Blackfire employee.() Mariano Abarca had previously been abducted in August 2009, and again received death threats in the week and had filed a complaint against the company one day prior to his death.See alsoExplorationFurther information*Interview with Mariano Abarca at the 2nd REMA Chiapas meeting in Chicomuselo*Video about mining in Chicomuselo (Spanish)References(Abarca Roblero
25261703
Balangeroite
Balangeroite is found in one of the most important chrysotile mines in Europe, the Balangero Serpentinite. It is considered an asbestiform in an assemblage of other mineral phases like chrysotile, magnetite and Fe-Ni alloys. In addition to its fibrous occurrence, balangeroites association with chrysotile raises concerns about its potential toxicity when its fibers are inhaled.IntroductionBalangeroite is classified as belonging to one of the two asbestiform silicate groups, the group. It is intergrown with the dominant member of the serpentinite, Chrysotile,() often  associated with tremolite (a contaminant of Chrysotile), which is classified as part of the group, the other asbestiform silicate Massive serpentines are economically important for providing building material. The fibrous nature of Chrysotile is particularly valuable for thermal insulation purposes, fireproofing etc.() Tremolite contaminated Chrysotile shows that the toxicity of the asbestos is due to the presence of Tremolite and not the entire mass of the Chrysotile.() Recent publications by Turci ( have drawn some conclusions that Balangeroite contaminated Chrysotile does have some areas of concern and can be attributed to the overall toxicity of the airborne fibers in the Balangero mine. Therefore, it cannot be compared to tremolite or croidolite in level of pathogenicity as the two have been proven by autopsies and biopsies to be present in the bodies of the people exposed to their fibers.CompositionThe chemical formula for Balangeroite is (Mg, Fe2+, Fe3+, Mn2+)42Si16O54(OH)40 ( and it has been calculated as shown in the diagram below by Compagnoni as follows: Chemical, X-ray Fluorescence and electron microprobe analysis were used to deduce the composition of Balangeroite.( The common intergrowth with Chrysotile proved to be valuable in providing better chemical resolution as portrayed in table 1. The results varied due to submicroscopic intergrowths or zoning. From the wet chemical analysis, there was 9.5% average weight loss after calcination at 1000C, due to the presence of water.( This was calculated as the difference from 100% of microprobe results, with the assumption that large quantities of material usually contain some impurities, and the possible oxidation of Fe2+ under heating.() A ratio of Fe2+/Fe3+  2.12 was obtained and on the basis of the known volume and density, the empirical formula for the unit cell was derived (      (Mg 25.70 Fe2+7.69 Fe3+3.63 Mn2+1.65 Al0.17 Ca0.07 Cr0.01 Ti0.01) total 38.93 Si15.38O53.66(OH)35.92.StructureBalangeroite is based on an octahedral build that consists of channels that are filled by chains of tetrahedra grouped in three and 4 rows running along the fiber axis.() Balangeroite is isostructural to Gageite.(                In contrast to Chrysotile, however, Balangeroite has more metal ions than Silicon ions and might be in some cases seen as complex Oxide containing some type of structure in its framework.( The surrounding fluid takes in a large number of the cations which are octahedrally coordinated, which unlike amphiboles, may be easily removed.( As a consequence, the Mg and Fe are released forcing the silicate structure to become loosely bound and therefore pass into solution.( Further tests have been conducted on Balangeroites ecopersistence and it showed fairly low eco-persistence at neutral pH.( Further studies were conducted by imitating weathering in an experiment to predict if weathered fibers retain the toxic potential present in freshly extracted fibers.() The tests proved that Balangeroite showed removal of Mg  and Si which shows a continuous structural severance which extends far beyond the surface.(Physical propertiesBalangeroite can develop as loose fibers or compact when in large volumes which can be prismatic.( Antigorite flakes are included in relict prismatic Balangeroite, while TEM observation shows that fibrous Balangeroite is partially replaced by Chrysotile.() The fibers run a couple of centimeters in the 001.{| classwikitable|colspan2|Table 2. Physical Properties of Balangeroite.(      |-|Chemical Formula||(Mg, Fe, Fe , Mn) 42 Si16 O54 (OH) 40|-|Crystal Data||	Monoclinic, point group, elongated along 001|-|Color||Pleichroism; dark brown and yellow brown parallel and perpendicular to 001 successively|-|Opacity||Transparent only in thin sections|-|Cleavage||One or more {hk0} are very good|-|Tenacity||Brittle, hardness is not determined (n.d)|-|Luster||Vitreous- greasy|-|Optical Class||Biaxial (-), due to its isostructural nature with gageite, it should be biaxial but due to its texture, it only has 1 index.|-|group||P2/n|-|Density||2.98 g/cm3 measure on a torsion balance|}Geologic occurrencesThe piemonte zone, remnant of the Piemontese Ocean from the Jurassic, is home to the majority of the serpentines of the Western Alps. Balangero mine is located in the Lanzu Ultramafic Massif which is in the inner part of the piemonte zone.() The Lanzu Ultramafic Massif is believed to have been involved in the subduction processes that were affiliated with the closure of the Piemontese Ocean in the late Jurassic.( The earliest generation of metamorphic veins and in particular type 1 Vein that constitute relict prismatic Balangeroite (often includes antigorite flakes) were formed during prograde high pressure metamorphism.( Fibrous Balangeroite is limited to the serpentine-infested rim of the northern Lanzu Ultramafic Massif, with its abundance in the inactive Balangero asbestos mine, where it was discovered.(Balangeroite was named after the location in which it was discovered.( It was brought to the attention of Robert Compagnoni and his colleagues at the Universitia Della Calabria, Cosenza Italy by a mineral collector, and Enrico Beccuti in 1977.( Mine workers at the Balangero mine had first discovered it and named it, based on its overall color and fibrous nature of other minerals present in the mine, Xylotile or Metaxite.( This new mineral Balangeroite was tested and found to be completely different from Xylotile and Metaxite in composition as well as optical properties.(      Turns out that Balangeroite was already discovered and a somewhat pure specimen was in Turin University Mineralogy institutes museum since 1925, inventory no. 14873, labeled as  fibrous serpentine (asbestos)- San Vittore, Balangero.(Literature surveyThe most highly cited paper on Balangeroite in the web of science was Robert Compagnoni  and colleagues for  Balangeroite, A new fibrous silicate related to Gageite from Balangero, Italy with twenty five citations. Authors of other articles, most often with Robert Compagnoni as co-author, often cite this article in further research of the mineral and other minerals related to it. Due to its asbestiform nature it has been cited by Francesco Turci (2005) and colleagues in the Journal of toxicology and Environmental Health Potential Toxicity of no regulated asbestiform minerals: Balangeroite from the Western AlpsFurther investigationAsbestiform minerals are gaining attention in the news and are of great concerns due to the potential health threat their fibers pose when inhaled. Klein and Duttrow ( chronicle that the regulatory bodies classify asbestiform minerals as having the same effects in both mines as well as in office buildings etc. This has resulted in the banning of Chrysotile mining in the United States due to health concerns of those exposed to asbestos.( The intergrowth of Chrysotile with Balangeroite has become controversial as a result. Tests have been performed by Francesco Turci () show that Balangeroite fibers have the ability to produce oxidative stress, and is therefore a determinant in their genotoxic effects. Crocidolites fibers, an amphibole riebeckite, according to Klein and Duttrow ( pose a greater health hazard especially in pleural abnormalities.  The concerns about the toxicity of Balangeroite are especially seen among health organizations within governments. Mineralogists, however, even with concerns about the health hazard Balangeroite might pose, are skeptical about calling it a cancer- inducing asbestiform as various experiments were performed on Balangeroite, show that it cannot be largely responsible for the health effects found in humans. Balangeroite research has been going on since it was discovered in 1983 but due to its intergrowth with chrysotile, it is very difficult to find a pure sample in large enough quantities for additional testing to get less controversial results. The contaminants in Balangeroite cause it to yield differing results which in turn give rise to controversies as is the case with its potential lethality regarding lung cancer and various pleural abnormalities.ReferencesExternal links*Entry on Mineraldata.com
25276024
Ruby-Poorman_mining_district
#REDIRECT mining district
25282914
Henry_Dwight_Barrows
Henry Dwight Barrows (18251914) was an American teacher, businessman, farmer, goldminer, reporter, States Marshall, Los Angeles County School Superintendent, manufacturer, writer, and a founder and president of the Society of Southern California. Early life Henry D. Barrows was born in Mansfield, February 23, 1825, a son of Joshua Palmer and Polly (Bingham) Barrows. The early years of his life were spent on a farm a village known as South Mansfield, or Mansfield Center. He received his education, in the public school, and later in the high school at South Coventry Afterward he spent several terms in the academy at Ellington  When he was seventeen, he taught school for four years, and devoted considerable time to music, joining the local band, of which he became the leader, and taking lessons on the organ at Hartford. His first business experience was clerking in York in 1849. The next year he went to Boston, where, as entry clerk and then as bookkeeper, he worked in the dry goods business of J. W. Blodgett & Co. for over two years acquiring business experience. While there he enjoyed the books, lectures, music, and opera., which that city afforded. Gold Rush and early life in Los Angeles On April 26, 1852, he sailed  for California from New York on the steamer Illinois to Aspinwall, crossed the isthumus of Panama, then took the connecting steamer Golden Gate to Francisco.  Soon after arrival, he went to the northern mines, going as far as County; but, as the dry season had set in, he returned down the valley, working at haying at $100 a month on Thomas Creek, near Tehama. He returned to San Francisco, July 31, with chills and fever, which the climate of that city only aggravated. He then went south to San Jose, where he raised a crop of wheat and barley which in 1852 to 1853 sold at a very high price. In the fall of 1853 he went to the southern mines, working at placer gold mining near Jamestown. Later Barrows obtained an engagement as teacher of music in the Collegiate Institute in Benicia, remaining there until October, 1854, when Wolfskill, one of the earliest American pioneers of Angeles, hired him to teach a private school in his home at Los Angeles, from December, 1854, until the latter part of 1858. His pupils, were the sons and daughters of Mr. Wolfskill, the sons of his brother, Mathew; the children of Carpenter, Pleasants, and others.Additionally, from 1856, for nearly ten years, he was the Los Angeles correspondent of the Francisco Bulletin, then one of the most influential newspapers in California. In 1859 1860 he again turned to farming, cultivating a vineyard near the city on the east side of the Angeles River. On November 14, 1860, Barrows was married to his former pupil, Juanita Wolfskill, daughter of William Wolfskill and Magdalena (Lugo) Wolfskill, giving him family connections to several influential Californio families. Civil War Until the formation of the Republican party Henry D. Barrows was a Whig when he voted for Fremont in 1856. He voted for every Republican candidate for president thereafter till 1900.  During Lincolns election campaign, he was chairman of his Angeles County committee.(Abraham Lincoln and the California Patronage, by John Denton Carter, 1943, American Historical Association.)By President Lincolns recess appointment on April 9, 1861, he became the States Marshall for the southern district of California, holding the office for four years.  He replaced James C. Pennie, who had been removed from office. His appointment was confirmed by the Senate July 22, 1861 and was again appointed and confirmed by the Senate January 2, 1866.( History of Marshals for the Southern District of California)On April 10, 1862, as the federal Marshal for Southern California, Henry D. Barrows, wrote to Brigadier General Wright, commander of the Pacific Department of the Union Army, headquartered in San Francisco, complaining of anti-Union sentiment in Southern California. The letter says such sentiment permeates society here among both the high and the low, and reports::Jackson King, under-sheriff of this county, who has been a bitter secessionist, who said to me that he owed no allegiance to the United States Government; that Jeff Davis was the only constitutional government we had, and that he remained here because he could do more harm to the enemies of that Government by staying here than going there; brought down on the Senator (a steam ship) Tuesday last a large lithograph gilt-framed portrait of Beauregard, the rebel general, which he flaunted before a large crowd at the hotel when he arrived. I induced Colonel Carleton to have him arrested as one of the many dangerous secessionists living in our midst, and to-day he was taken to Drum. He was accompanied by General Volney E. Howard as counsel, and I have but little hope that he will be retained in custody.( Candidate With Pro-Slavery Views Elected District Attorney in 1863)Brought before Colonel Carleton, A. J. King was made to take an oath of allegiance to the Union and was then released. King unlike the members of the Angeles Mounted Rifles, was true to his word and did not flee to the Confederacy and in 1862, he was married to Laura Evertson, and remained in office as Undersheriff to 1865. Also while Marshall, Barrows successfully petitioned the to have the anti-Lincoln, pro-Democrat and pro-secessionist newspaper Los Angeles Star banned from the use of the mails in October 1864 which ended its long existence as the city newspaper. Barrows wife, Juanita Wolfskill, died January 31, 1863, some months after giving birth to their daughter, Alice Wolfskill Barrows, who was born July 16, 1862.(Juana gave birth to a daughter on the 16 of July, 10 days after her Mothers death. She got along very well for two or three weeks but since, she has had a cough & has been quite weak. Dr. Hayward is attending her & she is better within a day or two. I feel anxious about her cough. Her cancer troubles her some. The babe is doing fine, is now about 6 weeks old. We call her Alice Wolfskill Barrows. She squalls good deal but we all think a good deal of her. They say she looks like me.   1862 Letter: Henry D. BARROWS to Timothy WOLFSKILL; Los Angeles, Cal. Aug. 26, 1862) Later life  From 1864 Barrows engaged in the mercantile business for fifteen years. On August 14, 1864, he married Mary Alice Workman, daughter of D. Woodworth and widow of H. Workman, who was killed by the explosion of the steamer Ada Hancock in San Pedro Bay April 23, 1863. She died in Los Angeles March 9, 1868, leaving two daughters: Ada Frances, born May 21, 1865, and Mary Washington, born February 22, 1868, and died in infancy. Barrows third wife was Bessie A. Greene, a native of Utica, N.Y. They were married November 28, 1868, and had a son, Harry Prosper Barrows; born December 14, 1869. For many years prior to the 1880s Barrows took an active part in public education. For much of the time during fifteen years he served as a member of the school board of Los Angeles. In 1867 he was elected city superintendent, and in 1868, county superintendent. Barrows wrote on many subjects for the local press, and especially on financial questions, including resumption of specie payment and bimetallism. He contributed an essay to the contest in 1889 by M. Henri Cernuschi on International Bimetallism.( Henry Dwight Barrows, International Bi-metallism: an essay, Stoll & Thayer, 1891) Mr. Barrows administered a number of large estates, including that of William Wolfskill.  He was appointed by the States district court one of the commissioners to run the boundary line between Providencia and that of the Ex-Mission San Fernando. Also, by appointment of the superior court, he was one of the commissioners who partitioned the San Pedro, which contained about . In 1868 he was president of the Society of Southern California, of which he was one of the founders, and to the records of which he contributed many valuable papers of reminiscences.  Barrows was also one of the charter members of the founders of the of Los Angeles Pioneers. He wrote about one hundred sketches of early pioneers of Los Angeles, most of whom he knew personally, for the Illustrated History of Los Angeles County, issued in 1889. He also wrote the text of the Illustrated History of Central California, published in 1893. Barrows voted for every Republican candidate for president till 1900, when he voted for William J. Bryan. He believed that it had departed from its earlier dedication on behalf of universal freedom, and to the happiness of free and equal men. Henry Dwight Barrows died on August 7, 1914 in Los Angeles.References*  Henry Dwight Barrows* Los Angeles-Tehama-Solano County CA Archives biographies.....Barrows, Henry Dwight 1825 - 
25283282
William_Freudenburg
occupation  Author, ProfessorWilliam Robert Freudenburg, Ph.D. (November 2, 1951 &ndash; December 28, 2010) was born in Madison, Nebraska and grew up in Point, Nebraska. He was the Dehlsen Professor of Studies at UCSB.(Faculty web page, accessed 2009-12-08.) He died at his home in Santa Barbara, California, of cholangiocarcinoma (cancer of the duct).(Although he stressed that he is not opposed to traditional forms of environmentalism, which emphasize recycling and reducing ones impact on the environment, Freudenburgs work has a different emphasis.  He focused not so much on the role of individual consumers as those of organized producers, emphasizing the socially structured sources of environmental impacts. He was the President-Elect of the Association for Environmental Studies and Sciences (AESS).Education and careerFreudenburg completed his undergraduate work at the of Nebraska and then earned three graduate degrees, including his Ph.D., from University. He began his professional career at State University, then moved to the of Wisconsin, where he spent most of his professional career. During that time, a compilation by graduate students found Freudenburg to have published more articles on environment-society relationships in leading journals than anyone else.  While he was still on the faculty at Madison, he was nominated for an endowed professorship at the of California Santa Barbara, which he accepted, and he worked at UCSB until his death.Theory of Double DiversionFreudenburg has published a number influential ideas, but perhaps his central focus in recent years has been on what he calls the diversion.  Although he now teaches in the program that was established in part by Garrett Hardin,(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Garrett_Hardin) and he often stresses his high regard for Hardins work, the predictions that derive from his double diversion work are virtually the opposite of those associated with Hardins tragedy of the commons.(Hardin, Garrett, The Tragedy of the Commons.  Science 162 (13 December 1968): 1243-48.)  Rather than being due mainly to the actions of individual consumers, Freudenburg argues, much or most of all environmental harm is actually due to a small number of organized producers.  Contrary to the notion that environmental protection is bad for the economy and jobs, the worst sources of environmental harm are commonly due to a surprisingly small fraction of all economic activityand to an even smaller fraction of the jobs.  In the first peer-reviewed article in which this perspective was spelled out, for example, Freudenburg found that the majority of all toxic emissions in the U.S. economy came from industries that were responsible for only about 5% of the gross national productand just 1.4% of the nations jobs.(William R. Freudenburg, Privileged Access, Privileged Accounts:  Toward a Socially Structured Theory of Resources and Discourses. Social Forces 84.1 (2005) 89-114 http://repositories.cdlib.org/postprints/1445)PublicationsBlowout in the Gulf: The BP Oil Spill Disaster and the Future of Energy in AmericaHis most recent bookwritten with long-time collaborators Robert Gramling was published in October 2010. Blowout in the Gulf: The BP Oil Spill Disaster and the Future of Energy in America (Cambridge MIT Press)puts the BP blowout in historical and policy perspective.Catastrophe in the Making: The Engineering of Katrina and the Disasters of TomorrowCatastrophe was written with Robert Gramling, Shirley Laska and Kai Eriksonwas published in August 2009, on the fourth anniversary of Katrina:  Catastrophe in the Making: The Engineering of Katrina and the Disasters of Tomorrow.  (Washington, D.C.: Island Press, 2009)  Unlike most Katrina books, which tend to focus on the hurricanes aftermath, this one discusses the ways in which works projectssupposedly designed to bring greater prosperity to Orleans -- actually had little if any economic benefits, while potentially contributing to the storms devastation.  Particularly noteworthy in this connection was the Mississippi River-Gulf Outlet, or MRGO,(http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Mississippi_River_%E2%80%93_Gulf_Outlet_Canal) which did little to serve as an outlet for commerce, but did serve as a major inlet for salt water, which killed much of the vegetation that held together the fragile but formerly healthy wetlands to the southeast of New Orleans.along with sociologists Robert Gramling, Shirley Laska, and Kai Erikson provide the reader with a hurricane of New Orleans history, engineering data, and scholarly analysis, the authors argue that the New Orleans land development led to the creation of several canals intended to promote economic prosperity, which ironically resulted in the intended economic capital was never realized due to the excessive maintenance costs.  Instead, significant human capital was lost in 2004 as the canals and their subsequent environmental degradation exacerbated the impact of Katrina and her deadly floodwaters.Robbing Natures BankBefore he died, UCSB Professor William R. Freudenburg was working on another book tentatively titled Robbing Natures Bank, which focuses more on learning from problems of the past in order to prevent similar Unnatural Disasters in the future. He focuses less on the individual factors in harming the environment and points out that a large majority of this harm comes from organizational factors.Professional Positions and AwardsAmerican Association for the Advancement of Science*Secretary, Chair-Elect, Chair, 198697Named AAAS Fellow, 199798American Sociological Association*First Congressional Fellow to serve in U.S. House of Representatives, 198384Chair, Section on Environment and Technology, 198991Winner, Award for Distinguished Contributions to the Sociology of Environment and Technology, 199596Winner, Award for Best Article of the Year, Section on Political Sociology, American Sociological Association (with Harvey Molotch and Krista Paulsen, for History Repeats Itself, but How?)Association for Environmental Studies and Sciences*Co-founder and organizer of first professional conference, 2006President-Elect and Vice-President, 20092011National Academy of Sciences/National Academy of Engineering/National Research Council*Member or panelist for six committees or panels, 19842001Pacific Sociological Association*Winner, Award for Best Article of 1999-2000, (with Lisa Wilson and Dan OLeary, for Forty Years of Spotted Owls)Rural Sociological Society*Award of Merit winner, Natural Resources Research Group, 199091Winner, inaugural Frederick Buttel Award for Outstanding article (20042006) (for Privileged Access, Privileged Accounts, 2005)*President, 200405University of California, Santa Barbara, Residence Halls Association and Office of Residential Life*Outstanding Professor Award winner, 20062007Selected work*Alario, Margarita and Freudenburg, William R. The Paradoxes of Modernity: Scientific Advances, Environmental Problems, and Risks to the Social Fabric? Sociological Forum, Vol. 18, No. 2, (June 2003). http://www.es.ucsb.edu/faculty/freudenburg_pdf%27s/AlarioFreudSocForum03.pdf*Fisher, Dana R. and Freudenburg, William R. Ecological Modernization and Its Critics: Assessing the Past and Looking Toward the Future. Society and Natural Resources, 14:701709, 2001*Freudenburg, William R. Boomtowns Youth: The Differential Impacts of Rapid Community Growth on Adolescents and Adults. American Sociological Review, Vol. 49, No. 5 (Oct., 1984), 697-705. http://www.es.ucsb.edu/faculty/freudenburg_pdf%27s/BmtnYouthASR84pdf.pdf*Freudenburg, William R. The Density of Acquaintanceship: An Overlooked Variable in Community Research? The American Journal of Sociology, Vol. 92, No. 1 (Jul., 1986), 27-63*Freudenburg, William R. Perceived Risk, Real Risk: Social Science and the Art of Probabilistic Risk Assessment Science, New Series, Vol. 242, No. 4875 (Oct. 7, 1988), 44-49*Freudenburg, William R. A Good Business Climate as Bad Economic News?  Society and Natural Resources 3: 313-31.  http://repositories.cdlib.org/postprints/1411*Freudenburg, William R. Risk and Recreancy: Weber, the Division of Labor, and the Rationality of Risk Perceptions. Social Forces, Vol. 71, No. 4 (June 1993), 909-932.*Freudenburg, William R. Seeding Science, Courting Conclusions: Reexamining the Intersection of Science, Corporate Cash, and the Law Sociological Forum, Vol. 20, No. 1, March 2005  http://repositories.cdlib.org/postprints/638*Freudenburg, William R.  Privileged Access, Privileged Accounts: Toward a Socially Structured Theory of Resources and Discourses. Social Forces 84.1 (2005) 89-114 http://repositories.cdlib.org/postprints/1445*Freudenburg, William R., Frickel, Scott, and Gramling, Robert. Beyond the Nature/Society Divide: Learning to Think about a Mountain. Sociological Forum, Vol. 10, No. 3 (Sep., 1995), 361-392.*Freudenburg, William R. and Gramling, Robert. Oil in Troubled Waters: Perceptions, Politics, and the Battle over Offshore Drilling. Albany: SUNY Press, 1994.*Freudenburg, William R. and Gramling, Robert. How crude: Advocacy coalitions, offshore oil, and the self-negating belief. Policy Sciences 35: 17-41, 2002*Freudenburg, William R. and Jones, Timothy, R. Attitudes and Stress in the Presence of Technological Risk: A Test of the Supreme Court Hypothesis. Social Forces, Vol. 69, No. 4 (June 1991), 1143-1168.*Freudenburg, William R. and Gramling, Robert. Scientific Expertise and Natural Resource Decisions: Social Science Participation on Interdisciplinary Scientific Committees. Social Science Quarterly, Volume 83, Number 1, March 2002.*Freudenburg, William R. and Wilson, Lisa, J. Mining the Data: Analyzing the Economic Implications of Mining for Nonmetropolitan Regions. Sociological Inquiry, Vol. 72, No. 4, Fall 2002, 549-75.*Freudenburg, William R., Lisa J. Wilson, and Daniel OLeary. Forty Years of Spotted Owls? A Longitudinal Analysis of Logging-Industry Job Losses. Sociological Perspectives 41(1): 1-26, 1998.ReferencesExternal links*Web page at UCSB
25315664
Golden_Fleece_Mining_and_Milling_Company_(New_York)
The Golden Fleece Mining and Milling Company (New York), probably already founded in 1879,(Smythe, Roland Mulville: Obsolete American securities and corporations, New York, R. M. Smythe, Vol. 2, 1911, p. 424: Golden Fleece Mining Co. Stock dated about 1879. No value found to stock.) but incorporated on April 22, 1882 in County, New York,(Utica Morning Herald and Daily Gazette, April 19, 1882, p. 1: The Golden Fleece Mining and Milling company of Tompkins county with a capital of $1,000,000 was incorporated Monday.) with a capital of $1,000,000, was a San Francisco Stock and Exchange traded mining company.(The Morning San Francisco Call, February 3, 1892, p. 6: The Golden Fleece Mining Company has levied an assessment of $5 per share and the Butte King one of 3 Cents per share.)The company operated several mining sites, including at Deadwood, after driving a three thousand foot tunnel, the Golden Fleece Tunnel, and one mine near Georgetown, Creek County, Colorado,(Gold mines and mining in California : a new gold era dawning on the state, ..;  G. Spaulding & Co., 1885, p. 270-271.) The company reportedly also held some interests in gold mining in Creek, Arizona.(Daily Democrat, Aug. 4, 1884: Death of the Well-Known Merchant, John O. Marsh.)In September 1892, W. Peirce, the companys treasurer, bought the Fleece Mine (Colorado) for $50,000.,(Richard Walker Holmes, Marrianna B. Kennedy: Mines and minerals of the Great American Rift (Colorado-New Mexico), Van Nostrand Reinhold, 1983, p. 180-185; ISBN 0442280386, ISBN 9780442280383.)(Engineering and Mining Journal, vol. 145, 1944, p. 102 (ISSN 0095-8948, CODEN ENMJAK).) During that year the company seems to have raised its capital basis to finance its expansion. Probably the new capital stock of $600,000 was organized under another company, which was incorporated in Iowa in 1893, under the same name of Fleece Mining and Milling Company (Iowa).Management* W. Peirce was secretary and treasurer of the company.,(Corregan, R. A.; Lingane, D. F.: Colorado mining directory : containing an accurate description of the mines, mining properties and mills, and the mining, milling, smelting, reducing and refining companies and corporations of Colorado. Denver: Colo., 1883, p. 320 pp., here Mr. Peirce was given by mistake as Geo. W. Pence)(Mining Directory and Reference Book of the United States, Canada and Mexico., Chicago, Ill., Poole Bros., 1892, p. 209, here Mr. Peirce was given by mistake as Geo. W. Pence.) George W. Peirce was also secretary of Fleece Mining and Milling Company (Iowa), in 1893.* John Owen Marsh, born March 21, 1829 in McLean, died on August 1, 1884, was chosen president of the Golden Fleece Mining and Milling Company since April 1884. But his fortune as president of the company did not last long. An excerpt of the Daily Democrat from August 4, 1884 reads:ITHACA IN MOURNING. Death of the Well-Known Merchant, John O. Marsh:. Last April, Mr. Marsh became a member of the Golden Fleece Mining and Milling Company, and was at once elected its president. About four weeks ago, he started west on business connected with the affairs of the company, intending to be gone five or six weeks. He went first to Denver, Colorado, and after transacting some business there; continued his journey to Arizona Territory, where the property of the Golden Fleece Company is situated. It is supposed that he went first to Phoenix, Arizona Territory, and from there accompanied by Mr. S. F. Mack, the companys superintendent of mines, to Cave Creek, the location of the companys property. He then returned to Phoenix, having written one letter home meantime. Last Thursday, Mr. D. E. Marsh received a telegram from S. F. Mack, saying that Mr. Marsh was quite sick with fever but not considered dangerous, and that he was having good care. Another telegram the next day stated that the fever was typhoid, and the patient in a critical condition. Saturday morning a still more disheartening message was received, followed by another at three oclock in the afternoon with the sad tidings that Mr. Marsh commenced sinking at ten oclock last Friday night and died at midnight. * Henry Monell (born July 15, 1848 in Warwick (Bellvale), Orange County, N.Y.; died March 1922 in Boulder, Colorado, unmarried) was superintendent of the company,(Corregan, R. A.; Lingane, D. F.: Colorado mining directory : containing an accurate description of the mines, mining properties and mills, and the mining, milling, smelting, reducing and refining companies and corporations of Colorado. Denver : Colo., 1883, p. 320, pp.) very probably until 1883 and was a good mineralogist and prospected from Alaska to Mexico. Henry Monell had two brothers, Ira and Peter B. Monell, the last resided in Montross, Colorado. Ira and Henry Monell, both unmarried, were residents of Sugar Loaf, Colorado.(THE RISING STAR. Issued Monthly. John B. Bradner & Co., Publ. July 15, 1889. Information about the newspaper The Rising Star can be found here: http://www.rootsweb.ancestry.com/~txeastla/rising.htm) Mr. Monell played an important role in the development of the mining activities in Colorado.(Anderson, M. M.: The Mining Camps: Salina & Summerville. A mining and social history, 18591919, with many references to the Switzerland Trail of America railroad, 2006, 442 pp., ISBN 0-9772230-0-0). More information on the book can be found here: http://miningcamps.blogspot.com/)* Thomas Blake Campbell (born January 8, 1854, at Fayetteville, N.Y., died August, 1928 in Huntington;(The New York Times, August 12, 1928, p. 27: THOMAS BLAKE CAMPBELL; Builder of Many Cornell Buildings Dies in Huntington.) married Eaura Frances Poole on February 23, 1881), was an architect, contractor and builder of the Memorial Chapel, Franklin Hall, Armory Hall, Morse Hall, Gymnasium Annex, Sibley College, and the Psi and Delta Phi Chapter Houses, at Cornell University, was named to be a director of the company.(Poole, Murray Edward: The history of Edward Poole of Weymouth, Mass. (1635) and his descendants. Ithaca, N.Y.: Press of the Ithaca Democrat, 1893, p. 116-117.)* Stephen F. Mack, superintendent of the Golden Fleece Mining Company., He probably held this position after the resignation of Mr. Morell.After the death of Mr. Marsh, public concern was expressed on the prospects of the company. Excerpt of The Daily Democrat, August 9, 1884 reads:BACK FROM ARIZONA. Mr. Mack Returns with Particulars of Mr. Marshs Death:Mr. Stephen Mack, superintendent of the Golden Fleece Mining Company, and who was with the late John O. Marsh, when that gentleman died, one week ago to-day, arrived in town last evening. This morning he was immediately besieged by a host of inquiring friends who were anxious to learn further details concerning the death of our lamented fellow citizen. A DEMOCRAT representative called upon Mr. Mack at his residence on Green Street, and learned the following facts from him. When Mr. Marsh arrived in Arizona he was much wearied by the long, tedious journey, and the slight symptoms of illness which he then displayed were attributed to this cause. His sickness, however, increased so long before it developed into typhoid fever, the details and sad result of which have already been published. It is not necessary to give the particulars of the long days and sleepless nights that preceded the termination of the sad affair; it is sufficient to say that Mr. Mack affirms the statement that everything within the power of skillful medical attention and careful nursing was done to relieve the sufferer. In regard to the remains of the deceased, Mr. Mack says that it will be impossible to remove them to Ithaca until cold weather, for the frontier village where Mr. Marsh died is utterly void of those improved undertaking appliances for the preservation of remains so common in the east rapidly that it was not. When asked as to the prospects of the mining company which he represented, and the stock of which is largely owned by Ithaca gentlemen, Mr. Mack did not feel at liberty to talk upon that subject, although he said that he felt satisfied that they had a good claim. Mr. Mack left Arizona Sunday morning.The fate of the company is not known in detail, but very probably the interests and properties of the company were transferred to the Fleece Mining and Milling Company (Iowa), which was incorporated 1893 under the laws of Iowa. George W. Peirce was the secretary and treasurer of both companies.Golden Fleece Gold & Silver Mining Company, NevadaThe company should not be confounded with the Golden Fleece Gold & Silver Mining Company, Nevada incorporated on February 2, 1875.(Details on the company are held at the Nevada State Archives. Informations on out of business companies are summarized here:  http://nevadaculture.org/nsla/dmdocuments/NVSecretaryofState.pdf) The Golden Fleece Gold & Silver Mining Company held interest in gold and silver mining at Golden Fleece Mine (Nevada), in Peavine Mining District, near Nevada, Washoe County. The company was listed at San Francisco Stock Exchange, on the Washoe Board list.(King, Joseph L.: History of the San Francisco Stock and Exchange Board (Wall Street and the Security Market), 1910, 373 p., reprint: Arno Press, Inc. 1975, ISBN 0-405-06944-8)Today, this Nevada company is known in connection of legal proceedings against the Cable Consolidated Gold and Silver Mining Co. in relation to some mining claims. The results of this case, held before Supreme Court of the State of Nevada, are considered to be important for prevailing case law in mining in the United States.References
25342959
Betts_Cove,_Newfoundland_and_Labrador
 Betts Cove is a settlement in and Labrador.Betts Cove is now deserted.  It was once a mining center with a peak population of 2000.  It had a hospital, school and three churches.  Around the 1870s copper ore was mined, crushed and partially smelted.  The ore was then transported by tram railways over the cliffs to boats.  The ore was shipped to Swansea in Wales for final smelting.  By 1884 the ore began to run out and people left.  No buildings remain.References1. Geological survey paperExternal links1. Mining history in NewfoundlandTrivial Ken
25365594
Chamosite
Chamosite is the Fe2+end member of the group. A hydrous silicate of iron, which is produced in an environment of low to moderate grade of metamorphosed iron deposits, as gray or black crystals in oolitic iron ore. Like other chlorites, it is a product of the hydrothermal alteration of pyroxenes, amphiboles and biotite in rock. The composition of chlorite is often related to that of the original igneous mineral so that more fe-rich chlorites are commonly found as replacements of the fe-rich ferromagnesian minerals (Deer et al., 1992).HistoryIn 1820, Bertier; a mineralogist and mining engineer from Nemours, France, discovered chamosite. The new mineral was found in an area of low to moderate grade metamorphosed iron deposit. Early chamosite (which are chlorites) stirred some controversy after they discovered to have possessed the structure of kaolin rather than chlorite. But further research proved that chamosite was largely in existence with another phyllosilicate called berthierine (which has a kaolin type structure) which was rather difficult to distinguish from chamosites. Chamosite is named after the municipality of Chamoson, between Sion and Martigny, the canton of Valais, Switzerland.Structurediffraction(XRD) indicates that the proportion of 7  B layers in bertherine-chamosite ranges from 5 to 28%, and chemical analysis by electron microscope-X-ray spectroscopy (SEM-EDS) indicates positive correlation between %B and Fe/(Fe + Mg) (Ryan and Hillier, 2002). The chamosite structure is very similar to typical chlorite in which they are alternated regular layers with tetrahedral and tri-octahedral components(M.L. Rivas Sanchez et al., 2006). Its 2:1 layer structure is similar to that of mica, with a basal spacing of 14 . (M.L. Rivas Sanchez et al., 2006). In most common chlorites, there are 12.0 octahedral cations per O20(OH)16 and approximately equivalent amounts of aluminium in tetrahedral and octahedral sites the magnesia chlorite, clinochlore, (Mg10Al2)(Si6Al2O20)(OH)16 (Deer et al., 1992).Physical propertiesChamosite has a laminar shape, sheets measure from 20 to 200 m (M.L. Rivas Sanchez et al., 2006). Chamosite may be greenish gray or brown in color. The cleavage are length-slow, the orientation may be   csmall, b,   small, optic plane 10 (Heinrich, 1965) and has good cleavage on the {011} axis. It has a dull luster and grayish green streak. Birefringence is much lower than that of the micas, illites, montmorillonites and vermiculite, and refractive indices are higher than those of kaolinite (Deer et al. 1992). The chamosite spectra shows the reflection d7.18  (main value of the chlorite) and the reflection d14.4  (that confirms the presence of chlorite) (M.L. Rivas Sanchez et al., 2006).Geologic occurrenceChamosite is a relatively uncommon mineral in nature. Since its discovery in Chamoson, only about 15 localities around the world are known to be associated with iron deposits. Chamosite may be found in occurrence with other chlorite minerals. In recent years, berthierine; a more abundant chlorite, was discovered in occurrence with chamosite in the iron deposit of Colorada, Mexico. Chamosite is related to the beginning of a hydrothermal phase and occurs mainly in a mineralized breccia type stock-work in which it fills open spaces and replaces the hot rock through fissures (M.L. Rivas Sanchez et al., 2006). The Mamu-Nkporo formation in the locality of Okigwe, Nigeria was studied by Akande and Mucke (1993), and they concluded that the carbonate discovered with associated chamosite was formed in a shallow marine subtidal to intertidal environment developed during periods of rise and fall in sea level. Formation of chamosite bearing oolites record periods of increasing wave energy corresponding to storm conditions between quiet shallow marine sedimentation,(Akande and Mucke, 1993). Chamosite is a mineral from which elements may be extracted for commercial purpose. City in Yunnan Province has one of the highest lung cancer mortality rates in China (Dai, S. et al., 2008). This epidemic had long been blamed on hydrocarbons released from the burning of coal.  Dai, S. et al. (2008) conducted a mineralogical and geochemical study of coal from two coal mines in this region, and identified chamosite as one of the main minerals in the coal.References*Akande S.O., and Mucke A. (1993). Depositional environment and diagnosis of carbonates at the Mamu-Nkporo formation,    Anambra basin, Southern Nigeria. Journal of African Earth Sciences 17, 445-456.*Dai, S., and Chou, C.L. (2007) Occurrence and origin of minerals in a chamosite-bearing coal of Late Permian age, Zhaotong, Yunnan, China. Mineralogist 92, 1253-1261.*Dai S., Tian L., Chou C.L., Zhou Y., Zhang M., Zhao L., Wang J., Yang Z., Cao H., Ren D. (2008) Mineralogical and compositional characteristics of Late Permian coals from an area of high lung cancer rate in Xuan Wei, Yunnan, China: Occurrence and origin of quartz and chamosite. International Journal of Coal Geology, Volume 76, Issue 4, 1 December 2008, Pages 318-327 *G.W Brindley and R.F Youell (1953) Ferrous chamosite and ferric chamosite. The Mineralogical Society 30, 57-70.*Heinrich, E.W., 1965 Microscopic Identification of Minerals, McGraw-Hill Book Company,*Saccocia, P.J., and Seyfried, W.E. (1993). A resolution of discrepant thermodynamic properties For chamosite retrieved from experimental and empirical techniques. American Mineralogist 78, 607-611.*Iijima A., and Matsumoto R. (1982). Berthierine and Chamosite in coal measures of Japan. Clays and Clay Minerals, 30, 264-274 *R.F Youell (1955). Mineralogy and Crystal structure of chamosite. Nature 176, 560-561.*W.A. Deer, R.A Howie and Zussman (1992). An introduction to the rock forming minerals. Prentice Hall N.Y**M.L. Rivas Sanchez et al.(2006). Berthierine and chamosite hydrothermal: Genatic guides in the Pea Colorada magnetite-ore bearing deposit. Earth Planets Space, 58, 13891400*P.C. Ryan and S. Hillier (2002).Berthierine / Chamosite and discrete chlorite from evolved Verdine and evaporate-associated facies in the Jurassic sundance formation, Wyoming. American Mineralogist, 87, 1607-1615.External links*http://webmineral.com/specimens/picshow.php?id1654&targetChamositeca:Chamositade:Chamosites:Chamositafa:fr:Chamositeit:Chamositehe:sk:Chamositsl:Hamozit
25378491
Ravensthorpe_Nickel_Mine
The Ravensthorpe Nickel Mine is a nickel mine located 33 km east of Western Australia.Ravensthorpe cost BHP Billiton US$2.2 billion to build but led to $3.6 billion in write-downs when it was shut down in January 2009, after less than a year of operation. The closure caused considerable bad publicity for the owner, prompting the operation to be placed on the market.(BHP offloads Ravensthorpe nickel mine Ninemsn.com.au, published: 9 December 2009, accessed: 10 December 2009) The mine was sold in December 2009 to Quantum Minerals for US$340 million.(Canadas First Quantum wins bid to revive Ravensthorpe nickel mine Australian, published: 10 December 2009, accessed: 10 December 2009)HistoryMining in Ravensthorpe considerably predates the current nickel mine, with gold discoveries dating back to 1898. The town experienced a down turn after the World War but mining for copper continued up until the 1970s.(Mining Shire of Ravensthorpe website, accessed: 10 December 2009) A railway line connected Ravensthorpe with the port of Hopetoun from 1901 to 1925, when the line was closed.(Hopetoun Sydney Morning Herald, published: 8 February 2004, accessed: 10 December 2009)Billiton commenced a feasibility study in 2002 into opening a nickel and cobalt mine and processing plant at the cost of A$1.4 billion() 35 km East of the town.The project was approved in 2004 and construction commenced shortly afterward. The plant known as the Ravensthorpe Nickel Project was commissioned in late 2007 with first production occurring in October and the first 5,000 tonnes being produced by December 2007.() The plant was officially opened in 2008, after massive cost blow outs and delays. Production was expected to total 50,000 tonnes of nickel per year.()In January 2009, BHP Billiton announced that it was suspending production at the Ravensthorpe nickel mine indefinitely, due the reduction in world nickel prices caused by the global economic crisis. The decision cut 1,800 jobs and was expected to have a major impact on the local economy.( ) Nickel prices, having reached a high of US$50,000 per tonne in May 2007, had fallen to under $11,000 per tonne by the time of the mines closure.(BHP Ravensthorpe nickel mine on brink of closure Perth.now.com.au, published: 18 January 2009, accessed: 10 December 2009) The closure had a devastating effect on the local communities of Ravensthorpe and Hopetoun and led to BHP Billiton being heavily criticised for its handling of the closure.(Ravensthorpe nickel mine sale ABC News, published: 10 December 2009, accessed: 10 December 20)On 9 December 2009, BHP sold the operation to Vancouver-based First Quantum Minerals for US$340 million. First Quantum was one of three bidders for the mine and actually produced the lowest offer. The Canadian company plans to have the mine back in production in mid-2011 by investing US$125 million in the operations. First Quantum won the bid despite offers from Minara Resources at US$360 million and Poseidon Nickel at US$400 million being higher than theirs.( BHP Billiton said that the lower price was accepted due to fewer conditions being imposed by the tenderer. The sale of the mine was subject to approval of the Australian Foreign Investment Review Board and the Western Australian government.(First Quantum announcement on the purchase of the mine published: 9 December 2009, accessed: 10 December 2009) First Quantum announced the completion of the acquisition on 10 February 2010.(First Quantum Minerals Announces Finalization of the Acquisition of the Ravensthorpe Nickel Operation, Western Australia First Quantum news releases, published: 10 February 2010, accessed: 4 June 2010)First Quantum expects an annual production of 39,000 tonnes of nickel for the first five years of production and an average of 28,000 tonnes per year for the mines projected lifetime of 32 years.(ProductionRavensthorpe, while in operation, was part of BHPs Nickel West operations, which included, apart from Ravensthorpe, the Mount Keith Nickel Mine, Leinster Nickel Mine, the Kambalda Nickel Concentrator, the Kalgoorlie Nickel Smelter and the Kwinana Nickel Refinery.(Nickel West BHP Billiton website, accessed: 11 December 2009) Production figures published by the company at the end of 2008 are for the whole Nickel West Operations and not broken down to individual mines. In the calendar year 2008, when Ravensthorpe was active, Nickel West produced 85,800 tonnes of nickel.(BHP BILLITON QUARTERLY PRODUCTION REPORT - DECEMBER 2008 Page: 11, published: 21 January 2009, accessed: 11 December 2009) See also *Billiton Ravensthorpe Nickel Project References  External links * Place Names Search Results - Ravensthorpe Australia website* First Quantum Minerals website* Information on historic Ravensthorpe and early mining activities
25398824
Lafayette_Holbrook
Lafayette Holbrook (September 7, 1850  January 1, 1941)() was mayor of Utah, from 18941897 and an unsuccessful candidate for the States House of Representatives in 1896.Holbrook was born in Lake City.  A year after his birth his father, Chandler Holbrook, helped found Utah and that is where Holbrook was raised.  Holbrook attended the University of Deseret, the predecessor of the University of Utah.  He was for many years involved in the ranching business, bringing cattle and pigs from Texas and Kansas to Utah.From 1873-1875 Holbrook served as an missionary in England.  In 1876 he married Emily Angeline Hinckley, the daughter of N. Hinckley.  In later years Holbrook was involved in mercantile activities in Utah and Utah and was an owner of mining companies in the Region along the Utah/ Juab County line and in the Detroit Mining District in County, Utah.  In 1896 Holbrook was the Republican Candidate for United States House of Representatives from Utah.  In 1901 he became a counselor in the presidency of the Utah Stake. Notes  Sources * bio of Holbrook
25412031
Brazil__Peoples_Republic_of_China_relations
Brazil  Peoples Republic of China relations refers to the current and historical relationship between Brazil and the Republic of China. Relations between Brazil and China began in the early nineteenth century and continued until 1949, when they were disrupted by the creation of the Peoples Republic of China. Diplomatic relations between China and Brazil officially began in 1974 with agreement on the establishment and operation of Brazils Embassy in Beijing and Chinas Embassy in Brasilia. Since then, bilateral ties have witnessed a smooth development in all fields.The growing economic and political relationship between the two countries was confirmed by Lulas visit to China, which included 450 Brazilian business representatives. Brazilian foreign minister Celso Amorim noted that the growing relationship could be part of a reconfiguration of the worlds commercial and diplomatic geography.()HistoryAn early joint undertaking involving Brazil and China began in 1812, when Queen I of Portugal, then based in Brazil, imported Chinese laborers to work on a tea plantation near de Janeiro. In 1900, a fresh wave of immigrants from China settled in Paulo.(Some Recent Features of Brazil-China Economic Relations CEBC.org, April 2009)Formal relations ended with the 1949 Chinese Revolution and were re-established  in 1974.(In the 21st century Brazilian businessmen have been somewhat frustrated by what the Financial Times have described as a slow pace of development for some aspects of the relationship. For example, Brazil officially recognised China as a market economy in 2004 but by 2009 the corresponding changes to the trading arrangements had not been implemented.  However agreement had been reached on a wide range of issues, and an outstanding personal relationship had been established between the two nations presidents. In 2010 the second BRIC Summit was held in Brazil, with proposals made for increased cooperation between Brazil and China on political and trade related issues as well as energy, mining, financial services and agriculture.()()Chinese President Hu Jintao said in his address to the Brazilian Congress on November 12, 2004, that both Latin America and China have similar experiences in gaining national liberation, defending national independence and constructing the country. Therefore, both sides have the same feelings and common languages. He said that Sino-Latin American relations were expected to support each other in the political fields, strengthen economic complementarily, and carry out close cultural contacts.() EconomicsChina became Brazils largest trading partner in 2009.((Malcolm Moore, China overtakes the US as Brazils largest trading partner, The Telegraph, 9 May 2009) Former Brazilian President Incio Lula da Silva and many in the Brazilian media consider China to be Brazils most promising business partner and a strategic ally due to Chinas rapidly rising demand for raw materials and agricultural produce.(Economic Relations between  Brazil and China: A Difficult Partnership Ebert Foundation, January 2006) Bilateral trade grew from US$ 6.7 billion in 2003 to US$ 36.7 billion in 2009.(In Brazil, Hu Jintao aims for bigger piece of Latin America trade Science Monitor, 15 April 2010)China and Brazil cooperate economically on quite some mutual beneficial projects such as the already in 1988 preparations for a joint project to construct the Earth Resources Satellite program, which in 1999 and 2002 successfully constructed two satellites providing key information on (new sources of) natural resources. Secondly, an International Satellite Communications company (INSCOM) was set up as a joint venture.() Other projects in the range  of the Earth Resources Satellite are the construction of Puerto de Au near de Janeiro, which can handle Chinamax containerships to import and export raw materials and manufactures vice versa(). The construction of a continental pipeline in Brazil. Other major important infrastructure investment like roads and high speed trains().Chinese investment in Brazil takes strategical approaches and does so in strategical areas to consolidate Chinas role in the Brazilian economy, this creates economical leverage, expands the zone of influence of Chinese companies in Brazil and increases interdependency. Chinese investments in Brazil are concentrated mainly in the energy, mining, steel and oil industries().In 2010, despite the generally friendly and close relationship, Brazil was one of the few emerging economies to publicly criticise Chinas policy in relation to the so called war. Brazil has called for China to allow a faster appreciation of her currency, which would help other countries to better compete against Chinese exports. Brazil also criticised US policy, saying both China and the US should seek to avoid escalating economic tension concerning trade and currency.()()Timeline See also * relations of Brazil* relations of the Peoples Republic of China References External links* China to reinforce strategic partnership with Brazil: envoy Daily, 2 January 2011* Bridging the Distance: Brazil and China Relations in the Age of Globalization  Studies Association May 6, 2009* The Panda Hugs the Tucano: Chinas Relations with Brazil Jamestown Foundation, 15 May 2009* Brazils China Headache on Foreign Relations, 14 December 2009* New Stage in Relations: China, Brazil to Build, Launch Earth Satellite Angeles Times, 8 July 2008 entre Brasil e China
25437312
Allan_Greenberg
thumb|Allan Greenberg (born September 1938, Johannesburg, South Africa), is an American architect and one of the leading classical architects of the late twentieth century. He was the originator and leading practitioner of canonical classicism, one of many design responses to postmodernism emerging in the mid-1970s.(M. Roth, American Architecture: A History (Boulder, CO: Westview Press, 2003): 500-501.)  According to Goldberger, architecture critic for The New York Times, Greenbergs lifes work has been a mission to establish the validity of classicism as an architectural language in our time. (Paul Goldberger, A Classical Showpiece.  The New York Times Magazine 135 (May 1986): 78-83, 91.) In addition to his architecture, Greenbergs articles, teaching, and lectures have exerted a strong influence on the study and practice of contemporary classicism. In 2006, he was the first American to be awarded the H. Driehaus Prize for Classical Architecture in recognition of his major contributions to architectural design and scholarship.  The prize is awarded annually to a living architect whose work embodies the principles of traditional and classical architecture and urbanism in contemporary society and creates a positive, long-lasting cultural, environmental, and artistic impact.(http://www.driehausprize.org) George Hersey, author and professor of Art History at Yale University, wrote:Greenberg is the most knowing, most serious practitioner of Classicism currently on the scene in this country. . . . Greenberg belongs in the succession of Follen McKim, Burnham, Bacon, Russell Pope, and Arthur Brown.  And above all he belongs to the succession of Greece and Rome, of Vignola and Sanmicheli, of Vanvitelli, Ledoux, and Labrouste, to the visionary company of those who play the great game of Classicism.(Hersey, G.L. Allan Greenberg and the Classical Game. Architectural Record 173 (October 1985): 160-61.)Biography and careerBorn in Johannesburg, South Africa, Greenberg was educated at the University of Witwatersrand, where he studied classical and Gothic architecture. He worked for leading Scandinavian modernist architects Utzon, with whom he worked on the Sydney Opera House, and Revell. After receiving his Master of Architecture degree from Yale University in 1965, he spent two years in the City of New Havens Redevelopment Agency and later served as Architectural Consultant to Connecticuts Chief Justice from 1967 to 1979. He has taught at Yale Universitys School of Architecture and School of Law, the University of Pennsylvania, the Division of Historic Preservation at Columbia University, and the University of Notre Dame.  Greenberg received his U.S. citizenship in 1973.  He is married to painter Judith Seligson.Allan Greenberg, Architect, LLC was established in 1972 and has offices in Washington, D.C., New York City, and Greenwich, Connecticut. Its work covers a broad range of buildings in the United States and overseas. Projects include master plans, feasibility studies, new construction, renovations, restorations, and interior and furniture design for academic, institutional, religious, commercial, residential, and retail clients.Greenberg has written both scholarly and popular books and articles on the dynamic and enduring qualities of traditional architecture and design. His extensive body of published work includes the books George Washington, Architect (1999), The Architecture of Democracy: American Architecture and the Legacy of the Revolution (2006), and Lutyens and the Modern Movement (2007).  A monograph of his work appeared in 1995; Monacelli Press will publish a second monograph in 2011.Major projects*State Library and Supreme Court Building,  addition (in association with Russell Gibson von Dohlen, Hartford, Connecticut, 1970)*Superior Court Building (Manchester, Connecticut, 19791980)*Goodman, new faade (New York, New York, 19831984)*Treaty Ceremony Room, Antechambers, and Reception Rooms, United States Department of State (Washington D.C., 19851986)*Offices of the Secretary of State, United States Department of State (Washington D.C., 198789)*The News Building (Athens, Georgia, 19881992)*J. Wilson Newman Pavilion, The Miller Center of Public Affairs, University of Virginia (Charlottesville, Virginia, 19881990)*Tercentenary Hall (now McGlothlin-Street Hall), College of William and Mary (Williamsburg, Virginia, 19891995)*Gore Hall, University of Delaware (Newark, Delaware, 19951998)*Tommy Hilfiger Flagship Store (now Brothers)  (Beverly Hills, California, 19951997)*Unicorn Mining Headquarters (London, Kentucky, 19971999)*Humanities Building, Rice University (Houston, Texas, 19972000)*Supreme Court Historical Society, renovation (Washington, D.C., 19981999)*DuPont Hall, University of Delaware (Newark, Delaware, 19982002)*Aaron Burr Hall, Princeton University (Princeton, New Jersey, 20032005)Selected bibliography*A Classical Touch for an Unruly Faade.  New York Times (Nov. 6, 2006).*Clarke, Gerald. In the Georgian Fashion. Architectural Digest (October 2009): 132-39.*Conroy, S. Claire.  At Home with the Past:  Allan Greenberg Makes the Familiar Fresh Again. Residential Architect  (September/October 2002): 56-67.*Gagn, Nicole V. Allan Greenberg. Traditional Building 17:5 (September/October 2004):  16.*Goldberger, Paul.  In Perpetuum. Architectural Record 174 (April 1986): 110-21.*Langdon, Philip.  Modern Classics:  Allan Greenbergs Houses Reflect the Revival of the Classical Tradition. The Atlantic 265.1 (January 1990): 86+.*Lubow, Arthur.  The Ionic Man. Departures No. 57 (May/June 1999): 156-63, 220.*Reiss, Gwen North. A Class Act.  Connecticut Cottages & Gardens (January 2007).*Rybczynski, Witold. Something Old, Something New: A Prize-Winning Architect at Princeton. Slate Magazine (Feb. 1, 2006).*Schmertz, M. F. Design for Diplomacy. Architectural Record 173 No. 12 (1985): 152-59.*Ward, Logan. Old Town Revival. Southern Accents (Sept.-Oct. 2005): 94-100.*Westfall, C. W.  Allan Greenberg and the Difficult Whole of Architecture. In Allan Greenberg, Selected Works, 6-10.  London: Academy Editions, 1995.ReferencesExternal links* http://www.allangreenberg.com Allan Greenberg, Architect, LLC* http://www.driehausprize.org Official site of the Richard H. Driehaus Prize
